,content,domain,fake,conspiracy,political,junksci,unreliable,bias,hate,reliable,satire,clickbait,unknown,rumor
159256,"











In one way or another, you have stumbled upon on an Apple device. Even if you are not an owner of one, we’re sure you are familiar with the new iPhones, MacBooks, iPads, and iMacs that come out each year. Apple is undeniably one the biggest and most valuable tech companies of our modern society. Being an Apple user is truly rewarding and it can make you feel like you are one step closer to the latest technology.

A lot of people don’t really mind the specific details when it comes to their gadgets. Some just want to be able to say that they have an Apple product but, did you know there are ways you can follow to maximize your value as an Apple customer? Some former employees of Apple were kind enough to spill some juicy secrets that might be very helpful for your next purchase.

Replace Instead Of Repair

Many people unintentionally drop their phone every minute. In many occasions, they need to go to the Apple store for a pricey repair. Since an employee said that the iPhone 6 camera slowly distorts your image, you can actually use that reason in order to get a free replacement when you bring in your cracked phone. You sign a legal document before being able to have your device sent for repair so think twice before you attempt to get away with something.

Employees Are Very Smart

When you walk into an Apple store, employees are the friendliest people on earth. Don’t be too quick to judge because these employees are very smart and not gullible. They know when you lie and make excuses for what really happened to your device. One person already said his device was damaged after being abducted by aliens while another customer said that his laptop had “water” damage where in fact, it was damaged by a clear/gooey substance that we’re pretty sure wasn’t related to water…

Also, if you talk to a Specialist employee rather than one of the Geniuses, odds are that they will sell you unnecessary add-on or the highest GB available. However, at the end of the day, Apple employees have to remain professional no matter what—even if they find your “private” photos during a data migration.

Yes, Yes, and Yes!

Have you ever watched Jim Carrey’s movie, Yes Man, wherein “no” wasn’t in his vocabulary? Same thing goes for Apple employees for they are not really supposed to say “no” to their customers. But don’t be silly, they won’t say yes when you ask if they can give you an iPhone or MacBook for free.

Open Entry For Robbers?

Apple stores are known for having devices and products just lying around or are in easy-reach for the customers. Their devices don’t really have security tags, so robbers might feel free to take a risk. If you’re one of them who is planning to rob an Apple store, you can try your best to snag one of these devices but rest assured that the store itself has numerous security tricks up its sleeve.

What It Takes To Wear An Apple On Your Chest

How does one become an Apple employee you may ask? Some of them say that becoming an employee is even harder than applying for an Ivy League school. Even just scoring an interview would be tough, but, if you can get a referral from someone who is already working for them, then it’s your lucky day.

Apple employees don’t really know that much when it comes to the latest technologies and new products of the company. Employees also seldom get discounts but they are rewarded with a plaque by the Apple CEO when they reach the 5-year and 10-year mark of working with the company.

Customer 101

Yes, you are treasured as an Apple customer but you should also know how to treat the employees and store with respect. Some customers think they will get prioritized when they raise their tone at employees. This doesn’t do anything good because employees choose to shrug off the problems of disrespectful customers.

One common problem customers have is when they have to wait a long time in the store even if they already booked an appointment. You’ll really need a lot of patience because appointments at the Apple store are usually triple booked. Don’t worry because you can roam around the store and play with any device for as long as you want. They only have one rule: Don’t Stink!

At the rate Apple is going, we bet this company would still be making a crazy amount of money 20-50 years from now. Well, that’s if a zombie apocalypse doesn’t happen. *fingers crossed*. We hope this list was a big help to you and we’re sure your next Apple experience would be 10x more exciting.

Now that you know Apple’s secrets, how would you act different?",loanpride.com,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
375942,"











A lot of newbie photographers want to buy a digital camera but usually, they don’t know about all of the factors they should keep in mind when making this type of purchase. Even though there are many articles that focus on different features of a digital camera or give suggestions on which models you should focus on, there are also a few questions and basic factors to keep in mind when deciding which camera is best suited for you.

Let’s get onto some important tips when buying a digital camera:

How to Buy a Digital Camera

1. Determine what you need exactly

The most common mistake most first-time digital camera buyers make is that they get stuck into buying cameras which are beyond their actual needs. Before buying, there are some questions you need to ask yourself:

Why do you need the camera for?

What kind of photography will you be doing? (portraits, landscapes, macro, sports)

What conditions will you be mostly photographing in? (indoors, outdoors, low light, bright light)

Will you stay in auto mode or do you wish to learn the art of photography?

What experience level do you have with cameras?

What type of features are you looking for? (long zoom, image stabilization, large LCD display etc)

How important is size and portability to you?

What is your budget?

These questions will put you in a much better position when making the decision to buy a pro camera. In many ways, you will find the salesperson asking you the same questions – so, having answered them beforehand will help you and them as well.

2. Megapixels aren’t everything

These days, one of the most prominent features that you will find while selling digital cameras or phone camera’s is how many megapixels a digital camera has.

A few years back, the megapixel rating of cameras was an important feature as most cameras were at the lower end as compared to today’s modern day range and having 1-megapixel increase was quite significant.

However, these days, with most new cameras come with at least 5 megapixels, this feature is not so crucial. In fact, having an upper end of the range can actually be a disadvantage to have images as it occupies an enormous amount of space on memory cards and computers.

So, one important question you need to ask yourself when it comes to megapixels is– ‘Will you print those shots’? If so, then how large they are going to be? If you are printing images at a normal size then anything above 4 megapixels is fine. If you are going to start blowing your images up then you will have to pay the extra money for something at the upper end of what’s on offer today.

3. Keep in mind the ‘extras’

While buying, keep in mind that the price quoted is not the final outlay that you have to make as there are a variety of other extras that you may need or want to fork out, including:

Camera Case

Memory Cards

Spare Batteries/Recharger

Lenses (if you are getting a DSLR)

Filters (and other lens attachments)

Tripods/Monopods

External Flashes

Reflectors

Some retailers bundle the above-listed extras with cameras or at least give a discount when purchasing more than one item at once. Know that though what they offer in bundles may not meet your needs. For instance, it’s common to get a 16 or 32-megabyte memory card with cameras but these days you may probably want something at least of 500 megabytes if not a gigabyte or two.

4. Do you already own any potentially compatible gear?

One way to save some cash is to see if you have accessories from your previous digital cameras that are compatible with your new one.

For instance, batteries, memory cards, lenses (keep in mind that most film camera lenses are actually compatible with the digital SLRs from the same manufacturers), flashes, filters etc.

5. DSLR or Point and Shoot?

Even though these days DSLRs are getting more affordable, they are not for everyone. Keep in mind that they are usually heavier, bigger, harder to keep clean and are quite complicated to operate than point and shoot. However, there are also some upsides too.

If you are trying to make a decision, you can consult with this guide: Should you buy a DSLR or a Point and Shoot Digital Camera?

6. Optical Zooms are the King

Keep in mind that not all ‘zooms’ are created equally.

When you look at different models of digital cameras you may often hear their zooms talked about in two different ways. First is the ‘optical zoom’ and the other is ‘digital zoom’.

Experts recommend that you take into consideration the ‘optical zoom’ when deciding which camera to buy. Digital zooms only enlarges the pixels in your shot which makes your subject look bigger, however, it also makes it look more pixelated making your picture ‘noisier’.

And if you are looking for zoom lens, then, make sure it’s an optical zoom ( modern cameras have at least 3x in length – ie they will make your subject three times as big – with an increasing array of ‘super zooms’ coming into the market at up to 12x Optical Zoom).

7. Read reviews

Before purchasing a digital camera take your time to do a little research. Don’t just rely on the advice of the salesperson.

Get some reviews from the digital camera magazines or online to help you narrow down the area. There are some good websites that give expert and user reviews on every camera available on the market. Make sure to use these free resources while you’re still in time to make the right decision.

8. Hands-On Experience

Now that you have narrowed down your search with the handful of cameras, you can consider yourself to be well-prepared to head into your local digital camera shop. There is nothing like having a camera in your hands to work out if it suits your needs.

9. Negotiate

After you have selected the best suited digital camera, it’s time to find the best price.

Once again, do some research to find the most competitive prices on the models you are interested in. With these in hand, you will be in a good position to negotiate in person with local stores or with online stores. In general, retail stores negotiate on price and often throw in freebies. Online stores are quite difficult – most bigger ones don’t give you the facility to negotiate however smaller ones does if you email them.

Don’t forget to ask for discounted bonuses including memory cards, camera cases, extra batteries, filters, free prints, cases etc. Do negotiate from the phone and only then go into a store to pick up the camera once the price is settled.

What’s Your Best Suggestion to Give When Buying a Digital Camera?

Leave Your Comment",loanpride.com,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
159262,"











We are sure most of you have seen movies like Big Hero 6 or Real Steal and instantly dreamed of robots coming to real life. With how ahead technology is getting with Face ID or Virtual Reality gaming, robots are actually something that is relatively far from fiction these days.

Can you imagine a world where robots actually served as cashiers, waiters, construction workers, or even hospital staff? Might be amusing at first but are these robots actually posing a threat to our modern society? Is a war between humans and robots a possibility in the future?

Robots vs Doctors

Don’t think robots can’t be as advanced as they are in the movies? Well, it’s time for you to start accepting the fact that robots are real and they might even be taking over your jobs. They have been recently known for causing a shift in employment because a lot of jobs the were formerly done by humans are now being given to real life metal machines.

China has been one of the front-liners when it comes to science and technology and just recently, they introduced the Hospital Robot. Don’t get us wrong though, because these robots are still far from being human-like and are somehow showing a bit of resemblance to R2-D2 from Star Wars.

Hospital robots in China

The hospital robots named “Noah” are found in the Guangzhou Women and Children’s Hospital in China. They are a total of eight robots who serve as some sort of a messenger. They are mostly used to transport medicines, documents, and hospital equipment. They are quite sturdy because they can carry things that weigh up to 650 pounds.

These robots are equipped with some of the latest technologies available. They won’t get lost in the hospital because they have GPS technology that can take them to any part of the hospital. Let’s just hope they know how to differentiate stairs from an elevator because the last thing the hospital would want is millions of dollars thrown away just because of an accident.

Robots In, Humans Out

The heads of the hospital put great trust in these robots. They trust in their potential so much that four hospital workers might actually have to say goodbye to their current jobs. You can compare this situation with people who used to work in parking lots. Ever since automated ticket machines were created, a lot of people who used to give and receive tickets at the parking lots lost their jobs.

These robots are said to ease the burdens of some nurses when it comes to going around the hospital. Some nurses seem like they’ve entered a walkathon with the amount of walking they have to do during a normal workday. “Noah” is not programmed to be a quiet machine for it can actually say phrases like, “Here I go!”, “I’m entering the lift!”, and “I’ve been obstructed!”

“Noah” delivering medical supplies

They lower the risk of contamination that can happen in the hospital since they don’t contain any bacteria whatsoever. These high-tech robots don’t come cheap since they have a $$100,000 price tag.

We wonder how much more will it cost the hospital for the maintenance of these robots…Thankfully, these hospital ‘helpers’ (or “Noah”) are still in a trial phase so no one has to be fired—yet. As of now, they are just used for the errands that need to be done for the hospital pharmacy and nurses station.

These hospitals robots seem pretty safe so far. We mean, it doesn’t really show potential threats like the lifelike robot Sophia who is equipped with artificial intelligence and is smart enough to engage in a conversation with a human being. We feel like humans have been watching too many movies that they already overlook the threats their lust for modern technology can bring. Elon Musk who is famous for SpaceX and Tesla already shared his thoughts about the risk artificial intelligence has added that an AI apocalypse is possible.

Who knows if humans will ever know their limits when it comes to technology. We wouldn’t want a scene from the Terminator to actually happen, right? For now, robots who help with everyday chores and activities are fine but what will happen when inventors actually build robots that can cover 100% of the things humans do?",loanpride.com,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
159269,"











Would you have ever imagined breastfeeding to become a reason for someone to be taken to court? We mean, there are a lot of odd cases in court these days but is breastfeeding really a valid reason for a lawsuit? For TV Host, Nicole Curtis, this was one of the key factors that led her and her ex to an eventful custody battle for their 2 and a half-year-old son, Harper.

Who Is Nicole Curtis?

Nicole Curtis became known through her work as a host on the show, Rehab Addict. Don’t be deceived, you might think that this show was about her dealing with people in-and-out of rehab because of a certain addiction.

The show is actually about pre-World War II homes being renovated into nice modern mansions. The show aired for 7 seasons so it is safe to say that she made a lot of money through this hosting stint.

She seems like she has such a beautiful life because of how she presents herself on-screen but she had quite the not-so-colorful past. Back in 1997 when she was only 18 years old, she gave birth to her first son named Ethan.

Being a teenage mother might have been hard for her since she was forced to find means and ways to earn a living. She first worked at IHOP and eventually ended up booking a job as a waitress at Hooters. Not only was being a waitress her source of income for she also earned through cleaning houses. At a young age, she had to act way beyond her years.

The Custody Battle

Last July of 2015, she gave birth to son Harper whose father is a businessman named Shange Maguire. Throughout her whole pregnancy, she actually kept it a secret even if she was filming for her show. They strategically used props on set to hide her baby bump.

She claims that she wanted her second pregnancy to be private and even wanted to raise him without any help whatsoever. When Harper was six-months-old, Shane took a paternity test and found out he was the father. He was later granted visitation rights but this just started some conflict.

Nicole with sons Harper (left) and Ethan (right)

Ever since Harper was born, Nicole has breastfed him. She never stopped breastfeeding him even up until this day. She said that even if she wants to stop, it is her son who demands to be breastfed. A lot of people on the internet have criticized her regarding this choice to continue breastfeeding her 30-month old son. Since Harper was growing up to be an exclusively breastfed baby, Nicole didn’t know how she would end up feeding him when he spends time with his dad since she was unable to produce enough breastmilk to pump into a bottle.

Blaming Breastfeeding

Unhappy with what was happening, Shane took Nicole to court because he claimed that she used breastfeeding as her way to stop him from seeing Harper. Nicole’s side was very contradicting to his statement because she says stopping breastfeeding just for him to see Harper was not right at all. The two ex-lovers never saw eye to eye and had a custody battle that lasted for two years. She eventually won the case and was granted the benefit of breastfeeding Harper once a day during his dad’s visitations since she proved that she really can’t produce breast milk through a pump.

It is no doubt that Nicole Curtis had been through a lot and we salute her for actually staying strong amidst all the drama that has happened in her life. She was able to write a book called Better Than New: Lessons I’ve Learned from Saving Old Homes (And How They Saved Me). She talked about her not-so-good relationships, being a teen mom, and getting through financial struggles.

Being thrown so many obstacles in life, a lot of people actually expected her to fail and give up. Nicole says that her source of strength and motivation was her two sons. She once shared the statement, “As long as you put your family first, everything else will work out.” Fortunately, her relationship with her ex Shane has been better. Although their relationship is very far from perfect, we’re sure they will eventually be able to provide a very good future for their son.

Can you prevent breast feeding from a child when he asks for it?",loanpride.com,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
375955,"











The concept of struggle and redemption is an integral part of life and as humans we love classic stories of people who turned all odds in their favor and acquired huge fortunes overnight. This is a story of one such guy whose luck suddenly turned around after a very dark period in his life.

Facing Trauma

Years ago, Loren Krytzer had a successful carpentry business, a family and a decent house in California that he was able to afford along with other luxuries in life. Year 2007 proved to be tough for Krytzer after an unfortunate car accident took away his career and happiness from him.

Following the accident, Krytzer spent most of his time in hospitals getting treatment for his injuries. Meanwhile, there was no one to look after his business and money was running out quickly. The crash of 2007 took a toll on Krytzer’s health, leading to severe nerve damage and several microfractures in his left foot. With no source of income, he was no longer able to afford expensive treatments so he decided to let his injured foot be, hoping that it would heal with time.

Krytzer thought that he would soon be able to return to work and things would go back to normal. What he did not expect was that his foot would soon become badly infected leaving the doctors with no other options but to amputate it.

Living in a Shack

Krytzer was no longer fit to work and had been denied disability pension. With no salary or savings in his account, Loren was forced to send his children away to live with their grandparents because he was no longer able to provide for them.

He finally received a monthly pension of $$900, out of which $$700 covered the rent for a shack that he was living in. He had to live off the remaining $$200 which was barely enough to feed him for the entire month. There were days when he would survive on a Costco hotdog and soda because that was all he could afford at the time.

Loren had given up all hopes that his life would ever change for the better but little did he know that an old blanket that had been handed down to him by his late grandmother would turn him into a millionaire overnight.

A Tale of an Old Blanket

Years ago, after the death of his grandmother, Krytzer stopped by her old house to collect any of her personal belongings that he could keep as her memory. Loren recalled that when he entered his grandmother’s house, most of her stuff had already been taken by his mother and sisters.

All there was left were a few clothes and a blanket that had been handed down to his grandmother by her mother. He picked up the blanket and put it in his car with the rest of her belongings that he wanted to keep and headed back home. Little did he know that the old family heirloom that he had just acquired was an antique piece from the early 1800s worth a huge sum of money.

A Life-Changing Sum

Krytzer stowed the blanket in his closet and forgot about for seven years until one lucky day, when watching an episode of a television show called Antiques Roadshow where a guy found out that his Navajo blanket was worth half a million dollars, made Loren realize that he had a similar blanket lying around in his old shack for years!

After watching the episode, Krytzer pulled out the blanket from the closet, trying to match it with the one showed on the episode. To his surprise, the two blankets were identical! He took the antique piece of cloth to a few auctions in California. Initially he was turned away by brokers who thought that the blanket was a dupe, probably made in Mexico.

He finally found a company called John Moran Auctioneers that dealt with Native American artifacts and after finding out about Krytzer’s Navajo blanket, the company invited him to their auction where the family heirloom was bought for $$1.5 million.

Making Smart Investments

To this date, the antique Navajo blanket is the most expensive item ever sold at John Moran. Krytzer, who had initially been told by the auctioneers that blanket might sell for $$200,000 or less, was shocked to find out that someone was ready to pay more than 7 times the amount he had anticipated.

With his newfound riches, Lauren has decided to spend his money wisely by investing in stocks and bonds as well as buying two houses in California: one where he and his wife Lisa live and a second one which is being rented out.

Want to know why Navajo blankets are so precious? Find out here.

If you had won $$1.5 million, what would you do with the money?

Leave Your Comment",loanpride.com,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
159252,"











Despite the apparent consumption which is preventing the fitful property market of Dubai, the apartments at the Royal Atlantis are standing apart. This 795-room hotel which will be sharing the building along with 231 height and homes is presently under construction on the artificial archipelago which has been created by Palm Beach Jumeirah of Dubai at the cost of $$1.4 billion. The building is expected to be 700 meters tall with 40 floors extending 190 m into the air.

The construction manager of the site, Alan Lim surveys the site from an observation deck under the extreme heat of 40°C, looking at the six concrete towers jutting out into the sky from the desert. He is now concerned with the construction of the lift shaft in the main lobby. The architects of the project have decreed that the residents should be collected from one side and deposited on the other to remain there for the duration for its accent surrounded by a waterfall.

Dubai considers water features as a theme and the Royal Atlantis is equipped with an 80-meter long communal pool that will be provided for just the club area of the residents, 90 m into the sky. The project also has 64 additional private swimming pools out of which most featured one is on transparent side, making this building the only one in Dubai where people can spend underwater even when they are 45 m high in their towers and getting a view of the skyline of the city.

The Property Market Of Dubai Needs The Razzmatazz As Attractions

Dubai does not have huge oil revenues like its neighbors Saudi Arabia and the residents cannot be considered as belonging to the superrich variety of people. However, this tiny emirate is one of the most liberal cities in the Middle East where a portion of the population is looking at unique selling points of a project when making investments. The water features are a favored choice of the superrich according to David Godchaux, the chief executive of Core Savills of Dubai. The locations preferred by the superrich from Dubai are mainly in Emirates Hills, by the Jumeirah Lakes neighborhood where one can find some of the plush homes individually constructed close to the Emirates golf club. The prices of these projects are ranging between $$22 million for an eight-bedroom villa to about $$6.25 million for a six-bedroom villa.

It is quite possible that the residents of Dubai may begin to change their preferences and of for the European model of homes which are mainly in the low-risk category. The residents are trying to move away from the domination of vehicles and are choosing to live in locations where shopping and restaurants will have easy accessibility. Residents could also be looking forward to a walk during the latter half of the year when temperatures drop below the low 20s which is unlike in the summer months when the temperatures can be as high as 40°C.

There has been a shift in the ownership of property which was earlier limited only to residents of the Gulf Cooperation Council. The reforms which have been implemented are giving access to the property market even to residents from other countries.

The option to change title deeds is certainly having an immense impact on the property market. Some locations in the Jumeirah neighborhood are restricting land titles just for GCC residents and the prices for properties in this region are estimated to be in the range of $$5.5 million. However, the new properties which are being constructed just a kilometer away on plots half the size are expected to fetch a price estimated to be around $$11 million.

Will The Prices of The Property Market Of Dubai Continue To Spiral?

The changing tastes of the residents may attract a section of property buyers away from the plush scale of the project by Royal Atlantis. However, it is unlikely that the top end buyers of Dubai will even blink at the prices. Dubai is home to 8380 residents holding more than $$30 million each and this is the city which has a major portion of the superrich in the Middle East collectively holding $$1.4 trillion.

In 2017, the property market has until this moment reported strong sales data with more than 6000 homes being sold until June 2017 which is a 6% gain over a similar period in 2016. The sanctions imposed by the UAE on Qatar are unlikely to have any impact on the property market because the residents of Qatar were anyway funding fewer than 2% of the sales in 2016.

Dubai May Witness A Downward Spiral In The Property Market

Data which is presently available about the prices should concern buyers and especially those who are considering investments in the higher end property market. The prices of homes in Dubai have dropped by 13% as compared to the peak in July 2014, according to data released by the government. The prices for apartments in the Burj Khalifa, which is the largest building in the region, also dropped by 25% in March 2017. The city estimates that the prices of super prime time property market have declined by 25 to 30% from the second half of 2014. The finest homes in Dubai are presently available at a price which is 55% lesser than the price which was quoted in the third quarter of 2008. The outlook for the property market in Dubai doesn’t look optimistic at the moment with the top end housing market being affected the most.

Is Dubai finished as the pinnacle of luxury around the World? Share your views below!",loanpride.com,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
375943,"











Possession of arms has been a subject of debate between opponents and advocates of gun control. Experts and politicians have been fighting to put an end to the horrific incidents of mass shooting which have been terrorizing the nation for years, but when the entire nation is divided on the real cause of gun violence, it becomes difficult to find a solution for it.

Researches have also been struggling to get to the root of the problem and understand the psychology of individuals behind shooting incidents. A recent study claims that there may just be a link between psychological illnesses and gun violence – but is there any truth to this claim?

An Increase in Gun Violence Incidences Around U.S.

Statistics show that there have been more than 1.5 million incidents related to gun violence since 1968 in U.S. alone with almost 33,000 deaths occurring every year due to the possession and use of firearms.

Surprisingly, not even half of these death result from mass shootings. More than two-thirds of the annual deaths occur due to suicide whereas mass shooting incidents account for only 500 deaths every year.

With the number of deaths from suicide on an all-time high, experts are trying to find any correlation between mental illnesses and mass murders. Want to see how bad gun violence has gotten in United States? Click here.

A Conflicted Debate

The family of one mass shooter Kevin Neal, whose attack on an elementary school left five innocent people dead, are beginning to connect the dots between Neil’s troubled past and his tendency to harm himself and others. The family said that they were aware of Neil’s mental illness for almost two decades but they never thought that that it would cost him his life.

Researchers who have been trying to find any patterns between mass murder incidents believe that blaming genocide on mental illness isn’t only untrue but also highly dangerous. One criminologist and book author named James Alan Fox, who has been studying shooting incidents for several years, is of the view that mental illness is often seen as the driving force behind mass shootings because people want to believe that the perpetrators of such incidents are not normal; in such cases it becomes easy to throw the blame on psychological abnormalities, stigmatizing those suffering from mental illnesses as ‘dangerous to the society’.

The President of the United States himself blamed the Texas mass shooting on mental health crisis only days after slashing the funding for Medicade by half. Trump’s critics called his remarks hypocritical, saying that if mental health is the real cause of mass shootings, cutting healthcare funds would not provide a logical solution to the problem.

Gun Violence in the U.S.A in Comparison to Other Countries

A study by United Nations Office on Drugs and Crime showed that gun related crimes are more prevalent in the United States than other industrialized nations. The explanation for these statistics lies not in mental health crisis but in the sheer number of firearms owned by American civilians. If mental illness was the cause of genocide, then the statistics of gun violence would be similar across the globe. The real threat lies in handing firearms to individuals who cannot be trusted with them. As more and more Americans begin to show signs of impulsive behavior, owning and carrying guns becomes extremely hazardous for others around them.

Strict Background Checks for Gun Sales May be the Answer

One solution proposed by experts to control gun violence is thorough background checks of individuals in every state before selling arms. However, most shooters involved in historical mass murders had no past criminal record making it even harder to create a correlation between psychological health and gun violence. In any case, there is an imminent need for awareness campaigns to educate everyone how to identify and cope with mental illnesses.

Las Vegas Casino – The place where the Mass Shooting Took place in Sep. 2017

Strict background checks shouldn’t only apply to those who suffer from psychological illnesses but also those display concerning behavior or have a history of incidents related to anger issues. These people aren’t just a danger for themselves but also for others around them.

Can we prevent the next mass shooting event?

Leave Your Comment",loanpride.com,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
159254,"











We cannot deny that the oil reserves that come from the fossil fuels are extremely valuable. In fact, we can see that those countries which utilize their oil reserves are some of the richest countries in the world. This is because most of the countries all over the world rely on oil for the mobility of vehicles, transportation, and even distribution of goods and services. That’s why sometimes the economy of a particular country greatly relies on oil price! If the oil price is high, most likely, our price of goods will also increase. If it’s down, our goods become more affordable. The oil has become one of the most important commodities on earth and sometimes countries tend to fight for it (like the unfortunate ongoing wars we’ve witnessed in the Middle East).

For years, the oil was and still is dominating our world. Unfortunately, we all know that fossil fuel reserves are limited. It’s a non-renewable energy and we’re only counting the time before we drain it. Aside from that, burning of oil contributes to the expansion of global warming and greenhouse effects. That’s why several environmental organizations are concerned about its usage. Aside from their mission to preserve the oil reserves, they want to tap more on using renewable energy to battle climate change and it seems that they’re going to reap the fruits of their labor since the oil price and demands are now declining, mainly because of the rise of electric vehicles.

Oil Prices Are Expected to Decline Down to $$10 Per Barrel

Chief Executive of Longview Economics, Chris Watling, predicted that the oil reserves will continue to plummet over the next six to eight years as the alternative and renewable energy fuels continue to attract investors. Waiting can’t help but say that in the dawn of 2018, the key catalyst for the decline of the oil market would be the Saudi Aramco’s initial public offering (IPO) for the second half of next year. While Waiting didn’t directly imply that the oil prices would go down for the next weeks or months to come, he’s more explaining about its long-term effects not only on the international stock market but on the world too, especially since 70% of oil is primarily used for transportation.

“We forget don’t we? I mean 120 years ago the world didn’t live on oil. Oil hasn’t always driven the global economy… The point is alternative energy in some forms is gathering speed (and) things are changing,” he added.

OPEC still optimistic in terms of oil market rebalancing

Despite the forecast Waiting made, the International Energy Agency (IEA) is still optimistic that it will not put a damper in their hopes of high oil price. They said that they’re closely monitoring the global stock builds, static oil demand, and the rising non-OPEC production that would determine the oil price hike. In the latest monthly report they submitted, they published an optimistic forecast in contrary to Waiting’s predictions. Their data shows optimistic oil price forecast from major oil reservoir OPEC, which argues that the cartel was an evidence of the growing demand of global oil market and rebalancing in response to several years of decreasing prices.

It can be reminded that the oil price collapsed for almost $$120 per barrel since June 2014 due to weak demand, in which the strong dollar exchange rate also affected the price. However, according to the graph projected by the international stock market, they predicted that it will move to a curb production along with the other oil-producing nations in 2016. The current trade for oil barrel is around $$57.39 since Friday meaning it is up by 2% while the US crude is around $$51.50 a barrel, up 1.8 percent.

While the data between two opposite groups seem to negate each other, time will only tell whether we’ll stop being independent of oil. In the meantime, several oil companies all over the world are battling to regain their domination while the environmental organizations are fighting hard to implement green and renewable energy.

Should we go for a more environment-friendly approach? Let us know your thoughts in the comments below…",loanpride.com,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
375949,"











Politicians are often elected to serve their people and the constitution, but in reality, it’s rarely the case. Most politicians are tempted to gain office for the sake of attaining political power and increasing their bank balance.

Putting their own personal benefit over that of the state is considered a serious crime that can cost a politician their office. Last week the FBI was tipped off that Philadelphia congressman Bob Brady may have bribed his foe to back out of the election campaign in 2012, clearing his path to winning the race.

A Secret Transaction

In 2012, the Democratic Congressional Primary was bribed by his opponent and current Philadelphia congressman into dropping out of the race. The political challenger’s former aide admitted that she was involved in striking a deal with the congressman and funneling a hefty sum of money into her former boss’ bank account in return for his resignation.

On Tuesday, the federal prosecutor announced that they had officially received a warrant to check Bob Brady’s email accounts to find any evidence to prove the alleged bribery. The former aide who informed the FBI of the secret transaction said that Brady had paid his opponent $$90,000.

After the case was made public, reporters dug deep to find the identity of the opponent who had been paid off by the congressman to help him win. A news report later revealed that the 2012 primary opponent involved in the bribery scandal was the former Municipal Court Judge Jimmie Moore.

The Issue of False Witness

During the federal investigation, the congressman influenced the former mayor of Philadelphia into giving a false witness account to clear his name from the allegation. Unfortunately, the tactic backfired when the federal prosecutors found out about the congressman’s efforts to derail the investigation and matters soon got worse.

The court filings were recently made public after the former political aide to Brady’s opponent, whose identity was revealed as Carolyn Cavaness, admitted to having been involved in the federal crime. Moore admitted that she not only accepted the bribe from the congressman, but also helped her former boss conceal the crime from the authorities.

As the FBI probes further into the case, Moore and Brady are yet to be charged with a criminal offense. Brady is one of the longest serving representative of his state and Philadelphia Democratic City Committee chairman for more than 40 years. During the 2012 elections, the congressman had represented the Pennsylvania’s First Congressional District for nearly 20 years – he had a lot of pressure from his party to win the elections and he was prepared to pay any price for it.

Moore’s Political Aide Speaks Up

During the court hearing, Carolyn Cavaness explicitly described how the exchange of money took place between the two contenders in 2012. According to her plea, she had been instructed by Moore to create a secret company to receive the $$90,000 from Brady’s political campaign as funding.

The money was later used to pay of Moore’s political debts. Two more consultants were involved in concealing the crime by providing false justification for the payment made by Brady. The congressman under scrutiny has denied all allegations against him, claiming that if his campaign did pay out any money to former political opponent during the 2012 election, they did it behind his back and that he was not aware of the situation until five years later when the case was made.

Congressman Maintains his Innocence

The case against Cavaness was kept secret from the public to prevent any intervention from Brady or Moore. The former political aide’s lawyer made a public statement saying that his client had confessed to her role in the crime and that she would not be making any comments about the case. Brady’s lawyer has also made a statement saying that the congressman has been fully cooperating with the federal investigators because he is confident that he has done nothing wrong.

Do all politicians play fair or some cross the line?

Leave Your Comment",loanpride.com,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
375958,"











You’re considered lucky if you’re born in a family that has established its own business and if that business is successful (whether locally or internationally), then one might say it has it all. It means that someday, you’ll probably inherit and manage the family business if you want to pursue the same path as your parents. Most children who are born in a family that has its own business are bound to become an heir and inherit luxurious business, fame, and fortune. And it seems that this legacy in the industry still continues to exist as another lucky woman was just bestowed with such fortune! Françoise Bettencourt-Meyers, inheriting L’Oreal, just became the richest woman in the world.

Meet the Heir of the Prestigious L’Oreal Company

Françoise Bettencourt-Meyers was the daughter of no one other than Liliane Bettencourt, who was the CEO of the prestigious Cosmetic Company which had a major influence in the world. After the death of her mother, she had to face her inevitable fate of inheriting the company. When she finally took her rightful place, Bloomberg reported that her wealth, assets, and net worth had blossomed to a whopping $$42.3 billion, making the 64-year old woman the richest woman in the world! In fact, she even surpassed Walmart’s heiress Alice Walton who only had a net worth of $$38.4 billion.

L’Oreal Success and Bettencourt’s Wealth

Cosmetic company L’Oreal was founded in 1907 by her father, Eugene Schueller. The company has been booming ever since, with its latest net worth of $$107.5 billion since May 2017. They also own at least 33% stake and shares of the company. When Bettencourt’s father died, Francoise’ mother was the only heir who could take over his business. And since Bettencourt-Meyers is also her only child, according to the French law, she was also entitled to inherit at least half of her mother’s estates. In 2011, Bettencourt-Meyers already had her Classical style villa in Paris suburb of Neuilly-sur-Seine, a grand mansion off the Brittany Coast, as well as a secluded island in Seychelles.

It also seems that Bettencourt-Meyers was already rich, even before she inherited her mother’s fortune. According to WealthX, she also serves as the President for the Bettencourt-Schueller foundation, in which its assets had boomed up to $$683 million in 2010. She was also an author of numerous books on Greek mythology and Jewish-Christian relations.

The Controversial Love life and Family History of Bettencourt-Meyers

Suffice to say that Bettencourt-Meyers’ love life was definitely wonderful and colorful one. She was married to Jean-Victor Meyers who turned out to be the grandson of a rabbi who was murdered in Auschwitz. The marriage became controversial as her grandfather was one of the victims of a Nazi regime. It turned out this was just the tip of the iceberg that surrounded Bettencourt-Meyers controversial love life and family ties.

The Infamous “Bettencourt Affair.”

In 2008, Bettencourt-Meyers filed a criminal complaint against a long-time friend of her mother and well-known French photographer François-Marie Banier. She accused the latter of taking advantage of her mother’s vulnerable mental state to defraud her mother for more than $$1 billion in cash and gifts. She claimed that he tricked her mother into giving him cash, buying his expensive art, and providing him with life insurance policies. This case was infamously known as “The Bettencourt Affair.”

Because of what happened, this created a rift in the relationship of Bettencourt-Meyers and her mother for almost 2 years. The two had just mended their relationship after the lawsuit was dropped, last 2010. However, a development followed up last October 2011, when the judge declared that her mother was deemed mentally unfit to manage their family’s wealth. The judge placed Bettencourt-Meyers as the sole guardian to manage the family’s wealth and assets.

Later in 2012, Bettencourt-Meyers transferred her guardianship of the company to L’Oréal’s board, by Jean-Victor Meyers in 2012.

“In this painful moment for us, I would like to reiterate, on behalf of our family, our entire commitment and loyalty to L’Oreal and to renew my confidence in its President Jean-Paul Agon and his teams worldwide,” Bettencourt-Meyers said in an emailed statement.

The relationship between mother and daughter may have gone through so many trials, challenges, and strains, but we cannot deny the fact that blood is indeed thicker than water. In the end, the two rekindled their familial relationship and her mother died peacefully while seeing her beloved daughter during her last moments.

What would you do with such a fortune? Let us know your plans…

Leave Your Comment",loanpride.com,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
159270,"











It is quite common in Hollywood for the celebrities’ siblings to either get a huge social media following too or, become a celebrity of their own. For Solange Knowles, who is the sister of one of the biggest stars in the industry, Beyonce, she was always said to living in the shadow of her sister. We can’t blame her, her sister is just too much of a superstar. But somehow, she was able to make a name for herself and carve her own path in the industry.

Who Is Solange?

Solange Knowles was born on June 24, 1986 and is five years younger than her overly famous sister, Beyonce. What a lot of people don’t know is that Solange started expressing her love for the performing arts at a very young age. When she was just in fourth grade, she was able to win a songwriting contest in her district. She spent most of her childhood in the dance studio and had the goal of getting into Julliard.

She was given the chance of a lifetime when she was just thirteen years old when he was offered to become a backup dancer for her sister’s girl group, Destiny’s Child. This was a big opportunity for her because she was able to go on tour with them and visit places like Tokyo and Berlin. Sadly, she later suffered from a torn meniscus so she had to kiss her dreams of auditioning for Julliard goodbye.

Solange with Destiny’s Child

She got really depressed about erasing Julliard from her possible future and this later served as the motivation for her to write songs at just fifteen years old. Even though her lyrics had a sad tone behind them, her songwriting talent was obvious. Kelly Rowland even asked Solange to write a song for her debut solo album. It was through writing songs where she discovered her passion to become an artist.

Career Milestones

Before starting her career, Solange was already used to being in someone else’s spotlight. When she reached sixteen years old, she was given her first career breakthrough. She was able to release her first solo album entitled, Solo Star. She served as a co-writer and co-producer of the album.

15-year-old Solange appearing in Lil Bow Wow’s music video for his song, Puppy Love

Solang tried it out with acting and her debut was a lead role in the movie, Johnson Family Vacation. Even if the film itself had a lot of negative reviews, she was able to receive positive feedback when it came to her acting. A lot of you might also remember her from her starring role in the movie, Bring It On: All or Nothing, which didn’t get that much positive reviews as well.

She later went back to music and first started to create noise in the music industry when she released an EP under Jay-Z’s record label, Roc Nation. By 2013, she decided to launch her own record label called Saint Records and released an album entitled Saint Heroin. By 2016, she released her album, A Seat On The Table, and it was her first time to ever reach No. 1 album on the Billboard Hot 100 chart.

Last May, Solange held a secret performance at the Solomon R. Guggenheim Museum which was called An Ode To. She asked guests to wear white and leave their cellphones at the door. This showcased not only her skills as a singer but also her skills as a choreographer, musical director, and composer. It was nowhere but up for Solange’s career.

Life Outside Of Music

She was only seventeen when she and Daniel Smith got married and gave birth to their child, Daniel Smith Jr. She referred to her son as an “unplanned blessing” and doesn’t feel any sort of regret whatsoever. Sadly, Solange divorced Daniel after three years of marriage. Last 2014, she tied the knot with Alan Ferguson who is a music video director.

Another point in Solange’s life that placed her name on the headlines was when a security video was released by TMX showing Solange assaulting Jay-Z in an elevator. It is rumored that this was because she found out about Jay-Z’s alleged infidelity.

Solange is far gone from being just “Beyonce’s sister”. Through her music, she was able to create her own voice and identity in the industry. Her story shows us that greatness and success takes time but that doesn’t mean we should stop working on our dreams. Every setback in life is there to get us prepared for a major comeback.

Is it the young sister’s turn to take the throne?",loanpride.com,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
375950,"











This Thanksgiving students at St. Thomas More High School had a lot to feel grateful for after a shocking donation by a kind-hearted alumnus who granted financial assistance to thousands of students in need. After you find out how much money this anonymous man left to the high school in his will, you will be shocked too.

Who was Leonard Gigowski?

During his lifetime, Leonard Gigowski ran a successful grocery store on the corner of his street that he had inherited from his father. Gigowski had worked in the family-owned business ever since he was young and after the death of his late father, Leonard Gigowski took on the role as the owner of the grocery store.

Simple and Selfless

Little was known of the fact that Leonard was a generous donor of educational institutions and foundations and even after he passed away, he found a way to ensure that thousands of students at St. Thomas More high school could afford to pay their tuition, a school that Lenoard himself had attended back when it was called St. Francis Minor Seminary.

In his will, Lenoard donated a staggering sum of $$13 million in a fund which helped provide scholarships that would waver off up to half of the tuition for students who would otherwise not be able to afford private education and did not qualify for government aid.

According to his friend and lawyer Larry Haskin, Lenoard led a lifestyle that was simple and devoid of extravagance; at times even buying clothes and shoes that would not fit him if they were on discounted sales just to save a few dollars. He preferred to help those in need rather than spend his wealth on himself and would habitually save money to help others to leave a legacy of his own.

He had never been married or had any children and would hardly go on dates, instead he had a passion for ballroom dancing and pigeon racing in his pastime. He owned around 50 to 100 pigeons at his Berlin home and would regularly drive more than a hundred miles to release the pigeons to allow them to race back home.

He had been a regular contributor and donor for Thomas More high school and would donate upwards of $$25,000 to the school’s annual fund along with his contribution of $$660,000 to the school’s capital campaign between 2001- 2003.

An Unexpected Disease

On July 21st 2015, he died of cancer at the age of 90 in his New Berlin home, but not before he had established his Leonard Gigowski Catholic Education foundation with the help of Larry Haskin. He even donated a large part of his possessions and estates to his foundation and scholarship fund, with small gifts going towards his friends and family.

After his death, his lawyer and friend, Larry Haskin arranged for a meeting over coffee with the president of Thomas More to inform her about the sizeable donation he had left for the students at the high school. According to Mary McIntosh, the president of Thomas More, she almost “fell out of her chair” upon learning about the magnitude of Lenoard’s donation.

In the wake of Leonard’s sizeable donation, the school was able to award a total of $$489,000 of scholarship to 131 students to either cover one half or one third of their annual tuition of $$10,800 and Mary McIntosh plans to grant 5% of the scholarship fund annually in order to maintain the scholarship fund in perpetuity for deserving students who could apply annually for the scholarship programme provided.

Life and Legacy of Lenoard Gigowski

According to his close friend and real estate broker Jeff Korpal, Leonard was a devoted catholic and as a kid aspired to one day becoming a priest. Raised in West Allies, he served in the navy as a cook during the Second World War and then took up a job in a meat processing company where he was able to acquire the company’s stock which he subsequently sold, putting his earnings to good use in various investments.

In later years, Leonard was able to acquire several residential properties, open a grocery store, a nightclub and also a dance studio in his neighborhood block. During this time, Jeff Korpal helped him buy and sell his various residential properties following which, Leonard retired at the age of 75 to pursue his interests and devote more time to his passion for dancing and pigeon racing.

If You Were in His Place, to Which Cause Would You Have Donated Your Money?

Leave Your Comment",loanpride.com,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
159274,"











In every sport, there is always a team that wants to have an edge over the other. In the world of Baseball, some players have used steroids, corked bats, and even spitballs in the hopes that they could be one step closer to an easier victory. But, as the modern times of technology come, innovation is set to happen and there are quite more ways of cheating that can take place on the field these days.

Miami Marlins Pitcher, Alex Sanabia, Caught in a “spitball” incident

A New Way Of Cheating

The Boston Red Sox have been competing in Major League Baseball for a long time already and they have won a total of eight Worlds Series Championships. It is safe to say that winning to them was a top priority. It is not a secret that the Boston Red Sox considers the New York Yankees as their top rivals. The rivalry has been there for more than 100 years and is considered to be one of the most popular and most vicious rivalries ever.

As if the tension wasn’t already enough, the Boston Red Sox decided to go through desperate measures in order to beat their rivals. During a recent stretch of games, they thought that they could steal the hand signals of their opponents. They were quite resourceful with technology because they used an Apple watch as the instrument to commence their swindles.

A Red Sox training staff basically checks a message from his Apple watch and relays it to the players in the dugout, then, the players in the dugout later pass the message to the players on the field. It is said that the certain message that was being passed was some sort of indication of the pitch that was about to happen.

Recently introduced Apple Watch 3 brings a new era for calls and messaging

Brian Cashman who works as the general manager for the New York Yankees was the one who ousted the Boston Red Sox for their mischievous ways. He filed a complaint once he stumbled upon a video that showed how the Red Sox used technology for illicit motives. The Red Sox eventually came clean and admitted that video replay personnel would send messages to their trainers and their trainers would later send it to the players.

Boston Red Sox manager, John Farrell, said that he was aware of the “stealing of signs” that was happening but did not know that they used technology to that. Using any kind of instrument to do so is prohibited and the only thing players can do if they want to know about their opponent’s signs is to use their eyes on the field.

Not The Only Guilty One?

Seemed like that if Red Sox were going down, they didn’t want to go alone. Following the scandal that broke out, they filed a complaint saying that the Yankees had their own way of cheating too. They claimed that they also stole signs with the help of some cameras from the Yes Network. All allegations were denied by the New York Yankees.

Rob Manfred, the commissioner of Major League Baseball, said that he will put up an investigation on both teams to decide if there is any potential punishment applicable to them. So far, all we know is that the Red Sox have been very cooperative when it comes to their investigation.

The rivalry between the Boston Red Sox and the New York Yankees is very far from over and by the looks of it, it can even last for another 100 years. We live in a world that is advancing through technology and even if it is fascinating, it is still scary what human beings are capable of doing when given access to such technology.

If you know about the series called Black Mirror, then you have some sort of an idea of what can happen when people get lost in the modernization of technology. Who knows what kind of cheating can happen 50 years from now when technology might be as advanced as how it is in the movies.

What do you think is the most appropriate punishment?",loanpride.com,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
375948,"











It’s another day and another gigantesque construction project proposed by a Saudi prince in the Middle East. Prince Mohammed bin Salman believes that normal cities are getting too boring and its time to take things up a notch by building a metropolis the size of three countries!

The announcement for this project was made during a critical point in Saudi Arabia’s economy and the government is hopeful that the new mega-city will be the breakthrough that the country needs to boost its economic and innovative status in the world.

Rebuilding the Economy

For many years, the Kingdom of Saudi Arabia has been the biggest exporter of oil in the world. The oil-rich nation has been able to strengthen its economy and GDP by selling its coveted commodity to other countries but the recent crash in the oil prices has left the jobs and future of thousands of Saudi workers in danger.

The crumbling economy has had a terrible impact on current construction projects, most of them left abandoned due to lack of funding and shortage of workers. Dropping oil prices has also begun a food crisis in the Kingdom, leaving thousands of immigrant workers hungry and jobless. In a time of severe economic crisis, Saudi Prince has proposed a construction project for the biggest mega city on the planet to give the country’s economy a boost and bring the jobs back.

The NEOM Project

Mohammed bin Salman, the Saudi Crown Prince, held a Future Investment Initiative conference during which he announced the commencement of the biggest construction project in the Middle East to date called the NEOM project.

The purpose of this project is to open doors to trade and innovation in the country, making its economy less dependent on oil export. The construction project, which will cost a whopping $$640 billion to build, is funded by private investors and Saudi government and isn’t expected to be completed any time before 2025.

A New Mega-city by 2025

The Prince and his team of architects have chosen a strategic location for this mega-city somewhere between the mountains and the Red Sea, making it a completely independent economic zone for trade and innovation. This independent city will follow its own laws and regulations and will span over 10,000 square miles, making it almost 33 times larger than New York City! The government is hopeful that this metropolitan will attract foreign investors and entrepreneurs to start businesses in Saudi Arabia and give a boost to the nation’s rapidly declining GDP.

Aims to Run the Metropolitan on Renewable Energy

A huge chunk of the construction budget for the NEOM project is reserved for solar panels and wind turbines that will cover vast fields bigger than the size of a football stadium. The mega-city will be fitted with electrical grids capable of storing low-cost renewable energy for generations.

Mohammed bin Salman explained the purpose of the city, “This place is not for conventional people or conventional companies, this will be a place for the dreamers for the world.” Once fully constructed, NEOM will become one of the biggest cities in the world powered solely by renewable energy.

Moreover, the city will have smart road plans to minimize traffic and air pollution. The city will also have a hundred percent eco-friendly transport system and create new routes between different continents to facilitate trade. Plans of building a bridge to connect Asia and Africa have also been indicated on the official NEOM website.

Futuristic Infrastructure

As if green transport system and renewable energy weren’t enough to convince us that NEOM will be the most advanced metropolitan in the world, the Prince also revealed his plans for building record-breaking theme parks, sky-high shopping malls and a futuristic infrastructure that will attract tourists from all over the world to experience a new Middle East.

Would you dare to visit the city?

Leave Your Comment",loanpride.com,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
159277,"Her Dad Raped Her In Childhood, Making Her Infertile – THIS Is What He'd Done When He Was Facing A Trial

21109

Views",loanpride.com,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
159261,"











Nuclear wars and Nuclear bombs are things we are used to hear or see only in movies. It’s quite fascinating when we see it unfold on the big screen but we bet it would not be as fascinating if it actually happened in real life.

North Korea, headed by Kim Jong-Un, is actually bringing what happens on the big screen to real life. Conducting Nuclear tests is not new to the North Korean supreme leader for he has already done six Nuclear tests with his latest one being the biggest so far.

A lot of you have probably heard about the infamous supreme leader of North Korea through the movie, The Interview, which actually created quite some drama between the US and North Korean Government.

How Serious Are These Nuclear Tests?

These so-called “tests” aren’t something to shrug off or just laugh about because in reality, they are creating a lot of damage. His sixth and latest test that was conducted a few months ago, was so strong it reshaped a mountain! Yes, true mountain… To be more specific, what they tested was a hydrogen bomb that resulted in a magnitude -6.3 tremor. This was the strongest bomb North Korea has ever tested.

The powerful blast from the latest test did not only reshape a mountain but it also made a tunnel inside the area the nuclear bomb was tested. This later resulted in the death of at least two hundred workers that were on the site trying to fix the damage. The first one hundred workers died during the first collapse and when another hundred were supposedly sent to the rescue, a second collapse occurred and later resulted in the death of the additional hundred.

North Korea has the Nuclear power to blow up the United States into ashes and sink the whole Japan under water—as said in their latest threat. With all this happening, it really makes you wonder whether Kim Jong-Un ever feels a tad bit of guilt for all the deaths of these innocent people…

What If These Tests Don’t Stop?

Kim Jong-Un seems like he is an unstoppable guy when it comes to doing things he sets his mind to. His latest Nuclear test already did a lot of damage and killed a lot of innocent people but it seems like this wasn’t something that affected the supreme leader. According to a Chinese Nuclear Scientist, these tests are becoming really unsafe and can cause some serious consequences. It is said that future tests can already lead to the top of the mountain blowing up and later causing radioactive waste to leak.

Just after the sixth Nuclear test which was conducted last September, small earthquakes were felt. This was really a serious sign of the long-term damage each test can bring to Mother Earth.

The said Nuclear site is already too unsafe for more Nuclear testing in the future but it seems Kim Jong-Un might consider these as “minor” details that cannot go against the initial plan that is to come up with the best Nuclear weapon he can get his hands on.

The truth is, Supreme Leader Kim Jong-Un isn’t just conducting these tests for fun and games. He has made numerous threats already to certain countries making people truly believe he is able to initiate a war between them. One of the missiles that were launched by North Korea before, actually flew over Japan and this really raised a high alert. This move went against finding a peaceful solution internationally and Shinzo Abe who is the Japanese Prime Minister said it was “totally unacceptable”.



Seems like North Korea was hitting two birds with one stone because not only did it raise Japan on high alert, but the missile launch was also done in order to send a message to the United States. Kim Jong-Un is becoming quite notorious for these test missiles and it seems he doesn’t plan to stop here.

We live in a time where Nuclear War is possible and dog filters help make the perfect selfie. Is there still hope that World Peace can be achieved in the future or are we doomed into living in a world where violence takes over people’s lives?

Should America do something about the North Korean nuclear threat?",loanpride.com,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
159272,"











The NFL has been the most popular sport in America for a very long time. That is why, its athletes are able to earn a fortune thanks to their salaries and endorsement deals. NFL stars are often seen driving the latest luxury cars and purchasing the most lavish of properties. Since the attention they get from their games make a big impact on how much they earn, what happens to them if their sport loses its audience?



How Big Is the NFL?

The NFL is not just like any other sport and it is said that it really makes the most money out of any professional sport in the world. Their sponsorship revenue reaches billions. A lot of college guys aim to be able to play professionally since being part of the highest-grossing sport can really be a huge blessing and it can help someone with being set for life.

Even if the NFL welcomes a lot of money each year, many of its players are still jealous of the guys from the NBA, mostly because apparently, they get bigger salaries than them. This might be because the NBA roster is smaller than the NFL so more money is distributed.



Here Is What’s Happening To The NFL

There are numerous sports that are being broadcast on television whose statistics and success are directly linked with people’s interest and curiosity. The NFL used to be America’s favorite sport, but it seems like this is not the case anymore. The sport used to get ratings that would reach up to 50-70%, but this year, it has dropped down to 40-44%. These low ratings were really unfavorable since broadcasts of the sport used to be viewed by more than 16 million people.

Another huge factor that contributed to the lower ratings was the fact that NFL players would kneel or sit down during the National Anthem as a sign of protest. It is said that they have a big issue with the new criminal justice reform and the police brutality in America. Some players have even argued about why should they stand up and honor the National Anthem for a country who likes to tyrannize people of color.

What Donald Trump Has To Say About it

These protests kept damaging the reputation of the NFL and led to more and more games having empty seats. Even U.S. President, Donald Trump, said that the sport will just go down in flames if they don’t stop with their protests. Trump said that the owners of the NFL should fire those players who are protesting and not showing pride and respect for their country. He remained very outspoken regarding the issue and said that they are really “ruining the game”.





Of course, Donald Trump didn’t just voice out his opinions, he took them to his very active twitter account as well. Here are some tweets the President has shared with the public:

The President really seems very serious about everything happening with the NFL. Props to him because he actually has a point. All this protesting the players are doing does not do any good to their jobs. It even seems like that they’re focused so much on protesting and getting their word out that they are not scared to get fired. Ratings of the NFL have reached an all-time low and who knows how much these ratings can drop.

The drop in the number of viewers the sport gets is not good for the NFL business. The sport might even lose millions and millions of viewers per week. The future of the sport is in danger, that is why, both the players and owners should start reevaluating the decisions they make regarding these protests.

At the end of the day, no one can deny the message behind these protests, however, is protesting really worth it if a big amount of money is lost in the business? Things are way different from how it used to be so these players should think twice before doing something that might put their career at risk. We wonder what jobs will they decide to take if their career in the NFL comes to an end.

Is it the end for the National Sport?",loanpride.com,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
375946,"











For one coffee drinker, a routine trip to Starbucks turned into a horrific experience that almost cost him his life. One barista at the store who was quick to use his CPR skills to save the life of a customer in the most heroic way possible. If you thought that Starbucks baristas were only good for making expensive frappuccinos then you’re about to be shocked.

Just an Ordinary Work Day

20-year-old Kurt Vaughn is a college student in California who had been working as a part-time barista at Starbucks store in Palm Springs for several months.

On the morning of August 14, the store was packed as usual with busy commuters looking for an early morning caffeine fix. It had only been fifteen minutes since Vaughn started his shift when, suddenly, something out of the ordinary happened.

A Customer Collapses in the Store

Things were running smoothly behind the counter for the first few minutes as baristas quickly prepared coffees for a long queue of customers waiting for their beverages. A groggy Kurt Vaughn was among the staff, taking orders and passing them along to his colleagues when suddenly, there were gasps and screams coming from crowd; apparently someone had fainted in the middle of the store.

A few customers rushed to the front and asked the staff if anybody knew how to perform CPR. The employees looked around with a sense of urgency trying to find someone who could help in the time of emergency. Finally, a barista approached Kurt Vaughn asking if he knew CPR. Luckily, Vaughn had received Boy Scout training when he was younger and knew a great deal about performing CPR from reading information on different websites.

Training from Boy Scout Days Comes in Handy

When Vaughn walked into Starbucks that day, he had no idea that the training he had received years ago was about to save a customer’s life. After hearing that someone had collapsed in the store and urgently needed CPR, Vaughn rushed forward to help.

The customer in crisis was 66-year-old Mike Furtado, a resident of Northern California who had gone into cardiac arrest while enjoying his morning coffee. Furtado had only arrived in Palm Springs a few days ago to enjoy a vacation, but his week-long trip turned into a nightmare when he was forced to spend his entire time on the hospital bed at Desert Regional Medical Center.

A Case of Cardiac Arrest

When Vaughn approached Furtado, who was lying on the floor unconscious and extremely pale, he realized that the 66-year-old was not breathing. Later, the young barista recalled that he had been extremely nervous while performing the CPR, scared that he may not be able to save the person in his arms.

Furtado had a faint pulse giving a sign that he was still alive. Other employees and customers assisted Vaughn as he performed chest compressions for almost 2 minutes. While one of the customers held up the unconscious man’s legs to maintain blood flow, another called 911 to send an ambulance.

The paramedics soon arrived on the scene and rushed Furtado to the hospital. Upon gaining consciousness, Furtado found out about how Kurt Vaughn had saved his life in time of crisis. The 66-year-old was extremely grateful for the young man’s efforts, saying that Vaughn will forever be his hero. Furtado has now been discharged from hospital and seems to be doing well.

American Red Cross and other medical agencies are providing CPR courses and emergency training worldwide to help save lives. If you’re interested in learning how to perform CPR, visit their website to enroll in one of their short courses or watch a short video by American Heart Association.

Would you Know How to Act in Such an Emergency?

Leave Your Comment",loanpride.com,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
159264,"











Strange things have happened in the past and will continue to do so even in the future. Every individual has a particular spot in their house or car where they routinely stuff mail and receipts only to forget about them. Jimmie Smith, a retired security officer also had something hanging in his closet which was full with a pile of lottery tickets. This individual from New Jersey always reminded himself to check the tickets when he had the time but for some reason failed to do so.

It was purely good fortune that brought him close to the shirt to check his pockets because if he would have waited two days longer he would have lost $$24.1 million that was waiting to be claimed by him.

The Habit of Checking Your Pockets Should Never Be Ignored

Smith had purchased a ticket for the New York Lotto a year ago for which the winning numbers were 05-12-13-22-25-35. He had left the ticket stuffed in his pocket with a shirt hanging in his closet for nearly a year.

The New York gaming commission was aware that the winning ticket worth $$24.1 million was sold in the bodega in New York City. They were unaware about who had purchased the ticket. Winners of the lottery have a year to claim the winnings and the date for the expiry was approaching fast. It was during the early stages of this year that the New York lottery began to get the word out about the unclaimed money.

The director of the commission’s division of the lottery reminded people such as players of the lottery to check their pockets and the glove box apart from looking under couch cushions by mentioning that the commission would love to meet the person that was in possession of the winning ticket. Perhaps it was just the motivation needed by Smith to check through his belongings where he chanced upon the winning ticket.

Smith Was Surprised To Find The Life-Changing Ticket In His Pockets

Smith who is a retired security officer picked up the news story of the search for the missing winner of the lottery ticket which perhaps inspired him to check the old tickets lying in the pockets of a shirt. He just had to go up to the closet where the old shirt was hanging. A surprise was in store for Smith when the winning numbers matched up and left him wondering whether he really had stumbled upon something that can only be classified as strange.

Smith had some difficulty convincing himself and needed to stick his head down from the window to get some fresh air. He seriously doubted he was fortunate enough to own the winning ticket and had to convince himself that he was, in fact, facing the truth.

Fortune Favored Smith Midway

The announcement about the mystery lottery winner was made on May 23, 2017, and the deadline for collecting the money was May 25, 2017. Just two days before the deadline fortune decided to favor Smith because he would have been ineligible to claim the money had he done so after May 25, 2017. On May 31, 2017, the New York lottery confirmed the name of Smith as the winner of the completing the usual formalities.

The director of the commission’s division of the lottery commented that they were thrilled that the lucky Smith was able to find the ticket which is proving to be a life-changing one for him.

Smith has chosen to receive the payments of $$24.1 million over the course of 26 years.

Smith is a father of two and a grandfather of 12 children and has commented that he plans to have a family discussion after things settle down for him. After receiving the money from the winning ticket Smith may have all the time in the world to consider taking things easy and even begin planning for a leisurely life. However would have been in a position to do so if he had ignored the habit of checking his pockets in which he had left a fortune which he may never have earned during his lifetime? Smith’s experience should be a learning opportunity for everyone that may be in the habit of leaving small bits of paper lying around in their pockets for the glove compartment. Will people begin to think differently after considering how fortune favored this retired security, officer? We certainly hope they do.

Will You Be Checking Your Pockets Every Evening After Reading This Article? What is the most valuable thing you’ve found so far lost in your pockets?",loanpride.com,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
159267,"











Social media has evolved so much over the past years that it has basically taken over a big percentage of our lives. Every person who uses Twitter knows how it feels to just tweet exactly what’s on your mind and rant about what’s bothering you.

Celebrities who often have millions of followers have are the ones who have the biggest influence. They could tweet they’re into this brand or this restaurant and make their followers take their word for granted instantly. 45th President of the United States of America, Donald Trump, is known for voicing out his opinions on his Twitter account—@realDonaldTrump.

People know he tends to actually be very active on Twitter and sometimes, he might even be “too” active. There was a time when he tweeted the frustrations he was experiencing about the people from Nordstrom who were treating his daughter, Ivanka Trump, unfairly. Not only did he voice out his emotions but he also tagged Nordstrom’s official Twitter account too —talk about d-r-a-m-a…

Not only did he tweet it to his personal account but he also retweeted it with the official President’s account—@POTUS. This move of his would definitely damage Nordstrom’s reputation mostly because, with the millions of followers Trump has, we can easily assume the whole world will be talking about it. The tweet got a lot of attention online so you can say that Trump won this round of the fight.



Apparently, the tweets were not enough for him. He later decided to make Kellyanne Conway, his Counselor, to go live on Fox News and advertise the clothing line of his daughter, Ivanka. Conway said: “Go buy Ivanka’s stuff is what I would tell you. I hate shopping, but I’m gonna go get some myself today. Ivanka has tried to distance herself from her brand since the election. It’s a wonderful line, I own some of it… I’m just going to give a free commercial here: Go buy it today, everybody. You can find it online.”

Violation of the Ethics Laws – Yes or No?

Now, we hope you didn’t think that Trump can actually get away with anything just because he is the president of the United States right? — or can he? Donald Trump is actually said to be exempted from any alleged ethical violation or even implications caused as a direct result of his behavior. This decision was confirmed by Chairman of the House Committee on Oversight and Government Reform, Jason Chaffetz. So, even though it might seem unfair, this time, Trump did get away with it.

His Counselor Kellyanne Conway, on the other hand, is not exempted from anything whatsoever. She somehow made some violations connected to the Ethics Government Act of 1978. The law basically says that a person can’t use his/her public office post for his/her own private gain.

For Conway’s situation, she actually used her position to endorse and plug Ivanka’s clothing line. Chairman Jason Chaffetz admitted that Trump and Conway’s behavior is a perfect example of an Ethics Law violation. He claims Conway went quite overboard.

Soon after this apparent violation, a letter was sent to the United States Office of Government Ethics by Chaffetz and Representative Elijah E. Cummings in order to impose an investigation on what happened and to recommend discipline to those at fault. We’re guessing Conway learned a lesson or two after acting all confident and savage like her boss, Trump.



Did you know that recently, Trump’s Twitter account got disabled by a rogue Twitter employee? Well, it did. Trump was able to recover his account and he’s back to posting his all-time favorite daily tweets and keeping himself under the hot seat even though he is now the President of U.S., making people question him and his thoughts on so many important things that are going on in the world right now.

Should Trump’s tweets be censored?",loanpride.com,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
159257,"











Even after two decades, Sweden is still battling with a mysterious illness known as Resignation Syndrome. It basically affects the children of asylum-seekers, ceasing them to walk and talk, and even open their eyes. And after some time, they eventually start to recover.

Nine-year-old Sophie is currently living like a lifeless human being. When her father picks her up from her wheelchair, she shows no signs of life except breathing. While her hair is still thick and shiny just like any other healthy children, under her tracksuit bottoms, she wears a nappy and a transparent feeding tube that runs into her nose and has been nourishing her for the past 20 months. However, Sophie’s eyes are always closed…

Like all other asylum seekers, Sophie and her family also came from the former USSR in December 2015 and dwells in an accommodation that’s allocated to refugees in a small town in central Sweden.

So what made the child so inert who once loved to dance like a free bird?

“When I explain to the parents what has happened, I tell them the world has been so terrible that Sophie has gone into herself and disconnected the conscious part of her brain,” said Hultcrantz.

The doctors who treat these children also nod to the fact that trauma is the main cause that has made them withdraw from this world. The most vulnerable children are those who have witnessed extreme violence mostly against their parents or whose families have fled from a highly insecure environment.

To our knowledge, no cases have been established outside of Sweden Karl Sallin, Paediatrician

So what is Resignation Syndrome and how deep are its roots in Sweden?

Resignation Syndrome was first reported in Sweden in late 90s. Only in two years, between 2003 and 2005, there were more than 400 cases reported.

Like every compelling story, more and more Swedes started worrying about the consequences of immigration. These lesser known “apathetic children”, soon became a huge political issue. People and leaders were accusing that these children were faking it and that their parents were poisoning them to secure residence. However, none of those stories was proven according to the reports.

During the last ten years, a decrease in the number of children reported to be suffering from Resignation Syndrome has been seen. Sweden’s National Board of Health recently reported there were 169 cases in 2015 and 2016 only.

This case is quite visible in the children from particular geographical and ethnic groups such as those particularly from the former USSR, Roma children, the Balkans, and the Yazidi. Only a few cases have been unaccompanied migrants, while none have been African, and a very few from Asian ethnicity. Like Sophie, other children who are affected have also been living in Sweden for many years, and speak the language and are well tuned to their new, Nordic lives.

In the past, such cases resembling Resignation Syndrome have been reported particularly among Nazi concentration camp inmates.While in the UK, a similar condition – known as Pervasive Refusal Syndrome – was identified in the 1990s among children, however, none of them was among asylum seekers and only a tiny handful of cases were identified.

Is this illness confined to some particular national boundaries?

“There is no definite answer to that question”, says Sallin, who is researching Resignation Syndrome for his PhD.

I can’t make her better because as doctors we don’t decide if these children can stay in Sweden or not Lars Dagson, Sophie’s paediatrician

“The most plausible explanation is that there is some sort of socio-cultural factors that are necessary in order for this condition to develop. A certain way of reacting or responding to traumatic events seems to be legitimised in a certain context.”

“That is sort of implicit in the model. That if you provide the right sort of nourishment for those kinds of behaviours in a society, you will also see more cases,” says Sallin.

“If you look at the very first case in 1998 in the north of Sweden, as soon as that case was reported, there were other cases emerging in the same area. And there have also been cases of siblings where the first one develops it and then the other. But it should be noted that researchers who proposed that model of disease, they are not certain that there needs to be direct contact between cases. It’s a topic for research.”

Is there any way to understand Resignation Syndrome?

Sallin highlights the main obstacle to understanding Resignation Syndrome – “the lack of research into it”. So far no one has done any follow-up on what happens to these traumatised children, however, we know that they somehow survive.

But for Sophie’s parents, it’s hard to believe there’s still hope. For the past 20 months, they have seen no significant changes in her.

T he town of Skara tells a very different story….

Evidence from the town of Skara in the south of Sweden tells that there is still a way of curing children with Resignation Syndrome despite the fact their families have not a permanent residence.

“From our point of view, this particular sickness has to do with former trauma, not asylum,” told Annica Carlshamre, a senior social worker for Gryning Health, a company that runs Solsidan, a home for all kinds of troubled children.

The carers at Solsidan believe that when children see violence or threats against their parents, their most significant connection in the world gets broken.

“We have an expectation that they want to live, and all their abilities are still there,” Clara Ogren, Solsidan.

It’s important to rebuild that family connection, but for that, the child needs to start recovering. So Solsidan believes the first step should be to separate the families from their children.All conversations related to the migration process are prohibited in front of the child.

The children perform their daily chores. Experienced staff like Clara Ogren, help them to once again colour their life by making them colour or draw by holding their hands to grip a pencil.

“We play for them until they can play on their own. And we goof around a lot and dance and listen to music. We want to bring all their senses to life. So we might take a little bit of Coca-Cola, and put it in their mouth so they taste something sweet. Even if they are tube-fed, we put them in the kitchen so they smell food,” she explained.

Efforts paid…

Its observed that the longest time a child took to recover was six months. Since children have no contact with their families this factor motivates them to get back to their families even through a phone call.

Can this Syndrome find its way to America? Let us know what you think about it",loanpride.com,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
159265,"











No matter how rewarding your full-time job might be, finding the right side hustle business idea and eventually becoming fully self-employed is even more meaningful than a great paycheck and solid benefits.

Choosing the path of entrepreneurship, and working on your side hustle business idea, is without a doubt riskier than being content with holding a 9-5 job. It requires way more sacrifices and ideas.

However, once you’re reaping the lifestyle benefits of being your own boss and hustling your way into making significantly more money than you ever could at your day job, the hard work will eventually start pay you off.

Business Ideas to Generate Side Income While on a Day Job

Online Freelancing

If you decide to work as a writer, content manager, editor, web developer, graphic designer, and many other jobs, you’ll build incredibly valuable skills that are extremely high in demand. You can get up to speed on building websites in as little as a few months with inexpensive or free online education programs like Treehouse, the Web Developer Bootcamp on Udemy and Codecademy. Enrich your skillsets and achieve professional growth at its finest.

Language Teaching

Do you speak another language? Do you speak English well enough to teach it? Either way, your skills are in demand and will help you make extra money. People need to learn other languages and non-English speakers need to learn English. Most people prefer to learn a conversational style rather than just conjugate verbs around the dinner table. Who knew just talking and having a conversation could result in earning additional income?

Gourmet Cooking and Baking

If you love baking and are unable to keep your hand out of the proverbial cookie jar over a healthier lunch platter, making these gourmet goodies is a great side hustle with plenty of long-term potentials. Start by learning how to execute unique and tasty gourmet recipes, then seal the deal by creating or purchasing professional-looking packaging. Sell these treats online or to people in your local community.

Meal-To-Go preparations are also a hype since most people are really busy. Making meals in advance is a great way to save money for yourself – but you can often prepare these for others as well and sell them for a markup. Prepare eight casserole for example and then sell six of them to cover your costs, and you’ve got two free dinners for your family (and maybe a bit more). You can grow this by taking orders from others and finding out what they like.

Event Planning and Coordination

Events like family reunions and large parties are often full of busywork that many people simply don’t want to tackle. That can be the perfect place for you to step in and take charge of the planning and coordination. And thanks to the Internet, it is now easier than ever to market your event planning services.

Fitness Coaching

Many gymnasiums will trade membership and often a bit more for a person willing and able to teach an exercise class. You can also find people who don’t want to go to a gym and train them at home as a personal trainer. If you’re in a good shape, this is a great opportunity to earn some extra money, plus it can often lead to additional income with one-on-one instruction opportunities.

Amazon Reselling

Anyone can sell goods on Amazon. If you’re the type to hit all the local garage sales each weekend, there are all sorts of valuable things that can be resold online as a side hustle business idea. If you want to step your Amazon selling game up, check out this detailed guide to Amazon and eBay retail arbitrage on Entrepreneur featuring an interview with Julie Becker and several drop shippers who’ve grown this home based business idea from side hustle into a lucrative money-maker.

Travel Consultancy

If you love to travel and find yourself randomly searching for airfare sales or browsing Lonely Planet, why not carve out a niche for yourself as a private travel agent? Take my friend, Mark Jackson’s lead with what he’s doing to build a travel consulting side hustle business idea.

Start with word of mouth recommendations from friends who know they can count on you for the cheapest flights, create a Facebook or LinkedIn group to invite people who want to stay on top of the latest deals and keep giving them updates on how to make your dream trip a reality.

Want to share a profitable niche business idea with our fellow readers? Hit the comment section and let us know what you would do.",loanpride.com,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
159275,"October 5, 2017

Thanks to the popularity of the Internet, the millennials are now able to express and…",loanpride.com,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
159253,"











Imagine this: You’re browsing the web or your fave social media platform till you’ve come across your much-awaited dress on sale at 50 percent off. What do you think is the next thing you would do? Of course, hit BUY or that “CART” button! It’s always ‘shopping made easy’ these days!

What This Technology Boost Has For All Shoppers Across the Globe

Almost everybody likes buying new stuff, but it’s not always the easiest or comfortable thing to do. People are waiting for new technologies that will raise the whole process of shopping to a higher level, and that’s what augmented reality can do for sure in the nearest future.

Customers want to see what they are going to buy before any purchase is made, and AR makes it possible to see virtual products in the real environment. So augmented reality can solve plenty of actual problems through online shopping. Even if you have all of a product’s parameters, it’s still hard to imagine how it will look like in your home or whenever you want it to be, without using some augmented reality applications.

The Birth of Online Retail Innovation

Like most disruptions, digital retail technology got off to a shaky start. A bevy of internet-based retailers in the 1990s—Amazon.com, Pets.com, and pretty much everything else—embraced what they called online shopping or electronic commerce. These fledgling companies ran wild until a combination of ill-conceived strategies, speculative gambles, and a slowing economy burst the dot-com bubble. The ensuing collapse wiped out half of all e‑commerce retailers and provoked an abrupt shift from irrational exuberance to economic reality.

Today, however, that economic reality is well-established. The research firm Forrester estimates that e-commerce is now approaching $$200 billion in revenue in the United States alone (reaching more than $$500 billion by 2020). Hence, its accounts will shoot up to 9% of total retail sales, up from 5% five years ago. The corresponding figure is about 10% in the United Kingdom, 3% in Asia-Pacific, and 2% in Latin America.

Globally, digital retailing is probably headed toward 15% to 20% of total sales, though the proportion will vary significantly by sector. Moreover, much digital retailing is now highly profitable. Amazon’s five-year average return on investment, for example, is 17%, whereas traditional discount and department stores average 6.5%.

As it evolves, digital retailing is quickly morphing into something so different that it requires a new name: omnichannel retailing. The name reflects the fact that retailers will be able to interact with customers through countless channels. These can be through websites, physical stores, kiosks, direct mail and catalogs, call centers, social media, mobile devices, gaming consoles, televisions, networked appliances, home services, and more.

Unless conventional merchants adopt an entirely new perspective—one that allows them to integrate disparate channels into a single seamless omnichannel experience—they are likely to be swept away.

Why Has This Form of Consumerism Made a Name in the Industry?

One of the obvious reasons why online shopping has prospered is because it allows you to purchase items from the comfort of your own home. Not everyone enjoys the so-called “shopping experience,” preferring to make a few clicks with their mouse and be done with it.

However, that’s not the only reason for the success of online shopping. One of the best weapons that online retailers have is the ability to track their visitors and obtain consumer data. They can tell where the majority of their consumers are located, how they reached the page, what types of sites they visit and how fast they go through the shopping process. With this information, online companies can quickly change their marketing and business strategies to cater to their customers in the most efficient way possible.

The best word that can be used to summarize the success of online shopping is “convenience.” It’s convenient for the consumer because they can shop from any location with a simple Internet connection and it’s convenient for retailers because they can track user data without investing into any special devices — or paying for a physical location.

The Verdict

Online shopping is indeed the future of retail marketing to most of us — people across the globe, all from the different walks of life.

No doubt, the biggest advantage of augmented reality in marketing is limitless. This technology will satisfy people who don’t like shopping at all and who is too lazy to go to the mall. The future the technologies are coming to our homes to make life better and easier, so let it come in.

Now, the question is: Are you really up to a greater challenge? Which is your favorite shopping type? Let us know below 😉",loanpride.com,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
375951,"











Imagine what you can do if you had millions of dollars in your bank account. Some would buy huge mansions, while some would spend it on a luxury car collection. Would you believe that one person chose to use $$450 million on a single painting? This is not new because a lot of people around the world apparently spend millions on pieces up for grabs during art auctions.

The Underestimated Mundi

“Mona Lisa” has been given a male version which is called the “Salvator Mundi”. The painting, which is one of the few pieces of Italian master Leonardo Da Vinci, is an image of Jesus Christ. The painting wasn’t in the best condition when it was rediscovered in Louisiana back in 2005, so Robert Simon, who is an art collector from New York City, purchased the painting for less than $$10,000 since he believed it was just a copy and not an actual Da Vinci painting.

Because of the painting being hidden for decades, Simon spent a lot of time in restoring it. Not one but a total of six years was spent for the restoration of the painting. Dianne Dwyer Modestini, who is a New York University paintings conservator, was the woman responsible for all the restoration that happened. Simon claims that once they removed the paint layer which seemed ancient, the original work beneath it really looked like the real deal. He even met with Da Vinci experts to confirm if it was legit—and yes, it was!

He instantly became scared because he knew he needed to keep it safe since it would attract the attention of a lot of people. The painting was originally kept in Modestini’s studio throughout the whole restoration process then it was later transferred to a locked safe. Eventually, the painting was moved to another safe place which was an off-site storage locker that is used by the people from the elite art world.

Once all the restoration was finished, Simon was ready to go public about it. He had meetings with the Metropolitan Museum of Art and the National Gallery in London and the painting was eventually put up for exhibit around the world. It has been exhibited in places like New York, San Francisco, Hong Kong, and London.

From One Rich Man To Another

Of course, numerous people wanted to get their hands on the painting once they heard it was an actual Da Vinci painting. After Simon, the next guy who was able to purchase the painting was Yves Bouvier, a Swiss art dealer. He took out $$80 million from his bank account for the purchase. You could definitely see how much the painting’s worth was growing from Simon’s original $$10,000 purchase.

After one year, Bouvier already gave up the painting and sold it to the Russian billionaire, Dmitry Rybolovlev. Bouvier sold it for $$127 million and little did Rybolovlev know that he just made a super profitable purchase. He did not waste any second and instantly placed the piece up for auction in Christie’s Auction House in New York.

Dmitry Rybolovlev, the most recent owner of the Salvator Mundi before it was auctioned for $$450 million

When the Salvator Mundi was placed up for bidding, it started at $$100 million and later ended in a whopping $$400 million bid. (The extra $$50 million was for different fees for the auction) The identity of the bidder remains unknown but we’re sure he/she has billions in their name to be able to make such purchase. Simon was present during the bidding and he says he didn’t feel any loss when the hammer dropped at a $$400 million-worth bid. He says he feels honored to have discovered such masterpiece.

The Salvator Mundi is now the Most Expensive Art Work ever to be sold. Two years ago, de Kooning’s “Interchange” was the title holder of Most Expensive Art Work at $$300 million. The buyer was billionaire Ken Griffin who was fond of buying multi-million dollar paintings. Griffin was one of the suspects who was rumored to be the unnamed buyer of the Mundi.



How much would you pay for a genuine Da Vinci piece?

Leave Your Comment",loanpride.com,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
375947,"











For decades, child-trafficking victims have been used as instruments of crime in the slavery business and a recent story of a 14-year-old girl who was forced to sell drugs on the streets of London reveals the harsh reality of human trafficking.

According to statistics, the total count of modern slavery victims has climbed up to 30 million worldwide. Here are some insightful facts about human trafficking.

Thousand of People Affected in Britain Alone

A report released by Britain’s modern slavery commission revealed that human trafficking and slavery affects thousands of people in Britain alone. Among them is a 14-year-old girl, whose identity has been kept secret for her safety, threatened into selling cocaine and other Class A drugs by a notorious gang leader.

The girl claims that she was lured into the dangerous drug-dealing business through a social media app where she first met a drug dealer. Teenage girls like her often fall prey to such dangerous traps at an early age and continue to be exploited in the slavery business for years.

For months, the 14-year-old would leave her home every Friday morning, dressed in her regular school uniform, and catch a train from Victoria station to a small town 60 miles away from London. With her school bag slug over her shoulder, to the normal eye it seemed like she was on her way to school. But the reality was far from it.

A Sales Quota

The girl had a daily sales quota to meet– and her life depended on it. Every day she must sell more drugs than before to meet the increasing demand or face the wrath of the gang leader. If she wasn’t able to bring back enough money, she would fall victim to physical and intimate assault.

The 14-year-old’s mother had no idea what her daughter had gotten herself into. Being a neglected child, she could not open up about the truth to anybody. It wasn’t until she suddenly disappeared last summer, that the truth about her secret activities began to surface.

Her mother had lost all hope of ever finding her little girl, assuming that she died a long time ago until a detective showed up at her door claiming that the girl might be still alive and have fallen in the hands of human traffickers.

A few months later, the 14-year-old was found by the police and her eye-opening story published in New York Times.

How can financial aspects affect someone’s vulnerability?

Experts point out that people with poor quality of life and no financial support from family are especially vulnerable to falling into such traps. The rescued girl, who met the drug dealer on a messaging app admitted that she needed money and he took advantage of her vulnerability, showing her how she could make a huge earning by doing an insignificant job – and being the naïve teenager that she was, she believed him.

During the four months that she worked for the gang, she made very little money, even though she was promised a daily wage of $$175. She was given a cell phone and expensive jewelry but the work benefits were short-lived. One day, she was told by the leader that she had been spotted selling drugs by the cops and they were on a hunt to find her. She was soon transferred to a garage of a safe house far away from the city where she was forced to live for almost seven months.

Things were different now. She was no longer leaving town to sell drugs. Instead, she tasked with preparing the supplies and cleaning up after other dealers. The man who introduced her into the world of drug dealing was no longer who he had pretended to be when they had first met. He would often beat her and tell her that she was no longer of any use to him.

It wasn’t until the gang members began to intimately assault the little girl, that she decided that the situation couldn’t get any worse and now was the time to get out. One day, she called the police from the closest laundromat and explained everything to them. The next day she was rescued from her perpetrators and brought back home.

The teenager fears that her life may still be in danger from the huge network of drug dealers that she worked with for almost a year. In the modern world that we live in, its astonishing to hear that such form of slavery does exist and young girls fall victim to it every day.

Do you think Slavery has gone from the world or is it still here?

Leave Your Comment",loanpride.com,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
159255,"











We all know that Samsung just dropped the shadiest and most savage advertisement against Apple and it truly created a lot of online buzz. Jumping out from the world of smartphones, there are other wars that are happening in the world of business.

Amazon has been quite successful through the years. It has been doing business and it actually became the biggest internet-based retailer. Achieving such success can be both a blessing and a curse because now, some companies are out to bring Amazon down. Walmart has recently joined forces with Google in order to go against the success Amazon has been getting so far.

It seemed like the whole idea of Walmart to bring Amazon down started back in 2015 when Amazon became more valuable than Walmart through market capitalization. Walmart is still the biggest company in terms of revenue but it seems like more and more investors favor Amazon the most since it just keeps on growing and growing.

So Why Ask A Helping Hand From Google?

Walmart asking help from Google was quite smart. Google will be in charge of taking down the orders and later use Google Express for the logistics of the payment while the delivery of the products would all be taken care of by Walmart.

Amazon achieved huge success since they launched their voice-activated speaker called Echo. People just loved the idea of doing your groceries by just talking to a speaker. Now, Walmart is teaming up with Google to go against them through using somehow the same idea. They were able to come up with their own voice-activated speaker called Google Home helping both of these companies to reach greater heights when it comes to e-commerce.

Echo Vs. Google Home

Walmart and Google seemed like they were able to give Amazon a big punch because Google Home can easily be compared to Amazon Echo. Both of them have pretty much the same features—doing the groceries, buying stuff online, playing music, and even asking when the world is going to end. They encounter differences in terms of pricing since Amazon Echo is only $$100 while the Google Home is $$130. For Walmart, their edge seems to be the fact that people can order what they want already from Walmart online. And, as they finish work or come from an errand then just need to head to the nearest Walmart outlet to pick up the things they purchased earlier.

If you take a look at the graph, you can see a growth in new users both devices have. It’s clearly seen that a lot of people chose to go for the Google Home as the year 2016 ended but Amazon’s Echo wasn’t really left that far behind.

Each device has something the other device hasn’t so it is just a matter of who can bring the better upgrade. One great advantage the Google Home has over the Amazon Echo is the fact that you can actually play music simultaneously with multiple speakers. It’s perfect if you want to achieve that perfect surround sound realness throughout your place.

You can easily talk to your Google Home when you want to play your favorite video on Youtube or your binge-worthy show you are currently streaming on Netflix just have to make sure you have a Chromecast video streamer or a Chromecast built-in for your television.

For the Amazon Echo, on the other hand, you’ll have to get Fire TV and then press a special button on your Fire TV remote if you want the voice-activation to work for TV purposes as well.

So Who Wins This Feud?

Walmart and Google’s move to launch a direct competitor to the Amazon Echo was very smart and it seems like they were able to put in a lot of features that would attract buyers to favor it more. So since both competitors have almost identical capabilities, it’s just a matter of choosing the device in terms of price or if you really are attracted to the fact that Google Home can ease day and night Walmart-runs. Well for lazy people, we’re sure they’d choose the Amazon Echo since you don’t actually need to leave your home in order to get the stuff you need at your doorstep.

Invasion to privacy or a better user experience?",loanpride.com,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
375959,"











People who serve in the military are truly a blessing to the country for their would go to great lengths and risk their lives on a daily basis. Sadly, for one female soldier who was captured in Iraq, the truth about what happened to her was greatly manipulated by the media.

Who Is Jessica Lynch?

Jessica Lynch started serving the army in 2001 since financial struggles hindered her from pursuing a career as a teacher. She was only 17 years old when she was first recruited to the army leaving her dream to become a teacher behind. Back in 2003, the US was dealing with a lot of conflicts regarding Iraq and the Middle East. This was the time when Lynch was deployed to Iraq, not for combat, but to serve as a supply clerk with the 507th Maintenance Company.

When Lynch was aboard, a convoy of the 3rd Combat Support Battalion elements and the 507th Maintenance Company, blew up after they took a wrong turn giving the chance to their enemies to launch a grenade towards the troops.

This event was part of the Battle of Nasiriyah and luckily, she and her best friend, Piestewa, were one of the soldiers who survived the blast. The Iraqi Fedayeen forces later captured them as prisoners of war. Sadly, her best friend Piestewa died from her severe head injury as they were brought to the hospital.

Lynch and her best friend Piestewa who died in the war

When Lynch was hospitalized, Mohammed Odeh al Rehaief, an Iraqi lawyer who witnessed her bad condition and then decided he needed to help her. He was the first to inform the people at the US marine base that Lynch was being held captive and was being “abused”.

Soon after the forces learned about Lynch’s condition, they devised a plan that resulted to be quite successful in rescuing Lynch from the hospital.

Since then, Lynch became the first female prisoner of war who was saved since the Vietnam war. Rick Bragg later penned her biography in the book, I Am a Soldier Too: The Jessica Lynch Story. She became an instant “icon” and “hero” to many.

The Truth Behind The Stories

According to her biography, she was sexually abused but apparently, it was all a lie. She was left in the hospital by the Iraqi forces two days before the US forces came to the rescue. Doctors from the hospital placed her in an ambulance in order to be delivered to the Americans but the Americans later decided to open fire before anybody got to explain anything.

Since a lot of articles claimed she was a hero who fought the Iraqi forces after the convoy explosion, she dismissed the claims saying she was too hurt to fight back and that it was other soldiers who were made the fight for her. Apparently, the Americans knew that there were no Iraqi forces in the hospital and even had cameramen with them as they entered. According to Lynch, she was treated well during her stay in the hospital and even had a “special bed”.

The lawyer who helped devise a plan with the US forces, al Raheif, was later investigated since he apparently made some false claims regarding Lynch’s condition at the hospital. Some experts believe the reason why he did all these was because he was hoping to get an asylum in America along with a $$150 000 book deal.

Lynch referred to all the lies in the media as a “propaganda effort”. She named the other soldiers who were rightful to be given recognition and agreed with those who said people were biased when they chose who to see as a hero. Some people even believed that it was her who started all the lies. She later confronted the author of her biography, Rick Braggs, about all the false things he penned.

Soon after getting back home, Lynch entered therapy because of the sorrows brought by her best friend’s death. She also had to undergo 22 surgeries in total. It was her fragile condition that made doctors think that she can’t conceive anymore due to the injuries she obtained.

New Beginnings

Lynch received a scholarship that was given to her by the US military. She obtained a Bachelor’s Degree and Master’s Degree from the University of West Virginia. She eventually found love along the way and tied the knot with Wes Robbinson.

It seems this story has a happy ending since she not only found love and got married, but she also received the miracle of a lifetime and welcomed their daughter, Dakota Ann, into this world.

Today, she continues to undergo physical therapy so she can get back to how she was before the war. She suffered from countless nightmares and acute post-traumatic stress disorder but was able to remain a fighter and build a happy life.

In 2015, she accomplished her lifelong dream to be a teacher. She balanced it out with her work as a motivational speaker. She also received another career breakthrough when she was given the role of a military specialist in the movie,Virtuous.

Settling Everything Once And For All

She wanted to formally dismiss all the fabricated information that happened in the past so she decided to speak at the U.S. House Committee on Oversight and Government Reform. She concluded that the Pentagon was responsible for the lies about the Battle of Nasiriyah.

Lynch has been through a lot ever since the war and all she wanted was for credit to be given to the right people. It is really scary how the media can be so manipulative these days so think twice before believing what you see on TV or the internet.

Do you think the media tells us the whole truth?

Leave Your Comment",loanpride.com,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
159260,"











Have you ever thought about a rating system that is fully implemented into the society that not only establishes your “trustworthiness”, but its also available for everyone to see? Well, China is serious about implementing it, as detailed in the State Council of China‘s document published in 2014 known as “Planning Outline for the Construction of a Social Credit Syst.”

Although this hierarchal system is at present a voluntary one, soon, by 2020 it is all set to become mandatory.The system China proposed sounds awfully similar to the ominous social rating system featured in an episode of Netflix series “Black Mirror”, which depict a chilling Big-Brother-type, social-media-obsessed future.

In one of the episode “Nosedive” paints the picture of what it’s like to live in a world where individuals Yelp-like ratings of one another to determine their trustworthiness in society. If their personal scores drop too low they not only become the outcasts from society but are even locked up just like Lacie, the protagonist.

It’s all set to become a terrible reality for China’s population

Till now, most of us were being habitual of having our data tracked by sites such as Google, Facebook, and Instagram, and this new system is set to monitor the residents’ friends, credit history, social interactions, shopping habits as well as how they love to spend their leisure time — for instance, for how long and what type of video games they play.

These characterized behaviors will be used for rating a person as either positive or negative, and raising or lowering the individual’s “citizen score” and overall trustworthiness, which will be ranging between 350 and 950 points.

Experts suggest that it can affect job and mortgage eligibility, what educational units children can get into, and even an individual’s ability to make friends.

The policy says that “it will forge a public opinion environment where keeping trust is glorious. It will strengthen sincerity in government affairs, commercial sincerity, social sincerity and the construction of judicial credibility.”

However, anyone who has watched the “Black Mirror” episodes can clearly see citizens living under this rating system were quite sincere in their social interactions.

Ironically, the only time Lacie could feel truly free was when she was imprisoned and removed from the social ranking system.

Being friends with those who have a lower score or posts negative remarks about the government online can even affect your scores as well.

What is astonishing is the new level of hypocrisy of the government where the process is anticipated on rewarding for obedience and punishing the genuine individuality, a lot like the characters were treated in “Nosedive.”

The penalties you could face if you fail to have better Social Credit System:

According to the policy documents and instructions, if you receive a low score on the Social Credit System, perhaps then you could face the following penalties:

You will not be eligible for public office positions

You will no longer have the access to social security and welfare

You will face stricter regulations and be frisking at Chinese customs

You will not be able to apply for any senior level positions in the food and drug sector

You will not be able to sleep in overnight trains

You will not be able to stay in luxurious hotels and restaurants and will have more difficulty traveling

Your children could potentially suffer as they will only be allowed to attend more expensive private schools

It’s quite clear that such kind of ranking system will create a lot of separatism and division, and allow the upper-class people to gain even more special treatment which they are already enjoying. Such type of tyrannical hierarchy is clearly the opposite of equality and a society that prioritizes freedom and love when it comes to personal decisions.

Is this the end of real socializing?",loanpride.com,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
159273,"











We are all entitled to our own opinions. Whenever we say something about another party, they will either take it as a constructive critic or just a plain old insult. For the case of Disney and LA Times, things got complicated when they didn’t meet eye to eye when it came to views and opinions.

What Started The Feud

The LA Times should have done something pretty serious for Disney to go to the extent of banning them from their preview screenings, right? Just last September, they published a very long article about the business links between Disney and Anaheim.

Basically, the article didn’t make Disney look good despite the numerous deals it had with the city. The people from Disney who saw the article said that it was “biased and unfair” so they clearly wanted to cut the ties they had with the LA Times.

Jose F. Moreno, the politician who claimed that other politicians prioritized Disney over the citizens of Anaheim

Ever since the article surfaced the internet and was read by numerous of people, Disney did no longer welcome critics from the LA Times to attend their advanced screenings. These advanced screenings are supposedly a place used for critics to watch a certain movie before it is released in order to build a constructive review.

They are also granted the chance to talk to the celebrities from the movies. By the time the movie is released, there’s already a review that is published that could attract more audience. LA Times was banned at the time the movie, Thor: Ragnarok, hit the cinemas so they weren’t able to publish any review for the movie.

Here Comes The Backup

Disney thought that their move to ban the LA Times won’t really affect them that much—they were wrong. Seems like the LA Times was a good one when it came to congeniality because people from The Washington Times and The New York Times actually backed them up.

People from The Washington Times and The New York Times vowed that they would also not be attending further advanced screenings as long as the LA Times remains banned. The New York Times released a statement saying, ” A powerful company punishing a news organization for a story they do not like is meant to have a chilling effect. This is a dangerous precedent and not at all in the public interest.”

The Washington Times stood by their word and even gave up the chance to get a first-hand look at the upcoming Star Wars movie, Star Wars: The Last Jedi.

Concluding It Was A Wrong Move

A joint statement by The Los Angeles Critics Association, The New York Film Critics Circle, The Boston Society of Film Critics, and the US’s National Society of Film Critics was released saying that year-end awards would not be applicable to Disney movies as long as the LA Times is banned.

They pointed out how contradicting Disney’s move was since we have a free press. People from the UK Critics’ Circle also stood by their fellow Critics’ circles.

Current CEO of Disney, Bob Iger

By now, Disney probably knew that there were just too much odds against them and that they are really not going to win this battle. Two months of a serious backlash against them was strong enough to affect their sales and reputation.

Can you imagine how the big bosses of Disney felt after seeing major Critics circles go against them? They must have been bummed! Well, for now, they seemed to have forgotten the feud since they already decided to lift the ban and allow the LA Times’ critics to attend their advanced screenings again.

This event shows how strong and destroying the Press can really be. One wrong move can lead to a series of chain reactions that would not be good even for one of the most well-established companies such is Disney. We just hope the critics from the LA Times don’t keep grudges because you never know when they’ll feel like publishing an article that won’t be favorable for the people at Disney again.

Does this change everything you thought about Disney?",loanpride.com,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
159276,"November 16, 2017

Would you have ever imagined breastfeeding to become a reason for someone to be taken…",loanpride.com,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
159258,"











US District Judge Vince Chhabria On Wednesday said in San Francisco that the federal government isn’t required to make any payments of Obama care subsidies even as litigation is unfolding over the issue. The judge refused to block the decision by Pres. Trump to discontinue subsidy payments to health care insurance companies giving him a victory over Democratic attorneys general that have frequently challenged the policies of the president in courts.

Chhabria who was appointed by former Democratic president Barack Obama also mentioned that despite the case appearing to be a close call, the administration of Pres. Trump seems to have a stronger legal argument.

The Reason For The Judgment By Judge Chhabria

Earlier this month, the Trump administration had terminated payments to insurance companies to help cover the medical expenses of low-income American families. The actions were part of several moves to repeal the signature health care law which was commonly known as the affordable care act, introduced by Pres. Obama in 2012.

Pres. Trump has been repeatedly opposed by Democratic attorneys general in the courts of law over his immigration policies, environment, and healthcare.

18 states along with the District of Columbia had requested for an immediate order to stall the move by Pres. Trump after his decision to end the subsidies that were provided stating that the case was being litigated. The argument put forward by the attorneys general stated that cutting subsidies would harm customers of insurance companies by raising insurance premiums.

The judgment passed by judge Chhabria clearly stated that the kind of immediate order demanded by the states wasn’t necessary. He also mentioned that the regulators from most states had devised responses which give millions of lower-income Americans access to better health coverage than would have been available in normal circumstances. It was also pointed out that most of the states party to the lawsuit were also following a similar policy.

What Were The Attorneys Generals Expecting From the Lawsuit

The lawsuit which is being headed by California Atty. Gen. Xavier Becerra mentioned in a statement that the decision by Pres. Trump does not allow payments to keep healthcare affordable. Swift action for the integration was becoming even more compelling without an emergency order to halt the actions by the president.

US Sen. Patty Murray, who is a Washington state Democrat, said that the ruling only makes it more crucial for the Senate to pass a bipartisan agreement which she had co-authored and called for authorizing the subsidies.

Does The Decision By Pres. Trump Benefits The US Economy?

A nonpartisan budget office of the Congress had noted, on Wednesday, that the proposal would benefit the American economy by $$3.8 billion over the next decade by cutting down the deficit. Congressional analysts have stated that the subsidies which are presently estimated at $$600 million every month, will cost the American economy $$7 billion this year and is expected to grow to $$10 billion in 2018.

The enrollment season for 2018 insurance policies for Obama care begins on November 1 and judge Chhabria has suggested that the states focus their attention on communicating the message which they had devised as a response to the subsidy cuts to prevent harm to a large number of Americans.

In his order, judge Chhabria also wrote that if the states were really concerned about people being scared by the thought of higher premiums, they should put an end to the yelling and rather concentrate on providing people appropriate responses.

Insurance companies have already stated they don’t benefit from the subsidies given by the affordable care act because they are passed directly to the consumers in order to reduce deductibles, copayments and other medical expenses which low-income people are required to pay out-of-pocket.

The government will be compelled to spend more by providing financial assistance to low-income Americans because the absence of subsidies on policies would compel insurance companies to increase premiums. Therefore whether the decision by Pres. Trump will benefit the economy or will leave it saddled with additional expenditure is still a matter of discussion.

The premiums for the silver plans of Obama care, which is the most popular on the individual health insurance market, have already risen by 34% for 2018 which is a sure-fire indicator that insurance companies are not in a mood to offer any discounts to Americans on healthcare bills.

Are Americans Waging A Battle Between The Devil And the Deep Sea?

Facebook Caption: Did Judge Chhabria Upset Democratic Plans On Obama Care?",loanpride.com,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
159266,"











As we reach adulthood, we subscribe to medical and dental insurance, either voluntarily or mandated by the company, in order to shoulder our medical expenses should any emergency or unexpected cases happen. Normally, medical and dental insurance coverage are only applicable for domestic affairs, meaning you need to be within the country of your domain to be able to use it. But high costs and affordability actually prompt us to think of medical tourism. Before you start signing up for medical tourism, you might want to read this and learn how it can and how it can’t actually help you.

What is Medical Tourism?

By definition, medical or dental tourism is a financial coverage used by a person who’s currently outside of his or her home country while undergoing a medical or dental treatment. The coverage of the medical tourism can vary depending on the country and policy the user has subscribed for. For example, for American citizens, medical tourism can be used and is logistically possible if they travel between U.S./Mexico or U.S./Canadian borders just for an afternoon errand. It can also be used in faraway visit such as visiting the Far East (e.g. Thailand or India).

An international travel health website such as Patients Beyond Borders estimated that around 1.4 million Americans crosses the border and spend an average 3,800 to $$6,000 per visit to seek medical or dental care. They’ve also listed some of the most popular destinations the Americans love to travel:

How Much Money Can You Actually Save from Acquiring Medical or Dental Tourism?

We got to admit that the price and coverage will vary depending on various variables. However, there are certain examples or basis in which you can use it as a source to get an estimated price how much you can save when availing this type of insurance.

Note: This sample computation is based on a dental crown replacement a customer had undergone last year.

The total cost of the procedure from the local dentist was around $$1,115. When the insurance benefit was applied, the total cost was cut down at around $$453.

The price at a random dentist in Mexico estimated around $$180.

When it comes to the cost of safety concerns, you should consider a lot of things before deciding to acquire medical or dental tourism. This is because even if you can benefit with cash bundle or wait-time, this option isn’t available for everyone.

Advantages of Acquiring Medical Tourism

Even though we can say that it’s technically an additional expense for us, there are certainly perks you can get from having a medical tourism. According to the World Health Organization, here are the following advantages you can get:

Access to the most advanced technology: 40%

Better quality care for medically-necessary procedures: 32%

Quicker access to medically-necessary procedures: 15%

Lower cost care for medically-necessary procedures: 9%

Lower cost care for elective procedures: 4%

Medical tourism has its advantages in that you have access to better technology and faster medical care at a lower cost than what you may have available in your own proximity,” said Dr. Constantine George, “However, be sure your doctor or specialist follows up with you or your local primary care doctor to ensure there are no possible complications.”

Disadvantages of Acquiring Medical tourism

Likewise, it’s also appropriate to discuss the repercussions and risks we’re taking when acquiring medical tourism. What does it mean if we aid medical treatments outside our beloved homeland?

Language barriers where the medical personnel is not speaking your native language. This can cause delay or miscommunication while you’re undergoing treatment.

Medication may counterfeit for the poor quality, unlike when you’re consulting with your usual specialist.

Risk of exposure to antibiotic-resistant bacteria in some countries

in some countries Flying after the surgery can trigger post-surgical problems.

“Being away from the specialist who performed the procedure may be a disadvantage in that they can’t assess the follow up as accurately, and this responsibility will fall into the hands of your doctor at home,” noted Dr. George.

What do you think about medical tourism? Is it worth taking a shot? We’d love to hear your opinion…",loanpride.com,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
159263,"











Las Vegas is in the headlines over the last three days for reasons that shouldn’t have been. Stephen Paddock, who loved guns, was a millionaire with interests in real estate deals and also a high-stakes gambler. Paddock decided to do something that will leave him etched in the memories of thousands. Paddock used his collection of guns [23 in all] to open fire on people attending a concert, killing 59 and injuring nearly 530. What could have prompted Paddock who seemingly had everything he wanted to commit a dastardly act of this type?

Mandalay Bay Resort And Casino.

Paddock committed the crime from the Mandalay Bay Resort and Casino, where he had checked in three days prior to the shooting. He had walked into the resort with 10 suitcases, obviously packed with his guns and thousands of rounds of ammunition. Paddock committed a crime which is presently acknowledged as being one of the worst in US history. Was Paddock mad about something when he finally decided to pull the trigger? Did Paddock even consider the implications of his act when he exhausted magazine after magazine, firing rapid-fire rounds into the crowd? Let us look into the life of Stephen Paddock as published this far to understand whether we can find any indications.

Paddock Checked into The Mandalay Bay Resort And Casino Three Days Prior to The Incident.

Stephen Paddock Provided No Indications He Was A Psychopath Of Any Kind

On the exterior, Paddock did not indicate he was similar to a mass murderer according to Clint Van Zandt, who is a supervisor in the FBI’s behavioral science unit but was a former hostage negotiator. Well, does anyone? Paddock wasn’t displaying signs of any mental illness despite being 64 years of age. Is it a requirement? Paddock had carried 23 guns to the hotel, leaving behind 19 at his home along with a pile of ammunition sufficient to begin a war. The FBI has, however, confirmed they haven’t seen any indicators which could suggest Paddock had intentions to commit homicide or suicide or both. The FBI just confirms Paddock had planned the attack for days which is perhaps rather easy to deduct since Paddock checked into the hotel three days earlier.

The rifles Paddock was carrying had been modified to make them automatic and were also equipped with telescopes. The rifles were capable of firing 400 to 800 rounds of ammunition per minute. Paddock had planned every detail of the dastardly act which he committed from the 32nd floor of the Mandalay Bay Casino and Resort and fired into the concert site which is located just off the Las Vegas strip. Paddock knew what he wanted to do and how he would do it but he didn’t have an escape plan, believes the FBI. However, Paddock seemed to have planned for everything because he escaped simply by using the gun on himself.

The Life of Stephen Paddock According to People Close to Him

Stephen Paddock was the son of a notorious bank robber who was also a fugitive. Paddock had two ex-wives and a live-in girlfriend when this dastardly act was committed. He was living a comfortable life in a retirement community in Nevada. Paddock wasn’t affiliated with any sect, religion or politics and wasn’t even bothered about such matters. Eric Paddock, the bewildered brother of Stephen, told reporters he wasn’t able to understand anything of what had happened. Stephen Paddock had alternative bouts of weeping and shouting but was also a person who was financially sound and did not hesitate to go on cruises or gamble.

Eric Paddock hadn’t spoken to his brother for nearly 6 months and only received a text message from Stephen after hurricane Irma, as he mentioned to the Associated Press. Their mother was in touch with Stephen a couple of weeks ago when Stephen was told the lady needed a walker which he promptly arranged for and sent to her.

Stephen Paddock also sent text messages to his brother Eric when he won $$40,000 on a slot machine but Eric mentioned it was the way he played. Eric has also provided information that his brother was a multimillionaire and together they had business dealings and also owned property. No information about whether Stephen had also accumulated gambling debts is available at this moment.

Stephen Paddock apparently had no criminal history despite his father being a bank robber, who was described as notorious. Benjamin Hoskins Paddock had escaped from a federal prison from Texas in 1968 when Stephen was still in his teens. Benjamin Paddock was described as a psychopath by the FBI and had been serving a 20-year sentence for numerous bank robberies in Phoenix. The senior Paddock managed to lead a life under an assumed name in Oregon for nearly a decade until investigators found him in 1978 when he established Oregon’s first bingo parlor that was licensed.

Stephen Paddock had purchased a three bedroom single-story home for $$369,000 in 2015, in the newly built Mesquite, Texas, according to the police. Paddock was also the owner of rental properties numbering three but never had any brush with the law enforcement agencies. He had been married twice and divorced both times, ending the marriages in 1980 and 1990. The only brush Paddock had with the law was in 2012 when he sued the Cosmopolitan Hotel and Resorts in Nevada for a slip and fall accident on a wet floor. The lawsuit was dismissed by the courts and settled by arbitration.

Going through the history of Stephen Paddock, it becomes easy to understand he was a man who had everything he ever wanted including the guns. He was leading a comfortable life, was a millionaire and was having the best of everything including the cruises and the gambling. Why would Stephen Paddock want to become a mass murderer and kill 59 people while injuring 530? Was he trying to comprehend whether the investment he made in guns was worth the money? Was he trying to prove something that law enforcement agencies haven’t been able to comprehend until this moment? The costs of this action will remain etched in the memory of the United States forever as it will in the minds of people that were in some way witness to the incident. 59 innocents have lost their lives and countless others are undergoing treatment for injuries. Thousands of questions are floating around speaking about various theories of why Stephen Paddock committed this act.

Your views on the Stephen Paddock mystery? Please share them with us…",loanpride.com,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
159268,"











Hugh Hefner was fortunate enough to achieve success with his company, Playboy. His success made him reach a desirable amount of fame and wealth that made him live a very lavish lifestyle. He was 91 years old when he passed away earlier this year, on September 27. Right after his death, a lot of questions surfaced about who was going to benefit from Hefner’s million dollar fortune.

We’re sure everyone who has been part of Playboy’s magazine and Hefner’s close cycle was brought to tears when news broke out. Now that he is gone, we’re sure he was able to rest in peace knowing that he was able to carve his name in history and make an impact in the industry.

How Much Did Hefner Leave Behind?

Hugh Hefner was only 27 years old when he first launched the Playboy magazine. Marilyn Monroe, who was the first girl to be seen nude on the cover, played a big role in Hugh’s success even though he never had the chance to meet her in person.

As the years passed, the magazine achieved a huge success and by the time he knew it, Hefner already had a net worth of over $$200 million. But when the era of technology arose, the number of people who opt to buy hard-copy magazines dropped significantly.

The new era left its impact and made the Playboy sales not as strong as before. At the time of his death, Hefner’s net worth was $$43 million. He was also a partial owner of the magazine having only 35% of the brand. Last year, his famous Playboy Mansion was sold for $$100 million to his neighbor, Daren Metropoulos. Before making the sale, both Hefner and Darren reached to an agreement that Hefner could still live in the house until the day he would pass away. Hefner was also known for having around $$36 million worth of investments in stocks and as well as a joint account worth $$6 million with an unnamed person.

Who Gets To Benefit From His Will?

Hugh Hefner has four kids. His daughter Christie and son David were from his very first wife, Millie Williams. His sons, Marston and Cooper, were from his second marriage with Kimberley Conrad. The terms from his last will and testament continue to remain confidential. However, rumor has it that 50% of his fortune will go to his charities while the other half will be split evenly between his four kids.

Hugh Hefner had a history with a crazy number of girls and guys. Out of all the women he ever dated, Holly Madison might have been the most outspoken one. This is because she spilled a lot of juicy details in her book, Down The Rabbit Hole. She mentioned that she found a document that said Hugh was going to leave the Playboy Mansion to her but this was all back in 2008 at the time they were breaking up.

Hugh’s wife, Crystal Harris, at the time of his death, was not added to his last will and will not be inheriting a single penny thanks to their ironclad prenup. Lucky for her, she still gets to inherit something from their marriage. After she and Hugh got married, they purchased a $$4.995 million-worth Hollywood Hills mansion which she is listed as the co-owner.

Hugh has now left a legacy behind that we know it will last for decades to come. His name will still be remembered as a game-changer in the magazine world. Passing away at 91 years old, he was truly blessed with such a long and fruitful life. He made a lot of friends as well as enemies but, at the end of the day, he worked really hard to get where he was.

Who do you think is most worthy to inherit all this fortune?",loanpride.com,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
375941,"











Just this weekend, netizens all over the world were shocked and surprised by the new and controversial Dove Ad, posted on their official Facebook page last Friday. It was taken down the following day but most of us still managed to see it!

Dove’s Controversial “Ready for a Dove Shower?” Ad

Dove's racist advertising is nothing new… just the most recent of many pic.twitter.com/U3fdRICHZv — Black Girl Culture (@blkgirlculture) October 8, 2017

The offensive ad portrayed a 3-minute GIF with a description “Ready for a Dove Shower?” in which it showcased a black woman removing her dark brown t-shirt, only to reveal a white woman underneath. Furthermore, she removes her beige t-shirt and throws to a third woman who’s also white. Netizens were quick to lambast Dove’s ad campaign, saying how it represents racism in its core and underestimates the black women. The Dove management was quick to take down the ad campaign as they released an official statement in response.

“This did not represent the diversity of real beauty which is something Dove is passionate about and is core to our beliefs, and it should not have happened,” the company said in a statement on Sunday. “We apologize deeply and sincerely for the offense that it has caused and do not condone any activity or imagery that insults any audience.” Marissa Solan, a spokeswoman of Dove, further reiterated that their intention for the GIF was to “convey that Dove Body Wash is for every woman and a celebration of diversity but we got it wrong and, as a result, offended many people.”

However, no matter how much Dove tried to fix the damage, the word was already out and the netizens, especially those popular Hollywood endorsers, couldn’t help but comment the ad.

An image we recently posted on Facebook missed the mark in representing women of color thoughtfully. We deeply regret the offense it caused. — Dove (@Dove) October 7, 2017

One of them is Naomi Blake, a 29-year old beauty entrepreneur who has massive followers on her Instagram account. She said how she reached out to the company about the ad. And Blake showed her distress when she only received a “copy-paste” response. Naomi also posted some screenshots about the ad that went viral over the weekend.

“How can you see a body wash ad like this and not realize? It rubbed me and many people the wrong way,” Blake said. “What are you telling the little black girls who watch this?”

Ever since the post went viral, Dove officially released a statement in response to Blake’s tweet about their ad campaign. Facebook netizens were also enraged about the campaign and they couldn’t help but leave their comments. Like one Facebook user named Ariel Macklin wrote:

“What was the mark? I mean anyone with eyes can see how offensive this is. Not one person on your staff objected to this? Wow. Will not be buying your products anymore.”. This comment of hers garnered around 1,100 likes and reactions.

This Is Not the First Time Dove Launched a Controversial Ad Campaign

Seeing as Dove has been running for more than a decade as a campaign for natural beauty, they’ve been using models with a diversity of weight, age, and races to emphasize their campaigns. One notable ad they’ve used was the “My Beauty My Say,” “Real Beauty,” and “#BeautyBias” has been lauded for their strong stance and depiction of diverse beauty and self confidence.

Unfortunately, this also isn’t the first time where Dove had some mishaps in their ad campaigns. In 2011. Dove was lambasted because of its campaign where they lined up three women and compared them from the lightest to darkest skin tone. They also appeared in “before” and “after” labels which signify that the dark skin is due to dryness and that is why it drew people’s attention, as it promoted racism.

Just this year, Dove’s UK Branch posted a short video which displays Dove’s products in various shapes and sizes. Its controversial tagline was “Beauty comes in all shapes and sizes”. The Critics said it suggested that women’s beauty is defined by its shape and size. In which, this racist line attacks those women who are plus size and those that are tiny in size.

Will you still patronize or boycott Dove products after this? We’d like to hear your thoughts too…

Leave Your Comment",loanpride.com,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
375945,"











Scientists have made a breakthrough in medicine with the creation of a revolutionary gene therapy that could treat diseases and disorders that had previously been declared incurable. The treatment has been approved by the Food and Drug Administration in U.S and is considered safe to use on humans.

What is Hunter Syndrome?

Brian Madeux is the first man ever to receive this gene-editing treatment for his incurable Hunter Syndrome. Now at the age of 44, Madeux was born with this rare condition and despite seeking treatments from various doctors, his syndrome has not been cured.

But for the first time ever, there may be a glimmer of hope for him to lead a normal life. Hunter Syndrome, also known as Mucopolysaccharidoses II, is a rare genetic disorder that causes damage to body cells and affects 1 in every 100,000 men.

People suffering from the Hunter Syndrome lack a key enzyme required for the breakdown of connective tissues. As a result, waste inside the cells is not broken down and it gradually accumulates over time. This build-up of waste inside the tissues happens in all vital organs such as heart, lungs and even the brain. Patients suffering from the Hunter Disorder experience symptoms such as hearing difficulties, breathing problems and other serious health complications which can worsen over time and shorten the lifespan of the patient.

Dr. Paul Harmatz, who has observed several patients like Brian Madeux before claims that in most cases, the sufferers of Hunter Disorder die from organ failure before they can reach the age of twenty.

How the New Treatment Works?

The engineers of the new revolutionary treatment that may give Brian Madeux a new life explain that curing the Hunter Syndrome is as simple as hooking up the patient to an IV which contains the gene editors along with the corrected copies of the gene to replace the faulty ones in the body upon entering the bloodstream.

Madeux’s doctors said that the infusion lasts from two to three hours and once the procedure has been completed, they must wait for a few months before seeing any improvements in the patient’s condition. Sangamo Therapeutics’s chief medical officer and pioneer of the unique treatment, Dr. Edward Conner said that he and his team are hopeful that the therapy will work the way they intend it to. It is only a matter of time before this gene-editing treatment becomes a breakthrough in the world of medicine.

A Step in the Right Direction

Brian Madeux and several others who have been affected by the Hunter Syndrome are anxiously awaiting the outcome of the treatment, hoping that they may finally have a shot at living a healthier, longer life. Before this groundbreaking genetic treatment, Hunter Syndrome patients had to rely on frequent enzyme replacement therapies to manage their condition.

Despite the expensive procedures, the patients still suffered from painful symptoms such as joint pain and were unable to avoid progressive damage to their vital organs. The new treatment offers an easy and pain-free solution for eradicating genetic mutation that causes the enzyme deficiency therefore getting rid of the syndrome once and for all.

Patients Get Only One Shot at Effective Therapy

Dr. Connor explains that genetic disorders like the Hunter Syndrome are relatively simple to treat with the new experimental therapy since only one specific type of gene is affected by this condition. But the precision for this treatment is extremely crucial in order for it to work.

Our body houses over 30,000 different types of genes and the treatment must act only on one specific type that needs replacing. The patients only get one chance to receive effective therapy, if the initial treatment fails the body becomes immune to the virus and no longer responds to it.

Madeux has been from the hospital after being kept under observation for 24 hours. The patient has shown no signs of complications from the therapy so far and the doctors will be keeping a close eye on his blood cells to see whether the mutated gene has been replaced with the corrected version.

The first trial of the gene-therapy is seen as a huge step forward in the world of medical science and Dr. Connor is hopeful that Madeux’s bravery will pay off in a big way. “I’m humbled by Madeux’s decision to participate (in this experiment)” he said.

Is this Medical Manipulation a Miracle or a Danger for Humanity?

Leave Your Comment",loanpride.com,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
159278,"November 19, 2017

We are sure most of you have seen movies like Big Hero 6 or Real…",loanpride.com,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
159271,"











When Megan Smith told she suffered from depression, her manager encouraged her to apply for other jobs. “It was horrible – I felt really exposed,” she said soon after the news about her illness spread across the office like a wildfire. After a few anxious, unhappy months, she eventually quit her job.

The truth is, Megan is not the only one who is facing the blues at the workplace.

According to UK’s Government-commissioned report, nearly 300,000 people with a long-term mental health condition lose their jobs every year. This mental health condition costs the UK economy between €83bn and €111bn every year, with a cost of between €37bn and €47bn to employers annually, according to the reports.Taking these figures into consideration, it now becomes evident that mental health issues are not being adequately addressed in the workplace.

Paul Farmer, the co-author of Thriving At Work report, admitted that mental health is still a subject treated as a taboo at many workplaces.

On the other hand, Obamacare’s mental health coverage requirements briefly highlighted the importance of mental health. However, mental health issues are often left unspoken.

Why it’s important to discuss mental health?

Talking about common issues and challenges such as mental health should be taken normally. By talking about it, we can make it easier for each one of us to fix any problem we may be experiencing.

Mr Farmer, chief executive of a mental health charity organization called ‘Mind’, says: “Opportunities are often missed to prevent poor mental health and ensure that employees who may be struggling get the support they need.

“In many instances, employers simply don’t understand the crucial role they can play, or know where to go for advice and support.”

So why is still such a stigma attached to it?

It’s often seen that people find it difficult to understand things that they cannot see or explain. There’s a degree of mystery, which carries a lot of cultural baggage on what goes on in our mind that no longer applies to our body.

People who are suffering from any type of mental illness, often don’t fully understand what’s going on with them and start to experience a feeling of guilt that might even make them feel ashamed about their condition.

How to bring such issues up with your manager?

If you are one of them, then try having a more open relationship with your manager. Mental health issues are a spectrum that runs from thriving to severe problems and is, of course, subject to change.

Have you noticed how often we ask our colleagues “How are you doing today?” ? Experts strongly recommend individuals to give an honest answer, for instance, ‘Actually, I am not feeling so great at the moment’, rather than just the routine answer; ‘Fine, thanks’.

According to a review, 40 recommendations were made on how to support employees to remain at work, which included creating an online wellbeing portal and using digital technology to support workers in this gig economy.

More and more companies are being asked to include a Mental Health section in their annual reports. According to this review, only 11% of companies have embraced this suggestion so far.

The review says that employers should:

Build a mental health plan at work

Raise mental health awareness by making information and support systems accessible

Encourage people for open conversations

Provide good working environment and ensure employees develop a healthy work-life balance

Hold regular discussions about health and well-being with their staff

Routinely monitor employee’s mental health

Mrs. Theresa May points something very valuable which each one of us should ingrain it in our brain: “It is only by making this an everyday concern for everyone that we change the way we observe the mental illness, so that striving to improve your mental health – whether at work or at home – is seen as just as positive as improving our physical well-being.”

Hayley Smith is just one of those lucky people who receive, support from her employer that made her chronic depression more bearable.

After resigning her job, she started her own company. And now, after five years, she is employing others.

“In the long term, it’s given me an awareness of mental health,” she says. “And the awareness to make sure I was never going to make people feel the way I was made to feel.”

Sadly, not everyone is as lucky as Hayley Smith to get a second chance, as there are cases that people get lost in the darkness of their mental issues.

Do you think mental health issues should be considered as a disability, and firing for it should be illegal?",loanpride.com,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
159259,"











A lot of us don’t know who Petrov was… Perhaps he is the reason we all are alive today.

On September 26, 1983, Soviet lieutenant colonel Stanislav Petrov received a message on his computer that five nuclear missiles had been launched by the United States and were heading towards Moscow. However, he didn’t launch a retaliatory strike, believing “correctly” that it was a false alarm. And with that, his wisdom saved the world from a nuclear war.

Sadly, it’s being reported that Petrov died this year’s May at the age of 77.

At that time, the United States and the Soviet Union were entangled in the Cold War. Each one stockpiled tens of thousands of nuclear weapons and no one could imagine how horrific this nuclear war could have been.

Karl Schumacher, who was one of the first people to publicize the Petrov’s story back in the 1990s, is a political activist in Germany. Howe, er Schumacher reportedly learned about Petrov’s death after contacting Petrov’s home. Petrov’s son Dmitry told that the man who saved the world from a horrific war had died on May 19, 2017.

Lt. Col. Stanislav Petrov was only 44 years old when he was working at a missile detection bunker south of Moscow. When the word “Launch” appeared on his computer screen he used his common sense while keeping those crucial 20 minutes on hold to launch a counter attack.

It was his job, his duty, to alert his senior officer —however, something seemed off

He sat there thinking what should be done. He reasoned that if the Americans were going to launch their first strike they would probably send more than six missiles, despite the fact they still had the potential to do an enormous amount of damage. He also believed that the alert system was relatively new to him, and it seemed that it could be sending a false alarm.

Although he had absolutely no real proof to support his wisdom — this is a true fact that saved millions of lives.

“The siren howled, but I just sat there for a few seconds, staring at the big, back-lit, red screen with the word ‘launch’ on it,” Petrov told to the BBC’s Russian Service back in 2013.

“I had all the data [to suggest there was an ongoing missile attack]. If I had sent my report up the chain of command, nobody would have said a word against it,” Petrov said.

“There was no rule about how long we were allowed to think before we reported a strike. But we knew that every second of procrastination took away valuable time; that the Soviet Union’s military and political leadership needed to be informed without delay,” he added.

Most importantly, Petrov said that in those days, he was the only officer who had received a civilian education while everyone else was a professional soldier. He believed that in his place they would have simply reported about the attack at face value. Those men around him were “ simply taught to give and obey orders.” But luckily, Petrov disobeyed as he did what he felt right.

“All I had to do was to reach for the phone; to raise the direct line to our top commanders—but I couldn’t move. I felt like I was sitting on a hot frying pan,” Petrov said.

If he had been wrong, perhaps he would have become the reason for millions of lives lost and certainly would have compromised the Soviet Union’s ability to retaliate against the nuclear strike. However, if he was right, World War III was averted and it seems he was…

It’s truly amazing that his wit helped the world survive the Cold War.

Rest in peace, Stanislav Petrov. Though you may not have got the deserved recognition in life, from now on, humanity will always remember you. All of us who’re living in the 21st century owe you a tremendous debt. And the best thing we can do is to hope the nuclear powers of the world will learn an important lesson from your heroism.",loanpride.com,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
375952,"











Last month, in the wake of rumors that Kim Jong Un may be close to creating deadly intercontinental ballistic missiles with the intentions of pointing them at the U.S. soils, Donald Trump boldly threatened to obliterate entire North Korea if they so much as look at his country the wrong way.

This isn’t the first time that Trump has engaged in verbal warfare against another nation. His previous victims have included China, Mexico and majority of Muslim countries including Iran. But the urgent question on everyone’s mind is whether the President of the United States has enough authority on the U.S. military to wage an actual war against a country – the answer to this question may surprise you.

Donald Trump’s Misconceptions about his Power

When Donald Trump took the oath of office on 20 January, 2017, he promised his supporters to punish the terrorists in the worst way possible and sent thousands of American soldiers back to Afghanistan to strengthen its crippled democracy in order to weaken the terrorist forces that have been plotting attacks against the west since 9/11.

Although his decision to maintain control in Afghanistan was met with very little resistance by the US Secretary of Defense, it seems like Trump’s misconception about having total control over his military might have been shattered after the US General recently came on national television and said that the President’s orders can be refused by the armed forces if proved unlawful.

U.S. Nuclear Force Commander’s Response to the President’s Threats

North Korea is increasingly becoming a global threat and Donald Trump has not shied away from expressing disdain against its supreme leader Kim Jong Un. In the midst of rising animosity between the two nations, U.S. air force General, John Hyten, made a public statement saying that any unlawful order from the current president or his successors will be met with resistance from the US army.

U.S General further explained that if Trump had any plans of carrying out an illegal missile strike on North Korea or any other country for that matter, he would be advised to take a more legal route by his military advisors. Hyten said that his job as a commander of Strategic Command is to present all possible, lawful options to the President for solving a particular problem. If a nuclear attack from North Korea was imminent, the Command would provide legal strike options to defend their country.

How Much Authority Does Trump Have as a President?

Ever since taking the office, Trump’s temperament has been of a serious concern for his critics who believe that the president’s borderline offensive and threatening tweets may just cost the nation another deadly war. However, judging from John Hyten’s assuring words, the US Commander in Chief may not have much of an authority over military matters after all.

In 2016, before Trump took office, General Hyten sent a message loud and clear that the U.S. army was not legally obliged to carry out any unlawful orders made by any future President. Commander John Hyten made it clear that he took an oath to protect the constitution and abide by the law, and he would do whatever it takes to protect the oath. Furthermore, if matters between North Korea and America ever got worse, the nuclear forces will ultimately be under the control of the command.

However, Trump is adamant that his army will show its loyalty to the Commander in Chief and obey his orders, legal or illegal. During a debate aired on Fox news, the president was questioned about the General’s remarks to which he responded, “They won’t refuse. Believe me. I’m a leader. If I say do it, they’re going to do it.”

Should a General follow any President’s order, or use judgment?

Leave Your Comment",loanpride.com,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
375953,"











Relations between North Korea and the United States are getting worse by the day and President Donald Trump’s latest action may have just escalated the animosity between the two nations to a whole new level.

North Korea Named State Sponsor of Terrorism

On Monday, Trump made an announcement during the Cabinet meeting that sent shock waves through the nation. He said that starting from today, the United States is putting North Korea on the list as a state sponsor of terrorism. The decision came as a result of his administration’s ‘extreme pressure campaign’ which is aimed at punishing North Korea for its provocative missile tests that have been putting the safety of countries around it in jeopardy.

In the past, Trump’s words on the North Korea situation have provided no diplomatic solutions, instead, they have provoked the North Korean supreme leader Kim Jong Un to intensify his missile testing campaign as a response to the U.S. president’s agitating words. Trump’s call for an extreme pressure campaign came in the midst of international concerns that if North Korea didn’t change its ways, another great war would be inevitable.

Despite the warnings from its western rivals, North Korea has not refrained from firing dangerous missiles over its borders as a recent warning from Japan states that North Korea might fire a third missile in the coming few days as a part of its army’s training regimen.

North Korea Faces More Sanctions

The U.S. and other western countries have intensified their punitive measures against North Korea by passing new sanctions against the country in order to isolate it even further from the rest of the world. After Trump’s announcement at the Cabinet meeting, North Korea joined the list of state sponsors of terrorism alongside Syria, Iran and Sudan, the only three other countries on the list.

The implications on North Korea for its new label are very serious; the country can no longer receive any sort of financial or diplomatic support from the U.S. and it cannot engage in any import or export of defense. Trump’s statement has generated mixed response from politicians around the world about whether North Korea deserves to be called a supporter of terrorism for simply carrying out missile tests.

Is Trump’s Decision Justified?

State administration lawyers have been calling Trump’s decision unjust. According to the law, a country must have committed more than one act of terrorism to be declared a state sponsor of terrorism – North Korea hadn’t committed any. The U.S. president and his cabin argued that Kim Jong Un had already committed more than one act of terrorism when he ordered the assassination of his half-brother in Malaysia and when the 23-year-old American citizen, Otto Warmbier, was returned from North Korea in a coma which eventually resulted in his death.

The country had been on the list of state sponsor of terrorism before during the presidency of George W. Bush along with Iraq and Iran. It was later removed from the list to promote diplomatic talks and persuade it to stop its nuclear program. The tactic didn’t work and it seems like North Korea has gone back to its old ways despite western efforts to negotiate.

Trump’s Pressure Campaign May Have no Effect on Kim Jong Un

As history repeats itself, it has become clear that North Korea will not be giving up its nuclear program any time soon and no amount of sanctions can change the reality. Its new designation as the state sponsor of terrorism doesn’t seem to have an effect on the country’s supreme leader either.

Kim Jong Un wants nuclear capability by creating an intercontinental ballistic missile to maintain his power and prevent any changes in the regime and nothing seems to be stopping him from doing so. Despite sanctions from its western rivals, North Korea’s missile program becomes stronger and more advanced than ever which goes to show what little effect Trump’s pressure campaign has had on Kim Jong Un’s actions.

Do You Think it’s a Smart Move to Put North Korea on this List? Why?

Leave Your Comment",loanpride.com,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
375956,"











This year, people all over the world were surprised (or maybe not), to see that Microsoft CEO Bill Gates had failed to retain his top spot as the richest man in the world. Apparently, Amazon’s CEO Jeff Bezos has grabbed his spot and was hailed as the new richest man in the world with astounding net worth of $$82.7 billion USD! How did Jeff Bezos achieve the limelight of his glory and how did he boost Amazon? In this post, we’ll unveil Jeff Bezos’ secrets, as well as his techniques on how he brought Amazon to its worldwide popularity and how he became successful, not only in the business field, but also in his personal life.

Focus More On Your Customers’ Needs

We all know that the golden rule in business is customer service. And yet most online businesses nowadays fail because they can’t fully grasp what it means. Well, maybe Jeff Bezos’ definition of customer’s service will help you understand on how to serve your customers better. Jeff Bezos already knows that the advantage of establishing an online business is to analyze your customer’s behavior. You have to know what they want, what they don’t want, and what features could be improved. That’s why, you’ll find how Amazon is constantly adding features here and there and upgrading their services and subscriptions to find out what their customers wants.

Most of the time, the customers are satisfied with it. If they aren’t, they send back some feedback about their complaints and that’s when Amazon will take action to improve their features. Furthermore, you don’t have to be afraid to take risks just to improve your customer service. Take an example from Jeff Bezos himself, despite receiving negative feedback and scolding from publishers, he still encourage his customers to leave book reviews, to never be afraid of voicing out their thoughts. In the long run, people find it incredibly helpful to use as a basis whether a particular product is good or not, based on reviews.

Practice Frugality

You might raise your eyebrows about this since you know how Amazon is now spending billions of dollars just to upgrade their features and services (as part of their customer service, of course). In fact, they’re willing to invest billions just for their latest drone delivery experiment. However, you should know that Amazon started out as a simple company. At that time, Jeff knew that their resources were very limited, that’s why they needed to be very careful about spending them. This, in turn, allowed them to focus on two important things: delivering the best customer service and continuous innovation.

Making Smaller Teams Increases Company’s Productivity

We all know that teamwork is the key to a company’s success. However, Jeff Bezos wanted to tweak and insert his own rules when it came to teamwork to ensure Amazon’s success. When he was still starting out, he usually paired up his employees into smaller team. His golden rule is this: no team should be large enough that you couldn’t feed them with two pizzas. Today, this rule is also known as the Two-Pizza team. Why? It’s because Jeff believes that an incredibly large team working for a particular project won’t do you any good.

It’s either some employees, who are part of the team, will be too lazy to do their part (because they’ll assume that the other one is doing their job), or they’ll be too unmotivated to work because the team isn’t in sync. They couldn’t voice out their own opinions and insight and have a significant contribution to the project. But if your team is smaller, though, all of you will be forced to do your job well and participate to ensure the success of your project. This also encourages every member to work hard and be productive.

Think Long-Term

Starting out your own business is never easy. It’s a big deal and that’s why you have to work very hard and always think in a long-term. If you only dream to earn big money, then you probably won’t survive. Your business might only exist for a year or two. Jeff Bezos’ vision for Amazon is that it’s going to become a giant online retailer in the world and that’s why all of the products, features, and services he makes are all for long term. Let’s take a notable example from his e-books. When the first e-book entered the market, most publishers priced it the same as the print edition. This turned customers off from purchasing. Why would they purchase when they can grab a printed book for the same price?

That’s why Jeff Bezos relies heavily on data to determine the average or ideal price for e-books. He determines that the ideal prices for eBooks range from %0.99-9.99 USD. Although their sales lost around 5 dollars per purchase, Jeff didn’t relent and continued with his e-book business. When the publishers finally caught up that most customers prefer to buy eBooks around this range, they have started adopting it, resulting in a drastic increase in eBooks sales. This long-term success also opened up an opportunity for Jeff to create one of his most successful legacy products of their company: Kindle.

Leave Your Comment",loanpride.com,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
375944,"











Charles Manson, the mastermind who engineered some of the most notorious murders of the 60’s, including that of famous actress Sharon Tate, died on November 19, 2017 while serving his life sentence in California State Prison.

After his death, a woman who claims to be the criminal’s lover, has finally revealed the shocking inside story of America’s most notorious killer and cult leader in her memoire Member of the Family.

Who was Charles Manson?

In the late 1960’s, Charles Manson rose as the leader of a dangerous cult and the mastermind behind a string of infamous murders in Hollywood which eventually put him on the list of the most famous criminals of the 20th century.

Standing over just five feet tall, Charles Manson was simply an average-looking petty criminal that no one could have ever guessed would turn into a mass murderer. In 1971, Manson was eventually caught and imprisoned for life for his heinous crimes.

The Crimes of Manson Family Cult

The Manson Family cult spearheaded by Charles Manson consisted of 100 young followers who were influenced by the ideology of their leader and followed an unconventional lifestyle of drug use. Once Charles Manson was released from prison for petty crimes, the cult moved to a deserted ranch in San Francisco where they plotted a string of murders in Hollywood that left 35 people dead.

Manson wanted revenge from the entertainment industry that had once rejected him therefore he used his most obedient disciples to orchestrate the crimes and ordered them to kill everyone. Manson was never personally involved in any of the killings.

Dianne Lake Tells Charles’ Story

Manson died on November 19, 2017 after losing a long battle with cancer and one of the youngest members of the Manson cult, Dianne Lake, has spoken up about America’s most notorious criminal in her book Member of the Family where she recalled a number of memories from her old days including the first time she met Charles Manson and how she eventually fell in love with him.

It has been 47 years since the famous killings in Los Angeles that shook the entire nation, and Lake has finally broken her silence on her relationship with Manson. In an interview with PEOPLE regarding the release of her new book, Lake described Manson as an extremely intelligent and observant young man who had the talent of understanding and fulfilling others’ desires.

Falling In Love With a Mass Murderer

At the age of 14, Lake was already living on her own, free from parents’ supervision. It was then when she first met Charles at a party in California and became intimately involved with him. Lake was desperately in need of affection, and not having a family of her own, she turned to Charles with the hope of finding love. Manson picked up on the young teenager’s weakness and pulled her under his spell. Lake eventually joined the cult and became the youngest member of the ‘Manson Family’.

Lake admitted that she was loyal to Manson for two years up until he went on a killing spree, ending the lives of seven innocent people in two days. A year later Manson and Lake, who then was 17 years old, met again, this time in court where she testified against the cult leader and his loyal following. She no longer felt anything towards the man she had once loved.

Making Peace with the Past

Dianne Lake eventually left behind her troubled past and moved on with her life. She was able to earn a master’s degree from college and found love again in the form of her husband with whom she has three children. She said: “It’s taken me this long really to get to the point where I can admit or have been able to realize that I really was a victim. I feel very unburdened and I feel untethered from the shame of being associated with this person who has become the icon of evil.”

How would you act if you found out your child was seduced to join a cult?

Leave Your Comment",loanpride.com,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
171221,"GETTY Andrey Rublev is in action at the ATP Next Gen finals

Next Gen ATP finals - everything you need to know What are the Next Gen ATP finals? The 2017 Next Generation ATP Finals will be played in Milan from November 7 to November 11.



While the best players on the planet play in the ATP World Tour finals in London, the best young stars do likewise in Italy.



This is the season-ending event for the best singles players that are age 21 and under on the 2017 ATP World Tour.



The format for the competition will be two round robin group. What is the prize money? There is prize pot of £960,000 on offer. However, there are no ranking points up for grabs.

GETTY Karen Khachanov is going for glory in Italy

Who is playing at the Next Gen ATP finals? The top 7 players in the Emirates ATP Race to Milan will qualify. The eighth spot is reserved for an Italian wildcard.



The highest ranked player is Alexander Zverev, the world no.4 from Germany. However, he has adopted to sit out the event to concentrate on the ATP World Tour finals in London.



It means the top seed will be Andrey Rublev, the world No 35.



The full list of players involved are:



Andrey Rublev

Karen Khachanov

Denis Shapovalov

Borna Coric

Jared Donaldson

Hyeon Chung

Daniil Medvedev

Gianluigi Quinzi

GETTY Alexander Zverev has withdrawn from the tournament to focus on the ATP World Tour finals

ATP Race to London rankings: Who has qualified for the World Tour Finals? Mon, November 6, 2017 Express Sport runs through the ATP rankings, with the top 8 set to feature at the season-ending World Tour Finals Play slideshow Getty Images 1 of 11 Which eight players have qualified for the season-ending ATP World Tour Finals?",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
120769,"The Treasury has received approaches from buyout firms and sovereign wealth funds keen to cash in on the bank’s turnaround. The moves are a sign of growing confidence in Lloyds and its chief executive Antonio Horta-Osorio.

Among those reportedly interested in buying shares is Tamasek, the Singapore government’s investment arm which is said to have made an approach to buy a 10 per cent stake for £4.5billion.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
262875,"WENN Jamie Dornan 'isn't returning to Fifty Shades of Grey'

A rep for the 32-year-old hunk has released a statement saying that the rumours are simply ""conjecture"". Jamie's rep told the Daily Express Online: ""All press reports are pure conjecture as the studio have not committed to a sequel as yet."" Earlier this week, a source told Australian magazine NW the 32-year-old had spoken to film bosses and informed them he won't be returning as BDSM pro Christian – on account of his wife Amelia Warner. Jamie and the actress have an 18-month-old daughter together. FIFTY SHADES OF GREY: IN PICTURES

WENN Jamie's wife Amelia is said to be unimpressed with the sexual scenes

A source told the magazine: ""Jamie said the movie would skyrocket his career. He tried to assure Amelia nothing would change but women all over the world now lust after Jamie."" They added: ""She hasn’t seen the film and I don’t think she will to be honest."" The source also claimed Jamie has blamed any lack of chemistry with his on-screen lover, played by Dakota Johnson, with the actress. It's reported he believes the actress ""gave him nothing to work with"". The news of Jamie's rumoured departure comes as and it's been revealed Universal Pictures have not yet committed to a sequel despite it being a trilogy.

WENN The actor reportedly said there was no chemistry between him and Dakota Johnson

A representative for Sam Taylor-Johnson told the Daily Express Online the movie studios haven't reached a decision about another Fifty Shades movie. The director's spokesperson said: ""The studio have not committed to a sequel as yet."" Sam Taylor-Johnson, who directed the first movie released last week with Jamie Dornan and Dakota Johnson, was rumoured not to be directing any other movies in the four-book series. Her representative was quick to discount reports Sam had backed out of the movie because she'd clashed with the Fifty Shades of Grey author E. L. James. She said: ""All press reports are pure conjecture as the studio have not committed to a sequel as yet. We will not be making any further comment.""",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
217382,"This snap went viral when the internet spotted a rude optical illusion

Two friends decided to take a picture in a bar to document their good times - but their unfortunate positioning for the snap has caught the attention of people online.

One of the girl’s, wearing a white crop top and short black skirt, is sat on a chair, while the other is stood up next to her wearing a floral vest.

But what the girl stood up is wearing on her bottom half is questionable - and it’s down to how the brunette girl is sat.

At first glance it looks as if the girl stood up is wearing peach-coloured leggings.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
15892,"The bad taste prank, which took place yesterday on the six-month anniversary of the Paris attacks, spread terror among Hollywood A-listers as a boat with a flag black carrying six men approached the French Riviera. Many guests feared the stunt was a “terrorist attack” after mistaking the black flag as the one used by Islamic State (ISIS). Terrified guests at the Hôtel du Cap Eden-Roc cowered in fear as a helicopter also flew overhead while the commando of men wearing combat dress sped towards the shore.

One guest said: “We were caught off guard. And then someone screamed and people jumped out of their chairs and started moving quickly to the swimming pool hear. “It was pretty scary. The fact that men appeared to be dressed like an ISIS-like militia group was quite shocking.” But the terrifying ordeal turned out to be a sick joke carried out by a French internet start-up company.

VANTAGENEWS Panic spread among Cannes guests after they mistook a PR stunt as a terror attack

VANTAGENEWS Terrified guests at the Hôtel du Cap Eden-Roc fled as the boat approached the French Rivieria

The fact that men appeared to be dressed like an ISIS-like militia group was quite shocking

The misunderstanding was confirmed by France’s National Police force who said: “It was not a terrorist attack. It was a communication effort and publicity for a website.” A hotel spokesman called the incident “a bad joke”. The stunt was pulled by Oraxy.com, a luxury high-end website aimed at the world’s richest celebs during Cannes Film Festival.

VANTAGENEWS Guests feared the six men in combat dress were terrorists

Local authorities also warned that “security checks” would be carried out at the Palais des Festivals on Friday morning. Cannes Film Festival has been on high alert after two terror attacks on French soil last year, with hundreds of soldiers, police and security agents deployed to the glamorous event. French elite forces simulated a terror attack last month at the Palais des Festivals - the main venue for big screenings during the two-week festival.

Air and sea exclusion zones have also been declared, as well as random searches being conducted on the streets. The Mayor of Cannes David Lisnard dismissed claims heavy security was hampering festivities at the notorious event which attracts stars from across the world. Extra security measures have been enforced for the 69th film festival after ISIS jihadis murdered 130 people in Paris on November 13 2015. France has been in a state of emergency since the atrocities, with François Hollande’s government seeking to extend the powers for Euro 2016.

VANTAGENEWS The PR stunt spread panic among hotel guests",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
251430,"Today North Korea once again vowed to attack the US territory of Guam, with dictator Kim Jong-un warning of a “dangerous military clash”. Kim said he would wait to see what the “reckless Yankees” would do next before launching four missiles towards the island. A state-run news agency said the despot had met with advisors to discuss when the hermit state should launch the attack. They said he had “examined the plan for a long time” and “discussed it” before agreeing to hold fire for the time being.

GETTY The North Korea situation is continuing to escalate

In pictures: North Korea holds mass rally to protest U.N. sanctions Thu, August 10, 2017 Tens of thousands of North Koreans were pictured on the streets on the same day tensions between the pariah state and the United States escalated following President Donald Trump's threats of ""fire and fury."" Play slideshow 1 of 9

Kim said: “The United States, which was the first to bring numerous strategic nuclear equipment near us, should first make the right decision and show through actions if they wish to ease tensions on the Korean peninsula and prevent a dangerous military clash.” The propaganda report added: “He said that if the Yankees persist in their extremely dangerous reckless actions on the Korean peninsula and in its vicinity, testing the self-restraint of the DPRK, the latter will make an important decision as it already declared.” READ MORE: Will the USA attack North Korea?

The situation is now more concerning than perhaps at any other time over the past 20 years Exotix

The situation is now as serious as it has ever been, investors Exotix said in a report detailing the market implications of the crisis. They warned: “While the world is well used to colourful and bellicose statements from North Korea, we think there are two reasons why the situation is now more concerning than perhaps at any other time over the past 20 years or so (e.g. compared to the first nuclear test in 2006 and attacks against South Korea in 2010).”

GETTY Kim Jong-un said he would wait and see what America did before attacking Guam

They say they were concerned about the strength of North Korea’s nuclear programme and the erraticism of both Kim and US leader Donald Trump. Exotix said: “DPRK is much further along in its nuclear plans, and either has, or is close to obtaining, weaponisable nuclear missiles which could pose a threat to the US (and its allies). READ MORE: Does North Korea have nuclear weapons?

GETTY North Korea has repeatedly threatened to attack the US territory of Guam this month",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
38057,"HANDOUT Mohamed Zahran was jailed for 16 years

Mohamed Zahran subjected his victims to the ""prolonged and sustained"" episode while the terrified young girl watched as he pretended to film it on his phone. The depraved chef, 38, made the two women strip and lie naked on the living room floor of a house in County Durham and told them to ""start kissing, to moan and make sexual movements"" while threatening them with a knife. He then told one of the women that it was ""his turn"" to have sex with her before stabbing her repeatedly in the throat when his advances were refused.

GETTY The court heard that Zahran subjected the women to a ""prolonged and sustained"" attack

The warped attacker, who told the pair he had a gun and threatened to shoot them if they told anyone of the incident, then knifed the second victim seven times in the stomach. Their ordeal – described as ""prolonged and sustained"" and ""gratuitous degradation"" by prosecuting barrister Deborah Smithies – was only put to an end when one of the women ran ""naked and bleeding"" into the street and begged neighbours to ring the police. Officers found Zahran had stabbed himself in the stomach when they eventually arrived.

GETTY Police arrived to find Zahran had stabbed himself

These women did not want to do what you were demanding. They were afraid you would hurt them. Fearing for their life, they complied. Judge Simon Phillips QC

He pleaded not guilty to two counts of causing a person to engage in sexual activity without consent, sexual assault and false imprisonment but was convicted by a jury at Teesside Crown Court. Jailing the sex offender for 16 years, Judge Simon Phillips said his twisted attack would haunt his victims for ""the rest of their lives"". ""These women did not want to do what you were demanding. They were afraid you would hurt them. Fearing for their life, they complied.

GOOGLE He pleaded guilty to the litany of sick offences at Teesside Crown Court",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
190592,"GETTY - STOCK An increase in overall living costs is expected to have contributed to a rise in inflation

A rise in the overall cost of living is due to be shown in the latest round of official data, which is expected to show the Retail Price Index (RPI) hit 3.5 per cent in July, in line with the figure seen in June. Meanwhile rail passengers will discover how much more they will pay for their travel in the new year, as July's figures are used to calculate any rise.

The Consumer Price Index measure of inflation was forecast to reach 2.7 per cent last month, up from 2.6 per cent in June, according to consensus figures. Annual average weekly earnings data will be released on Wednesday and is expected to remain at 1.8 per cent for the three months to July, the same rate for the three months to June.

How much is your money worth? Mon, October 2, 2017 Rare coins: This is what you should be looking out for in your wallet. Play slideshow Getty Images 1 of 17 A faulty £1 coin which has the 2016 date on one side and 2017 in micro-inscriptions around the edge of the reverse is worth £3,000

Food prices have risen for seven of the last eight months - with last month being the exception Alan Clarke, the head of European fixed income strategy at Scotiabank

Alan Clarke, the head of European fixed income strategy at Scotiabank, is forecasting CPI to hit 2.8 per cent, driven in part by rising price tags on food. He said: ""Food price falls came to a fairly abrupt end in the aftermath of the Brexit vote, particularly on the back of the sharp fall in the GBP exchange rate.

GETTY - STOCK The Consumer Price Index measure of inflation was forecast to reach 2.7 per cent last month

""Indeed, food prices have risen for seven of the last eight months - with last month being the exception, showing a 0.2 per cent month-on-month fall. ""Overall, we view last month's downward adjustment in inflation as temporary and the peak in inflation is yet to be reached."" The main downward pressure on the cost of living in June came from fuel, which saw the fourth consecutive month of falling prices, dropping 1.1 per cent month on month. Food was driving the upward pressure on everyday prices, with costs easing back by a smaller 0.3 per cent in June compared with a 0.4 per cent fall for the same month last year. Andrew Goodwin, the lead UK economist at Oxford Economics, said falling fuel prices will continue to weigh on the cost of living in July, keeping CPI at 2.6 per cent.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
180010,"GETTY Child migrants have been brought to Britain but their ages have been questioned

This week, bus loads of ‘child’ migrants arrived from the Calais Jungle after being branded ""unaccompanied"" minors. However, their ages have been brought into question when migrants who looked like grown men arrived in Croydon, Surrey, when Brits were expecting to see small children. MP David Davies suggested their ages should be checked using radiographs on their teeth - but the British Dental Association said it was ""vigorously opposed"" to the method of assessment, labelling such a move inappropriate. However, such tests are carried out on migrants in France and the US. And the Home Office ruled out this basic test of legitimacy as ""too intrusive"". However, comparisons have been drawn with the testing of sick and disabled British tax-payers who are made to take part in strict and ‘intrusive’ assessments for benefits they have already been awarded. The tests are often far from home and can even be in centres without disability access.

GETTY Tests to discover ages are not being done on lone migrants over suggestions it is ""invasive""

Disabled Brits who have gone through them have labelled them humiliating. Three tests are carried out including ""daily living activities"" which can include whether or not the person even managed to get to the centre. There are also observations in the assessment centre and Lima software testing - in which they are tested against a list of criteria. The system is described as ""incredibly unfair"" with some being unable to score points in tests, for example a blind person is unable to collect points in the observing danger category.

GETTY Disabled people are put through rigorous testing but migrants will not be

Philip Connolly Policy and Communications Manager for Disability Rights UK said the testing which disabled people must undergo is ""cruel"". He said: ""The tests are quite inhumane, some of them. ""We do not have a fair assessment system. ""It is so stressful for the people undergoing these tests - they are counterproductive and lead to people becoming unfit for work."" Mr Connolly said it would not be fair to draw a comparison with the situation faced by the migrant children, but insisted testing for disabled people in the UK is harsh and invasive. If a test shows an individual is not eligible for the disability benefit their payments can be slashed from £93 per week to standard job seekers payments worth £65 per week, or to nothing at all. It has been suggested the migrant children will be put in foster care after assessment by trained specialists.

Migrant 'children' from 'Jungle Camp' arrive in the UK Wed, October 19, 2016 Migrant 'children' from the 'Jungle Camp' in Calais arrive in the UK to be reunited with relatives. Play slideshow 1 of 26

But experts on tests faced by disabled people claim British people are made to travel miles to be put under embarrassing tests. Simon Duffy, director at the Centre for Welfare Reform said the tests faced by disabled people are invasive and put the person last. He said: ""The assessment will not be at your convenience, it will be somewhere they decide which might not have access for disabled people. The assessor will not have read your relevant medical information and may ask you things which will insult you or are irrelevant. ""The Government incentivises assessors to reduce the number of positives. ""From beginning to end they are designed to demean and insult people."" Politicians and campaigners alike have questioned why when disabled people have to go through such rigorous, ""inhumane"" testing.

GETTY Disabled people in Britain are made to travel to test centres for assessments

Why don't the border force use their common sense when dealing with them & for most who arrived in the past few it is obvious they not under 18 Star Anderton

UKIP Disability Spokeswoman Cllr Star Anderton said: ""Disabled people are being treated in a way that is intrusive yet the ""unaccompanied children"" from the Jungle are able to hoodwink the border agency about their age. ""Why don't the border force use their common sense when dealing with them and for most who arrived in the past few it is obvious they not under 18. ""During an assessment for all sickness & disability benefit claims people have to show they fit the related DWP descriptors & have problems with physical movements. Any who refuses to do these are often ""sanctioned"" or have their benefits withdrawn. ""The assessments are invasive as you're asked all manner of questions about your life plus you must prove who you say you are by providing photographic ID. If you can't supply the ID then you're claim is delayed or denied.""

GETTY Child migrants are being protected from testing by the Home Office despite such measures elsewhere",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
267220,"These are the vexing thoughts that have temporarily invaded my mind as I paddle serenely towards one of the most beautiful beaches I’ve ever seen. It’s the kind of beach you normally associate with TV adverts for a certain coconut flavoured chocolate bar. Creamy white sand untouched by human footprints, lapped by dreamy turquoise water and backed by lush green jungle teaming with birdlife. It really is what I imagine paradise would taste like. And I’m surrounded by thousands of them. This tropical utopia is on one of 800 islands scattered off the southern coast of Myanmar, formerly Burma, in an area known as the Mergui Archipelago.

PH Myanmar is a tranquil tropical paradise that has to be seen to be believed

PH Moken children playing in the water

It’s the kind of beach you normally associate with TV adverts for a certain coconut flavoured chocolate bar Martyn Brown

Never heard of it before? That’s because it was off limits to foreigners until 1997 under the Burma’s military-led Junta and tourism is still heavily controlled by the government. The islands have, in fact, enjoyed scant international mention for much of the past century apart from mentions in the Biggles air adventure books and the 1965 James Bond movie Thunderball, in which the evil Ernst Stavro Blofeld demands a vast ransom in diamonds, to be paid here in the archipelago. The only diamonds I discover are of the sandy variety as well as the underwater treasures in an area which has been described one of the world’s best dive sites. With this as one of it’s major drawcords it’s no wonder that Lonely Planet has made Myanmar as one of its top-10 must-see destinations for 2017. I’m told, by no-one who is old enough to remember, that the islands are like those in Thailand were 60 years ago. More like 600 years ago, I imagine.

PH 'The island’s only beach simply took my breath away'

Today tourist numbers are, blissfully, still in the low thousands with many visiting through the handful of commercial sailing yachts or live-aboard diving trips. But the world is closing in as Myanmar accelerates forward following decades of political isolation. The continuous erosion of the Moken ‘Sea Gipsy’ culture, environmental damage and the spectre of uncontrolled mass tourism all pose a threat to one of the world’s last must-see paradises. I begin my voyage of the islands on the Sea Gipsy - a Burmese-style junk boat - in the scrappy port town of Kawthaung which sits at the very bottom of Myanmar on the border with Thailand. As I clamber aboard the cream and bottle-green coloured boat I’m warmly greeted by the crew of six who show me around the 100ft vessel which is decked out with teak lounge chairs, a large dining table shaded by a white canopy, and cozy, open-air sleeping cabins. There’s even a bar. I also meet my travelling companions, a united nations consisting of a French couple, three Norwegian/Canadian’s and three Australians.

PH 'Lampi island is a “Lost World"" of thick forests'

The boat, adorned with the Red, Yellow and Green Myanmar flag and a bunch of flowers secured to the bow for good luck, we gently make our way out of the cluttered harbour with Victoria Point, as Kawthaung was known in colonial times, soon a small dot on the horizon. Our first destination, That Yan Kyunn or Barwell Island, is two-and-a-half hours from the mainland, leaving enough time for mobile phone and internet connections to fizzle away and to kick back and relax. Sheer bliss? Well not quite. Any thoughts we have of spending our first evening watching a blazing Bengal sunset dipping it’s toes into the Andaman sea are quickly extinguished as we head directly into the teeth of a squall. Weather reports suggest there is a Cyclone brewing and it’s already causing problems further south in Thailand. Oh goodie. Faced with the prospect of a storm we decide there is only one thing for it - jump in the sea. There is something quite ethereal about snorkelling among colourful fish with the rain beating down on the back of your head. After an hour or so fish-spotting and a quick trip to the beach it was time to get back onto the boat to get warm and dry before nightfall.

PH 'The snorkelling was magical at Shark island'

We all gathered in the bar area at the back of the Sea Gipsy to drink rum, nibble on some freshly cooked snacks and shelter from the wind. This was followed by a delicious meal of seaweed soup, grilled seabass and spicy squid. As we eat our smiling guide, Kyaw Kyaw, sets out our plan for the next day having spoken on the radio with the station manager in Kawthaung to find out the latest weather updates. “We will head north to an island,” he says.”It has a beautiful beach, we can go kayaking and paddle boarding - no problem.” With that reassuring thought in our heads we prepare to spend our first night at sea. Early next morning, with the weather picking up, we are treated to a hearty breakfast of bacon, eggs, toast and coffee in bed before arriving at the unimaginatively named 115 island.

PH On the Sea Gipsy guests can drink rum, nibble on freshly cooked snacks and shelter from the wind

What it lacks in name it more than makes up for in beauty. Myself and a crewmate decide to circumnavigate the tiny jungle-clad islet in a kayak, watching as dozens of crabs scuttle across rocks as we approach while a bright blue kingfisher darts through the air and red jellyfish float by. Around the corner is the crowning glory of this speck in the ocean, a chevron-shaped beach of talcum-powder soft white sand. Next we are enticed by the prospect of “outstanding” snorkelling at Shark Island, fortunately named not because of its sharp-toothed marine-life but because of its appearance. The snorkelling was magical, Angel Fish, Banner Fish, Parrot Fish darting in and out of the coral while tiny Clown fish hid amongst swaying pink sea anemones. But the depressing signs of man’s negative impact on the environment were all too apparent here. Shattered coral lay on the seabed, a victim of dynamite fishing prevalent in the area.

PH Angel Fish, Banner Fish, Parrot Fish and Clown Fish can all be seen when snorkelling on Shark island

The island’s only beach simply took my breath away. It had supermodel good looks, turquoise water lapping onto creamy white sand backed by a dark green blanket of soaring rainforest. That night we anchor in a sheltered bay on Pilar Island or Great Swinton as it was known by the British. Dinner, again, is a wonderful array of seafood, fruit and vegetables. Next morning I wake earlier than everyone else and decide to take a dawn paddle-boarding trip explore the island. As Sea Eagles soar above my head I paddle across the bay to a wide and flat beach backed by mangroves. It is flanked on one side by the steep and daunting rainforest which bursts into a early morning cacophony of bird life. After breakfast and a refill of water the compass is set to the North West and Bo Cho Island. Here we catch a dinghy to another isolated beach with fresh turtles tracks the only sign anyone has been here in days, perhaps longer. We then wade waste deep through a hot spring behind the sand before being enveloped by the dense dripping wet jungle. Soggy and covered in mud we arrive 90 minutes later at the Moken village Ma Kyone Galet.

Top 10 travel destinations for 2017 Thu, December 8, 2016 Holiday inspiration: These are going to be the top 10 destinations to travel to in 2017. Play slideshow Getty 1 of 11 Top 10 travel destinations for 2017

PH Sea Gispy’s roam the islands, worship spirits and recite long epics of a mythical past

For centuries the Moken, or Sea Gipy’s, roamed the islands, worshipping spirits and reciting long epics of a mythical past. They collected mollusks, crabs and sea cucumbers, speared fish, hunted and dove deep to find valuable pearl oysters. Today, about 2,000 Moken are believed to inhabit the archipelago, significantly reduced through migration, intermarriage with Burmese and deaths of males from rampant alcohol and drug abuse. Tania Miorin, who manages an environmental and tourism project in the village and Lampi Island Marine Park, said the key challenge is to protect the environment and maintain traditions while providing income to local people. “We are trying to educate the local people about the environment and the benefits tourism can have but you have to give them incentives to protect the park.” The project, run by the Italian group Instituto Oikos, includes the development of eco-tourism, putting a draft management plan into practice and training park staff. Lampi Island, Myanmar’s first and only marine park and the size of Phuket, is a “Lost World” of thick forests, the region’s best mangrove forests and an abundance of wildlife including Hornbills, pythons and flying foxes. Heading across the island’s protected waters we witness a giant black Manta Ray leap out of the water. On our final full day we head south, stopping at the stunning Pho Ni Island for the best snorkelling yet and Red Monkey Island for a refreshing swim.

Stunning travel destinations Fri, November 11, 2016 The most beautiful places in the world: From stunning hidden villages to palaces and colourful streets. Play slideshow Getty Images 1 of 12 Medieval village Albarracín, Aragon, Spain",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
147770,"Alexis Sanchez has claimed his Arsenal future depends entirely on the club

Alexis Sanchez has been locked in contract talks with Arsenal for months but has so far failed to agree new terms.

The Chile international's current deal runs out next summer and the Gunners are said to have made him a bumper £250,000-a-week offer.

Sanchez is yet to sign the new contract and the club have since shelved negotiations amid reports the 28-year-old's wage demands are too high.

And the former Barcelona man has suggested earnings could be the reason for the standoff, revealing the likelihood of him signing a new contract rests entirely in the club's hands.

“I cannot tell you now [about my future], we have to wait until the end of the season,"" Sanchez said.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
245437,"Norman Lamb, the Care and Support Minister, said it was right to consider making people with a “vast amount of money in the bank” pay up.

The Government was accused of “welshing” on a deal after it emerged a scheme to defer a person’s care costs until after their death may be available only to people with assets, apart from their home, of less than £23,250. But Lib Dem Mr Lamb said it is “clear that you would not be forced to sell your home”.

He added: “If together with owning your home, you have more than £23,250 of assets in the bank or in shares or whatever, the question is, ‘Should you be expected to use that money?’

“We’re talking about people with quite significant means.”

But Liz Kendall, the shadow care minister, said: “We discover many older people must use up other savings and assets before they qualify for help.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
257039,"ITV Holly Willoughby shares X-RATED live as This Morning descends into CHAOS

Discussing his latest road trip show with Phillip Schofield and Holly, the comedian revealed that one of his favourite games to play with his friends is stealing their phones and sending a friend an unsuspecting text. The blonde beauty, 36, then stunned Jack by revealing that she had fallen victim to his game and had actually received a raunchy photo from the 28-year-old. ""You sent me a photograph… It obviously wasn't from you,"" teased Holly.

ITV Holly shared the picture that Jack sent her live on This Morning

ITV Jack was mortified by the rude picture, insisting it wasn't him

I don't own those boxer shorts Jack Whitehall

The presenter then teased that she still had the photo and set about locating it. After explaining that he didn't know what was coming, Jack was completely horrified when he was shown the saucy photo, which couldn't be aired on daytime television. Visibly gobsmacked, he exclaimed: ""That's not mine! I don't own those boxer shorts. ""I'm so sorry national treasure, Holly Willoughby,"" Jack continued.

This Morning blunders Tue, November 21, 2017 When live TV goes horribly wrong: Take a look at Holly and Phil's best This Morning blunders. Play slideshow ITV 1 of 16 This Morning blunders",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
11960,"The Shadow Brexit Secretary was quizzed over his party’s EU exit plans as Andrew Marr turned the tables on Mr Starmer after he tore into Theresa May for getting the UK ""into a complete mess”. Marr asked: “How do you think the General Election result has changed the negotiating position Britain should take for Brexit?” Mr Starmer replied: “I think the Prime Minister has got us into a complete mess. She’s got no mandate here and she’s got no authority abroad and the negotiations start tomorrow. “Things have to change, her approach so far has alienated our allies in Europe, it’s weakened our position with the EU, and it’s actually got us into the worst possible starting position.”

BBC Andrew Marr told Keir Starmer he sounded like Theresa May

Pointing out the similarities between the Labour Party and Conservative Party’s Brexit plans, Marr said: “What people say to me is actually when you look at it, Labour’s position on Brexit is identical to Theresa May’s position. “So, let me test that if I may with some yes or no questions. First of all, do you accept that we are leaving the EU, come what may?” And as the Labour politician confirmed remaining in the EU and re-running the Brexit referendum would be out of the question, the BBC host asked about Labour’s position regarding the single market. Marr said: “Third question, are there any circumstances in which you think Britain should stay inside the single market?” Sir Keir said: “As far as the single market is concerned, our manifesto is clear, we want to retain the benefits of the single market and the customs union.

Labour’s position on Brexit is identical to Theresa May’s position Andrew Marr

“Formal, full membership is only available to EU member states and that’s why all the discussion about what sort of model…” Cutting Mr Starmer off, Marr said: “So that sounds to me like a no, we cannot stay in the single market.” Pushed on the issue of the single market, the shadow Brexit sectary insisted the UK would have to leave, as only EU members have full access the inner market. However, he urged Mrs May to keep the UK’s options open as the Government heads into Brexit talks with Brussels on Monday. Mr Starmer said: “Focus on the outcomes… you can take single market membership and say what needs to change to get us to the position we need to be in, or you can start with a bare agreement and work up.

Brexit debate in pictures Mon, April 17, 2017 The debate in the European Parliament in Strasbourg will focus on key issues of the Brexit talks including reciprocal rights for EU citizens, the peace process in Northern Ireland and trade Play slideshow AFP/Getty Images 1 of 23 Former leader of the UK Independence Party (UKIP) Nigel Farage (L) gestures as he speaks with EU Commission president Jean-Claude Juncker (R) prior to a debate on the conclusions of the last European Council, at the European Parliament in Strasbourg",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
358869,"And now, after eight-and-a-half years at Liverpool , he is being allowed to leave.

The Slovakia captain, 31, finished last season down the pecking order at Anfield.

Besiktas and Galatasaray had been interested in Skrtel, who joined Liverpool from Zenit St Petersburg in 2008, but he has opted to head to their Turkish rivals.

The Reds have already released Kolo Toure and the impending departure of Skrtel following Euro 2016 comes with Mamadou Sakho still awaiting to discover whether Uefa will confirm he has failed a drugs test.

Manager Jurgen Klopp had recruited Joel Matip on a free transfer from Schalke and must decide whether to strengthen again with Dejan Lovren his other option.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
283531,"The Holland striker today completed the £4.7million move and was unveiled in front of thousands of fans. Van Persie was Sir Alex Ferguson's last high profile signing and helped United win the Premier League title in the 2012/13 season.

But last term he struggled with injury and found himself out of the team when fit. The former Arsenal man scored just 10 goals and Louis van Gaal decided to move him on - even though it leaves him with only Wayne Rooney in attack. ""From my side, there are no hard feelings with how it went. It's part of football, it's part of life,"" Van Persie said.

GETTY Robin van Persie left Man United after three seasons today",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
254263,"The Belgian international, dubbed 'the new Eden Hazard', has less than a year remaining on his current deal, and is set to leave the Dutch outfit in either January or at the end of the season.

Atletico Madrid and Borussia Dortmund are also interested in acquiring Bakkali's signature, but it has now emerged that Barca boss Luis Enrique is keen to bring him to the Nou Camp.

The Spanish giants are bracing themselves for the exit of Juventus target Pedro and want Bakkali to replace him.

However, the Premier League quartet are all determined to land the 18-year-old midfielder in January, with PSV's sporting director Marcel Brands admitting last month that the club are resigned to losing their brightest prospect.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
36292,"The former United boss struck up a father-like relationship with Ronaldo during his time at Old Trafford.

Sir Alex Ferguson still has an ambassador role at the club and, according to reports in Spain, Louis van Gaal is ready to ask for his help in bringing Ronaldo back to Manchester.

The Portugal superstar looks likely to leave Madrid this summer with United, Chelsea and Paris Saint-Germain keen.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
94988,"Zlatan Ibrahimovic scored twice as United sealed their second win of the season

Pogba was making his first appearance for the club since signing from Juventus after being suspended for last week’s clash with Bournemouth.

But it was the Sweden star who took top billing by heading in from Wayne Rooney in the first half to break the deadlock.

Ibrahimovic then slotted in a penalty after the break to put the game beyond Southampton.

Ibrahimovic has now scored 30 goals in his last 20 league games.

FOLLOW ALL THE REACTION FROM MAN UNITED V SOUTHAMPTON HERE",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
193782,"Shane Richie, pictured, told us there is one man he wants to get in EastEnders now swaggering actor Danny Dyer is behind the bar at the Queen Vic: Liam Gallagher.

It seems Shane, 49, has more of a rock ’n’ roll past than we’d given him credit for. “I’ll ask Liam if he wants to be in EastEnders,” he told us. “I know him from years ago. I had it large back in Manchester a long time ago. I’m not saying any more about that though, it’s all in my next book!”

He says his own dreams of rock stardom with his band Shane Richie and The Prelude are coming along nicely. “We’re playing some festivals this year. It’s just finding the time. I want to be an actor rocker.”

At the bash at London’s O2 Arena, Downton Abbey’s Hugh Bonneville, 50, said he was happy to be “spreading the Downton love” in America.

Great British Bake Off star Paul Hollywood, 47, spent the night taking selfies with other celebs. “I’m always shocked when we get a nomination and I think ‘Oh no, time to dust off the DJ suit again.’

“I always get really starstruck at these things,” he told us.

Even Mary Berry, 78, was into the rock ’n’ roll spirit, saying she would celebrate Bake Off’s nomination with “a nice glass of very chilled white wine”.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
182797,"PH Madison Wolfe is exceptional as Janet in the chilling The Conjuring 2

The Conjuring 2 (Cert 15; 134mins) Hollywood has been quaking in its boots after poor box office returns for Alice Through The Looking Glass and The Huntsman: Winter’s War. However The Conjuring 2 bucks the trend. This expertly executed scary movie puts time and effort into setting the scene and establishing the characters before all hell breaks loose. The result is old-fashioned but offers numerous ways to make you jump out of your seat, aided by a classy cast and some excellent work from the production designers. Once again based on true events, The Conjuring 2 follows real-life ghost hunters Lorraine Warren (Vera Farmiga) and her husband Ed (Patrick Wilson). Having resolved an infamous spot of bother at Amityville, the couple are now known across the globe. Lorraine wants to take a step back after a harrowing vision of Ed’s death but Ed cannot resist the call of a family in danger. So The Conjuring 2 decamps to a grey, drab vision of London in 1977. Punk is in the air, The Goodies are on television and every teenager’s wall is adorned with posters of David Soul and Paul Michael Glaser. Downtrodden single mother Peggy Hodgson (Frances O’Connor) is struggling to provide for her four children and feels like a refugee from a Mike Leigh film. However, making ends meet becomes the least of her worries when youngest daughter Janet (an impressive Madison Wolfe) becomes possessed by a demon.

PH This expertly executed scary movie puts time and effort into establishing the characters

This is the notorious, real-life Enfield haunting and soon we are in familiar territory of creaky floorboards, rocking chairs, inanimate objects with a life of their own and sweet young girls talking with the gruff tones of Dot Cotton. Who ya gonna call? Well, ghostbusters Lorraine and Ed of course. There isn’t anything terribly new in The Conjuring 2 as furniture moves and vilelooking demons keep jumping out of the shadows but the acting and the craftsmanship make all the difference. Vera Farmiga and Patrick Wilson take the material deadly seriously; there is nothing camp or knowing in their performances, just a quiet determination to keep everything real from the characters’ decent intentions to their wary scepticism. In the end The Conjuring 2 isn’t just set in the 1970s but feels as if it could have been made in the era of The Exorcist or The Omen and that is all the recommendation horror fans will require. Not all sequels are a bad idea.

PH Tale Of Tales is a loose interpretation of the 17th century fairy tales of Giambattista Basile

Tale Of Tales (Cert 15; 134mins) Tale Of Tales offers a loose interpretation of the 17th century Neapolitan fairy tales of Giambattista Basile. It is an eccentric, sprawling hodgepodge of a film filled with cave-dwelling ogres, deep-sea monsters, scary creatures and magic spells. Everything takes place in three neighbouring kingdoms. In Longtrellis, the Queen (Salma Hayek, left) will do anything to have a child. In Highhills, the King (Toby Jones) is beguiled by a flea that he secretly rears. In Strongcliff, the lusty monarch (Vincent Cassel) is besotted by the angelic voice of a young woman who he assumes to be more beautiful than anything he could imagine. These are quite adult tales of obsession and desire where you need to be very careful when your wish comes true. The film’s virtues are a vibrant use of colour, sumptuous set design and a cast of grotesque characters. The result is often momentarily enchanting but lacks rhyme or reason as we wearily move between the three kingdoms and are left with enough loose ends to fill another book. VERDICT: 4/5 The Girl King (Cert 15; 106mins) More than 80 years after Greta Garbo starred in the unforgettable Queen Christina, Malin Buska portrays the 17th century monarch in The Girl King. There is a whiff of Blackadder in the cunning plans that swirl around Christina as she defies convention by advocating peace and vowing to make Sweden the most “sophisticated country in Europe”. Rejecting countless marriage proposals and refusing to bear an heir marks her as a danger to the state but what really riles Chancellor Oxenstierna (Michael Nyqvist) and others is her fondness for lady-in-waiting Countess Ebba Sparre (Sarah Gadon) who is given the title of the monarch’s “bed companion”. Malin Buska glides between fierce determination and giddy adolescent but the film fails to make the most of a potentially fascinating subject. VERDICT: 2/5

PH Gods Of Egypt has to be the silliest sword-and-sandal epic since Victor Mature hung up his toga

Gods Of Egypt (Cert 12A; 127mins) Gods Of Egypt has to be the silliest sword-and-sandal epic since Victor Mature hung up his toga. The makers seem to have been aiming for a combination of Clash Of The Titans and The Mummy but with its jokey dialogue, ropey special effects and hammy performances, Gods Of Egypt falls far short. Gerard Butler stars as Set, the God of Darkness. Things look grim when Set commits murder to claim the throne of Egypt and starts stealing the powers of all the other gods. Fortunately rascally mortal Bek (Brenton Thwaites) is on hand to help restore the sight of the god Horus (Nikolaj Coster-Waldau) and begin the quest to thwart Set. The duo fight venomous snakes, a Sphinx and a collection of scorpions. All that’s missing is Kenneth Williams shouting: “Infamy! Infamy! They’ve all got it in for me.” Unbelievable. VERDICT: 1/5",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
193458,"Ms Conway insisted Mr Trump and the Russian President “hardly knew” each other but could have a “good” relationship if they worked together on major issues such as terrorism. The top adviser recently had a 25-minute grilling from a CNN anchor about alleged false statements from the White House and the news network reportedly refused to put her on the air on its Sunday show due to concerns over her credibility. It follows ridicule over her blaming two Iraqi refugees for a terrorist “massacre” that didn’t take place. Speaking on CNN, Ms Conway denied the two world leaders had a special bond – despite precise claims from Mr Trump previously they did.

CNN•GETTY Kellyanne Conway denies Trump and Putin are BFFs

President Trump hardly knows Vladimir Putin Kellyanne Conway

She said: “There just seems to be charge and accusation after charge and accusation that some how President Trump and Vladimir Putin are BFFs. “That is not true. He made very clear I think most recently and most vividly at his joint press conference with the Prime Minister of the UK Theresa May that he, President Trump, hardly knows Vladimir Putin. “He said that day that it’s possible he’ll have a good relationship with Vladimir Putin, it’s possible that he won’t. “But, if we can come together on big issues vexing this world, like defeating radical Islamic terrorism, pushing back Isis, which is on the advance, then he will join with other countries that wish to do that including President Putin.

“They’ve had a couple of phone calls since he was elected President and he will continue to speak to many leaders around the globe.” Ms Conway, who rescued Donald Trump’s flagging campaign before being appointed as a presidential adviser, often addresses the press on behalf of the Trump administration. She cited the “Bowling Green massacre” as a defence for Mr Trump’s controversial travel ban on visitors from seven designated Muslim-majority nations. But it was immediately pointed out the “massacre” which Ms Conway referred to never actually took place.

CNN Kellyanne Conway helped rescue Mr Trump's flagging campaign

First 100 days of President Trump Mon, June 12, 2017 President Donald Trump is making a significant impact on global politics during his first term. Play slideshow REUTERS 1 of 23 President Donald Trump arrives at Newark International airport",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
188195,"SPLASH Amal Clooney gave onlookers a glimpse of her toned stomach

The 38-year-old - who is currently in Germany for the 66th Berlin International Film Festival with husband George - treated onlookers to a glimpse of her toned midriff, wearing a pair of high-waisted trousers and a crop top. She teamed the chic get-up with a blazer-style black coat and flashed a smile at photographers as she was snapped leaving the Grill Royal restaurant with her Hollywood hubby.

Amal then finished off her look with a pair of diamante statement earrings and wore her brunette locks loose and wavy. She also applied a slick of red lipstick to add a splash of colour to the outfit.

SPLASH Amal looked stunning as ever as she stepped out in Berlin

SPLASH Brunette beauty went for the casual chic look

George and Amal's latest outing comes after they were pictured looking extremely loved-up at the premiere of Hail, Caesar! in LA last week. George plays a 1950s movie star filming a movie in which he plays the leader of the Roman Empire. The couple have been married for almost two years and it looked as though they couldn't keep their hands off each other as they put on an extremely amorous display. Amal looked stunning in a white mini dress with red floral embellishment around the waist.

George and Amal Clooney in pictures Tue, September 5, 2017 George and Amal Clooney's relationship in pictures. Play slideshow Getty•Flynet 1 of 130 George and Amal Clooney in pictures

WIREIMAGE George and Amal looked loved-up as ever at the Hail, Caesar! LA premiere

GETTY Pair posed for photographers at the red carpet event",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
163210,"ITV Alison Hammond has opened up about Holly and Phil's innuendos on This Morning

The TV presenter - who has gotten to know the cheeky duo rather well during her 14 years on the show - has admitted that while their gaffes are sometimes accused of being deliberate, they are totally “accidental”. Speaking to Express.co.uk about their saucy slip-ups, she dished: “They’re completely accidental. No, seriously. “It’s a live show. They haven’t got time to be thinking of what they’re gonna do. You can’t help it though, on live TV you do make mistakes.” Alison also reflected on her brief turn as main presenter alongside Rylan Clark-Neal when Holly and Phil were having a spooky makeover during the show’s Halloween special.

ITV Alison said that Holly and Phil's naughty blunders are completely accidental

This Morning blunders Tue, November 21, 2017 When live TV goes horribly wrong: Take a look at Holly and Phil's best This Morning blunders. Play slideshow ITV 1 of 16 This Morning blunders

“It’s a live show. They haven’t got time to be thinking of what they’re gonna do."" Alison Hammond on Holly and Phil

Asked if it was something she would like to do again, she confessed: “I loved it! We only did it for 25 minutes, so I only got a little taste. I've never done it before. “I’ve been on This Morning for 14 years and they've asked me to do it before but I've always said, ‘No’, and then when they asked me to do it with Rylan I thought, ‘You know what, it'll be a bit of a laugh and I'm going to go for it!’ and I actually loved it! I really did enjoy it.” The former Big Brother star added: “Everyone had assumed that I'd done it before, they were just like, ‘Yeah, come on Al, just do this’, but nobody was explaining anything to me because they just assumed that I knew what I was doing, so I was just kind of busting it but it was fine.”

ITV Alison and co-host Rylan Clark-Neal recently took over the reins from Holly and Phil

ITV Alison recently suffered a cheeky mishap of her own when she accidentally mocked Matt Smith's ears",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
67949,"GETTY Russia has been accused of plotting to oust Angela Merkel

The CIA and FBI has already accused the Kremlin of swaying the US election results in favour of Donald Trump. And it has now been revealed the German federal security agency had observed “active measures” from Russia in a bid to influence public opinion.

Thomas Haldenwang, the deputy president of the domestic security agency BfV, warned senior officials back in June Russia could be carrying out a campaign of cyber attacks and misinformation. He claimed the aim was “to influence public perception and opinion in our country, to the detriment of the German government”.

GETTY Germany has been hacked by pro-Russian groups several times

BfV’s head Hans-Georg Maassen added: ""We detect increasingly aggressive cyber-espionage. ""The indications of attempts to influence the German parliamentary elections next year are intensifying."" With elections due next year, the government is now concerned Russian President Vladimir Putin could have his sights set on ousting Angela Merkel.

GETTY The chancellor has been one of Russia’s biggest critics of its involvement in Syria and Ukraine

The chancellor has been one of Russia’s biggest critics of its involvement in Syria and Ukraine. And during a press conference earlier this month, Merkel - who will run for office again next year - revealed cyber attacks and a misinformation campaign during the election were “possible”. Konstantin von Notz, the Green party’s spokesperson on internet policy in the German parliament, added: “There’s a real danger that the bitter experience of the US election could be repeated here.”

GETTY The CIA and FBI has already accused the Kremlin of swaying the US election results

The indications of attempts to influence the German parliamentary elections next year are intensifying Hans-Georg Maassen, head of the domestic security agency BfV

This would not be the first cyber attack on Germany from Russia however. In January last year, a pro-Russian group hacked parliament websites to bring them down during a visit of Ukraine’s then prime minister Arseniy Yatsenyuk, supposedly in retaliation for the German’s support for Kiev. Then just months later a group known as Fancy Bear - who allegedly penetrated the Democratic National Committee in the US - gained access to the Bundestag servers, collecting hoards of information over period of months after security services failed to detect that the system had been breached.

Angela Merkel in pictures Tue, August 8, 2017 Angela Merkel has served as German Chancellor since 2005 and Leader of the Christian Democratic Union since 2000. We take a look at her political career in pictures. Play slideshow AFP/Getty Images 1 of 83 Angela Merkel through the years

And in Spring this year, hackers tried to access Merkel’s Christian Democratic Union and before launching another attack on the Bundestag - although this time the hack was fended off before the group could access the servers. Now officials are concerned hackers could be holding on to potentially damaging information, with the aim of releasing it close to the election for maximum impact. Mr Maassen warned earlier this month that “information obtained through cyber attacks could emerge in the election campaign to discredit German politicians”.

GETTY Putin could have his sights set on ousting Angela Merkel

And security officials claim threats of online warfare is set to worsen - with France and Netherlands election also at risk of Russian hacks. But Russian officials have denied the claims - along with reciting claims they influenced the result of the US presidential election last month. Russian presidential spokesman Dmitry Peskov said: “It’s nonsense. To use Russia as a tool in an election campaign is something we hate … It’s fake information.” The revolution comes after European Union experts claimed Russia could be organising migrant sex attacks in Germany in a sick plot to oust Ms Merkel.

GETTY Merkel is standing again in the German elections next year",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
358145,"Zayn Malik left One Direction yesterday causing major upset with fans of the band

The heartbroken workers are convinced they are too distressed to turn up for work after the 22-year-old walked away from the pop band yesterday.

Manchester-based Peninsula said its employer advice service had received an astonishing 220 calls from firms seeking advice on what they should do after receiving the requests from staff.

Alan Price, an employment law director at the firm, confirmed he was telling bosses to refuse the request - unless the workers are of course related to the departing star.

He said: ""While I sympathise with One Direction fans, I hardly think this qualified as compassionate leave.

**CLICK HERE TO SEE MORE PICTURES OF FORMER ONE DIRECTION STAR ZAYN MALIK**",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
153854,"The 57-year-old actor, singer, comedian and presenter appeared on Sunday Brunch yesterday to chat about his exciting new role in the long-running BBC sci-fi favourite.

""It's really exciting because when I was a kid William Hartnell was in it, and then Patrick Troughton, and it was black and white and very evocative.

""I remember getting bought a Dalek, I drove my mum and dad mad,"" he continued. ""And in those days, 1968, '69, Daleks would come in a package and they would be battery operated and the light would flash.

""And I had one,"" Bradley explained, before teasing a big clue about possible plots for the 11th season.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
140105,"GETTY The port of Durban is the ninth largest harbour in the world

1. At the entrance to the busiest port in South Africa is the Point Waterfront, launched in 2003 and responsible for transforming a once unsavoury area of the city into an elegant leisure area. The district’s historical and listed buildings have been rejuvenated and you’ll find an enticing mix of shops, bars and restaurants – perfect for people-watching. (http://www.sa-venues.com/attractionskzn/point-waterfront.php) 2. A free museum the children will love is Durban’s Natural Science Museum, housed in the City Hall building. Founded way back in 1887, you can take in many stuffed birds, giant insects and Peter Amen – apparently an authentic Egyptian Mummy. (http://www.sa-venues.com/attractionskzn/durban-natural-science-museum.htm) 3. For a very small entrance fee you can visit the city’s Campbell Collections – widely considered to be the most important museum in Durban. The collections include rare artefacts, art and documents and are housed in ‘Muckleneuk’, a Dutch-style house and formerly home to the Campbell family. (http://campbell.ukzn.ac.za/) 4. Durban’s Indian district, often referred to as ‘Little India’, is an absolute must and a vibrant cocophany of sights, sounds and smells. Located in the eastern quarter of the city you’ll find traditional shops, colourful markets and the vast Juma Musjid Mosque. Durban is home to the largest Indian population outside India. (http://www.places.co.za/blog/durbans-indian-quarter/)

GETTY The South Pier Beach is a popular tourist destination

Hit Durban’s historic Victoria Street Market and you’ll feel like you’ve been transported to the east

5. Durban’s popular sandy beach stretches for around 4 miles and is known as ‘the Golden Mile’. Swimming is good all year round – and the beach is said to be well-protected by shark nets. You might just fancy watching the surfers though or walking, jogging or cycling along the promenade. (http://www.southafrica-travel.net/kwazulu/durban_goldenmile.html) 6. Durban’s Botanical Gardens were founded in 1849 and are the oldest gardens of their kind in Africa. Free to enter, the gardens also host concerts and events throughout the year and you will have to pay for these. Check out the stunning orchid collection, the impressive arboretum and the amazing cycads – seed plants that have survived three mass extinctions. (http://www.durbanbotanicgardens.org.za/index.html) 7. A great starting point to ‘free Durban’ is the city’s Tourist Junction located at the old railway station. The large red back building dates from the 1800s and inside houses a vast information centre with impressive maps of the city. There are also various quaint shops and an African art centre.

GETTY A view of Durban city centre

8. Hit Durban’s historic Victoria Street Market and you’ll feel like you’ve been transported to the east. It opened in 1910 and is modelled on the Maharajah’s Palace. Here the air is heady with incense and 170 stalls sell everything from fish and spices to ceramics. (http://www.indianmarket.co.za/jhi/) 9. Combine a stroll with some fabulous bird watching at the Amanzimtoti Bird Sanctuary – also known as the Umdoni Bird Park - just south of Durban. The park’s lush, rolling lawns are perfect for a picnic and on one of the self-guided walks you can spot up to 150 different bird species. (http://www.safarinow.com/destinations/amanzimtoti/animalparks/amanzimtoti-bird-sanctuary.aspx)

GETTY If you get the sance, visit the botanical garden in Durban",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
285504,"GETTY The Xbox Scorpio and PS4 Pro will be followed by yearly Sony and Microsoft upgrades?

While both tech giants have ruled out moving to a system more akin to those used by Apple and Samsung - producing yearly updates to their biggest products - it appears not everyone agrees. Brad Wardell, the CEO of Stardock, a company that specialises in graphics and technology innovation, believes that a rolling hardware upgrade system could soon be adopted by both. Sony's PS4 Pro Microsoft's Xbox Scorpio are certainly different ventures from the traditional cycle adopted by both companies in the past. While we have seen smaller consoles released, this is the first time we have see a mid-generational refresh. Speaking about the impact of 4K gaming on the PS4 Pro development and how things could change in the future for gamers, Wardell told Gamingbolt: “I think 4K is becoming pretty common now, but I think when they were starting out, I don’t think any of us expected it to take off quite as much as it did.

“On the other hand, there’s still quite a lot of exciting things waiting- HDR is going to be a big deal. So that’s another thing these guys will all want to support via upgrades in their hardware (and by the way, Nitrous Engine supports HDR, I think we’re the only ones who do). And that it creates a pretty tremendous visual difference. I don’t think that many people have HDR yet, though. “So give it another year or two… I think, all the guys will end up releasing just a early or bi-yearly upgrades to these things, like the iPhone, and they’ll all going to end up following the iPhone model, where you must have at least this model for it to work.” There has been much speculation over the future of generational jumps in consoles and how beneficial it could be to tweak how things currently work.

Xbox One Backwards Compatibility Games 2017 Mon, March 6, 2017 All the Xbox One Backwards Compatibility Games added in 2017 so far. Play slideshow MICROSOFT 1 of 46 Call of Duty: Black Ops 2",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
102657,"Oscar Tabarez admits that Luis Suarez might not be as effective for Uruguay as he is Liverpool[AP]

Suarez trained at the Arena Sao Paulo last night as he looks to launch his comeback following knee surgery and wreck England's World Cup dreams in the process.

Uruguay coach Oscar Tabarez - who will be without captain Diego Lugano due to injury - accepted the Liverpool striker's instincts may be dulled after his lay-off and not as sharp as when he plundered 31 league goals last term.

But he insisted Suarez, who is a contender to wear the armband in the make or break Group D clash, can still cause England problems. ""We thought if everything went well there was no reason for him not to play in the World Cup,"" said Tabarez, who is likely to ask Liverpool's Sebastian Coates to replace Lugano.

""He has recovered well. His knee seems to have adapted to the work he has been doing. He has been training and playing with his team-mates during this last week. So, he was able to train and a training session is not the same as a match.

""If he plays we must consider the possibility that he's not as well as he was during the Premier League.""",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
291046,"Thomas Vermaelen is being monitored by a number of clubs[GETTY]

The Arsenal captain has frequently been linked with a move away from the Emirates, and has piqued the interest of a number of Europe's elite. Reports claim Liverpool boss Brendan Rodgers is looking to quickly follow up his impending £20m capture of Dejan Lovren with Vermaelen - a move that could spell the end for Danish international Daniel Agger. The Dane has been vocal with his displeasure of how last season unfolded, he said: ""It is no secret that I had problems last season and I am considering things.

""Many things can happen in football and I do not want to exclude anything."" Vermaelen commands a significant £70,000 per-week wages, and is likely to opt for a club capable of matching or even surpassing that total. From this perspective United could pose the main danger for Rodgers' side. Furthermore, Louis Van Gaal's need to bolster his defensive options far outweighs Liverpool's.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
207850,"The 60-year-old MP for West Dorset revealed that there were no guarantees that Britain would save money by leaving the European Union. The shocking remark came as the government were defeated on the Article 50 bill which has been sent back to the House of Commons after a vote was lost in the Lords. Mr Letwin admitted that there were no assurances that Britain would save money once the UK has fully left the European Union. On Channel 4 News, the interviewer asked: “You don’t rule out the possibility that we will end up paying more out, than we did in?”

C4NEWS Letwin admitted that the final Brexit deal could be more expensive that what the UK was paying

“I think it is possible, you can’t rule out the possibility that at the end of the day we have negotiated something that is expensive,” the Conservative politician replied. The reporter pressed the Tory MP on whether this would be more money than the UK was originally paying to Brussels, in which Mr Letwin admitted that it was “conceivable” that Britain would end up paying more. The interviewer then added one final dig, arguing that information about what the UK might pay to the EU when negotiations are over, was “not on the side of the bus”, which promised more money to the NHS.

GETTY Theresa May is expected to trigger Article 50 and begin Brexit negotiations before the end of March

Mr Letwin finished: “It was not”. The House of Lords blocked the bill that would allow Brexit to take place in an attempt to protect EU nationals in the UK. The Labour amendment was passed in the chamber by 358 votes to 256, however the government are expected to reject the changes made to the bill in Parliament.

Images from inside the House of Lords: Peers have voted to guarantee EU citizens' rights Wed, March 1, 2017 The House of Lords voted overwhelmingly in favour of an amendment to the Prime Minister’s proposed Brexit legislation Play slideshow PA 1 of 11 A packed House of Lords, London, as the Government is facing possible defeat in the House of Lords as peers push for guarantees over the rights of EU nationals living in the UK after Brexit

You can’t rule out the possibility that we have negotiated something that is expensive Oliver Letwin",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
181991,"BBC Simon Reeve visits Ireland and discovers its interesting geography

It wasn't so much that look as the look that came two seconds later when Cilla Black told her exactly where the Emerald Isle was. You could almost see those visions of scuba-diving, hammocks and coconut-shell cocktails drain away from her eyes. IRELAND WITH SIMON REEVE (Sunday, BBC2) will not, I fear, convince anyone that the Emerald Isle is more romantic than an all-inclusive in the Dominican Republic. Yet that's never really been the purpose of this presenter's programmes and this isn't ITV. His shows are more about geography (the interesting geography that was never taught in school), about taking in lands and peoples and how they shape one another.

So Hitler's gun changed history, without firing a shot

The programme began with a wide bay where the first Anglo-Norman invaders pitched up in 1169. Then we visited the stillthriving reason for all those invasions. Rain (the rain that possibly made that Blind Date such a washout) creates lush green pastures, fat cows and heavenly milk and butter. On a nearby farm, surrounded by ultra-modern milking machines, farmer Pat Moloney talked about the ""organic faith"", away of farming, shopping and eating that was fast becoming a new sort of religion. Elsewhere, in soup kitchens and at pilgrimage sites, it was clear that Ireland's spiritual life is still strong. Scandals might have made people turn away from the Church but their beliefs have grown even stronger. That point kept coming up, a green thread linking everything we saw. Whether people were surfing off the chilly Atlantic coast, growing award-winning potatoes or collecting legends about fairies, they were doing it with devotion.

GETTY Society is still divided in Derry between the Protestants and the Catholics

There are always some downsides to devotion too, of course, and in Derry, or is it Londonderry (even the name is contentious) Reeve found a still divided society. Protestant and Catholic kids on a community project were learning to spray graffiti side-by-side. The choice of graffiti was somewhat depressing but more depressing was the fact that this was the first time these young folk had mixed. There can't have been many viewers who were surprised at this. The point was that we gained a sense, via means more entertaining than educational, of how it all fitted together, from the rainfall to the land to the love and the hate. You'd be lucky to learn that much from a holiday. My old history teacher, Mr Murphy, liked to say ""conflict is the mother of invention"". BUILDING HITLER'S SUPERGUN: THE PLOT TO DESTROY LONDON (Sunday, C4) was not the story of one dastardly innovation but several. Aware, from aerial photos, that the Nazis were building a weapon powerful enough to blast Westminster from the French coast, the Allies set to work.

CHANNEL 4 Building Hitler's supergun revealed how the Nazis were building a powerful weapon",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
1565,"1. The USA called it the Department of Alaska, then renamed it District of Alaska, then Alaska Territory. It became the State of Alaska in 1959.

2. Alaska is by far the biggest US state. It is more than twice the area of Texas which comes next.

3. There are only 16 countries in the world (including the US) which are bigger than Alaska.

4. Alaska is the only US state whose name can be typed on a single row of a standard keyboard.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
3409,"GETTY Richard Branson: The Virgin founder has raised the issue of discrimination on holiday

A whopping 84 per cent of straight couples are at ease showing affection to a partner abroad - in fact, the majority are even more affectionate than when at home. This stands in stark contrast to LGBT+ travellers; just one in twenty feel comfortable openly showing affection with a loved one whilst abroad. Sir Richard Branson said: “At Virgin Holidays, we believe everyone, regardless of their sexual orientation or gender identity, has the right to be whoever they are, wherever they are. ""That’s why it is shocking that in today’s society some of us can’t even enjoy a simple holiday without fear of discrimination.

GETTY Richard Branson: The founder believes everyone has the right to be at ease on holiday

It’s fantastic that Virgin Holidays are raising awareness around this important issue Richard Branson

""It’s fantastic that Virgin Holidays are raising awareness around this important issue."" A third of LGBT travellers admitted they feared judgement from hotel staff and more than half have had their relationship status questioned. This has resulted in eight out of ten couples refusing to hold hands on holiday at all, with more than half refusing to hold hands in the comfort and safety of their hotel. Joe Thompson, Managing Director at Virgin Holidays, said: “Holidays should be relaxing, fun and full of adventure. Unfortunately for LGBT+ people this still isn’t always the case.

Hurricane Irma: Sir Richard Branson's Necker Island destroyed Mon, September 11, 2017 Billionaire Sir Richard Branson has released pictures showing the devastation left behind by Hurricane Irma on his private island, Necker Island Play slideshow PA 1 of 9 Sir Richard Branson amongst the debris on his private island Necker caused by Hurricane Irma

""We want everyone to take on the world and that’s why we’re working with one of the biggest issues driven publishers to continue to raise awareness of the issues faced by LGBT+ travelers on holiday, and to work with our partners abroad, to give customers the best experience possible."" In 2016 Virgin Holidays unveiled a three-year plan to become one of the friendliest LGBT companies in travel with a plan that focused on empowering staff, educating customers and influencing suppliers. This year the tour operator has focused on using its influence to advance LGBT+ equality in conservative regions such as the Caribbean. At the Caribbean Hoteliers and Tourism Association Conference in Miami the travel company convened close to 100 of the most influential industry stakeholders, and laid out the argument for LGBT inclusion.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
255897,"Another day, another dagger for the England coach up in Manchester for what could be his final game in charge. The queue of club directors of rugby willing to sound off was substantial. If they were not exactly independent witnesses as possible successors should Lancaster resign or be fired, then their grievances were loud, long and in many cases worth airing. After a group stage exit at a home World Cup the response was always going to be voluble, and Lancaster acknowledged he has needed ""snow goggles"" to see through the blizzard of criticism. But here is the surprising bit. He has also been deluged by personal messages of support from, among others, rival World Cup coaches - including his Wales nemesis Warren Gatland.

Rugby World Cup 2015: Pool stage in pictures Mon, October 12, 2015 The Rugby World Cup 2015 pool stage in pictures. Play slideshow World Rugby via Getty Images 1 of 100 Jonathan Sexton kicks at goal for Ireland

""It's been nice the number of texts and emails of support I've had, running into the hundreds,"" said Lancaster. ""They say, 'We are all equally disappointed, however we can all see what you're doing and where the team are going. The foundations are strong with the way you've gone about trying to build a team and the way the team have responded'. There has been a lot of that which has surprised me actually. ""The support does help in one way but I still can't change the results. I don't think the decision is going to come down to me ultimately. There are other people who have got the decision to make."" The RFU review chaired by chief executive Ian Ritchie will make the final call on Lancaster's future if he does not walk away.

GETTY Stuart Lancaster may be about to take charge his last ever match as England coach

Lancaster insists he has not given his own future much thought yet. With tomorrow's game against Uruguay to plan for, reflection time with his family has been minimal. ""I had a half-hour walk with my wife and the dog on Wednesday then I came here. It was raining most of the time so we didn't talk that much,"" he said. But he has moved as far as to reflect that, despite the Danny Cipriani/Mike Catt training-ground row and agent issues over players being told by the RFU not to wear non-sponsor headphone brands in public, nothing is so fundamentally broken within the England set-up that it needs a radical overhaul. ""Personally, I would say no, but I would say that wouldn't I, because I built it!"" said Lancaster.

GETTY Sale coach Steve Diamond has suggested keeping Lancaster and adding Dean Richards

""Clearly things need to be done better, no doubt about it, because we didn't achieve what we wanted to achieve. That's the whole purpose of the review - if things can be done better, let's learn and improve and do them better. ""I know we can all talk about the off-field stuff, about players being disappointed by selection or this or that didn't happen with someone's headphones, but the bit we need to review properly is the rugby stuff. That's what really matters - why we didn't execute under pressure. That's what I have to think about and understand."" A shake-up in Lancaster's coaching team, as opposed to a complete wipe-out, has been suggested. ""Player feedback will be important in that,"" said Lancaster, who will coach a state school in Eccles today with some of his squad. ""The reality is that I have three guys, two of them British Lions coaches.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
341365,"Clara (left) will exit the show in the coming weeks

The Game Of Thrones star, 18, has been seen as viking Ashildr in The Girl Who Died and The Woman Who Lived; both of which received overwhelmingly positive reactions from viewers. Now, speaking at London's Comic Con, Steven Moffat, Mark Gatiss and writer Sarah Dollard are said to have revealed that the character will be back sooner rather than later - and her next appearance will tie-in with the exit of Jenna Coleman as companion Clara Oswald.

Advertisement

However, despite calls from fans, her character will not become the Doctor's next full-time assistant. The Mirror reports that Face The Raven is the episode in which fans will see Ashildr again - the same instalment that will see the show kill off one of the Time Lord's companions for the first time since 1982.

BBC Maisie as Viking Ashildr

BBC Fans will be devastated by Clara's death

Advertisement

An insider previously told the tabloid: ""It’s the first time since the show came back that a companion has been killed off. It’s going to be a horrible shock for everyone, as Clara is loved by the fans."" In a behind-the-scenes clip shared by the BBC last week, Maisie revealed she was hopeful for a comeback for Ashildr, who was made immortal after she saved her village from an alien invasion. ""I hope that she comes back,"" she said. ""I know they have characters similar to Ashildr that have come back in future episodes and future series. So we'll see! I think there's a good chance."" Face The Raven will be followed by one of the show's most ambitious episodes yet, in which Peter Capaldi's mourning Doctor will be the only character on-screen for the entire duration.

BBC What role will Ashildr play in Clara's exit?

Maisie Williams - She is best known as the feisty Arya Stark in the HBO fantasy drama but she is set to take on a mysterious role in Doctor Who. The part will be one of her biggest parts to date Julian Glover - Most probably know him as Maester Pycelle in Game of Thrones, But those with long memories will remember that Julian played the role of Scaroth in the Seventies Doctor Who serial City of Death Iain Glen - He plays Jorah Mormont in Game of Thrones, but before that Iain had a role in Doctor Who as Father Octavian in the Time of the Angels Mark Gatiss - Not only has Mark written several episodes of Doctor Who - including Cold War, Robot of Sherwood and The Crimson Horror - he's even played a part in one episode Tobias Menzies - Tobias took on the part of Lieutenant Stepashin in the Doctor Who adventure, he alsoplayed Edmure Tully in Game of Thrones, one of the few characters to have survived the Red Wedding David Bradley - Walder Frey is one of the most odious characters on Game of Thrones, He also played the ruthless space buccaneer Solomon on Dinosaurs on a Spaceship in Doctor Who Paul Kaye - The British star cropped up in Doctor Who after playing an annoying alien called Prentis in the episodes Under the Lake and Before the Flood. The comedian previously starred as the red priest Thoros of Myr in season three of Game of Thrones Harry Lloyd - Viserys Targaryen met a sticky end in Game of Thrones way back when, long before this Harry played the role of the alien-possessed school boy Jeremy Baines in the episodes Human Nature and The Family of Blood Thomas Brodie-Sangster - Before landing the role of the stoic Jojen Reed in Game of Thrones, Thomas played Tim Latimer in Doctor Who. The schoolboy with Time Lord-like qualities helped to save the Earth in Human Nature and The Family of Blood Joe Dempsie - He was one of Robert Baratheon's many illegitimate sons Gendry in Game of Thrones, prior to his journey to Westeros, Joe starred as a solider called Cline in the Doctor Who story The Doctor's daughter Ian Hanmore - The Scottish star played Pyat Pree in Game of Thrones, Before that he had played the part of Father Angelo in the werwolf story Tooth and Claw in Doctor Who Dame Diana Rigg - She is the sharp-tongued Tyrell matriarch and the Queen of Thorns Lady Olenna in Game of Thrones. But her role as Mrs Gillyflower in The Crimson Horror took the biscuit in the disturbing stakes Ben Crompton - Eddison Tollett is one of the members of the Night's Watch and a friend of Jon Snow, last year Ben decided to travel through time and starred in the Doctor Who episode Into Dalek Liam Cunninghham - He plays the advisor to Stannis Baratheon and seafaring smuggler Davos Seaworth in Game of Thrones. But a couple of years ago took another nautical role as the Russian Captain Zhukov in the Doctor Who episode Cold War",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
81155,"If they slip up, the momentum shift against them going towards next Saturday’s final Test in Sydney could well become irresistible.

“The nature of this game is that you go for broke. It’s do or die,” said backs coach Howley, below, after final training yesterday.

“We are in a good place, have played a lot of good rugby and the players are looking forward to something they dare not speak about. If you dare to dream it turns into a nightmare. But the players have got on with their jobs and that is what is needed in a Test match.

“If you dare to dream about the future, it doesn’t happen.” The Lions have not won a series since beating the Springboks in 1997.

When last in Australia in 2001, with Howley as scrum-half, they lost the second Test here after winning the first.

With Howley injured, they went on to lose the third.

“Backs to the wall, the wounded Wallabies are going to come out and play high-risk, high-reward rugby,” Howley added.

“We talk about 80 games of one minute. Those are the sort of concentration levels you need, the trust and unity you have to have in attack and defence. Our entire attitude is to go 2-0 in this series, about seizing the moment and taking the opportunity.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
163419,"GETTY A large scale study has discovered what the UK's dream house looks like in 2016

The UK property market often attracts a great deal of attention, as it contains some of the most highly-regarded real estate in the world. From the stunning Lake District to villages in Kent, England offers many picturesque places to call home. Earlier this year, housing experts revealed homes in Greater Manchester and Bromley as some of the best places for Brits to buy. A new large scale study has discovered what the UK’s dream house looks like in 2016.

GETTY Almost half of Brits want a custom-built property, designed by an architect or themselves

According to the research, which was conducted by estate agency Tepilo, almost half (43 per cent) of Brits crave a custom-built property, designed by an architect or ourselves. The ultimate set up is a four-bed pad either on the beach or in the city centre. The study of 2,000 homebuyers revealed that people want their dream house to boast en-suites in every bedroom (48 per cent) and a TV room/snug (48 percent). Almost half (47 per cent) also want a huge kitchen with its own kitchen island and a spacious garden.

Tips to add value to your house Tue, April 4, 2017 Selling your house? Here are some tips to add value to your property. Play slideshow Getty Images 1 of 14 How to add value to your home

TEPILO Almost half (47 per cent) of respondents want a huge kitchen and garden

It’s interesting to see how reality compares to what Brits dream of, and the differences are pretty big! Sarah Beeney, Tepilo

As for location, the beach and city centre were the most popular choices with both earning 16 per cent of the votes each. Interestingly, it seems size isn’t everything. Almost three in ten (29 per cent) Brits say their dream house would have just four bedrooms. Almost a third (27 per cent) wanting just three and only 11 per cent would opt for six or more. More Brits preferred a ‘cute’ country cottage than a huge mansion. Detached bungalows and ‘modern pieces of architecture’",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
322856,"David Cameron predicts his wife Sam Cameron will win the charity special of Great British Bake Off

The Prime Minister, 49, who previously predicted Nadiya Hussain as champion, is hoping his eye for true baking talent will lend itself to hopeful Sam, when she appears on The Great Sport Relief Bake Off. Mrs Cameron, 44, is one of 16 celebrities who are set to show off their culinary skills in a bid to raise money for the charity.

Advertisement

Former shadow chancellor Ed Balls, singer Kimberley Walsh and actor Alison Steadman, are among contestants vying to be crowned star baker. In an interview for Stylist magazine, Mr Cameron said he cooks dinner for the family some evenings, but would rather make a speech in the House of Commons than get his hands dirty with dough.

GETTY The PM predicted that Nadiya Hussain would win and hopes he can foresee another champion in Sam

GETTY Mr Cameron says he would rather debate politics than attempt Bake Off

Advertisement

""We backed Nadiya to win in the last series. We're hoping our support will have the same effect on Sam when she appears on The Great Sport Relief Bake Off in March"", the PM enthused. He added: ""I don't envy her. I'd rather fight an election than make pastry from scratch."" But the Conservative leader doesn't shy away from the kitchen entirely: ""Some nights I'll cook dinner - Italian sausage meat pasta is a family favourite.

BBC Mary Berry and Paul Hollywood return for a Sport Relief charity special in March

BBC Nadiya Hussain took the crown last year proving the Prime Minister correct

STYLIST David Cameron made the comments about his wife's Bake Off appearance in Stylist magazine

""Samantha and I regularly host receptions for some of Britain's heroes. We've had everyone from the Ebola medics to the England women's rugby team. They make you truly proud to be British."" Mr Cameron is among a host of politicians who have given interviews for the 300th edition of the Stylist. Sport Relief will run from Friday March 18 to Sunday March 20, 2016.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
163289,"* It's the final day of London Fashion Week - boo!

* But it looks set to be the most star-studded yet - hurrah!

* Last night saw all the A- (and Z-) listers hit the big parties after a day on the FROW.

* Harry Styles had the perfect day, ogling models on the catwalk and then partying with other celebs and those very same models - including Cara Delevingne.

* Harry and Cara played pass the balaclava, with Harry posing in it for an Instagram snap...

* We'll be keeping a close eye on those two today - and expect some bleary eyes and sore heads on the front row for shows including Adidas by Stella McCartney, Simone Rocha and Anya Hindmarch.

* Meanwhile the grand dame of fashion shows, Victoria Beckham, stepped out with husband David. She changed her outfit at least twice, from a utilitarian top and trousers to a classic, sexy black tux.

* Keep checking in for all the gossip from our fashion and beauty teams on the ground. We'll be bringing you all the news as it happens!

* Yep, Harry Styles is back again - this time with partner in crime Nick Grimshaw, or Grimmers to his mates.

* Emma Thompson brought a touch of class, looking much younger than her 54 years as she rubbed shoulders with the IT crowd. Loving her blonde bob...

* It's not over yet! Our fashion team will be blogging through the evening from the after-party circuit, bringing you even more insider gossip!",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
272340,"GETTY Jamie Vardy scored within 10 minutes of coming on against Wales for England

It took the England striker just 10 minutes of major finals’ football to find the back of the net after coming on as a substitute in the 2-1 win over Wales that lifts England to the top of Group B at Euro 2016. Perhaps it was no surprise that he was flying, given the pictures taken of him earlier this week near the team’s base in Chantilly drinking Red Bull and wearing a nicotine patch. Vardy admits he sometimes needs the energy drink to get him going in the morning and has checked the ingredients over with the doctors on site to make sure any stimulants are legal ones. And his regime is part of an unusual one when held up against the modern stereotype of nutritionally-balanced gym-bunny international footballers, hammering at the weights to get give them the strength they need to compete at the highest level.

England arrive back in Chantilly after victory over Wales Fri, June 17, 2016 England arrive back at their hotel in Chantilly to a thunderous welcome after their 2-1 win over Wales in Lens on Thursday Play slideshow Vantagenews.com 1 of 14 A triumphant England team arrive back at their Chantilly base after their last-gasp 2-1 win over Wales on Thursday

“I wouldn’t call it a diet, the Red Bull was just to wake me up in the morning,” he said. “It’s just standard me, a bit of Red Bull. It’s not a regular thing whereby I have a Red Bull every morning. It’s just something I felt I needed that day. “It’s just something I’ve always done from time to time and they’ve been checked with the medical team and there’s nothing wrong with them. “At the same time, if I go in the gym it will slow me down. I don’t go in for weights or anything like that. Each and every person is different and this is my way, and I’m sure if someone else tried doing what I do then it probably wouldn’t work for them.” When asked when was the last time it he lifted a weight, his response was as quick as one of his lightning runs off the shoulder of a centre-back. “Probably that can of Red Bull the other day!” he said. “People have tried to drag me into the gym but they have not succeeded.”

Of course, Vardy is no slouch, and earlier this season Leicester’s strength and conditioning coach Matt Reeves went on record to explain the unorthodox way in which the striker gets himself into peak physical shape for the very specific demands he puts himself through during 90 minutes. “He isn’t a player that spends hour upon hour in the gym but instead has developed a very good functional strength, which is a big asset on the football pitch and he knows how to use his strength and aggression effectively,” Reeves told The Times. “Jamie is an extremely explosive player who plays at full tilt every game. As a result, though, he requires slightly longer to recover after each game than his team-mates.” The fact that Hodgson has so far used him only sparingly will have helped with that recovery process and although the clamour is for the Arsenal target to start against Slovakia on Monday night, he is happy to fulfil whatever role Hodgson sees fit for him.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
100632,"Jurgen Klopp is known for getting excited on the touchline

Charging up the touchline or jumping in the air for joy when his side scores is a common image associated with the German.

Klopp’s charisma has also won over the Liverpool fans during the six months he has been in charge of the Anfield outfit.

Although he is rather eccentric, he has done his best to explain his excitable manner on the touchline.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
48429,"The fervent pro-Brexit MP said leaving the EU will give Britain the chance to ""re-invigorate"" British fishing communities. The CFP, which allows EU vessels access to UK fishing grounds and imposes strict quotas, is despised by many British trawlermen who blame it for decimating what was once a national industry. Ms Fernandes, MP for Fareham, said: ""I have a constituency which is on the coast and I meet with fishermen there who fish for bass.

DEUTSCHE WELLE•GETTY Brexit news: Suella Fernandes hailed the opportunity for fishing community Brexit offers

""They have been almost ruined by inappropriate policies due to the Common Fisheries Policy – which is a European creation."" After Brexit, the UK will be entitled under international law to lay claim to an exclusive economic zone (EEZ) up to 200 miles from its coast, within which the British Government will police how fishing operates. Speaking to Deutsche Welle, Ms Fernandes said: ""I think there is a great opportunity to re-invigorate our fishing our fishing and our agriculture in Britain."" A new poll released Wednesday revealed that eight in 10 voters want Britain to seize back control of its waters by the end of 2019 even if there is a two year transition period after Brexit.

They have been almost ruined by inappropriate policies due to the Common Fisheries Policy Suella Fernandes",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
34575,"Mourinho replaced Louis van Gaal at Manchester United last summer.

And the Portuguese claimed his first trophy with the Red Devils yesterday, as his side beat Southampton 3-2 to win the EFL Cup final.

But United remain in sixth place in the Premier League, despite not tasting defeat since losing to Chelsea 4-0 in October.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
366895,"Ruby Tandoh hit out at X Factor judges, producers and the general public after Gifty Louise's exit

Advertisement

Gifty found herself in the sing-off with girlband Four of Diamonds and subsequently was eliminated. Ruby, who has since become a successful cookbook author and baking columnist, said that X Factor bosses were guilty of sidelining minority acts in favour of white contestants. The 24-year-old hit out at just about everyone involved in the show in a lengthy Twitter rant earlier today.

SYCO•THAMES•DYMOND When Gifty left the X Factor Simon Cowell apologised for giving her the wrong song

Advertisement

”X Factor channels the purest essence of racism, and Gifty getting sent home is absolutely typical of this,” she tweeted. ""'It's the public who are racist! They vote!' Yeah, true, the public is racist in the extreme, but the show's producers are fully culpable, too. ""POC [people of colour] don't get the same fleshed-out, humanising, emotional back-stories that the others get. Not in the slightest. POC get far less screen time throughout auditions. A small handful of white contestants are pretty much groomed to win from the beginning,"" she continued.

INSTAGRAM Ruby Tandoh showed off her new buzz-cut recently on Instagram

TWITTER

TWITTER

TWITTER

TWITTER Ruby Tandoh said minority contestants do not get the same opportunities as white contestants

Ruby then went on to slam judges Simon Cowell, Sharon Osbourne, Nicole Scherzinger and Louis Walsh, as well as contestant Honey G who she deemed both “offensive” and “appropriative”. She posted: ""The judges preempt, validate, and bolster that racism, not to mention the way that the show sets queer people up to be mocked, while lauding offensive, appropriative joke acts like Honey G. “If you think that gifty was the worst and deserved to go home you are straight up a racist. It's literally that simple sorry. “Bet u think she had an 'attitude' right. Bet u think she was 'overconfident'. As if WOC [women of colour] have to grovel just to justify their very inclusion.”(sic)

TWITTER

TWITTER

TWITTER

TWITTER

TWITTER Ruby Tandoh hit out at the judges and rapper Honey G, labelling her ""appropriative""

SYCO•THAMES•DYMOND Ruby said that anyone who thought Gifty should have left X Factor last night was racist

Matt Terry is crowned winner of the X Factor Matt Terry is crowned winner of The X Factor Nicole Scherzinger congratulates Matt Terry Matt Terry is crowned winner of The X Factor Saara Aalto performs for the judges Saara Aalto performs for the judges on the X Factor final Little Mix wore pink jackets before stripping down into sexy outfits Little Mix stripped down to leotards to perform new song Touch Little Mix show off their toned bodies as they dance on stage in sexy leotards and thigh high boots Sharon Osbourne and Nicole Scherzinger share a hug Simon Cowell praises 'brave' Louis Tomlinson for performing on the show just days after the death of his mother during the final of 'The X Factor' Louis Tomlinson and Steve Aoki perform their new single 'Just Hold On' during the final of 'The X Factor' Matt Terry performs with Nicole Scherzinger during the final of 'The X Factor' Matt Terry performs with Nicole Scherzinger during the final of 'The X Factor' Saara Aalto performs with Adam Lambert during the final of 'The X Factor' Saara Aalto performs with Adam Lambert during the final of 'The X Factor' 5 After Midnight perform with Clean Bandit and Louisa Johnson during the final of 'The X Factor' Saara Aalto performed Sia's 'Chandelier' Saara Aalto lit up the stage with 'Chandelier' by Sia Emily Middlemass cuddles Simon Cowell after being voted off the competition Emily Middlemass is the latest contestant to leave the X Factor Emily Middlemass sings 'Wings' by Birdy to stay make it through to next week Matt Terry sings 'Hurt' to stay in the competition 5 After Midnight take on 'Signed, Sealed, Delivered!' by Stevie Wonder Honey G says goodbye to the X Factor Honey G becomes the latest contestant to leave the show Honey G fights for her place in the live finals 5 After Midnight fight for their place in the competition Emily Middlemas sings Rag 'n' Bone Man's Human Honey G sings Salt-N-Pepa's Push It and Rae Sremmurds's Black Beatles Honey G and the X Factor do their own mannequin challenge Matt Terry wowed with his Sia cover on Saturday night Matt Terry performs Alive by Sia Saara Aalto sings ABBA classic The Winner Takes it All Matt Terry got a mixed response for his performance in Disco Week Saara Aalto performs Enough Is Enough for The X Factor's Disco Week Ryan Lawrie attempted to Play That Funky Music Samantha Lavery was slammed for her take on I Will Survive 5 After Midnight brought the house down with an Earth Wind & Fire mash-up Emily Middlemas's slowed-down Wishing On A Star was panned Honey G performed Stayin Alive on The X Factor Saara Aalto sings Girls Aloud classic Sound of the Underground 4 of Diamonds perform in week 5 of the X Factor Saara Aalto sings Who You Are by Jessie J in the sing off Saara Aalto performs in the sing off 4 of Diamonds are the latest act to be eliminated Saara Aalto survives another week 4 of Diamonds sing Wilson Phillips' Hold On Sam Lavery sings a Girls Aloud numer 5 After Midnight perform Spice Girls number, Say You'll Be There Matt Terry opens the show with a Wham! number Honey G performs Jump by Kriss Kross Honey G performs Jump by Kriss Kross The X Factor judges The judges give Honey G a standing ovation Emily Middlemas performs What Makes You Beautiful Emily Middlemas lights up the stage with What Makes You Beautiful Gifty was given the boot during last night's X Factor Gifty Louise sung A Song Four You by Leon Russel Gifty Louise was up against girl group Four of Diamonds Louisa Johnson performed her new single, So Good on the show X Factor 2016: Louisa Johnson flashes her knickers on stage Little Mix wowed in some seriously racy looks during the X Factor results night Little Mix took to the stage in rather skimpy outfits Saara Aalto sung Run by Leona Lewis to stay in the competition Embarrassingly Sharon Osbourne forgot the same her contestant in the sing off After the judges went to deadlock, the viewers voted to send Freddie home Freddy Parker opened the show with 'Ain't no Mountain High Enough' by Marvin Gaye Four of Diamonds made their debut on the show Honey G performed Mo Money Mo for Motown week Honey G gave a memorable performance for Motown week Simon Cowell looks unimpressed Saara Aalto hit the high notes with 'River Deep, Mountain High' Relley C sung Bill Withers' 'Aint No Sunshine' Matt Terry sung Marvin's Gaye;s 'Heard it Through The Grapevine' Sharon and Nicole cheer on the performers Gifty sung Michael Jackson’s Rockin’ Robin Sam Lavery belted out Lionel Ritchie's classic 'Hello' 5 After Midnight performed a Motown mash-up of Get Ready and Reach Out I’ll Be There Ryan Lawrie sung Stevie Wonder's Superstition Emily Middlemass performed The Supremes’ Stop in The Name of Love",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
95197,"Kroos, who lifted a second Champions League title with Real this year having previously won it with Bayern Munich in 2013, has been linked with a move back to Bayern following Carlo Ancelotti's appointment as manager. However, he says he has not changed his mind about having turned his back on German football for good when he linked up with Ancelotti in Madrid in 2014.

Pep Guardiola's potential Manchester City XI Sun, July 3, 2016 Click through the gallery for a look at Pep Guardiola's potential starting XI for 2016/17 Play slideshow Bongarts/Getty Images 1 of 12 Click through the gallery for a look at Pep Guardiola's potential starting XI for 2016/17

""I ruled out quite a while ago playing for a club in Germany again and this is still the case,"" said the 26-year-old to Sport Bild magazine. Kroos has also been linked with a move to City and he would not rule out linking up with Pep Guardiola in the Premier League, but insisted his focus is currently elsewhere.

GETTY Toni Kroos refuses to rule out Manchester City move",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
9775,"Stephen Woolfe, who quit the eurosceptic party last year, is demanding unskilled migrants to be banned from Britain for five years in order to bring yearly net migration down to 50,000. In a report for campaign group Leave Means Leave, Mr Woolfe argues in favour of a new visa scheme which combines the Australian points-based system and plans for work permits to be rolled out post-Brexit. Critics have blasted the controversial move, claiming it would have a “serious economic impact on our country” in areas such as the NHS and agriculture.

SKY NEWS•GETTY Steven Woolfe rejected criticism that drastic cuts to migration would impact the UK's economy

We have 826,000 young people from 16 to 24 who are not workin Steven Woolfe

However, the independent MEP, who is part of the campaign group Leave Means Leave, rejected the calls, insisting unemployed British workers could be trained to make up for any shortages. Speaking on Sky News he said: “This would slowly filter downwards over a period of two to three years, which you see in terms of the report. “Secondly, we have 826,000 young people from 16 to 24 who are not working, and we should be putting our money into training them to fill the jobs.”

SKY NEWS The Independent MEP was appearing on Sky News on Monday

The report was criticised by Labour MP and spokesperson for Open Britain, Mike Gapes, who warned of “major issues” if such migration controls were implemented. Mr Gapes told Sky News: “The Australian points-based system actually leads to a higher level of migration. “The economy that we have grows because it actually has workers, there would be major labour shortages - we’re already 20,000 nurses short in the NHS. “We’ve obviously got to do more about training people in this country to do highly-skilled jobs. “But, the agriculture sector, the food processing sector, retail, a lot of hotels would be massively affected by the loss of ability to have people come from other countries.”

SKY NEWS Labour MP Mike Gapes was critical of idea of cutting migrants",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
113354,"The Real Madrid midfielder made 39 appearances last season for the Spanish giants with his two goals and three assists helping them win the La Liga and Champions League titles.

But his fine form has not gone unnoticed with Spanish outlet Diario Madrista claiming Mourinho is keen on bringing him to Old Trafford this summer.

Jose Mourinho already has his sights set on Real duo Alvaro Morata and James Rodriguez.

The pair are both said to have expressed a desire to leave the Bernabeu after playing bit-part roles at the club last term.

Express Sport understands Morata has already told friends that a deal is done for him to move to Manchester.

Real have demanded that United pay £70million for the Spain international, who Mourinho wants to sign as a replacement for Zlatan Ibrahimovic.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
340523,"FCA acing CEO Tracey McDermott said automated financial advice should be encouraged

The Financial Conduct Authority (FCA) and the Treasury want to encourage more effective use of automated or “robo” financial advice to avoid costly face-to-face meetings and make it easier for professionals to offer general guidance and streamlined services. Their financial advice market review (FAMR) also suggests that consumers could be allowed to access a small part of their pension pot to pay for advice five to 10 years before they retire. The proposals were announced as Royal Bank of Scotland said it would cut about 550 jobs as it replaces face-to-face advice with automated services. The review, launched last August amid concerns that millions are caught in an “advice gap”, found “a clear need” for intervention by Government and regulators to help consumers and industry.

GETTY RBS is cutting 220 face-to-face advisers

Advertisement

FCA acting CEO Tracey McDermott said: “This review has taken place against the backdrop of social and demographic changes which have led to an increasing need for individuals to take more responsibility for their financial future. People often find it difficult to engage with financial matters and we need to make it easier for them to do so.” A survey on behalf of the Association of Professional Financial Advisers found that 69 per cent had turned away potential clients over the past 12 months, with affordability cited as the main reason. The FCA would help firms to develop automated or “robo” advice to guide customers through investment options using online algorithms.

GETTY The FCA suggested consumers could be allowed to access part of their pension before retirement

Advertisement",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
22956,"1. Santiago de Compostela is a magical medieval city in the top, northwest corner of Spain in Galicia. It’s a unique region with its own language, great sandy beaches and, on the west coast, Spain’s own ‘Land’s End’ Cabo Fisterra.

2. Barcelona is Spain’s second city, with an abundance of companies flying direct, from easyjet to British Airways. It’s also ideal as you can mix a city break with a beach trip. There’s so much to do. It’s the capital of culture in Catalonia and the city beach is just a stride away from the famous shopping street of Las Ramblas. barcelona.com

3. Valencia – Explore this waterfront city with a guided bus tour. It’s got some stunning architecture and the futuristic arts and science museum – known as the City of Arts and Sciences complex is a top attraction. There are landscaped gardens here, an IMAX cinema, oceanarium and opera house.

4. San Sebastian is a pretty shell-shaped bay in Northern Spain. Catch the ferry to Bilbao and drive east along the coast to get there.. There’s a tower-topped hill at either end with a small island just off the coast from the beach. This elegant resort is renowned for its International Film Festival in September.

5. Costa Brava: Camp in Tossa de Mar with it’s medieval walls and towers. The town curves around a pretty bay and has five camping grounds. Camping Can Marti is well-equipped and open until mid-September. campingcanmarti.com",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
255478,"The Rocky star was left frustrated last month (Jul14) when his new action sequel The Expendables 3 leaked online, three weeks ahead of its scheduled release date.

More than 100,000 copies of the blockbuster were downloaded within hours, and Stallone has now spoken out to warn the prevalence of piracy on the Internet is costing jobs and damaging the film industry.

He tells Sky News, ""I understand people want to get something for nothing. Who doesn't? But it effects the fact that studios will start to lose confidence and they won't put big, big numbers in and a lot of people lose their jobs. It's a ripple effect.""",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
62572,"Police said there were no reported injuries on board the train.

The man, thought to be the car driver, was left injured and was taken to hospital by air ambulance.

Paramedics and police rushed to the Bloss crossing in Melton, Suffolk, just before 10.30am this morning.

Ivory Coast plane crash: Four dead after cargo plane crashes into sea

A spokesman for Suffolk county Council said the man had already been pulled from his wrecked car by the time fire crews arrived.

British Transport Police said: A man, believed to be the driver of the vehicle, was air lifted to hospital by air ambulance.

“His injuries are not considered to be life threatening at this stage.

“There were no other reported injuries on board the train.”

Travellers on Greater Anglia services were being warned to expect delays.

Those using its services are being advised to check with National Rail Enquiries or the train company first.

Police are still examining the circumstances which led to the car being struck.

They are appealing to anyone who was in the area at the time of the incident, and saw what happened, to get in touch by sending a text to 61016 or by calling 0800 40 50 40.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
246243,"GETTY Novak Djokovic lost the French Open final to Stan Wawrinka

It is the privilege of the men's champion to get play underway on Centre Court on the opening day of the new Championships, but since that shock reversal in Paris, Djokovic has played only a couple of exhibition matches at Boodles by way of preparation for the grass court event. He said: ""Right after I lost the match, of course, there was this sense of disappointment. There is no doubt about it. I felt that for some days after it. ""Because I have a family, I have different things in life, different interests, I've managed to move on because of the experience that I talked about previously of learning how to handle these particular situations and circumstances. I managed to get the necessary reset in my mind. ""But, again, there's a possibility that the traces may stay for some time.

""You always try to train your mind to look on the bright side, to move on, to live what happened in the past, and just take it as a lesson, and something that will give you that strength. ""I needed some time to just mentally recover. More than physical rest, I needed that emotional, mental rest to recharge my batteries and get myself in a proper state of mind so I can start all over again. ""Because it was the final, that was the most important match of the tournament for me. That's the match that I had wanted to win, but it didn't happen, mostly because I lost to a better player that day. ""Maybe I could have done a few things differently. But it's all behind me now. I'm experienced, and something that tennis has taught me over the years, to move on, and to be able to do that very quickly.""",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
375293,"Hibernian's fans have had little to cheer about following relegation to the second tier

The Leith club began last season in the Europa League, but a 7-0 thrashing at home to Malmo was followed up by an even worse last game at Easter Road when they lost a relegation play-off to Hamilton.

Poor performances on the pitch were reflected in their turnover, for the year ending July 31, 2014, as it fell by more than a quarter from the previous season from £8million to £5.8m, while they also recorded a £300,000 loss on transfers.

However, staff costs dropped £200,000 to £3.7m, although the wages to turnover ratio increased from 49 per cent to 64 per cent.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
2779,"The actor won Best Performance by an Actor in a Limited Series or Motion Picture Made for Television for his role in Fargo, beating the likes of Robert De Niro, Jude Law, Kyle MacLachlan and Geoffrey Rush.

Speaking backstage, McGregor answered journalists’ questions about ongoing rumours that an Obi-Wan standalone film is in the pipeline.

""It's just that. There’s a lot of talk,” he said.

“I’d be happy to play him again. I don’t know any more about it more than you do.”",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
47103,"While many of us are fascinated by images and videos of whales, it is rare we get a close up view of the magnificent creatures. However, a viral video from Imgur has shown us just that as a whale makes a shocking appearance from the ocean. In the video, the user is recording a glittering dark blue sea, on what looks like a fairly windy time of day. In the background, we can see the mountainous coastline falling up and down, mirroring the unsteadiness of the environment.

YouTube/Wildcoast Adventures Whale: The giant creature leaps from the sea

It jumps into the sky, water flying everywhere, its flying body reaching up metres above the water below

The camera person themselves seem to be rising and falling, and is clearly taking the video from a boat on the sea. We see the waves fall up and down, but do not seem to be disturbed by anything other than a strong breeze. However, the video takes a surprising turn as the camera pans to the left, and we see a gigantic whale leaping up from the sea. It jumps into the sky, water flying everywhere, its flying body reaching up metres above the water below.

Then, as fast as it came upwards, the whale turns in the air and belly flops down on to the water surface. As it strikes the water, it makes a huge splash high into the air, pushing up a towering wave of foamy white water. For an instant, we get a flash of a small boat’s sail and mast as the video maker loses control, before the video goes black. We then see a struggle below the water as the passenger is overturned, before it emerges again above the water.

YouTube/Wildcoast Adventures Whale: The creature leaps out of nowhere

Fascinating facts about whales Fri, November 10, 2017 We take a look at some amazing facts about the incredible creatures under the sea Play slideshow Getty Images 1 of 10 The beluga whale is the only member of the cetacean order that can make facial expressions which is why they can look like they are happy or sad

YouTube/Wildcoast Adventures Whale: The photographer falls underwater before emerging again",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
204525,"GETTY China's debt pile continues to soar

The colossal country has seen its GDP to debt ratio soar to eye-watering levels, from 148 per cent at the end of 2007 to around 277 per cent at the end of 2016.



Fears over China's slowing economy triggered a huge stock market crash in 2015 and again at the start of last year.



However, policymakers managed to ease fears with actions to prop up markets and the economy.



At the end of last year, the Asian economy was growing by a bumper 6.8 per cent.



But the expansion is being fuelled by spiralling debts.



And its feared the economy could start to slowdown in the coming months, as actions by officials begins to fade.

GETTY China's debt bubble coud burst at any moment, fear experts

GETTY China's slowing economy created market panic at the start of 2016

Sky-high debt combined with a slowing economy is a toxic mix, experts have warned.



Sheridan Admans, investment research manager at The Share Centre, said: ""China’s continues to pile on the debt at a worrying rate.



""The only comfort at this time is that it is internal rather than external debt.



""China has been working on ways to tackle this problem but such a sharp increase combined with the delays in coping with debt mountains, have previously been the cause of financial crises the world over.""



Credit in China is now approaching a historic crisis level, according to Anthony Doyle, investment director in the M&G Fixed Interest team.



He said: “The problem with heavily indebted economies is that the financial cycle could peak at any time.



""At some point, borrowers like households and corporations will conclude that their income is not sufficient to service their debt obligations.



""This will see the non-financial corporate sector enter into a deleveraging cycle: as has happened previously in Japan, Spain, and the US.



“As we are now nine years into the expansionary phase of the global economic growth cycle, and developed economies are still characterised by rock-bottom central bank rates, one has to wonder whether the next global recession will be much longer than the experience of 2008-09.”

The risks to China could be grow this year, thanks to Donald Trump, who has previously spoken out against trade policies



It's feared the US president could slap trade tariffs on imports, which would heavily hit China's economy.



Another risk is the US raising interest rates, which could speed up the amount of money flowing out of China.



Mr Admans added: “A key risk to the Chinese economy in 2017 is the US FED raising interest rates as this will likely lead to an increase in the pace of outflows from China.



""Furthermore, the region’s exports could come under pressure if the new US president Donald Trump initiates protectionist measures. Indeed, the devaluation of the Chinese currency against the dollar, and China burning through reserves to support it, could contribute to a rise in interbank rates.""

GETTY A trade war with the US would hurt China

Inside China's Military Superpower Sat, November 11, 2017 An inside view of the Chinese military over 120 years. Play slideshow VCG via Getty Images 1 of 23 Armed police soldiers lift timbers during a drill on August 24, 2016 in Chongqing, China. As the highest temperatures reached over 40 degree Celsius at 5 districts in Chongqing, officers and soldiers of an armed police crop took outdoor training",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
260322,"Meryl Streep is transformed for her latest role as a wicked witch[DISNEY]

The highly-anticipated Disney film, which also stars Johnny Depp and James Corden, sees the gorgeous actress take on the part of a wicked witch, seeing her transformed into a dishevelled, grey-haired woman with wrinkles. And this week has marked the first official trailer, which shows the character in all her glory. The clip, which doesn't include much dialogue, opens with Little Red Riding Hood skipping into the woods before making its way through famous fairytale stories, including Jack And The Beanstalk, Rapunzel and Cinderella.

Meryl can be seen with grey hair and wrinkles [DISNEY]

The films also seens Anna Kendrick take on the role of Cinderella [DISNEY]

Twilight star Anna Kendrick takes on the role of Cinderella and can be seen repeating the phrase: ""I wish"" before being interrupted by the witch. ""You wish to have the curse reversed,"" she exclaims. The film - which is a remake of the Stephen Sondheim written Broadway play from the eighties - also sees Johnny Depp take on the role of the The Wolf from Little Red Riding Hood, however his face is not revealed in the trailer.

James Corden also appears in the hughly-anticipated flm [DISNEY]

It follows the famous fairytales including Little Red Riding Hood and Jack and the Beanstalk [DISNEY]

The clip ends with The Witch's breathy voice uttering 'Go to the wood!' before vanishing into a cloud of dust. The film is directed by Rob Marshall, who also worked on Oscar-winning musical Chicago, and will open later this year on Christmas Day.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
123999,"By Wednesday the Iraqi Government may request British assistance to stop IS [REX/E ]

Prime Minister David Cameron is set to meet US President Barack Obama this week in New York to discuss how to crack down on the marauding Middle-East extremists.

But although UK military action is highly unlikely before a United Nations meeting on Tuesday, it is believed by Wednesday the Iraqi Government may formally request British assistance to stop IS’s advance into their territory.

That could mean RAF aircraft – already flying surveillance missions – could be ordered to begin bombing by mid-week.

Defence Secretary Michael Fallon will also this week hold talks with Gulf state leaders on combating the IS threat when he travels to Saudi Arabia and Bahrain.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
245298,"Coronation Street's Jenny runs to Jack's rescue as he darts in front of a tram

Jenny joins Johnny Connor (Richard Hawley), Sally Metcalfe (Sally Dynevor), Kevin Webster (Michael Le Vell) and his son Jack in scenes set to air on May 16.

However, after Sally accuses her husband Tim (Joe Duttine) of playing happy families with Kevin, Jack then vanishes from the cafe they're in.

The youngster careers across the road and straight into the path of an oncoming tram, before Jenny dashes to the rescue.

An onlooker told The Mirror of the scenes: ""Jenny ran in front of the tram and pushed Jack out of the way, almost certainly saving his life. Afterwards she looked shocked as she sat on the ground and Kevin came to thank her.""",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
281666,"Andy Murray celebrates winning the third set of his doubles match

The 4-6 6-3 7-6(5) 6-1 win over Jo-Wilfried Tsonga and Nicolas Mahut gave the British side a 2-1 lead with Sunday's reverse singles still to play.

World Number 3 Andy was originally due to miss the doubles in favour of Dom Inglot but captain Leon Smith picked his main man and was vindicated with a passionate display in front of a raucous crowd on a beautiful day in west London.

A slip in the second set produced some concern for Andy but the two-time Grand Slam champion said after the match he was ""sore"" but determined to play against French number one Gilles Simon tomorrow.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
228413,"GETTY/NETFLIX With her role on Stranger Things, Millie Bobby Brown has taken Hollywood by storm

How right he was. The British acting prodigy – full name Millie Bobby Brown – was this week nominated for a Screen Actors Guild best actress award for her brilliant performance as Eleven, a young girl with supernatural powers, in Netflix’s 1980s throwback thriller series Stranger Things It is only the latest in a string of stunning roles that have wowed critics and directors alike and made Millie the most searched for new actor in the course of 2016 on the online movie database IMDB. She also has 1.9 million followers on photo-posting site Instagram and more than 400,000 followers on Twitter. According to the film industry bible Variety, Millie has “the kind of presence some actors take a lifetime to acquire “and she is now tipped to command £3 million a fi lm at the tender age of 12.

PAIGE BROWN TWITTER By all accounts the young actress was destined for great things from a young age

However, such success has not come easily. Her rise is a tale of determination and self sacrifice not just on her own part but on that of her family, too. As Millie herself once put it: “It was very hard. There were lots of tears along the way.”

She was just so natural and she could switch on that creepy side that you need for that character Daniel Stamm, director

Our story starts in Marbella, Spain, where Millie was born in 2004. Her mother Kelly was pregnant with her when she, her estate agent husband Robert and their two older children, Paige, now 23, and Charlie, 18, relocated to Spain where Robert’s parents ran a restaurant. It was apparent from a young age, that Millie was no ordinary toddler. “My other children would watch cartoons, but Mill watched musicals – Chicago, Moulin Rouge, Annie and Bugsy Malone,” says Robert. “She’d belt out a tune. She was performing from day one.” The Browns’ Spanish sojourn proved short-lived. Millie was four when they moved back to the UK and four years later they were on the move again, this time to Orlando in Florida where Robert and Kelly launched a tooth-whitening business.

GETTY Millie shot to fame with Netflix's Stranger Things

Actress Millie Bobby Brown in pictures Fri, December 16, 2016 Stranger Things actress Millie Bobby Brown, the British schoolgirl who has taken Hollywood by storm. Play slideshow Netflix 1 of 18 Stranger Things actress Milly Bobby Brown in pictures

It was there that Millie, who had appeared in a string of plays at her school in Bournemouth, began getting more serious about acting. “I was annoying my father one Saturday and he said, ‘We need to find you something fun to do’,” she once recalled. Robert’s solution was to enroll his precocious younger daughter in a stage school where she spent four hours every Saturday, acting, singing and dancing. At one of the school’s regular showcase events, Millie was spotted by a talent scout who told her parents that “she has instincts you cannot teach”, adding that she could “mix it with the best kids in Hollywood”. This was enough for Robert and Kelly. Despite the fact they had been in the sunshine state for only six months and had just had another baby, Ava, now four, they upped sticks and drove their children and the family pet, an English mastiff, 2,200 miles cross-country to Los Angeles, home of all the major studios. Within a week of their arrival Millie had meetings with many of Tinseltown’s top children’s talent agencies and was offered representation by all of them but her parents finally opted for an agent introduced to them by a friend.

GETTY She did not quite make the cut for Steven Spielberg's BFG movie

She was the British-born Melanie Greene, a heavyweight Hollywood agent whose clients include David Duchovny, Michael Sheen, Natascha McElhone and Paul Bettany. Greene immediately spotted Millie’s talent. “She’s a natural,” she said. Millie began doing the rounds of auditions and quickly found small parts in series such as Modern Family and Grey’s Anatomy. In November 2013, she got her first big break as Madison O’Donnell, a disturbed 10-year-old runaway in Intruders. Her performance proved to be a revelation. “She blew me away,” said the director Daniel Stamm. “She was just so natural and she could switch on that creepy side that you need for that character.” Even Stephen King, the undisputed master of the horror genre, was impressed. He tweeted: “Millie Brown, the girl in Intruders, is terrific. Is it my imagination or are child actors a lot better than they used to be?” But, despite this success and making the shortlist for blockbuster movies such as Steven Spielberg’s BFG, lucrative starring roles eluded Millie. With the family income reduced to a trickle, Greene lent the Browns money in a bid to allow them to hang on until their talented daughter landed a careerdefining job but by summer 2015 their situation was so desperate they were forced to return to the UK and stay with an aunt.

GETTY Stranger Things attracted an audience of 14 million viewers

“I was devastated. I wasn’t getting work. I thought I was done,” Millie has said of that time. Ironically it was after a British agent kicked her while she was down that Millie found the inspiration to produce the audition of a lifetime. “She said I was too mature and grown up,” says Millie. “She made me cry.” Later that day, she had her try-out for Stranger Things. “I had to cry in the audition,” she recalls. “My emotions were so raw, I hit it out of the park.” Millie duly got the part of Eleven – known as “El” to her on-screen friends – the tattooed, shaven-headed orphan, who has escaped from a laboratory where she was being experimented on. Filming of Stranger Things began in Atlanta in November 2015 and the series was released on Netflix the following July. It was soon attracting 14 million viewers and the critics loved it. The LA Times said Millie played El with “astonishing power” and Spielberg, the man who had once crushed her dreams of stardom, hailed Stranger Things as the best show of the year. Six weeks after the first series went out, Netflix announced it was renewing it for a second season.

GETTY Netflix has already green-lighted a second season of the hit show",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
47327,"United have been in demise since Moyes took over the reins from the much-heralded Sir Alex Ferguson and have slumped to seven defeats in the Barclays Premier League this term.

The Red Devils' chances of making the top four currently appear to be slim as they are 11 points adrift of the Champions League places.

Pulis. who has a wretched record against United as a manager, firmly believes Moyes will be given a similar amount of time to that of his predecessor to deliver success to the club.

He said: ""I'll say Moyes has had a tough start. I've watched their last three games on tape, and they could have won them all comfortably.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
140660,"“There will be a detailed plan for how Scotland should react in these circumstances – that’s inside knowledge – but I think you’ll find it’s certainly the most comprehensive approach that we’ve seen to date as opposed to the total confusion and chaos that’s raining at Westminster.

“In terms of independence, as Nicola Sturgeon has said, if that plan for that prospect is turned down and Theresa May can’t find it in herself to give a special deal to Scotland but offering a special deal to the car industry, the finance sector – then I think there’ll be an independence referendum in just under two years time.

“For that, unlike the European referendum, we will publish a bit of white paper which will be the prospectus on independence on which people judge.

“I think it’s perfectly legitimate under this new situation for that prospectus to be published and if Nicola Sturgeon’s plan is not accepted.”",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
217150,"A video of the driver trying to dig his way out of his slippery situation has gone viral. The man was captured on camera making a desperate attempt to save his sinking car. Waves started lapping at the Land Rover which was parked on the sand at Island Beach State Park in New Jersey. Footage posted to Facebook showed the man with shovel in hand trying to dig under the wheels of the huge car to rescue it.

FACEBOOK Viral video - the Land Rover driver found himself in a slippery situation

The man insisted on driving his white SUV even though the lights were flashing

He flicked small amounts of sand up onto the dry shore behind him, but it was no match for the water rising rapidly around the vehicle. By the time tow trucks and police arrived, the water was at low tide and the rescue operation was relatively simple. Witnesses told WNBC-TV the man still insisted on driving his white SUV even though the engine was waterlogged and the lights were flashing. The American network claimed the driver had been trying to take photos of his car when it began to sink.

FACEBOOK Viral video - the Land Rover driver used a shovel to try to dig his SUV out of the water

Land Rover Discovery 2017 SNEAK PEAK off-road testing pictures Sun, December 11, 2016 NEW Land Rover Discovery 2017 sneak-peak off-road testing pictures surface online. Play slideshow LAND ROVER 1 of 15 Land Rover Discovery 2017 off-road testing

The driver didn’t get fined as he had a Mobile Sportfishing Vehicle permit which allowed him to use his car in the area. One beach in the UK is notorious for swallowing up cars at high tide. Brean Beach in Somerset experiences the second highest tidal range in the world after the Bay of Fundy in Canada. In 2014 Paul Redfern from Bristol drove his Vauxhall Frontera half a mile down the sandy stretch.

FACEBOOK Viral video - the Land Rover driver didn't succeed in his shovelling mission but tow trucks did",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
3974,"Barcelona-based engineer Sergi Santos has developed - and is selling - a one-off sex robot than needs to be chatted up before the action begins.

Mr Santos created the life-like robot named Samantha with the purpose that she acts as much like a real woman as possible, who needs to be seduced for, and enjoys, sex.

Samantha has been equipped with the latest developments in AI, and if touched on places such as her hands or her hips, responds with statements such as “I love this” and “nice and gentle”.

Mr Santos told German news agency Ruptly TV: “Basically she likes to be touched.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
173952,"SWNS.com An unidentified animal tooth found in a Waitrose ready meal

Arabella Frankel, 32, said she was eating the meal on her lunch break when she bit on something hard.



The city worker claimed she took it out of her mouth and washed it under a tap only to discover that it was an animal tooth.

SWNS.com The ""deliciously rich and comforting"" lasagne ready meal box

The disgusted estate agent, from Highgate, said: ""It was a fang, about one and a half centimetres long. It even has a root on it. It was really, really grim. Honestly, when I think about it it gives me the shudders.



""I even spoke to a dentist at the practice near my work and he said it looks like a rat's tooth. I just don't understand how a tooth could have got in there unless there are rats running around the factory.""



The packaging of the product, which was bought in St Katharine Docks Waitrose in Wapping, was undamaged.

SWNS.com Estate agent Arabella Frankel

She said: ""I didn't see it in the food and it could've been a really bad choking hazard.



""I know things happen but I wonder how it could have got in there. It's so grim that it was in my mouth.



""I think this is the end of my lasagne days. I was probably eating ratty lasagne which is disgusting.""

SWNS.com The tooth found in a Waitrose lasagne next to a penny.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
279749,"The model turned heads in her sheer outfit

Fashion outlet Etam is celebrating 100 years. And to mark the occasion, the retailer hosted a seductive catwalk show. Featuring 80 models at the Pompidou Centre in the heart of Paris, the theme for the night was “100 years of French Liberté”. The stunning models walked the runway in a series of steamy underwear sets, perfectly showcasing their svelte curves.

Advertisement

But one model turned more heads than most when she strutted down the runway in a sheer body. Leaving nothing to the imagination, the see-through top flaunted the model’s bust and rock-hard abs. Paired with lace French knickers, the ensemble showcased the model’s svelte figure. She wore simple make up to complement the lock and her blonde locks flowed over her shoulders in waves.

GETTY The model braved a sheer body and lace knickers to walk the runway

The model turned heads in her sheer outfit The model turned heads in her sheer outfit The stunning models walked the runway in a series of steamy underwear sets, perfectly showcasing their svelte curves The runway show featured an array of revealing numbers Fashion outlet Etam is celebrating 100 years And to mark the occasion, the retailer hosted a seductive catwalk show Featuring 80 models at the Pompidou Centre in the heart of Paris, the theme for the night was '100 years of French Liberté' Model Constance Jablonski walks the runway during the Etam show A model walks the runway during the Etam show in a sparkly number This model wowed in a pearl bra and french knickers A model walks the runway during the Etam show as part of the Paris Fashion Week

Advertisement

This isn’t the first time a nip slip has caused a stir. Weather girl Daniela Cruda has gained a loyal legion of fans thanks to her playful personality and stunning looks. But she’s also proved popular on the internet due to an unfortunate series of nip slips. The star is known for her energetic dance routines.

GETTY The runway show featured an array of revealing numbers",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
117581,"The new Call of Duty Infinite Warfare Zombies mode chapter releases soon on PS4

Call of Duty Infinite Warfare Zombies next PS4 update unlocks tomorrow but is currently available to pre-load on PS4 right now.

It’s expected that Call of Duty Infinite Warfare continuum will be available to play at midnight EST on April 18.

That means COD fans in the UK will have to wait until around 5am to gain access.

It seems unlikely, but fans may also get the chance to start playing midnight local time, although that hasn’t been the case for DLC launches in the past.

Like past bundles, Call of Duty Infinite Warfare DLC 2 will have four new multiplayer maps, as well as a fresh zombies co-op experience called Shaolin Shuffle.

The new Call of Duty Zombies experience is set in a ‘70s era New York disco-zombie fright fest, following on from its earlier movie-themed eras shift.

Continuum is scheduled for release April 18th, first on the PlayStation Network for the PlayStation 4, with other platforms to follow.

“We couldn’t be more excited to deliver a new co-op zombies chapter with Shaolin Shuffle, with an all-new setting and story, that continues the wild and increasingly twisted narrative,” said Dave Stohl, Studio Head of Infinity Ward.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
340577,"Chris Curry, director of the PPI, told the BBC: ""I think people would be surprised to find out that there was a state second pension, so I don't think people are that aware of the top-up.



""And I think people will be even more surprised to find out that what's replacing it is less generous.""



Millions of pensioners are also set to to be disappointed by state pension payouts after not qualifying for the top payout.



Workers who spent part of their career ""contracted out"", opting not to receive the second state second pension or State Earnings Related Pension Scheme (Serps) in exchange for paying a reduced rate of NI could find they have reduced payments under the new state pension.





Advertisement

However, the Government has said that the new state pension will benefit 75 per cent of people within the first 15 years of its introduction.



More than three million women are set to receive an average of £11 more a week by 2030 as a result of the changes, said the Department for Work and Pensions.

Retirement benefits are being overhauled to system that the Government claimed would be simpler and fairer for millions.



Under the new state pension, retirees will be entitled to a flat-rate of up to £155.65 a week, provided they have paid at least 35 years of National Insurance (NI) contributions.



However, the changes will leave more than 11million people worse off in retirement, according to the Pensions Policy Institute (PPI).



The hardest hit by the reforms will be workers currently in their twenties, who are estimated to lose £19,000 on average in retirement payments.



At the same time, two thirds of workers now in their thirties will miss out on around £17,000 that they would have received under the current system.



The basic state pension pays a maximum of £115.95 a week, but workers who build up enough years of NI contributions can qualify for the second state pension - worth up to £135 a week extra.



Older workers who have already built up a second state pension will see the benefits protected.

Advertisement

GETTY The state pension is changing from April 6

Chris Curry, director of the PPI, told the BBC: ""I think people would be surprised to find out that there was a state second pension, so I don't think people are that aware of the top-up.



""And I think people will be even more surprised to find out that what's replacing it is less generous.""



Millions of pensioners are also set to to be disappointed by state pension payouts after not qualifying for the top payout.



Workers who spent part of their career ""contracted out"", opting not to receive the second state second pension or State Earnings Related Pension Scheme (Serps) in exchange for paying a reduced rate of NI could find they have reduced payments under the new state pension.



",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
94650,"DAILY EXPRESS: Memphis Depay's future looks uncertain after he was snubbed for Manchester United's FA Cup final.

THE TIMES: Granit Xhaka is expected to have his medical at Arsenal in the next 24 hours ahead of a £25million move.

DAILY MAIL: Paul Scholes has hit out at United boss Louis van Gaal once more.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
25124,"Emmerdale actor Jeff Hordley, who plays hard-man mechanic Cain, has spilled all about why his character and farmer Moira (Natalie J. Robb) are destined to be together in the ITV soap. The 47-year-old Manchester star has been an important part of the northern serial for the last 18 years, but he is determined that he and Moira should be together, despite their problems. Right now, a grieving Moira is debating whether or not to leave the village following the devastating reveal to Pete (Anthony Quinlan) and Ross Barton (Michael Parr) that she killed their mother Emma Barton (Gillian Kearney) in the harrowing October episodes. Yet Jeff’s words seem to reveal that the pair still have a number of important storylines together to come, so Scottish actress Natalie, 43, may not be leaving after all.

ITV Emmerdale: Cain Dingle star Jeff Hordley has hinted about Moira's potential departure

ITV Emmerdale: Cain declared his love to Moira in this month's episodes, but she might leave

ITV Emmerdale: Cain and Moira have had a rocky relationship on the ITV soap

She grounds him and makes him a better person Jeff Hordley on Moira

Speaking to Radio Times, Jeff shared: “I think Cain and Moira work really well together. There is a strong bond there and she makes him act like no other woman can. “She grounds him and makes him a better person.” When asked whether Cain had ever intended to take his relationship with ex-vicar Harriet Finch (Katherine Dow Blyton), Jeff reiterated that it will only ever be Moira for him. He said: “Cain cares about Harriet a lot, but I don’t think the word ‘love’ ever passed his lips.

Emmerdale spoilers and predictions for 2018 Mon, January 1, 2018 Emmerdale residents have already had a harrowing year in the not-so-sleepy Yorkshire village, but with one family’s mass exit and another character’s devastating murder secret, 2018 is set to be even more explosive. Play slideshow ITV 1 of 9 Emmerdale spoilers and predictions for 2018

“But Cain felt, at the time, that being with Harriet was the right thing to do. “He thought it would help him get over Moira – but he kept getting dragged back into Moira’s life.” Meanwhile, another couple potentially headed for romance in the village is that of Rhona Goskirk (Zoe Henry) and Pete. The pair seem to be a surprising pairing, given Pete’s recent behaviour cheating on former-fiancée Leyla Harding (Roxy Shahidi) and Rhona’s hidden feelings for her ex Paddy Kirk (Dominic Brunt).

ITV Emmerdale: Harriet Finch was left devastated when Cain broke up with her for Moira

ITV Emmerdale: Moira keeps pushing Cain away on the soap, as she gets ready to leave the Dales for good",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
299636,"The Portuguese tactician will start with striker Diego Costa up front, while 18-year-old midfielder Ruben Loftus-Cheek is also set to feature, most likely off the substitutes' bench.

Midfielder Nemanja Matic is available following his suspension for the defeat at Newcastle, while Cesc Fabregas could play ahead of a one-match ban for Saturday's match with Hull.

Chelsea provisional squad: Courtois, Cech, Ivanovic, Luis, Fabregas, Zouma, Ramires, Oscar, Hazard, Drogba, Mikel, Schurrle, Salah, Remy, Costa, Matic, Willian, Cahill, Terry, Azpilicueta, Beeney, Loftus-Cheek, Christensen.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
346346,"BBC Squeeze changed the lyrics to their song

The group were performing their song Cradle to the Grave on on The Andrew Marr Show this morning when they made the change. The Prime Minister, apparently not realising, applauded when they finished.

Lead singer Glenn Tilbrook altered the words to suggest the Conservatives were ""hellbent on the destruction of the Welfare State"". Tilbrook sang: ""I grew up in council houses, they're part of what made Britain great. But there are some people who are hellbent on destruction of the welfare state.""

BBC Glenn Tilbrook changed the lyrics to Cradle to the Grave",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
77013,"The billionaire media mogul and presumptive Republican nominee has targeted several groups and ethnicities in his unlikely charge for the White House. His latest set of inflammatory remarks came during a routine campaign speech in North Carolina Mr Trump had been discussing the cost of US intervention in the Middle East when he appeared to accuse US troops of stealing money meant for the post-war reconstruction of Iraq's infrastructure. He said: ""Iraq. Crooked as hell. How about bringing baskets of money, millions and millions of dollars, and handing it out?

AP Trump seemed to imply that American troops in Iraq had pocketed money meant for reconstruction

""I want to know who are the soldiers that had that job because I think they're living very well right now, whoever they may be. ""Think of it, the money that went out."" The firebrand politician's off-the-cuff comments follow recent efforts to adopt a more scripted approach in public. Following the remarks, CNBC’s John Harwood tweeted: ""Trump suggested tonight that American soldiers in Iraq stole cash intended for reconstruction of Iraq, are 'living very well' now."" The contentious remarks attracted a wave of criticism from veterans groups and US senators alike.

Donald Trump's most bizarre and uncomfortably awkward quotes Tue, November 8, 2016 Donald Trump business mogul turned political candidate is well known for his off the wall and often offensive quotes; here are some of his most mind boggling quotes from over the years. Play slideshow AFP/Getty Images 1 of 31 A recording of Donald Trump emerged during his campaign of him boasting back in 2005 “I’m automatically attracted to beautiful — I just start kissing them. It’s like a magnet. Just kiss. I don’t even wait. And when you’re a star, they let you do it. You can do anything.” He then went on to say “Grab ’em by the pussy. You can do anything.”

I want to know who are the soldiers that had that job because I think they're living very well right now Donald Trump

A spokesman for the Trump campaign, Hope Hicks, said the comments were directed at Iraqi troops, not US forces. But, officials from VoteVets.org, the largest progressive organisation of veterans in the country, said the comments should disqualify Mr Trump from serving as Commander-in-chief. Retired major general Paul Eaton said: ""Trump's attack against the courageous American men and women who heroically worked to restore law and order in Iraq is at once uninformed and irresponsible. ""For him to smear our troops and veterans as he has, it is disqualifying, as far as I am concerned.” Despite the Trump campaign's efforts to blame Iraqi soldiers and not US troops , Michael Warren, at the US Weekly Standard, pointed out ""the duty of delivering money for reconstruction in Iraq was one for the American military, not the Iraqi military"".

Senator Tim Kaine, a Virginia Democrat, said: ""Yesterday was the birthday of the Army. He insinuated that American soldiers were stealing money in Iraq. He said that."" Mr Kaine, a potential running mate for Hilary Clinton, added: ""When I hear Donald Trump say the American military is a disaster, I want to go through the screen and shake the guy. ""We do not need a Commander-in-chief who is going to talk about our troops with disrespect and contempt.""

GETTY Trump’s campaign issued a statement saying the comments were directed at Iraqi troops, not U.S",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
361002,"Jurgen Klopp is in desperate need for some defensive reinforcements after his recent injury woes and Liverpool's poor defensive form, but who could he sign? [Getty Images]",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
219115,"Riding across the snowy mountains, this adventurer was soaking in the incredible sights. But his thirst for adventure nearly cost him his life when the unthinkable happened. Reaching the edge of a cliff, he is left terrified when a chunk falls away. Thankfully, he manages to stay upright.

The horrifying footage has gone viral online after being uploaded to YouTube. It’s been viewed 2,924,963 times by shocked users. The uploader captioned the video: “I almost fall off a GIANT cliff on Idaho Wyoming border filmed with Liquid Image video goggles, wearing my motorfist riding gear.” One user wrote: “Not sure if you believed in angels, but if not, hopefully you do now! Miracle.”

IMGUR The adventurer was lucky to be alive when the unthinkable happened.

The most dangerous selfies ever taken Sat, August 6, 2016 Not all selfies are harmless fun. In fact, recent data suggests more people died in 2015 trying to take selfies than were killed in shark attacks. This is largely due to people trying to take ever more adventurous selfies that put them in real danger. Play slideshow Caters News Agency 1 of 20 Aaron Gekoski with a shark

Another said: “It’s called a cornice. They break off quite easily, as you found out. ""You're lucky to be alive.” One wrote: “That happened so fast.” Another user added: “Happy you survived. Don't go too close to those cliffs now.”

IMGUR The cliff broke away",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
60810,"GETTY Biscuit sales reached a record £1.8 billion last year as Brits ate 420,000 tonnes of them

New research out yesterday revealed 96 per cent of people from Manchester cannot resist a daily biscuit. It compares to 93 per cent of people across the country who munch a biscuit every day. Biscuit sales reached a record £1.8 billion last year as Brits ate 420,000 tonnes of their favourites, said analysts Mintel.

The research among 1,500 people found coffee has taken over from tea as the favourite accompaniment to a biscuit, with 33 per cent of coffee lovers saying a biscuit boosts their drink, compared to 32 per cent of tea drinkers. Mintel said a higher proportion of people are eating biscuits at least once a week, but many weight-watching adults see them as 'permissable treats' and limit themselves to fewer biscuits on each occasion. Overall sweet biscuits continue to triumph as Britain's favourite, with 93 per cent of Brits eating them regularly, compared to 77 per cent who have eaten savoury.

GETTY 96% of people from Manchester reach for a daily biscuit

It's a British tradition that shows no signs of dying out as younger Brits are the most likely to have eaten biscuits, with 95 per cent doing so compared to 90 per cent of the over 55s.

Brits still love a biscuit treat and sales of biscuits are holding up well Richard Caines

While folk in the north-west are the biggest biscuit eaters, those least likely to indulge are in Yorkshire, followed by the East Midlands and the south-west. By region - across the country it is the North West that has the greatest love of chocolate biscuits - 88 per cent having eaten chocolate biscuit bars in the past 3 months, compared to an average of 81 per cent. And when it comes to watching their waistlines, the West Midlands are leading the way with 55 per cent eating “light” or low-fat sweet biscuits or biscuit bars in the past 3 months, compared to half (50 per cent) of Brits on average.

GETTY Coffee has now taken over from tea as the biscuit companion beverage

And it is those living in the East Midlands reaching for the biscuits in the morning (Breakfast biscuits), with 52 per cent eating breakfast biscuits in the past 3 months compared to an average of 47 per cent. Richard Caines, senior food analyst at Mintel, said: “While the majority of people are concerned about sugar, Brits still love a biscuit treat and sales of biscuits are holding up well. “With consumers likely to become more focused on portion control due to concerns about sugar though, smaller-sized convenience products and mini packs that also cater better for on-the-go snacking are likely to become more important.

GETTY Brits still favour the sweet biscuit over the savoury biscuit with almost a 20% majority",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
225779,"An official report showed that the UK is the only member of the G7 group of advanced industrial nations to meet the UN target for spending taxpayers' cash on overseas assistance for impoverished countries. UK aid spending has risen at more than twice the rate of the US and more than five times that of France since 2004, the G7 report showed.



Critics said the Government was ""stupid"" to stick to targets that were flouted by other wealthy countries and branded the spending ""insane and unjustifiable."" The figures were released as Mr Cameron flew to Ise-Shima in Japan last night for the G7 Summit of world leaders.



Behind a ring-of-steel security cordon, they are due to discuss how wealthy countries can increase their assistance for the world's poor.



On the eve of the gathering, G7 officials confirmed that Britain was the sole member of the international group to comply with an agreement to spend 0.7 percent of national output on overseas aid every year.



The UK spent about £13.2billion on aid in 2014, up from £5.4billion in 2004. G7 officials gave the Britain a top rating of five stars. France earned just three stars and Italy two.



Only the US and Germany had increased the proportion of national output spent on aid over the last year. France, Canada, Italy and Japan all cut the proportion spent.



The report showed that the EU - which is not a G7 member but will be represented at the summit - fell well short of the UN target with just 0.43 per cent of the 28-nation bloc's economic output spent on aid.



Critics last night called for the policy to be scrapped. Tory MP Philip Davies said: ""It seems that it is only the UK who are stupid enough to hand over more and more money to other countries when we are borrowing money, and it would seem that other countries have reduced the amount they spend as they see we have increased what we spend.



""Handing over all this money, often to countries riddled with corruption, is insane and unjustifiable."" Jonathan Isaby of the TaxPayers' Alliance said: ""The 0.7 per cent spending target is a totally arbitrary and meaningless figure.



""The worst possible way to deliver value when spending taxpayers' cash is to define the success of a policy by financial inputs rather than what the money actually achieves.""



Ukip MEP and international development spokesman Nathan Gill said: ""There will be 9,000 exservice personnel sleeping rough tonight and yet our foreign aid goes to countries like Nigeria, described by David Cameron as 'fantastically corrupt' only a few weeks ago.""



A spokeswoman for the Department for International Development declined to comment on the report but said the Government's commitment to aid spending was reaffirmed in last week's Queen's Speech.



The Prime Minister is also expected to use the summit as an opportunity to dragoon fellow world leaders into backing his campaign to keep Britain in the EU.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
251425,"GETTY Ander Herrera amazed by support of Manchester United fans

The Spaniard arrived at Old Trafford from Athletic Bilbao a year ago, costing the Red Devils £29million. And the midfielder has been overwhelmed by the United faithful since his move to the Premier League. When asked if he would attend a match with the away fans if he was ever unavailable due to injury or suspension, he replied: ""Yes, of course.

The 20 best Manchester United signings Mon, September 7, 2015 Express Sport brings you 20 of Manchester United's best signings. Play slideshow Getty Images 1 of 20 Bryan Robson: Nicknamed 'Captain Marvel', Robson joined United from West Brom in 1981. The midfielder scored 99 goals in 461 appearances

""I would like to go to one away game with the fans one day because our away fans are unbelievable. ""They are always singing and very noisy and they help us a lot. That is why I celebrate my goals with them because I have to say ‘thank you’ to them for supporting us. ""They travel around the world, they spend the money, they spend the time so I think we have to be very, very thankful.""

GETTY Ander Herrera wants to repay the Manchester United faithful",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
336338,"René sadly passed away on January 14 of this year aged 73 after losing a long battle with cancer and as it nears the first anniversary of his death, Celine has given a heartbreaking interview.

The My Heart Will Go On singer said that she's going to take the couple's boys - René-Charles, 15 and six-year-old twins Nelson and Eddy - away to Montana for the annual family ski trip.

Celine explained: ""It’s kind of a bittersweet moment and at the same time we need to really make the holidays really happy.

""He put some something magic into that snow, into those mountains, and every time we go down, I go down with him.""",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
324264,"Adam Richman has a great appetite. He’s consumed almost everything that’s considered edible from a restaurant kitchen, and many things that shouldn’t be. It’s an impressive list, from monster burgers to massive tacos, from oversized pizzas to super-hot curries. He was so prodigious at scoffing huge amounts of food that the presenter was once sponsored by Zantac digestion tablets for his Man V Food TV series. The show has now ended and this week he starts on ITV’s new food competition, BBQ Champ. But mention Richman’s name to anyone and they just want to know how he did Man V Food and how he survived. I can report that New Yorker Richman is in fine health, but has “moved on” and would rather talk about his other eating exploits. He doesn’t escape that easily, though. His passion for food, he says began at an early age.

“I grew up in Brooklyn,” he says, “among many first-generation communities, and you grow up eating a little bit of everything. For example, Chinese food wasn’t ‘Chinese food’ – it was what Benny’s mum used to cook for us. Italian food was also something that was cooked up when I went over to Nicky’s house to play with action figures. Some neighbours were Syrian; others were Irish. “I was also blessed by the fact my father and mother were both good cooks, as well as my great-aunt and grandmother. And my father’s ethos was that you don’t have to finish but you should try it. There was an inherent degree of curiosity. My father had an office on the edge of Chinatown, and just sampling raw, unadulterated food has made me a better traveller, eater and cook. I know dozens of techniques, too. I’m a well-retentive sponge!” He didn’t immediately focus his sights on the all-you-can-eat buffet.

Advertisement

PH With his fellow BBQ Champ judge Mark Blatchford and the show’s presenter Myleene Klass

After school and university, where he studied drama, he focused on acting and appeared in the American crime series Law & Order. Food, however, was drawing him in. While Man V Food, which began in 2008, wasn’t his idea, it was undoubtedly made for him. “I had never done it before,” he says, “nor since Man V Food. I never knew I could do it. I never took a food challenge before the first one I did for the show.” There was no audition? “No. I just had to eat a sandwich. It was a sizeable sandwich, but nothing more than the average bloke could take down. In earnest, it wasn’t like the big, mammoth stuff that Man V Food became known for. I haven’t done that show for about close to five-and-a-half years and I look back on it now and think, ‘How the hell did I eat that?’” His explanation as to how is surprising. “It was all about visualisation. I’m also a ferociously competitive person – I hate losing. In the Chicago episode – three overstuffed sandwiches – I barely spoke and I won the challenge. The worst thing was after each challenge going back to the hotel room, getting ready for the next one, packing, going to another city, the actual physical rigour. A lot of people think, ‘I could do those challenges,’ but could you really film 10 hours on an empty stomach after you’ve not eaten in 17-and-a-half hours?” It ended, he says, because he was bored. “It was years of the same thing. Are you kidding? It was so repetitive and I knew I had other things to explore as a presenter than just being the guy who ate large quantities of food. I then went on to do Man Finds Food, which was an infinitely better thing to do.” Coincidentally, Man V Food grew in popularity globally just as the obesity crisis was gathering momentum. Does he take a view on that? “A lot of it starts in the home. To assign blame to any show, whether it’s me or MasterChef or even Bake Off, with all those butters and creams, to the global pandemic of obesity is absurd. A lot occurs because of a lack of food knowledge, a lot because of the global trend to be sedentary.” But did you worry about being a role model for it? “At no point would I espouse eating the foods I ate on Man V Food or the challenges as a lifestyle choice. It would be absurd. I was certainly not this Pied Piper of comfort food, leading people down this path to hyper-indulgence. That’s ridiculous. I want to be the Pied Piper of good food, to tell them what places to try and, like in BBQ Champ, to encourage them to try new things.” The British barbecue industry is now worth about £50 million a year, making his new series well placed to capitalise on the trend. He’s one of two judges, alongside presenter Myleene Klass for the five-part series. “In my humble, biased opinion,” he says, “I think we have a winner.”

Advertisement",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
280640,"The Real Madrid forward spent six years with the Red Devils, winning three Premier League titles and the Champions League trophy in 2008. Ronaldo has previously spoken of Ferguson's fiery temper he experienced working under him - but his latest comments reveal a much softer side to the Scot. Speaking ahead of the BBC's documentary on the former United boss, 'Sir Alex Ferguson: Secrets of Success,' which will be aired at 10.30pm on Sunday, the Portuguse ace recalled a memorable encounter between the two.

Top 10 all-time Premier League managers Sat, October 3, 2015 Express Sport have crunched the numbers, done the long division and come up with the list of the top ten Premier League managers of all time. We eliminated those who hadn't been in charge of at least 100 games to find the top gaffers this country has ever seen Play slideshow GETTY 1 of 10 10. Brendan Rodgers, with a win percentage of 47% from 159 games makes at number 10

""He invites everyone to come for lunch, come for tea... an English cup of tea! It was a family with him,"" Ronaldo told the BBC. ""When my dad was sick in London and was in hospital – very bad, in a coma – I had a conversation with [Ferguson]. ""I said, 'Boss, I don't feel good.' We are in a key moment in the league and the Champions League, but I say, 'Boss, I don't feel good. I want to see my Dad.'

GETTY Cristiano Ronaldo described Sir Alex Ferguson as a ""football father"" to him

GETTY Ferguson won a record 19 Premier League titles with Manchester United",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
158529,"Revealing his favourite-ever guest on his hit chat show, Parkinson admitted that Dame Edna Everage was at the top of his list. The television favourite also acknowledged modern day criticism for his flirtatious interviews. Accused of on-air flirting, Parkinson laughed: “Which I plead guilty.” Speaking to audience including Express.co.uk at How To Academy's An evening with Sir Michael Parkinson, he continued: “I have to confess, I fancied her quite a lot actually. We had her on about 15 times?

GETTY Sir Michael Parkinson reveals Dame Edna Everage was his favourite guest

GETTY Dame Edna Everage (Barry Humphries) was Sir Michael Parkinson's favourite guest

Sir Michael Parkinson in pictures Thu, November 24, 2016 Talk show host Sir Michael Parkinson through the years. Play slideshow ITV 1 of 31 Michael Parkinson's popular talk saw him interview an array of international stars from the world of film, stage and television

The trick with her is to put other people on with her. She didn’t need a script, she’d make her own script up Sir Michael Parkinson on Dame Edna Everage

“I think Barry [Humphries] is a genius. An extraordinarily remarkable guy. Dame Edna is one of the greatest comedy creations of all time. “Like Billy Connolly, this always makes me laugh. Of course, she’s impenetrable. Once he puts a wig on, he doesn’t exist. The voice changes and that’s the way it works.” Comparing the Australian character to Sacha Baron Cohen’s creations, Parkinson admitted that he didn’t enjoy the latter due to being scripted. Parkinson explained: “Ali G was awful [to film with]. Everything was scripted.” Contrasting with Humphries’ creations, he said: “We worked together for a long time so we got to know each other and I adore working with him.

GETTY Dame Edna Everage (Barry Humphries) was Sir Michael Parkinson's favourite guest

GETTY Sir Michael Parkinson and Dame Edna Everage

TV shows we miss from the '90s Mon, April 18, 2016 We've brought you the best form of nostalgia - TV shows from the 90s Play slideshow Rex 1 of 34 Denise Van Outen and Johnny Vaughan during The Big Breakfast (1992-2002)",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
339609,"The TV mogul said the trio could have worked well on the ITV singing contest if their ""unbearable"" egos didn't get in the way. The 56-year-old claimed the current BGT line-up was the best it'll ever be, ahead of the launch of the 10th run this weekend.

Advertisement

Speaking to Radio Times, Simon commented: ""I’ve got to admit it — I think the four of us on the panel is about as good as we’re ever going to get."" The father-of-one continued: ""We actually even considered transferring them all on to X Factor at one point, but their egos, if I ever suggested it, would be unbearable!

ITV Amanda Holden, Alesha Dixon and David Walliams work well on the ITV show, the mogul said

Advertisement

Britain's Got Talent's most memorable moments Tokio Myers is crowned winner of 'Britain's Got Talent' Dance act Just Us get the golden buzzer Ryan Tracey completes a world record on stage Josephine Lee wows with her magic act Tokio Myers plays an emotional song on the piano Mahny and Robbie do doggy yoga Amanda Holden and Dec take part in doggy yoga on stage Ant and Dec join comedian Jonny Awsum on stage during Britain's Got Talent Richard Jones has been revealed as Britain's Got Talent's tenth winner. Wayne Woodward put his health troubles aside to bring the show to a close with his performance of Nina Simone's Feeling Good. voice-less dance act Boogie Storm performed to a medley of songs. Singing impressionist Craig Ball took to the stage Lucy and Trip Hazard's uber cute doggy act was up next and it was so cute. Singing mother and son duo Mel and Jamie took to the stage next with their performance and the judges enjoyed it 100 Voices of Gospel were the third act to perform with their singing Happy Days and it more than impressed. Richard Jones has been revealed as Britain's Got Talent's tenth winner. Schoolgirl singer Beau performed in the final Alex Magala won high praise for his terrifying stunt involving a pole, a chainsaw and some handcuffs. Bearded drag star Danny Beard performs hoping for a chance to perform for the Queen Magician Christian Lee recreates an iconic movie scene with a balloon stuck on his head Performer Charlie Placais and his abs perform a stunt from a bathtub of water Charlie Placais performing his anticipated bath stunt hoping for a chance to perform in front of the Queen Simon Cowell hits the buzzer for Stormtrooper dance act Sword swallower Alexandr Magala performing during the auditions for Britain's Got Talent Singer Jasmine Elcock is shocked as Ant & Dec press the golden buzzer Scott and Muriel on Britain's Got Talent Alesha Dixon pouring water over David Walliams for the second time, on Britain's Got More Talent in 2014 Lucy and Trip are vying to be crowned the third dancing dog act to win the show Susan Boyle at the semi-final of Britain's Got Talent George Sampson after completing his dance in 2008 Collabro celebrate victory after winning the competition in 2014 Paddy and Nico perform together in 2014 Lettice Rowbotham showed off with her musical skills on the show in 2014 Light Balance perform in 2014 David Walliams dancing on the desk in front of fellow judges Alesha Dixon, Amanda Holden and Simon Cowell on Britain's Got More Talent Terri and Lisette dance on a pole together in 2014 Natalie Holt throws eggs at Simon Cowell and judges in 2013 Steve Hewlett (ventriloquist) with Simon Cowell Dummy at the semi-final in 2013 Winners of BGT Jules O'Dwyer and Matisse (left) with Skippy the three legged dog (centre) and Chase the stunt dog (right) Stevie Pink at the auditions for BGT in 2013 Lucky performs on stage in 2012 Charlotte Jaconelli and Jonathan Antoine perform in the semi final in 2012 Ashleigh and Pudsey during the semi-final of BGT in 2012 Steven Hall made everyone laugh in the final of BGT in 2011 Mark James (1/2 man 1/2 woman) was on the show in 2010 Stavros Flatley were a comedy dance act who appeared on the show in 2009 Favourite Susan Boyle was beaten to the title of 'Britain's Got Talent' TV Show, by street dance group 'Diversity'. Faces of Disco showed off their incredible dance skills in 2009 Darth Jackson [Vadar] danced his way onto the show in 2009 Fabia Cerra, Burlesque dancer appeared on the show in 2009 Connie Talbot on the set of 'Britain's Got Talent' in 2007 Crazeehorse perform in 2007

""There have been times with X Factor — now I’ve had the chance to rethink what happened last year and the years before — where we had that chemistry and lost it by trying to change too much."" Simon went on to reveal that originally singer Alesha had been eyed up for a role on The X Factor. He added: ""Alesha was supposed to be on X Factor but it didn't work out… She had what we were missing [on BGT], real expertise with the dances.""

ITV Cheryl and Nick Grimshaw will not be returning this year

WENN Alesha was originally eyed up for the ITV singing contest

The interview appears in the latest issue of Radio Times [RADIO TIMES]",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
70332,"She has previously worn an Alexander McQueen coat dress in New Zealand in a very similar hue, with a very similar belt.

Today’s version had lapels, a pleated full skirt and a belt in a matching hue.

The 35-year-old is a fan of powder blue coats, having worn the pretty colour numerous times.

Kate Middleton Duchess of Cambridge wore a blue coat ahead of Pippa wedding in Luxembourg

Today the Duchess of Cambridge wore the favourite colour to arrive at MUDAM, the Musze d'Art Moderne in the city in Belgium.

She wore baby blue Matthew Williamson coat to visit the Pembroke Refinery in Wales in November 2014.

Kate Middleton is a fan of her designer garments.

Duchess of Cambridge conceals her baby bump with a clutch bag

Kate Middleton the Duchess of Cambridge wore yet another blue coat today

She is attending commemorations marking the 150th anniversary 1867 Treaty of London, which confirmed the country's independence and neutrality.

Blue is a key hue in wedding celebrations, and perhaps Kate is making a nod to her sister Pippa Middleton’s upcoming nuptials.

Pippa Middleton is getting married to James Mathews, 41, a hedge fund manager.

He got down on bended knee to propose to Pippa, 33, during a trip to the Lake District last July.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
153845,"REUTERS Sami Khedira has reportedly agreed a £152,000 a week deal with Arsenal

The timing is not great, with Arsenal closing in on a £23.8million deal for Real Madrid's Sami Khedira, a box-to-box midfielder who will put Wilshere's place in the first team under real threat. Chelsea are also keen on Khedira, who helped Real to Champions League success last season, but reports in Spain say the Germany international, who was hugely unfortunate to miss the World Cup final after pulling a calf in the warm-up, has already agreed a four-year deal at the Emirates worth £152,000 a week. Khedira arrives back in Berlin today with the rest of the Germany World Cup squad for a presentation in front of half-a-million fans. He is close friends with Arsenal's Mesut Ozil and that is understood to have played a part in his decision to favour the Gunners, who also have World Cup winners Per Mertesacker and Lukas Podolski in their ranks. The Arsenal trio will now take a three-week break before returning for pre-season training. Khedira will also have three weeks down time but wants his future sorted before going on holiday. He has only a year left on his contract at Madrid and does not want to renew, partly due to the fact that Germany team-mate Toni Kroos is set to join Real from Bayern Munich in a £20m deal, throwing into doubt the 27-year-old's future at the Bernabeu - in much the same way his proposed arrival would have on the central midfielders at Arsenal, including Wilshere. Getting photographed a second time with a cigarette in his mouth, this time on a holiday in Las Vegas, is not the wisest move by Wilshere.

GETTY Jack Wilshere has been photographed smoking once again

In October last year, the 22-year-old was photographed smoking outside a London nightclub leaving Wenger non-plussed. ""I disagree completely with that behaviour,"" said the manager. ""When you are a football player you are an example and you don't do what damages your health. ""You can damage your health at home - you can smoke at home and you can drink at home and nobody sees it. But when you go out socially you also damage your reputation as an example."" Wilshere responded with an apology and a goal in his next game. He said at the time: ""I made a mistake. Players make mistakes. I am not a smoker, so I think that will be my last one."" The new-look Arsenal is starting to take shape with Arsenal moving early to make a landmark signing with the £31.7m transfer of Alexis Sanchez from Barcelona. They are also set to announce the £12m capture of Mathieu Debuchy from Newcastle and make a £3m offer to Nice for Colombia goalkeeper David Ospina. Al Ahly's Egypt international centre-back Ahmed Fathi is also having a trial. Sanchez's arrival has left the Arsenal squad ""buzzing"" ahead of the new campaign, according to defender Carl Jenkinson. ""He is world class and they are the sort of players you want to see at the club,"" said Jenkinson. ""The squad are buzzing as much as the fans, because if you are going to push on as a club and really compete for things, you need to sign top players. ""We have done that with him for sure - it is a fantastic addition. He's quick and direct, he can play up front and on the wing, and he is very dynamic. He will definitely fit the Arsenal style of play.

Once you have got one [trophy], you want to experience it again, so fingers crossed we can compete on all fronts this season Carl Jenkinson",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
90415,"Jose Mourinho says he would have turned down every job in the world to return to Chelsea [PA]

The Portuguese coach, 50, agreed a four-year deal to take over once again at Stamford Bridge after he left Real Madrid at the end of last season.

There had been suggestions Mourinho, a Champions League winner with Inter Milan after leaving England almost six years ago, was in the frame for the United post when Ferguson stepped down as well as on Manchester City's list of potential replacements for the axed Roberto Mancini.

However, Mourinho maintains there was only ever going to be one destination for him this summer, which he happily shared with Ferguson, who also revealed to the Portuguese his own plans to stand down after one last campaign at the helm long before that news became public knowledge.

He said: ""I knew that Ferguson was retiring many months ago, and I am so happy with his trust because it was big news for the world - I can imagine that just a very small circle around him knew that, and it was a big responsibility for me to know that.

""Why do I know that? Because we are friends, so if I am his friend to know that he is going to retire, he is also my friend to know that the club I want to coach in England is Chelsea. Of course I told him I want to come to Chelsea.""

Mourinho added: ""I would have turned down every job in the world, the Manchester United job, everyone, for Chelsea I would turn down every job in the world.""",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
45644,"GETTY Cindy Crawford's daughter, Kaia Gerber, has launched her fragrance advertising campaign

Kaia Gerber, whose father is businessman Rande Gerber, 55, looked pretty as a picture as she promoted Daisy Marc Jacobs in Los Angeles. Fashion industry insiders predicted the teenager could one day earn as many millions as 51-year-old Cindy, one of the most sought-after models on the planet. “She already has it all,” one said.

“She has charisma, good looks and energy. And most importantly she has the backing of her mother – still one of the biggest names in the entire industry. She will guide her through these early stages until she is an adult.” The high school junior was unveiled two months ago as a brand ambassador for the perfume alongside fellow teenage models Dilia Martins and Sofia Mechetner.

Cindy Crawford in pictures Wed, April 5, 2017 Model Cindy Crawford's best pictures; from posing on the cover of Vogue Paris with her daughter Kaia Jordan Gerber to her peak supermodel days. Play slideshow FameFlynet 1 of 47 Cindy Crawford sizzles as she flaunts her supermodel body in plunging bikini

GETTY Parents Cindy Crawford and Rande Gerber with children Kaia Gerber, 15, Presley Gerber, 17

And now Kaia, who boasts 1.4 million social media followers, has been given control of the official Instagram photos site for the Story of Marc Jacob Fragrances.

She has charisma, good looks and energy Fashion industry insider

The youngster wore a Marc Jacobs long-sleeved lace mini dress and metallic heels at the fragrance launch at which older brother Presley, 17, joined her. The siblings’ famous mother, said to be worth £77million, has given the pair her blessing. She said: “It’s been really fun for me to see my kids get their feet wet in the fabulous world of fashion.

GETTY Industry insiders were already predicting the 15-year-old will make millions during her career",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
209286,"The mass grave was found by Iraqi forces in a college building in the town of Hamam al-Alil. The shocking reports come after the Iraqi military declared the town liberated from the bloodthirsty ISIS extremists on Saturday.

GETTY ISIS have reportedly beheaded 100 civilians

GETTY US-backed forces have been attacked Mosul for the past two weeks

Gangs of ISIS militants continue to commite crimes against our people

Officials described the incident as a ""heinous crime"". They said: ""Inside the building of the Faculty of Agriculture there is a new crime: the presence of 100 beheaded bodies of citizens killed by terrorists and a special team will be sent to inspect this heinous crime. ""Gangs of ISIS militants continue to commite crimes against our people."" Special teams have been sent to the site to invesitgate.

GETTY he Iraqi army are set to take back Mosul from the Jihadi

Battle for Mosul Tue, January 12, 2016 A major offensive to recapture Mosul from ISIS continues. Play slideshow REUTERS 1 of 80 Members of the Iraqi rapid response forces fire missile toward Islamic State militants during a battle between Iraqi forces and Islamic State militants in Somer district of eastern Mosul

GETTY ISIS fighters have been blowing themselves up in their battle for Mosul",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
209468,"GETTY Saudi Arabia are reportedly backing fundamentalist Islamic groups in Germany

AT LEAST 10,000 Islamic extremists living within Germany are being supported by Saudi Arabia and other Gulf countries, a shock new report has claimed. The number of fundamentalists swearing allegiance to the Salafi group in Germany is on rise and Gulf countries have been accused of increasing their support to the terror cell.

We don't want terrorism in Germany… and we don't want to export terrorism Thomas de Maiziere

German media claimed Berlin’s Federal Intelligence Service (BND) and the Federal Office for the Protection of the Constitution (BfV) have accused Saudi Arabia and Kuwait of funding religious groups and conversion groups, as well as financing the building of mosques and backing hardline imams. According to a report drafted by the agencies, missionary groups including the Sheikh Eid Bin Mohammad al-Thani Charitable Association and the Saudi Muslim World League are involved in a ""long-running strategy to exert influence"" by Gulf nations.

GETTY Salafi group member Sheikh Issam Saleh speaks during a press conference in Gaza city

In addition to this, the Kuwaiti Revival of Islamic Heritage Society (RIHS), an NGO banned by the US and Russia for alleged links to terrorist group Al-Qaeda, has also been blamed for the rising support for fundamentalist Salafi groups in Germany. RIHS and the Sheikh Eid Bin Mohammad al-Thani Charitable Association have denied the allegations. Saudi ambassador Awwas Alawwad also rejected the claims, saying his country has “no connection with German Salafism”.

The news comes after religious group Die Wahre Religion were banned in Berlin following raids of their offices in cities across Germany. Interior Minister Thomas de Maiziere said: ""The translations of the Quran are being distributed along with messages of hatred and unconstitutional ideologies…Teenagers are being radicalised with conspiracy theories.

GETTY The report suggests mosques in Germany are receiving funds from key figures in Saudi Arabia

""We don't want terrorism in Germany… and we don't want to export terrorism."" Salafism is an ultra-conservative movement within Sunni Islam which aspires to emulate the ways of the Prophet Mohammed. Typically dressed in traditional white robes with long beards and flowing head scarves, followers of the 100-year-old school of thought see Salafi Islam as the purest form of the religion.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
251751,"The U.S. President and his wife Michelle visited the Emerald Isle on Monday (23May11) and were treated to a concert by some of Ireland's biggest stars at College Green, Dublin.

Over 20,000 fans showed up to see the free show, which was followed by a speech from Obama.

Pop siblings John and Edward Grimes, better known as Jedward, even scored an invitation to visit the Obamas at the White House.

In a series of posts on Twitter.com, the duo writes: ""We met Barack Obama, it was a moment that will go down in History for Jedward. We were talking to Barack Obama about the Jonas Brothers and Justin Bieber and Miley Cyrus.

""When we saw Michelle Obama we gave her a Jedward Hug and we were talking about going to the White House to meet her daughters. We can't wait to go to the White House!""",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
98218,"GETTY Piotr Zielinski has joined Napoli

Liverpool were keen on bringing him to Anfield but Udinese refused to do business with them. The Poland international, who spent the last two seasons at Empoli, is said to have cost around £8.5million.

Liverpool player ratings against Roma Tue, August 2, 2016 Express Sport takes a look at how the Liverpool players rated in their 2-1 pre-season friendly defeat to Roma Play slideshow AFP/Getty Images 1 of 24 Express Sport takes a look at how Jurgen Klopp's Liverpool players rated in their 2-1 pre-season friendly defeat to Roma at the Busch Stadium in St Louis, Missouri

“Napoli communicates that it has signed the sporting contract of Piotr Sebastian Zielinski, from Udinese,” a statement on the Napoli’s website said. Zielinski's arrival follows the signing of international team-mate Arkadiusz Milik earlier this week.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
357326,"Ayan Hadi, 31, has pleaded guilty at the Old Bailey to failing to provide information that she knew or believed might have helped secure the apprehension, prosecution or conviction of her husband Richard Dart for an act of terrorism.

Dart was jailed for six years in April with two co-conspirators Jahangir Alom and Imran Mahmood for engaging in conduct in preparation of acts of terrorism.

Last month, Mr Justice Sweeney, sitting at the Old Bailey, told Hadi: ""All sentencing options remain firmly open.""

Hadi, of Acton, west London, has a ""very young child"", the court heard.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
7061,"Alastair Cook was part of the briefing for the Bangladesh tour

The one-day squad, preparing for tomorrow’s second ODI against Pakistan at Lord’s, as well members of the Test side, including captain Alastair Cook, were briefed by Reg Dickason, England’s head of security, at the team hotel in London yesterday evening.

Dickason visited Bangladesh last week along with John Carr, the England & Wales Cricket Board’s head of operations and David Leatherdale, chief executive of the Professional Cricketers Association, to assess the security situation following last month’s terrorist attack in the capital Dhaka that left 20 people dead.

Islamic State claimed responsibility for that outrage and Foreign office advice warns UK nationals of a “heightened threat of further terrorist attacks” in Bangladesh.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
74551,"GETTY M&S is expected to announced that its clothing sales fell for a fourth consecutive quarter

According to City analysts, the retailer’s food business had another strong quarter, with like-for-like sales up 0.3 per cent, but its general merchandise, including clothes sales, are believed to have fallen by 3.4 per cent. The firm hopes that the launch of its new Alexa Chung range on April 13 will provide its clothing division with a boost. Her new 31-piece collection is based on classic designs she found in M&S’ archive at Leeds University. It will be available online and in 66 stores nationwide. Yesterday Rowe, who previously ran the firm’s clothes division for six months and Simply Food before that, succeeded Marc Bolland, who retired after six years at the helm.

He will unveil its fourth-quarter trading update to M&S investors on Thursday. Revenues for the 12 months to March 31, 2016, are expected to be flat at £10.4billion. Pre-tax profits excluding restructuring costs, loss on disposals and mis-selling provisions at its insurance division, are also forecast to be flat at £664million. On Tuesday, Moss Bros is expected to say that its pre-tax profits rocketed by nearly 29 per cent to £6.2million last year, thanks to refitted stores, more competitive pricing and continued growth in its hire business, which has seen higher demand for formal wear. ________________________________________________________

GETTY The retailer will unveil the new Alexa Chung range on April 13

GETTY Six former Barclays bankers have been accused of rate rigging

________________________________________________________ Fraud Office gets Serious on Libor The Serious Fraud Office will be looking to bounce back from its Libor prosecution setbacks on Monday, when the trial of six former Barclays bankers accused of rate rigging begins. The six bankers, Stylianos Contogoulas, Peter Johnson, Jonathan Mathew, Jay Merchant, Alex Pabon and Ryan Reich, face charges of conspiring to manipulate the US dollar Libor. The London interbank offer rate is used to price billions worth of loans and set investment return targets around the world. The trial, which was originally due to be held in January, will take place at Southwark Crown Court. In January the SFO suffered a massive blow, when the three-month trial of six brokers that were accused of helping former UBS trader Tom Hayes rig interest rates ended with all of them being acquitted. Former ICAP brokers Darrell Read, Colin Goodman and Danny Wilkinson, former Tullett Prebon worker Noel Cryan, and ex-RP Martin employees James Gilmour and Terry Farr were found not guilty of involvement in manipulating the Japanese yen Libor. ________________________________________________________

GETTY Moma started as a stall in London’s Waterloo train station",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
37417,"Van Gaal insists he will not panic buy and will only move into the transfer market again in the unlikely event of a world-class player becoming available - like Thomas Muller, Gareth Bale or even Neymar. He continues to place his faith in Wayne Roney emerging from his worrying 10-game goal drought, Javier Hernandez, a player he did not want last season, youngster James Wilson, who has only started one League game under him, and battering ram Marouane Fellaini, who has yet to appear in the Premier League this season because of suspension.

That is hardly a line-up likely to scare title rivals Manchester City and Chelsea, let alone Champions League big guns Barcelona, Real Madrid and Bayern Munich and it makes Van Gaal's decision to pull the plug on a deal for Pedro even more baffling. After United's laboured goal-less draw against Newcastle, former England pair Chris Waddle and Paul Scholes, who both know a bit about opening up defences, joined the clamour for new arrivals - and reckoned the Dutchman is in denial. Waddle said: ""Van Gaal will not admit it but he's lacking a proper No 9. There's no doubt about it. In the final third United have let themselves down. The priority is a No 9 and if he doesn't get one United will be struggling big time this season.""

GETTY Louis van Gaal has said he does not need a new striker

Scholes found it hard to believe Van Gaal was ""satisfied"" with the performance. He said: ""I don't think I would be. He said 'fantastic' a few times but I don't think there was anything fantastic about it at all. At home to Newcastle you are expected to win the game. Their goalkeeper has had one save to make, so that is not fantastic. The money the manager has been given, he needs to produce and needs to do it this season."" United may have managed only two goals in three Premier League games this season but the problem goes back to last season when they netted only three goals in the final six fixtures. So that is five goals in their last nine League games - and one of those was a Juan Mata penalty while another was a Kyle Walker own goal. Pretty compelling evidence that re-inforcements are necessary.

Done Deal XI Thu, August 20, 2015 Express Sport have compiled the best XI of this summer's transfers Play slideshow Arsenal FC via Getty Images 1 of 18 Petr Cech transfered from Chelsea to Arsenal for £10million

Rooney has now gone 858 minutes without a competitive goal for United - although a marginal offside decision denied him early on against Newcastle. In fairness, he can point to a lack of service with youngsters Memphis Depay and Adnan Januzaj frequently taking the wrong option. Rooney's 'touch map' indicates he would be better off operating as the No 10 behind a new striker. Van Gaal, however, remains unconcerned, although he continues to send out mixed messages. ""I don't think we need a striker because I already have a lot of options,"" he said before adding: ""When he is the best striker in the world then, yes, we need him, but that's the issue what I have been saying for two months: he has to contribute."" He may have problems up front but Van Gaal has it right at the back - this match was United's third clean sheet - and so has Newcastle manager Steve McClaren on the evidence of this battling display. And he hailed skipper Fabricio Coloccini's decision to stay and sign a new contract as his best summer signing.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
334392,"David Attenborough tracks a 500 million-year journey to reveal the rise of the vertebrates.



He presents new fossil evidence from the frontier of modern paleontological research, China.



New fossil finds combined with CGI technology allow Sir David to tell this story of how humans became the heirs to an evolutionary heritage.



In the first episode he uses new fossil evidence to unlock nature’s most extraordinary story, the ascent of the group that dominates our planet.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
42389,"GETTY Paul Scholes has backed Manchester United's pursuit of Toni Kroos

Kroos is a top target for Manchester United with a £20million move for the Bayern Munich star close.



And while Scholes believes Kroos is the first player he would bring to Old Trafford, the midfield schemer insists United need plenty more signings.



In his first column for PaddyPower, Scholes said: ""The first player I'd bring in is Toni Kroos.

The first player I'd bring in is Toni Kroos Paul Scholes

""He's a top-class central midfield player but United need five or six to get anywhere near the top of the Premier League again.""



Express Sport understands Van Gaal is also eyeing Luke Shaw, Mats Hummels, William Carvalho and Marco Reus.



Arjen Robben and Mario Mandzukic are also mooted targets.



Scholes believes Van Gaal is the right man for the job but faces a difficult task on his hands to win the Premier League next season.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
49997,"The leader of the largest French employer federation praised President Macron for his labour law reform proposing measures that would help employers fire workers more easily. Speaking to Bloomberg, Pierre Gattaz said however that Mr Macron should prepare for mass street protests. He said: ""The hard part of the unions, the CGT for instance, will be on the street. They will be on the street for obvious reasons.""

BLOOMBERG/GETTY Mr Gattaz said Mr Macron should expect hard line unions like the CGT to take to the streets

Mr Gattaz said the French businesses were expecting ""a lot"" from Mr Macron's labour reforms and that unions were made aware of the plans a long time ago. He said: ""I think there have been lots of discussions with the unions for months. Lots of meetings, lots of discussions. they are not being taken by surprise because this is part of the programme of Macron. ""They are not being taken by surprise because this is part of the programme of Macron. However the CGT, one of the unions most vocally opposed to labour reforms, called the proposal a ""declaration of war"" against workers. CGT general secretary Jean-Pierre Battestini said: ""These proposals are an attack without precedents against the labour code and the collective protections of workers.""",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
142448,"PR The former Saturdays singer and mum-of-two has reunited with Marie Curie this year

Between school runs, packed lunches and hectic work schedules it can be difficult to maintain a balance on the home-front. And mum-of-two Frankie Bridge is no stranger to a busy lifestyle.

But the former Saturdays singer still finds time for what is important. Frankie has reunited with Superdrug and P&G to help raise £200,000 for Marie Curie.

PR Frankie said: ""What I love about the campaign is that it's so easy to get involved""

The cosmetic brands are donating funds from selected products to Marie Curie, the leading charity caring for people living with any terminal illness and their families in the UK. Last year saw the #FeelSuper campaign raise over £200,000 for the cause, which funded the equivalent of 10 Marie Curie Nurses for a year. This equates to more than 10,000 hours of vital care and support for people living with a terminal illness, whether it’s providing hands-on care for someone at home, complementary therapies at a Marie Curie hospice or simply making a cup of tea for a family member. Alarming research shows that a quarter of people still do not receive the care and support they need at the end of their life, thus why Frankie is getting behind the campaign again this year.

Child stars then & now Thu, October 19, 2017 These child stars are all grown up. From Daniel Radcliffe, to the cast of Willy Wonka, see the children who aged gracefully into adulthood. Play slideshow Getty 1 of 65 Outnumbered's Karen star Ramona Marquez looked very different these days",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
355047,"Andre Schurrle has pulled out of the Germany squad

The 24-year-old missed the 2-1 win over Liverpool on Saturday, as he has been suffering with an infection.

The winger has missed a chunk of training in recent weeks, and he will not be involved in Germany's Euro 2016 qualifier against Gibraltar and their friendly against Spain.

A statement read: ""Schurrle suffered a persistent infection in October and could not train regularly.

""It was agreed with coach Joachim Loew that he stays in London and trains individually to optimise his fitness.""

Schurrle will not be replaced in Loew's squad.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
20249,"GETTY Thermometers will plunge through this week with experts warning of a major winter freeze

Thermometers will plunge this week with experts warning of a major winter freeze after the weekend. Further heavy rain is forecast across the country from tomorrow with showers turning to snow in the north by Friday. Up to two feet of snow is expected to settle in the Scottish Highlands with flurries expected further south next week. The entire country faces sub-zero overnight temperatures with bitter winds and frost heralding the start of “proper winter weather”. The chilly forecast comes as parts of Britain brave further heavy rain and gales as the clean up form Storm Frank continues.

Families across Scotland, Cumbria and Yorkshire are still battling chaos with roads closed and communities devastated. The cold snap threatens more misery for the north with plunging temperatures turning roads in to lethal ice rinks and snow falling on flooded ground. Leon Brown, forecaster for The Weather Channel UK, said after another week of torrential downpours Britain will be plunged into the freezer. He said: “There is some proper winter weather for a change so get the de-icer ready. “More very wet weather is forecast this week with some heavy snowfalls for higher parts of Scotland. “It is turning quite a bit colder next week with temperatures below minus 10C over the Scottish Highlands and widespread frosts in the south.

GETTY Further heavy rain is forecast across the country on Thursday with showers turning to snow

There is some proper winter weather for a change so get the de-icer ready Leon Brown, forecaster for The Weather Channel UK

“A wide band of rain moved slowly eastwards last night into today giving 10 to 25mm [one inch] in many areas of the UK, and falling on saturated ground will bring yet again a high flood risk. “Heavy snowfalls are expected over the Scottish highlands today with more than 50cm [1.6ft] over the higher mountains.” The Met Office said after a wet and windy week things will start to turn colder towards the weekend. It comes as official figures reveal last month was the wettest and mildest December on record and the wettest month in history. Average temperatures of 7.9C (46F) beat the previous record of 6.9C (44F) set in 1934 while 50 inches (1,289mm) of rain secured the wettest December ever. The Met Office has issued severe weather warnings for Scotland and Northern Ireland tomorrow and Thursday where more than three inches is expected to fall. Spokesman Grahame Madge said Britain is braced for another bout of strong winds and rain on Thursday after a slightly calmer mid-week spell. He said: “There are further warnings in place for Thursday with heavy rain, especially in the north bringing a further risk of flooding.

Storm Imogen hits the UK with 96mph winds Tue, February 9, 2016 Storm Imogen causes havoc across the UK, bringing severe flooding and gail force winds to Britain. Play slideshow Tony Kershaw / SWNS 1 of 105 Storm Imogen - Cars stuck in flood waters near Dorking, Surrey, 8 February 2016

“It is going to feel quite cold with strong winds associated with the new front which moves slowly across the country. “The northeast faces heavy and persistent rain with widespread showers expected.” James Madden, forecaster for Exacta Weather, warned Britons to brace for a “shock to the system” as the cold sets in. He warned torrential rain threatens further flood misery in parts this week with heavy snow and blizzards about to unleash mayhem. He said: “This will come as a real shock to the system after the mild weather throughout winter.

GETTY Flood-stricken Britain faces fresh misery with a bitter Arctic blast to bring up to two feet of snow

GETTY The entire country faces sub-zero overnight temperatures with bitter winds and frost",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
54863,"Hughton was controversially sacked just one year later but hasn't lost his affection for Newcastle fans who he believes make a visit to St James' Park a memorable experience for away teams.

Hughton spent three years at Newcastle, first as a coach and caretaker manager and then as a permanent manager at the start of the 2009/10 season.

I don't like to use that word 'daunting' because I think it's an enjoyable place to go.

He said: ""It's a wonderful stadium to go to.

""I don't like to use that word 'daunting' because I think it's an enjoyable place to go.

""I would want every single one of my players to very much look forward to going there.

""It is a wonderful stadium and they can create a great atmosphere there. They can get behind the team and if their team are playing well, they can drive them on.

""That's the wonderful thing about this game and that's the thing to look forward to.

""So daunting? No. I think it's an exciting place to go and play football and it's very much an exciting place to go and try and win a football match.""

Norwich go into the game on the back of a rousing 3-1 win over West Ham just before the international break but Newcastle will also be looking to build on their excellent victory over Chelsea when the two sides meet on Saturday.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
211433,"The former Tory frontbencher slammed EU member states delaying Brexit talks progress with growing internal instability. Speaking to the BBC Daily Politics, Mr Duncan Smith said: ""It’s all very well to say the UK Government’s position is not clear. Actually, amongst many of the European nations, there is quite a lot of instability. ""The problem isn’t just the UK Government. You have The Netherlands who has only just now, after months, finally began to look like they are forming a government. You got Spain in total chaos, the Italian banks are in real trouble and the Italian Government looks like it’s teetering. And Germans also haven’t yet formed their government.

GETTY/BBC Mr Duncan Smith said EU member states were at fault with the Brexit talks delay

""I am not surprised that at this particular point they are not ready to progress to the next phase."" The Chingford and Woodford Green MP said Brussels should rein in member states in order to strike a mutually beneficial deal with Brexit Britain. He added: ""I think once they are ready, it’s in everybody’s interest to make good progress once that happens. ""I am convinced that the reasons for doing it are there for both sides and therefore I’m quite optimistic about it.""",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
241540,"Their approach has provoked more than one flashpoint in the Kelly household, as his mother and I question how much and how effectively he is revising. A teacher friend of ours recently explained that 15/16 is the worst possible age for a boy to be taking exams because of all the distractions they face - though for ""distractions"" you can really just substitute the word ""girls"".

It's an observation that carries much merit but omits, I think, another crucial point: the parents of nearly all those teenagers are also precisely the wrong age. That's because most of us are in our 40s or early 50s and so at what is generally acknowledged as the most stressful time in our lives. Our jobs are at their most challenging, our financial outgoings at their highest and the demands made on our time never greater.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
297583,"South Yorkshire Police had ""a lack of understanding"" of the risk posed by offenders who target vulnerable children while officers showed an inconsistent response to child sexual exploitation, Her Majesty's Inspectorate of Constabulary (HMIC) said.

The report was carried out in May - just months before Professor Alexis Jay's report revealed that at least 1,400 children were abused in Rotherham over 16 years.

Officers come under fire for ""regarding many child victims with contempt"".

However, the force is praised for undertaking ""prompt and thorough"" inquiries in most cases.

In one case, officers failed to sufficiently protect three girls identified as at risk, who were sexually assaulted by several men and were reported missing from care on several occasions.

Officers were also found by inspectors to have failed to properly tackle men who are sexually exploiting young girls within the force area.

Inspector of Constabulary Dru Sharpling said: ""We are concerned that force practice is inconsistent so not all children receive the standard of treatment they deserve.

""We were also concerned about the lack of understanding of the risk posed by offenders who target vulnerable children and shortcomings in the protection of children in care.""

HMIC found that there were particular shortcomings in care homes in Doncaster, one of four districts covered by the force.

In another case, three young girls had been placed in a children's care home and police and children's social care services identified that they were becoming involved in increasingly risky behaviour.

Authorities agreed that the three girls should be separated immediately, but it took a month for this to happen.

Plans were put in place in the meantime - but failed to sufficiently protect the girls.

The girls were reported missing on numerous occasions, they were found drunk and under the influence of drugs, they were arrested several times for offences such as criminal damage and assaulting care home staff.

They were also sexually assaulted by several men and one was detained in police custody for her ""own protection"".",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
328703,"Wow,” declared my four-year-old son, open-mouthed, as our taxi emerged from thick pine forest to pass a colossal Roman amphitheatre. One glance at the marble relics of an ancient city centre, with towering temple columns strewn by the roadside, and we knew this was far from a typical trip to a local fishing village. Struck by the open access to such well-preserved ruins, we joined the tourists roaming across an ancient bazaar and headed to the amphitheatre that once seated 20,000 bloodthirsty spectators. Entrance to Side’s sleepy town through an arched fountain gate is restricted, however, to protect the fragile warren of alleyways that snake down to the waterfront. After explaining as best we could to our son about jousting gladiators and circus beasts, our 15-minute stroll to the majestic port temples of Apollo and Athena was accompanied by the calming echoes of the mosque’s call to prayer.

SAT MAG The temple of Apollo

Advertisement

Side, located in the popular province of Antalya and pronounced “see day,” means pomegranate in the area’s ancient dialect, and the fruit appeared on Roman coins to symbolise fertility in one of the empire’s key trading posts. With Side’s year-round warm climate, larger hotels were built in the 1980s east of the harbour, but in recent years new properties have sprung up in the west, taking advantage of the lush forest backdrop. Two years ago, the five-star Sensatori Turkey resort opened its doors and my family reaped the benefits staying at this beachfront base, just a five-minute bus ride from the harbour. We soon settled into a daily routine – my four-year-old son plunging straight from our terrace into the long pool that ran directly along the ground-floor, sea-view rooms, and it was here he proudly removed his armbands for the first time and embraced doggy paddle. There was also the bonus that our six-month-old baby was easy to settle for morning and afternoon naps in the comfort of his cot, while we enjoyed the pool.

SAT MAG 'Ensconced in the beauty of Side, I’d defy anyone not to feel rejuvenated'

Every taste was catered for at the huge buffet, but for true Turkish fare our favourite was the small Safran restaurant, which served Side’s most famous fish dish, trout casserole. Here you can also savour an expertly prepared lamb kebab and large plates of meze. There is even an authentic griddle station by the beach to enjoy hand-cooked Turkish flatbread (gozleme), delicious with a sucuk filling (traditional spicy sausage). Parents in need of total relaxation can leave their little ones in the supervised playhouse and make their way to the hotel’s marble hammam, a glamorous steam room. Here, I indulged in a detoxifying bath ritual while our eldest child was having the time of his life at a seashell and sand art session.

Advertisement",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
96117,"The Italian recently returned to pre-season training after a season-long loan with AC Milan. But The Mirror claims Klopp sat down with the forward today to discuss his situation. Klopp said: “With a lot of players it is not the moment to talk of transfers as it could kill all talks by saying someone was 70 per cent to sign him or whatever.

Mario Balotelli's Liverpool career Sat, February 20, 2016 Express Sport reflects on Mario Balotelli's tumultuous Liverpool career Play slideshow Getty Images 1 of 17 Why always him? Mario Balotelli is on the verge of leaving Liverpool with Jurgen Klopp keen to make back the money Brendan Rodgers spent on him

“But I can talk of Mario because that one is obvious and I have spoken to him about this. “He’s not at the stage of his career where he should be battling with four or five other players for one or two positions. “We want him to become the player he was before his injury and the talent is still there, there’s no doubt about it.

GETTY Mario Balotelli has been told he won't be part of Jurgen Klopp's plans",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
358686,"SWNS Council bosses apologise after a woman's ashes were placed on the wrong grave

Agnes Marland remains should have been placed in her husband's memorial within a church's garden of remembrance following her death in February. But due to a mix-up, they were instead placed with their son Craig's resting place in an adjacent plot at St Saviour's Church in Stoke-on-Trent, Staffordshire. A church court has now ruled husband James's ashes can be exhumed to join the remains of his wife and son.

Stoke-on-Trent City Council launched an investigation following the error and have since said sorry to the family. A spokesman for the authority said: ""We have apologised to the family. ""An internal investigation has been carried out to establish how this regrettable situation occurred and we have been in regular contact with the family.

SWNS Agnes Marland's remains were scheduled to be placed on her husbands grave

""Arrangements are now in place for the error to be corrected in line with the family's wishes, and we will be covering all the associated costs.""

An internal investigation has been carried out to establish how this regrettable situation occurred Stoke-on-Trent City Council

The Church of England's Consistory Court heard consent for exhumation is only given rarely as a person's remains should stay where they are unless there are exceptional circumstances. Mum-of-one Mrs Marland died at Bradwell Hospital earlier this year and was cremated at Carmountside Crematorium following a Mass at St Mark's Church, in Norton, Staffs. The court heard 92-year-old Mr Marland's remains were buried at St Saviour's in May 2012 and son Craig died in 2015, aged 64.

SWNS Her ashes were instead placed on her son's grave which is adjacent to her husbands

The couple's niece Roseann Holleran, who lives in London, asked the court for James's remains to be exhumed. Lichfield Diocese Chancellor, Judge Stephen Eyre QC said: ""I have concluded that it is appropriate to permit the proposed exhumation and re-interment in the circumstances of this case. ""The interment of the remains of Agnes Marland in the wrong grave has brought about a situation which is outside the norm.

SWNS Deceased husband James's ashes are set to be moved to the same grave Agnes's are in",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
329176,"Ocado hopes to make an £18million profit by the year end [PH]

The business, founded in 2000 but yet to turn a profit, said retail sales for the 12 weeks to February 23 were £218.8million, while average orders per week rose 18.4 per cent to 155,152 putting Ocado on course to meet forecasts for profits of about £18million by the year end.

Ocado sells Waitrose products as well as an own-label range and last year agreed to run supermarket Morrisons’ online service in a £200million deal.

Chief financial officer Duncan Tatton-Brown said: “The business is getting better as we always knew it would. We will become more profitable as we scale up.”

Its annual report showed that chief executive Tim Steiner took home £1million last year after his basic salary rose 19 per cent to £417,000 and his annual bonus leapt from £104,000 to £528,000.

Co-founder Jason Gissing, who stepped down this year, took home £608,000 in 2013.

Ocado shares, which rose from 80p a year ago to a peak of 623p last month, eased back 33p to 539p.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
40280,"The Dutchman sighs a five-year contract at the club after forcing a move from Celtic Park. Van Dijk, 24, was expected to depart the Scottish title holders after they failed to qualify for the Champions League this season. “I’m delighted. It was a very easy decision to join this club,"" Van Dijk said.

“This is a very ambitious club, who have been doing very well in the last couple of years. It’s a great place to be and it’s the right step for me. “For me now to get the opportunity to play in the Premier League is unbelievable and I will enjoy it. “I know it’s an ambitious club – they have been through a lot throughout the years. They are trying to play football and that’s something that really attracted me.

TWITTER SOUTHAMPTON FC Southampton have signed Virgil van Dijk on deadline day",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
108027,"GETTY Lenders are offering thousands of pounds of cashback with some mortgages

Barclays, Halifax, Skipton Building Society and Clydesale and Yokrshore banks are among the providers all currently offering the bungs.



But mortgage fees and higher rates may not make the cash offer as generous as it first appears.



For example, Halifax is giving £1,000 cashback on a number of its mortgage, including its first-time buyer 1.63 per cent two-year fixed rate, available at a loan-to-value of 60 per cent.



However, the deal comes with a £790 fee, which cancels out all but £210 of the cashback.



It means borrowers need to look carefully at the overall cost of the mortgage, including repayments, fees and cashback to decide if it is good value.

How to make money from your home (without having to sell it) Fri, April 21, 2017 Selling your property isn’t the only solution to make extra cash from your home. If you have a bit of extra space and bit of spare time on your hands, you may want to consider these thrifty tricks. Play slideshow Getty Images 1 of 10 How to make money from your home (without having to sell it)

For example, Skipton Building Society also offers £1,000 cashback - without product fees - on a 2.5 per cent fix at a loan-to-value of 85 per cent.



On a loan of £250,000 the deal would cost £25,928 over two years with monthly repayments of £1,222.



In comparison, HSBC currently offer a 1.39 per cent fix at the same 85 per cent LTV, with a booking fee of £999.



Even with the additional fee, a borrower would pay £24,687 over the two years with HSBC, less than with Skipton and with lower monthly payments of £987.



With more cashback deals on the market, borrowers have now been urged to check the overall cost of deals.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
278968,"The 28-year-old has been linked with a £22million move to Old Trafford as they seek a replacement for Angel Di Maria. The Argentina international left the club for Ligue 1 champions Paris Saint-Germain for £44m, having spent only one season in Manchester.

And Sky pundit Henry admits Pedro is the man to the fill the void as he will slot seamlessly into Louis van Gaal's plans. He told Spanish newspaper Marca: ""Van Gaal went on to buy players this summer that can suit the way he wants to play - that’s why he wants Pedro.

GETTY Thierry Henry has backed Pedro for success at Old Trafford",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
58826,"REAL MADRID TRANSFER NEWS LIVE: All the latest on Kylian Mbappe and more... Wednesday July 26 Liverpool failed in Asensio bid 23:30: Liverpool had a bid for Real Madrid star Marco Asensio rejected. That's according to Diario Gol who claim the forward was on Jurgen Klopp's radar. Manchester United and Arsenal are also interested in snapping him up. But Real supposedly want to keep him as they deem him a vital asset for the future. Bale to Man Utd backed 22:45: Manchester United should pursue Real Madrid star Gareth Bale this summer - that's the view of former Arsenal midfielder Stewart Robson. “I think his game time or playing time will be limited because at the end of last season Real Madrid changed the system,"" he told ESPN. “Isco was their best player, Ronaldo doesn’t play wide anymore, he wants to play up front and they like [Karim] Benzema as well so they’ll play with a front two I think with Isco in behind. “Where does Gareth Bale fit into that? And of course they’re talking about Mbappe. “I think Gareth Bale’s time could be limited at Real Madrid and it’s the right time for Manchester United, maybe, to go for him.” 17:45: Manchester United are confident of signing Real Madrid star Gareth Bale this summer, According to the Independent, United sources say the club feel they have a 'real chance' of bringing him to Old Trafford during the transfer window. The report suggests United's desire to land a player of Bale's calibre may even be the reason for their pursuit of Inter Milan's Ivan Perisic stalling. United and Milan have been in talks for months over his transfer but the Red Devils are reluctant to meet their £48million valuation. The Manchester outfit would have no problem forking out the cash needed to secure Bale and they could be waiting to see if Kylian Mbappe's seemingly impending arrival has an impact on the 28-year-old's future. 16:26: Real Madrid could land a treble transfer blow on Arsenal this window.



The Spanish giants are closing in on a world-record £160million move for Kylian Mbappe.



Arsenal wanted him and it means, as a result, they’ll be less likely to get Thomas Lemar.



Manchester City, meanwhile, wanted Mbappe themselves. They could now re-evaluate their options and go back in for Alexis Sanchez. 13:50: Gerard Pique admits he does not know for sure whether Neymar will stay at Barcelona amid interest from Paris St-Germain. Neymar has been the subject of speculation this summer, with reports that PSG had agreed to activate his release clause of almost £200million. Barca defender Pique posted a message on social media on Sunday which appeared to suggest the Brazil forward had committed his future to the Nou Camp. However, speaking at a press conference, Pique acknowledged his opinion was not definitive. The 30-year-old said: ""My Instagram post was a gut thing. I want Neymar to stay. It's my intuition. It was nothing official, it doesn't depend on me. Only Neymar can say what will happen, but I hope he stays.” 13:00: Diego Costa has been offered to AC Milan on a temporary basis, reports claim. According to Sky Italia, Costa’s agent Jorge Mendes has held preliminary discussions with Vincenzo Montella’s side over a potential deal. The report claims Atletico Madrid is Costa’s most likely destination, but could spend six months with the Serie A side until Atletico’s transfer ban is lifted in January 2018. 12:05: Danilo has revealed why he rejected Premier League champions Chelsea in favour of Manchester City. City signed the right-back on a four-year deal in a move worth £26.9million, and says it wasn’t a difficult decision. ""It wasn't a difficult decision to choose City over Chelsea,"" he said. ""The moment City called me and Pep called me, I knew what I had to do. Pep's words motivated me to be ready for this. ""It was very fast. I was training with Real Madrid and Pep called me and I was very motivated to make this change and start to work with him. ""Zinedine Zidane tried to make me stay but I was sure I needed to change. I needed to think a bit more about myself and find a place where I had more options.""

GETTY Arsenal Transfer News: The Gunners have been keeping tabs on Marco Asensio

10:40: Manchester United want to sign Real Madrid star Marco Asensio as revenge for the Spanish club’s interest in Marcus Rashford. Surprise reports in Spain last week claimed that Rashford was on a four-man list of Real Madrid striker targets to replace Alvaro Morata after his move to Chelsea. And Spanish website Diario Gol claim United want revenge on their European rivals by accelerating their plans to bring Marco Asensio to Old Trafford. It is said manager Jose Mourinho initially wanted the 21-year-old attacking midfielder further down the line - but news of Real's interest in Rashford has supposedly forced him to go for Asensio quicker than originally planned. 09:00: Manchester United boss Jose Mourinho has voiced his concern about the way clubs are ""spending £30million, £40million, £50million in such an easy way."" The 54-year-old has splashed the cash since replacing Louis van Gaal at Old Trafford in May 2016, highlighted by the £89million and £75million captures of Paul Pogba and Romelu Lukaku respectively. But what Mourinho does not like is the excessive transfer fees that are currently being paid for players that do not fall into the world-class category. ""I always thought the problem is not what you pay for these kind of (top) players, I don't think the problem is what you pay for Pogba, I don't think the problem is going to pay crazy for Neymar,"" the Portuguese said. ""I think the problem is with the other group which is a big group because players like Pogba, there is one or two (big) transfers (like that) per transfer window. The other ones are where you have 100 transfers and for me that is the dangerous area of the market. ""Some clubs are paying or they don't buy because they don't accept the numbers that are now ruling the market, or to do it they have to go the same levels and for me that's what worries me a little bit because now we speak about £30million, £40million, £50million in such an easy way."" 08:05: Arsenal have been keeping tabs on Real Madrid star Marco Asensio dating back to his time at RCD Mallorca, according to reports in Spain. Asensio is one of Real Madrid's brightest talents for the future, with the 21-year-old scoring 10 goals as the club won La Liga and the Champions League last season. Manchester United and Juventus have both been linked with summer swoops, while Arsenal have also been mentioned as a potential suitor. And Spanish outlet Diario Gol claim the Gunners have been keen on the youngster for quite some time. It is said that manager Arsene Wenger has monitored the player ever since his time at Mallorca. He was supposedly impressed by the talent Asensio possesses but lost out when Real opted to pay just £2.5million for him in 2014. 06:00: Manchester City believe Real Madrid will sell Gareth Bale to Manchester United if they sign Kylian Mbappe from Monaco. The 28-year-old has been heavily linked with a move to Old Trafford in the past few seasons. And The Daily Mirror say City reckon it could finally happen if Real secure a world-record deal for Mbappe. It is said they will sell the Wales international in order to raise funds to offset the financial burden. 02:20: Back to Philippe Coutinho now. Diario Gol claim Real Madrid were offered the chance to sign the Liverpool star - before Barcelona. However, Los Blancos rejected a move because they thought he was not good enough. Real chief Florentino Perez is said to be amused by Barcelona's determination to sign the Brazil star.

Real Madrid home kit 2017/18 revealed Wed, June 14, 2017 Click through the gallery for the best snaps of the Real Madrid home kit for 2017/18 Play slideshow Real Madrid 1 of 5 Real Madrid home kit 2017/18

Tuesday July 25 00:00: Manchester City are in advanced talks with Monaco to sign Real Madrid target Kylian Mbappe. Real are said to be in pole position to sign the France international despite Monaco denying that an agreement was in place for him to move to the Bernabeu in a world-record £161million deal. However, The Daily Mirror say City are trying to hijack their move for Mbappe. It is said chief executive Ferran Soriano is in talks with Monaco vice-president Vadim Vasilyev about brokering a deal to bring the youngster to the Etihad. And they are confident of beating Real to his signature as they look to take their summer spending to the £350m barrier. Tuesday July 25 23:30: Real Madrid could yet sign Chelsea star Eden Hazard. That's according to Diario Madridista, who say Los Blancos are still mulling over a summer swoop. They think he could be the ideal asset both on and off the pitch. But they are also mindful of his lack of firepower - something that could hold him back. 20:10: Mateo Kovacic is considering his future at Real Madrid. Spanish publication Diario Gol claim he is desperate to get regular game time and will consider leaving the Bernabeu in order to fulfil his ambitions. Dani Ceballos' arrival could also see Kovacic slip further down the pecking order under Zinedine Zidane. Tottenham have been linked with making a move for the 23-year-old. 18:20: Ajax star Kasper Dolberg has aspirations to play for Real Madrid… but not just yet. ""I want to stay and will not be leaving,"" he said. ""A similar career to [Klaas-Jan] Huntelaar Real Madrid would be alright. Milan and Schalke are nice clubs as well."" ""And everyone dreams about finishing second and third at a World Cup. I will just follow my own path, though."" 16:23: Cristiano Ronaldo will be playing for Real Madrid next season and reports in Spain say Kylian Mbappe could be alongside him.



The four-time Ballon D'or winner was reportedly unhappy in the Spanish capital and rumours of a move, particularly back to Manchester United, began to circulate.



After captaining Portugal in the Confederations Cup and now coming to the end of a promotional tour in Asia, the 32-year-old has spoken about his future.



He told Spanish newspaper Marca that he sees himself in Madrid with the aim of repeating last season's title and Champions League success.



""Winning important trophies with my club last year was great, just like the individual trophies, and to do it again would be great,"" he said. 15:01: The bookies don’t think Kylian Mbappe to Real Madrid is a done deal just yet. Despite social media going into meltdown and one punter lumping £5k on the move, Ladbrokes have still not suspended betting on Mbappe joining Real Madrid. When they do that with a transfer it’s a tell-tale sign that it is going through. But you can still bet on the move, although at odds of 1/5 you won’t be making much back if it does happen… 14:04: Bizarre story of the day alert!



Could an online punter from Chingford could hold the clue to a huge Real Madrid transfer move?



Bookies Ladbrokes have revealed they have just taken a £5,000 bet on Kylian Mbappe completing a move to the Bernabeu this summer.



It’s come from a customer in north-east London, who is based more than 1,000 miles from Madrid. 12:28: Sensational reports from Spain claim Real Madrid have AGREED a deal for Kylian Mbappe with Monaco. Marca claim the La Liga giants will fork out £161m, paying £143m of that fee up front with the rest in add ons. Mbappe, 18, is set to earn £120,000 a week at the Bernabeu. Madrid would subsequently smash the world-record transfer fee to land the talented teenage forward.

GETTY Real Madrid want Arsenal to sell Alexis Sanchez to Man City...so they can sign Kylian Mbappe

10:30: Arsenal and Liverpool are on red alert after claims Karim Benzema is available. According to Spanish website Don Balon, Real Madrid will consider selling Benzema to prove they’re serious about signing Kylian Mbappe. It’s believed Mbappe will only consider moving to the Bernabeu if he’s guaranteed regular first-team action. The report states England will be Benzema’s most likely destination, with his representatives preparing to contact Arsenal and Liverpool. 09:50: Bayern Munich manager Carlo Ancelotti believes Premier League sides will be more competitive in the Champions League this season. Chelsea, Liverpool, Manchester United, Tottenham and Manchester City are all looking to topple holders Real Madrid. And after a few years on under-achieving in UEFA’s prestigious tournament, Ancelotti think’s that's a serious possibility. He said: “The last period in the Champions League, the Premier League teams had problems, but this year I think they have really good teams in the competition. “Chelsea, Tottenham Hotspur, Liverpool, Manchester United, Manchester City — I think with these teams the Champions League will be really more competitive. “There was a period when the English teams did not do well in the competition but it was only a period. I think it’s finished.” 09:00: Chelsea's new signing Alvaro Morata believes he was destined to play under manager Antonio Conte at a club good enough to compete with Europe's elite. The 24-year-old Spain international backed the defending Premier League champions to go toe-to-toe with Europe's top sides, including his former club Real Madrid, who won their second successive Champions League title last season. ""There are very good players here and I think we can do something amazing this year,"" the Spaniard said. ""It is hard to leave Madrid but it is not so hard when you come to a club like Chelsea, with these players and with this coach, and I think we can play against Real Madrid and Barcelona and win.""

Alvaro Morata's emotional goodbye to Real Madrid team-mates Thu, July 20, 2017 Alvaro Morata bid goodbye to Real Madrid yesterday after agreeing a move to join Chelsea Play slideshow 1 of 8",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
168822,"GETTY Yen-Hsun Lu previously beat Andy Murray at the 2008 Olympic Games in Beijing

Standing between Andy Murray and a place in the third round of Wimbledon is Yen-Hsun Lu but just how much of a threat does the 32 year-old from Taiwan pose to the former champion? Gamestyle Nicknamed ‘Rendy’, Lu is a consummate professional with a ferocious work-ethic and he will have no regrets when he eventually hangs up his racket. He is a solid performer with excellent mobility, and baseline consistency is the foundation of his game. Technically sound but without a signature shot, Lu does not possess an imposing serve to earn him easy points. He gives nothing away for free and is a tough player to overcome but at the highest level, more often than not, he has come up short.

Wimbledon 2016 Sun, July 10, 2016 The world famous Wimbledon Championships 2016 Play slideshow Getty 1 of 180 Andy Murray kisses the championship trophy following his win over Milos Raonic of Canada in the men's singles final of the Wimbledon Championships

Ranking History Lu is currently 76th in the rankings but he reached a career-high of thirty-three in 2010. He is mostly to be found competing on the Challenger Tour and his record in the second tier is exceptional. Last summer he became just the second player competing at that level to rack up an impressive 300 wins. Notable Achievements The man from Chinese Taipei has never won an ATP Tour title and his only final appearance was in Auckland in 2014. His record against elite standard players is far from stellar either and he has amassed just seven top ten wins in his fifteen year career.

Grass Court Credentials The surface on which Lu has enjoyed most of his success is hard courts however he is dangerous and threatening on grass. His most notable and career-defining win came against Andy Roddick at Wimbledon en route to the quarter-finals in 2010 - his best ever Grand Slam result by a considerable margin. He has highlighted recently just how adept, capable and comfortable he is on grass by winning successive Challenger Tour tournaments in the lead up to Wimbledon and his current winning run is now up to eleven matches.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
144991,"GETTY Red squirrels in the UK are being forced to battle the medieval disease leprosy

Fortunately for people living nearby, the strain of the hideous condition is no threat to human health. The UK’s native squirrel population has been slowly clawing back in numbers after efforts to halt the spread of the colonising North American greys. Scientists studying one of England’s last major populations have finally identified an illness that has afflicted them over the last 50 years.

Wildlife experts at Poole Harbour’s Brownsea Island, in Dorset, say symptoms such as fur loss and severe skin ulcers are due to leprosy. The bacterial disease was rife in the Middle Ages especially from the 11th to the 14th Centuries. Brownsea is one of the last locations in England still to have red squirrels, with the vast majority of the 120,000 which remain in the UK living in Scotland.

GETTY Red squirrels on Brownsea Island are displaying hair loss and skin ulcers

Professor Anna Meredith, of the University of Edinburgh, said the National Trust-owned island is home to 200 reds and provides the ideal location for the three-year project as it is completely contained.

They are an icon of endangered British wildlife Professor Anna Meredith

She said: “They are an icon of endangered British wildlife cherished both for their rarity and their beauty. “But there is cause for concern in this red squirrel haven. Some have been spotted with a peculiar and disturbing illness – fur loss, swelling, ulceration – it is painful to even look at. “These symptoms have been identified in a small number of squirrels for almost 50 years.”

GETTY There are only about 120,000 red squirrels left in the UK

Prof Meredith now plans to humanely catch red squirrels, take blood and other clinical samples before micro-chipping them so that any evidence of the infection can be monitored over a long period. She added: “It is really important that we try and understand a bit more because it’s never been described in squirrels before. “We want to know where they’re getting it from and how they are possibly spreading it to each other.

Comedy Wildlife Wed, December 28, 2016 From a kung fu squirrel to a swearing chimpanzee, here are the funniest animals captured on camera. Play slideshow Barcroft 1 of 111 Comedy Wildlife Awards 2016

“Then we are taking the samples to test and work out what is going on here because they are an endangered species and we want to do the best conservation management we can.” Prof Meredith stressed that although the leprosy impacts red squirrels in the same way it does on people, there is no threat to humans. Chris Thain, Brownsea Island’s nature reserve manager, said the number of red squirrels affected by leprosy is small and those that do rarely die as a direct result.

GETTY North American grey squirrels killed nearly all the red squirrels because they carry a deadly pox",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
209874,"XPOSURE•GETTY David Beckham has hit back at people slamming him on the internet for this picture

Harper Beckham, Victoria and David's youngest child, is still using a dummy aged four, it's been revealed. While the world jumped on their high horse and judged her parents for letting her have a dummy for so long, they didn't expect a response. But it clearly got to former footballer David who snapped back at the paper who reported the 'shocking' news. He said: ""Why do people feel they have the right to criticize a parent about their own children without having any facts ?? ""Everybody who has children knows that when they aren't feeling well or have a fever you do what comforts them best and most of the time it's a pacifier so those who criticize think twice about what you say about other people's children because actually you have no right to criticize me as a parent …""

Why do people feel they have the right to criticize a parent about their own children without having any facts ?? Everybody who has children knows that when they aren't feeling well or have a fever you do what comforts them best and most of the time it's a pacifier so those who criticize think twice about what you say about other people's children because actually you have no right to criticize me as a parent ... A photo posted by David Beckham (@davidbeckham) on Aug 10, 2015 at 9:23am PDT

But the dummy debate isn't a new concept, in fact it's a war between parenting styles that's been around as long as pacifiers themselves. It was once reported the use of a dummy is shown to reduce the risk of cot death - but there is little evidence to back this claim up. On Mumsnet, a topic-board site specifically for mothers, a fierce debate has ensured about whether or not to use the soothing items. One new mum wrote: ""I dislike dummies. I hate the way they look, they way they sound, the price of them, and especially the way you see older children walking around talking with them in.

It’s hard to learn to talk with a dummy in your mouth NHS advice",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
68327,"Arsenal have released images of their new Puma strip ahead of the new season, with several high-profile players participating in the photoshoot.

Sanchez, Ozil and Bellerin have all been tipped to leave the Emirates this summer but Gunners fans will be pleased to see them taking part in pre-season publicity.

Chilean frontman Sanchez has attracted interest from Bayern Munich and Manchester City while talks concerning Ozil’s new contract stalled at the end of last season.

Bellerin has been linked with a return to Barcelona while Olivier Giroud, who also took part in the launch, has reportedly been subject to interest from West Ham United.

The new strip was officially launched at Kings Cross station on Wednesday, with club legends Robert Pires and Martin Keown in attendance.

Scroll through the gallery above to see the best pictures as Arsenal unveil their new home kit.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
1278,"GETTY A father accused of murdering his baby daughter has described throwing her onto a sofa

John Burrill, 31, admitted causing the injuries which led to two-month-old Daisy-Mae's death, but denied her murder. Preston Crown Court heard the Fleetwood father had got up in the early hours of March 11 after the baby woke crying. The B & M Bargains store worker said he had been up with Daisy-Mae for about an hour and a half in the night to feed her and had about 15 or 20 minutes of sleep before she woke again. He said his girlfriend, Ashlee Cox, tried to calm the baby with a dummy but she continued to cry so he took her downstairs in their terraced home in Warren Street.

PA Preston Crown Court heard the father had got up in the early hours after the baby woke crying

Burrill told the court the baby had gone back to sleep by the time he got downstairs but began to cry again so he picked her up. He said: ""I was just trying to get her to settle again."" He added: ""Then I lost my temper a little bit, well quite a lot, to be honest. ""I think the tiredness just took over and I really lost my rag and I threw her down onto the couch."" Burrill, of Gordon Street, told the court the throw was ""quite forceful"" and when he picked her up he realised there were hard items, including a baby monitor, on the sofa where she had landed.

He said the baby was still crying when he picked her up and gave her a ""cuddle"" but then she stopped so he put her back into her Moses basket. Burrill, who told the court he felt ""horrible"" after throwing his daughter, said: ""I thought she'd gone to sleep so I thought I'd put her down and get ready to go back upstairs again."" The father, who told the court he and Miss Cox spent £100-£200 a week on cannabis at the time, said he went into the kitchen and made a small cannabis joint which he smoked in the back garden. He said he returned to the house and sat watching TV for no more than five minutes before he realised he could not hear Daisy-Mae making any noise.

GETTY He said he went into the kitchen and made a small cannabis joint which he smoked in the back garden

He told the court he picked the baby up and could not feel her breathing so he ran upstairs with her to Miss Cox. The couple checked the baby but could feel no breathing or heartbeat so Burrill rang for an ambulance, the court heard. Daisy-Mae spent three and a half days in hospital before a decision was made to turn off her life support machine on March 14. But, the court heard Burrill did not admit causing her injuries until two weeks before his trial.

PA The court heard Burrill did not admit causing her injuries until two weeks before his trial",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
322919,"The image shows Diana looking over Princess Charlotte

The edited snap shows the late Princess of Wales cooing over her granddaughter, held by her mother Kate at her christening. It has been shared more than 267,000 times on Facebook and has generated more than 31,000 likes and over 2,539 comments since it was posted on August 4. The picture of Kate carrying Princess Charlotte into the service at St Magdalene Church in Sandringham in July has been merged with a photo of Diana greeting Mother Teresa in 1997.

Advertisement

The original image of Diana bending down with her hands clasped together was taken in August 1997 - just two months before her tragic death in a car crash in Paris. While some Diana fans have praised the ""touching"" and ""beautiful"" image, others have called the Photoshopped image ""creepy"" and ""tasteless"". One Facebook user commented: ""This is beautiful…yes the way it should have been"", while another said: ""So very touching"".

FACEBOOK The image has divided opinion on social media

Others, however, felt the picture was disturbing to say the least. One Facebook user said: ""Loved Diana but this is creepy. Sorry.""

Advertisement

Another blasted: ""Why would you EVER think it's cool or sweet to photoshop a picture of a man's dead mother onto a picture of his wide and child?"" Since Diana's death at the age of 36, Prince William has ensured his mother's memory lives on, choosing 'Diana' as one of his daughter's middle names. Charlotte's service was also held at the same church where her grandmother was baptised in 1961.

GETTY A family portrait by Diana's favourite photographer Mario Testino

Diana's favourite photographer Mario Testino was even chosen to take official photographs of the royal family at Charlotte's christening. The family snap was shared by a woman called Mary Kohnke, of Milwaukee, Wisconsin, with the caption: ""What a great job with photoshopping…Let's make this go viral!"" It created by an American called Lori Eastwood, who creates “Diana photo blends every Sunday in her memory” according to The Independent.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
148998,"Jose Mourinho has not been convinced by his defence and is looking to make signings in January following Manchester United’s 4-0 thrashing at Chelsea.



United got back to winning ways with a 1-0 EFL Cup victory over local rivals Manchester City on Wednesday night, with his defence keeping just their third clean sheet in 11 games.



But according to the Daily Mail, United defenders Chris Smalling, Daley Blind and Marcos Rojo are all fighting for their futures.

GETTY Jose Mourinho is preparing to overhaul his Manchester United defence with five stars undre threat

GETTY Jose Mourinho is not sure about his Manchester United defence

Manchester United predicted team to face Burnley Fri, October 28, 2016 Express Sport brings you Manchester United's predicted team to face Burnley in the Premier League Play slideshow Getty Images 1 of 12 Express Sport brings you Manchester United's predicted team to face Burnley

Matteo Darmian could also be sold in January while left-back Luke Shaw has apparently yet to convince Mourinho either.



Eric Bailly, who Mourinho signed for £30million from Spanish side Villarreal this summer, has impressed the Red Devils boss but he is now out for two months with a knee injury.



Blind and Rojo filled in at centre-back against City, while Smalling could return from a muscle problem in time to face Burnley at Old Trafford tomorrow (3pm).



But the trio’s long-term future at Manchester United appears uncertain, with Mourinho said to be keen to sign a right-back and centre-back in January.

GETTY Manchester United's defence, captained by Chris Smalling, shipped four goals against Chelsea

GETTY Luke Shaw has yet to convince Manchester United boss Jose Mourinho",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
170708,"Lieutenant General Sir James Dutton took the unprecedented step to stand down from his role as Her Majesty’s Governor and Commander in Chief of the British overseas territory less than two years after leaving a lucrative career to take up the position.

His tenure has seen the ramping up of Spanish aggression against Gibraltar, with illegal border controls causing havoc on the tiny territory, and a increase in illegal maritime incursions – as many as 245 over a two-month in 2014.

Last night sources close to the Sir James who, as a Royal Marine, became second in command of Nato forces in Afghanistan, said he felt he had been “sold a duff” after increasing friction with the Foreign Office made it clear the role would just be ceremonial.

The Sunday Express has learned that, while he had been unhappy with his position for some time, it was only after the Conservative Party’s election victory earlier this month, and the decision to keep Europe Minister David Lidington in post, that he took the decision to finally leave.

In his resignation speech, Sir James said the job was “more representational and ceremonial than I had expected”. His shock announcement left the Foreign Office scrabbling to find a suitable replacement before September, when he will take his leave.

However one close source said last night: “When he was invited to become Governor, he assumed it was because of his military career. He was very much of a mind that the Royal Navy’s presence should be increased in Gibraltar, and that Gibraltar’s reaction to Spanish incursions should be more robust.

“In the event, he was met with increasing frustration by the way the Foreign Office dealt with the Spanish question.”

Other sources suggested that he faced mounting friction with Alison MacMillan, formerly Gibraltar’s deputy Governor who now heads the Foreign office’s Gibraltar desk.

Sir James’s 37-year-career with the Royal Marines saw him become deputy commander of the Nato-led International Security Assistance Force in Afghanistan in 2008, before leaving the service in 2010 to join the engineering conglomerate Bechtel as principle vice president.

Responsible for overseeing a complete overhauling of Gabon’s infrastructure, he had settled his family in the West African nation before “getting the call” to become Governor of Gibraltar.

“Jim is one of those rare chaps who managed to follow a highly successful military career with an equally successful civilian one,” said a friend.

“He gave it all up – and it was a lot to give up - for Gibraltar, because he was led to believe that he could make a difference. He assumed his military career was the reason he was wanted. Instead what he got was pomp but no real power”.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
73712,"GETTY Liverpool boss Jurgen Klopp is looking to make big signings this summer

Reds manager Jurgen Klopp wants to team up again with the German talent he nurtured to stardom at Borussia Dortmund and bring him to Anfield.



Gotze is set to leave Bayern Munich with new coach Carlo Ancelotti prepared to overlook the winger - whose goal won the World Cup for Germany in 2014 - in his plans for next season.



Liverpool have already begun the process of trying to persuade Gotze to move to Merseyside rather than return to former club Dortmund and will do everything they can to secure his signing.

Jurgen Klopp's special relationship with Mario Gotze Tue, March 29, 2016 Liverpool fans should brace themselves for plenty of tender moments if Mario Gotze rejoins former boss Jurgen Klopp at Anfield Play slideshow Bongarts/Getty Images 1 of 13 Liverpool fans will have to get used to plenty of tender moments between Jurgen Klopp and Mario Gotze if the German World Cup winner reunites with his former boss at Anfield in the summer

That is likely to mean they would offer to make Gotze one of the highest paid players at the club, and the Anfield hierarchy are determined to back Klopp's judgement after the impact he has made in his first months at the club.



Gotze has also been making discreet enquiries about Liverpool as he readies himself for his next career move to revive his fortunes.



The 23-year-old is valued at around £20m by Bayern with his contract set to expire at the end of next season.

Liverpool are also embroiled in a battle with Dortmund over Ousmane Dembele, Rennes' teenage whizzkid who is one of Europe's most-sought after talents.



Anfield scouts have made regular checks on Dembele, who was voted Ligue 1's Young Player of the Year last week and is the sort of up-and-coming talent they are interested in.



But Dembele has so far indicated a preference to move to the Bundesliga with Dortmund in prime position to land him a deal that could be worth £28million.



Meanwhile, Christian Benteke is still expected to leave Liverpool this summer in search of regular first team football.

What's in Jurgen Klopp's office? Sun, May 1, 2016 Ever wondered what a Premier League manager has in his office? Play slideshow Liverpool FC via Getty Images 1 of 17 Have you ever wondered what Jurgen Klopp keeps in his office at Melwood?",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
304606,"George Lomas was sued by his late wife's carer after her hours were cut from 30 to 16 [NEWSTEAM]

Devastated George Lomas, 77, was stunned when Jayne Wakefield – who he treated “like a daughter” – told him she was taking him to an employment tribunal for breach of contract. The 55-year-old resigned after having her hours cut when George’s wife Rose, 76, passed away. East Cheshire Council paid Ms Wakefield for 30 hours a week to care for Rose, who had Parkinson’s disease. But she quit and launched legal proceedings against frail George after her hours were slashed to 16 when Rose died on March 4. A Birmingham tribunal awarded Ms Wakefield £3,569 in compensation for constructive dismissal after a judge agreed she had been treated unfairly.

Jayne Wakefield took George to an employment tribunal to make him pay her £3,500 [NEWSTEAM]

George must pay the bill as he is classed as Ms Wakefield’s employer because the council stopped paying for Rose’s care after her death. The retired accountant was ordered to pay £1,097 damages for failing to notify termination of her employment and £2,472 in redundancy payments. George, of Scholar Green, Cheshire, said yesterday: “Rose would be turning in her grave if she knew what was going on. Jayne Wakefield even had the cheek to come to us after the funeral and ask for redundancy money. “It’s ruined my health. I’ve had an outbreak of Parkinson’s and a mini-stroke. My doctor told me it has been brought on by the stress of this case. “How was I supposed to give notice? You don’t have notice when your wife is going to die.”

George's health was affected by the tribunal as he had an outbreak of Parkinson's and a mini-stroke [POSED BY MODELS/GETTY]

Rose would be turning in her grave if she knew what was going on. Jayne Wakefield even had the cheek to come to us after the funeral and ask for redundancy money George Lomas",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
232557,"Anastacia spoke out about her double mastectomy to raise awareness of breast cancer [REX]

In February, the American, known for hits including Left Outside Alone and I’m Outta Love, had to cancel her European tour, due to start in London, after she received her second shocking diagnosis.

At the time she broke the news on her website, telling fans she planned to make a “full recovery” with the help of family and friends. In July she said she had beaten the disease.

But it has now emerged that she has had the radical surgery – which actress Angelina Jolie also bravely endured this year as a preventative measure.

Anastacia, 45, had a partial mastectomy and radiotherapy after being first diagnosed in 2003.

In a statement released yesterday, she said: “In light of Breast Cancer Awareness Month I wanted to take the opportunity to support a cause particularly close to my heart. I was diagnosed with breast cancer for the second time earlier this year and am in the final stages of recovery after undergoing a double mastectomy.

“It has been an intense journey but I am feeling great and ready to start the next chapter.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
100738,"The 22-year-old joins the current Ligue 1 champions from AS Monaco after passing a medical, costing PSG a reported £16million.

The news will likely comes as a blow to Premier League pair Arsenal and Manchester United, how have both been linked with summer moves.

""I am very happy to have joined a club, and a project, as ambitious as Paris Saint-Germain,"" the left-back said.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
234321,"Dutch parent Hans de Borst used the open letter, posted on Facebook, to describe 17-year-old Elsemiek’s plans for the future, plans she will never fulfil.

I hope you’re proud to have shot her and that you will be able to look at yourself in the mirror tomorrow morning

He wrote : “Thank you very much Mister Putin, leaders of the separatists or the Ukraine government...for murdering my loved and only child, Elsemiek de Borst!

“I hope you’re proud to have shot her and that you will be able to look at yourself in the mirror tomorrow morning.”

He signed it “Hans de Borst – whose life is ruined”.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
59887,"NC Brain Cox has slammed TV bosses for banning the film

Dundee-born Cox features as Marlon Brando, with Joseph Fiennes as the Thriller singer and Stockard Channing as Elizabeth Taylor in 30-minute comedy Urban Myths. It was dropped from Sky Arts' February schedule after Jackson's daughter, Paris, said it made her ""want to vomit"". However, Cox claims none of the Jackson family have seen the film and that black actors were not interested in the role.

He also says the writer, fellow Scot Neil Forsyth, wanted a woman to play the late singer. Cox, 70, said: ""A number of black actors were approached, who declined. ""Originally, they were going after a woman because they wanted this satirical element. They didn't get the woman or the black actors, so they resorted to a white actor.""

NC Casting a white man to play Michael Jackson sparked outrage across the world

Michael Jackson: A life in pictures Sat, August 29, 2015 Michael Jackson would have been 57 today. We take a look back at the life and times of the King of pop. Play slideshow Getty 1 of 17 Michael Jackson during the HIStory world tour in 1996

Cox, who was awarded a CBE in 2003 for his services to drama, added: ""I said a year ago, you're making a stick for your own back because people aren't going to like that.

A number of black actors were approached, who declined Brian Cox

""I predicted what would happen and it happened."" Paris, who lost her father in 2009, had tweeted: ""I'm so incredibly offended, it honestly makes me want to vomit. ""It angers me to see how obviously intentional it was for them to be this insulting.""

GETTY Paris Jackson said the casting choice 'made her want to vomit'",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
346810,"But he acknowledged that a call made by an attendee at a public meeting for Esther McVey to be lynched was not justified, and insisted he was not endorsing it when he later repeated it. The Hayes and Harlington MP has come under pressure at Labour's annual conference in Liverpool to apologise for the remarks, with Labour former frontbencher Yvette Cooper describing them as ""really, really not OK"". But, in a second successive day of TV questioning on the issue, he refused to back down, saying he was driven by ""justifiable anger"" over the impact of welfare cuts overseen by Ms McVey on disabled people, some of whom had taken their own lives after being stripped of benefits.

Advertisement

Mr McDonnell told ITV's Good Morning Britain: ""Let's be absolutely clear, I didn't call for her to be lynched at all. I simply reported what had been shouted at me at a public meeting. ""You have to be honest in politics, you have to express how you feel. And I'm angry still about the role Esther McVey and her Government played.""

GETTY McDonnell called McVey a 'stain on humanity'

GETTY Labour's Yvette Cooper described the comments as 'really, really not OK'

Advertisement

Asked whether he accepted that it was inappropriate to call for an MP to be lynched, Mr McDonnell said: ""Of course, and I wasn't endorsing that. I was reporting what was being said, I wasn't endorsing it at all.

""I've always distanced myself from that sort of language. I don't believe in any threats of abuse or violence and I've said that continuously."" He added: ""I reported what was said but I am not apologising for the words I used in parliamentary debate. ""Of course you have to be constrained in your language, but also you have to be honest about how you feel. And sometimes there's such a thing as justifiable anger.

""That doesn't justify words like 'lynching' or anything else but in the parliamentary debate. if you look at my words. you will see it is an honest expression of the anger and anguish I felt in dealing with these families."" Mr McDonnell said he had repeatedly called on the former minister to carry out an impact assessment of the suffering caused by fitness-for-work tests being imposed on claimants, and she had refused to do so. Describing how he spoke with the family of a depressed man who committed suicide after losing benefits because he was deemed able to work, he said: ""Those people asking me to apologise should go and meet those families and they'll see that I have got a justifiable anger and so have a lot of other people.""

Batman: The Telltale Series 'Realm of Shadows' screenshots Batman: The Telltale Series 'Realm of Shadows' screenshots Batman: The Telltale Series 'Realm of Shadows' screenshots Batman: The Telltale Series 'Realm of Shadows' screenshots Batman: The Telltale Series 'Realm of Shadows' screenshots Batman: The Telltale Series 'Realm of Shadows' screenshots Batman: The Telltale Series 'Realm of Shadows' screenshots Batman: The Telltale Series 'Realm of Shadows' screenshots Batman: The Telltale Series 'Realm of Shadows' screenshots Batman: The Telltale Series 'Realm of Shadows' screenshots

GETTY McDonnell defended his comments saying 'you have to honest in politics'",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
232340,"The average home in London now costs £530,409

The average home in the capital now costs £530,409 - up from £458,283 in January 2015, according to the Land Registry.

This works out a £72,126 over as 12 month period or £1,387 per week - more than twice the average UK salary.

The average home in England and Wales now stands at £191,812, an annual increase of 7.1 per cent.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
88127,"The Red Devils are reportedly in for a new striker following Radamel Falcao's return to Monaco.

Manchester United have made a bid for Carlos Bacca, according to the Metro .

David de Gea looks set to stay at Manchester United for one more season, according to the Daily Star.

Real Madrid are believed to be interested in signing the Spain international this summer.

However, Rafa Benitez is reportedly happy to stick with Iker Casillas and will instead move for De Gea next year if he becomes a free agent.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
86455,"This new underwear has been designed to protect male fertility

Described by Sir Richard Branson as ""underpants for superheroes"", a new line of Wireless Armour underwear has been developed to protect mens' manhood from harmful mobile phone rays.

In more technical terms, the smart underwear protects male fertility from radiation emitted by smartphones and laptops.

The underwear contains a mesh of pure silver woven into the fabric that reportedly helps to shield against 99.9% of electromagnetic radiation. This type of radiation is emitted from devices like smartphones, tablets and laptops, and has been linked to fertility problems by scientists.

Inventor, British scientist Joseph Perkins, said the growing popularity of smart, but radiation-emitting, devices prompted him to take action.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
801,"GETTY Brain health: Alzheimer's and dementia are different

Dementia is the gradual decline of the brain and its abilities, including memory, thinking speed, mental agility, language, understanding and judgement. The risk of developing it increases as you get older, but it usually occurs in those over 65, meaning the number of sufferers is increasing as people are living longer. According to the Alzheimer’s Society, an estimated one million of the UK population will have it by 2021. Alzheimer’s disease is a type of dementia, and currently affects 850,000 people in this country. While increasing age is thought to be a factor, family history, lifestyle factors and past head injuries can also be a cause. Becoming forgetful is usually the first indication of Alzheimer’s, but other symptoms gradually develop, including confusion, difficulty making decisions, hallucinations, personality changes and problems with speech.

GETTY Brain news: the number of sufferers is rising

Alzheimer's accounts for two-thirds of dementia cases - but there are other causes, including strokes, head injuries and brain tumours.

Despite their similarities, there are several reasons why they should be thought of as different. 1. Alzheimer’s causes dementia It accounts for two-thirds of dementia cases, according to Alzheimer’s Research UK. However, there are many other known causes of dementia, including strokes, head injuries and brain tumours. A recent study by the University of Oxford also found that having an autoimmune disease can up your risk, and according to another recent study published in The Lancet, so can living in urban areas close to traffic.

Early signs of Dementia Tue, December 20, 2016 Dementia affects the ability to remember, think and reason. Here are the early signs to look out for in yourself and loved ones. Play slideshow Getty Images 1 of 12 Early signs of dementia

2. Unlike dementia, we know very little about the cause of Alzheimer’s In addition to suggestions by researchers that family history probably plays a role, a recent study by the University of Bath suggested that a diet high in sugar was to blame, while another 2016 study published in the British Medical Journal found that taking benzodiazepine to calm your nerves or sleep better, could trigger the disease. All we currently know for certain is that there are changes in the brain beyond those associated with normal ageing, according to Alzheimer’s Research UK. Researchers are currently looking into why two key proteins build up in the brain, and how they damage nerve cells. 3. Alzheimer’s is a disease, but dementia is not Dementia is a syndrome - which means a group of symptoms that consistently occur together, not a specific disease - In fact, it’s just the term to group memory loss, difficulty thinking, problem solving, or issues with language, together.

GETTY Brain illness: the symptoms vary greatly

4. The diagnosis for both is different A person diagnosed with dementia is actually only being diagnosed with a set of symptoms. After blood tests, mental status evaluation, neuropsychological testing, and sometimes a brain scan, doctors can accurately diagnose the cause of the dementia symptoms in 90 percent of cases, according to the Mayo Clinic. Alzheimer’s disease, on the other hand, can only be diagnosed with complete accuracy after death when a proper examination of brain tissue can take place. 5. There are several types of dementia In addition to Alzheimer’s, other types of dementia include vascular dementia, Parkinson’s disease and Huntington’s disease. An estimated 10 per cent of people with dementia have more than one type. According to The Alzheimer’s Society the most common combination is Alzheimer’s Disease and vascular dementia.

GETTY Brain condition: Alzheimer's and dementia can be hugely debilitating",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
119214,"Hail Caesar, indeed. Excited fans are tweeting abourt early screenings and the advance word is incredible. The film isn't out in US cinemas until July 14 but the lucky few who have seen it already are going ape, or even, dare we say, bananas. Reviews are strictly embargoes but the cheeky folk have already posted their reactions online including a senior editor at Rotten Tomatoes.

FS War For The Planet Of The Apes: First reactions

Scott Mantz‏ from Access Hollywood wrote in a flurry of capital letters:"" It's OFFICIAL! #WarForThePlanetOfTheApes is AMAZING! Deep, dark, EPIC! RISE + DAWN + WAR = one of the BEST MOVIE TRILOGIES EVER! #HailCaesar. ""The BEST movie of the summer is HERE! #WarForThePlanetOfTheApes is a LANDMARK TRIUMPH! Gripping, intense, powerful, moving, MAGNIFICENT!"" The movie, which stars British actor Andy Serkis as the heroic ape Caesar, is picking up universal acclaim.

Unbelievable celebrity movie transformations Tue, August 22, 2017 Most shocking celebrity movie transformations from Christian Bale's 60lbs weightloss in The Machinist, to Gwyneth Paltrow's fat suit in Shallow Hal. Play slideshow Flynet•Getty 1 of 30 Margot Robbie looks unrecognisable as Queen Elizabeth I for Mary Queen of Scots

Rotten Tomatoes Senior Editor Grae Drake added her praise. She wrote: ""I just had the pleasure of seeing #WarForThePlanet of the Apes. Jesus, you guys. Start hydrating now, you're going to need it. Wow. ""I’m dumbstruck by what they continue to accomplish. If you thought you had no more feels left after the Wolverine Movie, you are mistaken.""

TWITTER War For The Planet Of The Apes reactions",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
207367,"GETTY Vote Leave activist Boris Johnson attacked David Cameron's deal with Brussels

The anti-EU campaigner and ex-London mayor last night attacked David Cameron's failure to secure a better deal from Eurocrats. Johnson said: ""I have been a Eurosceptic for decades and was hoping the PM would achieve fundamental reform and full-on treaty change."" His comments came after the Prime Minister doubted Johnson's commitment to the Brexit cause ahead of next month's referendum.

That is why it was dropped from the Queen's Speech Boris Johnson

Johnson also blasted the Government for ditching plans to announce a ""so-called Sovereignty Bill” in the Queen's Speech. The process of trying to draw up measures to protect the supremacy of UK institutions had been a ""farce"", he said. The MP for Uxbridge and South Ruislip added: ""That is obviously why it has been dropped from the Queen's Speech.""

GETTY Johnson went on to criticise the Government for scrapping the Sovereignty Bill

The latest row came as the Government was accused of making a ""humiliating climbdown"" over the planned EU-US trade deal. Division in the Tory ranks over Europe could have led to an embarrassing Commons reverse over the proposed TTIP agreement. But Downing Street moved to avoid the possibility of defeat by indicating ministers would accept a cross-party amendment to the Queen's Speech.

Boris Johnson's funniest pictures Sun, July 17, 2016 Boris Johnson in pictures Play slideshow Getty•Reuters 1 of 39 Boris Johnson's funniest pictures",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
243344,"The blonde star has accused an unnamed man of getting into her car in west London and attacking her as she drove, allegedly punching her three times in the face before spitting at her.

Police confirm a 40-year-old man has been arrested and bailed until September (13).

Douvall, 34, famous for undergoing hundreds of cosmetic procedures, counts Simon Cowell among her former boyfriends.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
121634,"Suarez scored twice in Sao Paulo last night as Uruguay sealed a 2-1 win over Roy Hodgson's men. And after putting the Three Lions on the brink of an early exit from Brazil, Suarez consoled club team-mate Gerrard. The Reds striker had words of sympathy for the England skipper, admitting he does not enjoy seeing him lose.

""This is an unlucky moment for him,"" Suarez said. ""I don't like it when he hurts like this.""



""I said: 'Keep going, forget this game, you're one of the best.' He's the best player I've played with.""



England must now rely on other results going their way with a heavy victory needed against Costa Rica on Tuesday (5pm).",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
253678,"GETTY Seven good reasons to buy a Kia Sorento

1. Looks aren't everything. But in the modern car market, they count for a lot, as consumers prioritise design when buying a new car. Luckily for Kia, its design chief, Peter Schreyer, is one of the most creative in the business, so modern Kias aren't a million miles away from the cars that he used to design for Audi. The Sorento - with its smooth surfaces, sharp lines and bold nose - is yet another good-looking car that will win new fans for the brand. 2. Lots of equipment. One of the other reasons Kia has been so successful in recent years is that it includes a lot of useful equipment as standard in its cars - unlike many of its rivals (especially the premium ones). All variants have features such as air conditioning, privacy glass, cruise control, DAB radio and parking sensors, with only the entry-level cars not fitted with a touchscreen for the infotainment system.

GETTY Looks aren't everything, but in the modern car market they count for a lot

3. A comfortable cabin... The improvement in quality of Kia's cars has been marked in recent years and the Sorento is another rung on that ladder. Soft-touch plastics, comfortable seats and good-quality materials throughout the cabin is a sign that buyers will be more than happy to spend time in their new car. 4. ... and roomy, too. The Sorento has seven seats and there is a surprising amount of room for everyone. The front has plenty of room for the driver and passenger; the second row of three seats is also spacious, especially as they move backward and forward; and the pair of seats in the back , which lift up from the boot floor easily enough is fine for kids and smaller adults - and they even have their own air con controls, which isn't common in seven-seaters.

GETTY The Kia Sorento boasts a comfortable cabin

5. No choice? No problem. The Sorento just has one engine option, a 2.2-litre turbodiesel that produces 197bhp and meet the latest EU6 emissions regulations. It has start/stop technology to cut the engine temporarily when stationary, so emissions can be as low as 149g/km and official fuel consumption can be as high as 49.5mpg (figures aren't as good if you opt for an automatic transmission or when speccing up the car). Not bad for an SUV with a kerb weight of just under two tonnes. 6. But also plenty of choice. Four trim levels - KX-1 to KX-4 - mean that there's something for a wide spread of budgets, from £28,795 50 to £41,575, a spread that suggests just how far the company has come from its 'budget car' roots.

GETTY An incredibly roomy car",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
210550,"GETTY Could the Bank of England raise interates rates in May?

One of the eight Monetary Policy Committee (MPC) members - Kristin Forbes - is predicted to vote for an immediate rate hike in this month's meeting, with the outcome announced at 12pm on Thursday.



Michael Saunders could also call for a rise, according to experts.



The rest of the decision-making committee are set to vote for a hold, as the inflation report is also released.



Rates were slashed by half in August after Britain vote to leave the European Union (EU). But in the following months, economy growth smashed expectations - with some experts saying the Bank acted too soon by cutting rates.

At the same time inflation has surged, and is expected to hit around three per cent this year. Monetary policymakers is tasked with keeping price rises at two per cent, and one way to help halt inflation is to raise interest rates.



But the MPC is not expected to act as Brexit negotiations get under way and ahead of the UK general election.



The inflation report could also see the Bank downgrade its forecast growth, after initial predictions showed economy growth slowed in the first three months of 2017.





How much is your money worth? Mon, October 2, 2017 Rare coins: This is what you should be looking out for in your wallet. Play slideshow Getty Images 1 of 17 A faulty £1 coin which has the 2016 date on one side and 2017 in micro-inscriptions around the edge of the reverse is worth £3,000",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
227553,"The 55-year-old was mowed down by a heavy goods vehicle outside the University Hospital of Wales

The 55-year-old was mowed down by a heavy goods vehicle outside the University Hospital of Wales in Cardiff this morning.

But despite being virtually on the doorstep of A&E and the best efforts of his colleagues, the hospital worker, who has not been named, was pronounced dead at the scene.

Health bosses said the incident had left staff devastated.

Royal College of Nursing in Wales director Tina Donnelly said: ""Each day our organisation works to protect and support our nursing workforce.

""Tragic accidents such as this, which took place not too far from our headquarters, reminds us how precious life is.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
106933,"Sick pet owners abandoned the sweet dog along a motorway close to the Gibraltar border. Video footage, filmed by two animal volunteers on the motorway, captured the harrowing moment the dog chases after the car which speeds away. The animal, who does not realise he has been abandoned, runs after his owner's car for several kilometres until he is too tired to keep up.

CEN Dog chasing after family car when it’s abandoned by its owners

Animal lovers on social media have been left outraged by the callous family's behaviour. In the clip, a grey Sedan pulls over on a busy motorway and a passenger opens the door to shove the adorable pet out of the car. They then shut the door, before the driver then suddenly accelerates away - as the dog runs along the hard shoulder after the car as quickly as possible. The dog gives up its pursuit only when it appears too visibly tired to carry on.

The Civil Guard has appealed for witnesses

Several drivers tried to pick up the animal to make sure it was okay. However, according to the NGO group Prodean, the dog was too terrified of strangers and fled whenever people tried to feed the tragic animal. Prodean volunteers dropped food and water along the motorway but the dog was too nervous to come close. The Civil Guard in Spain has appealed for witnesses as animal abandonment is a crime in the country.

CEN One of the passengers opens the door and throws an adorable dog out of the car

CEN The clip was made public by activists of the local NGO Prodean",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
265576,"GETTY Martin Schulz, president, European Parliament

EU parliament chief Martin Schulz has called for an immediate deal with Cairo to close down the possibility of a sudden and massive rush for Europe. He said Brussels should strike a similar agreement to the one it has with Turkey, where all migrants arriving in Greece are immediately sent back across the Aegean Sea. And he threatened to pull the plug on aid funding to the impoverished North African country if it refuses to play ball and help the EU dig itself out of its migration hole. Egypt receives billions of pounds in loans from the International Monetary Fund and is also a recipient of EU foreign aid. Calling for a ""comprehensive"" migrant agreement with Egyptian leaders, he said: “This is the path we must take.”

Migrant Crisis: Mass exodus from the migrant camp continues Tue, October 25, 2016 Hundreds of migrants are continuing to arrive in Europe as they flee the scenes of chaos and brutality of the Islamic State in the Middle East. Play slideshow 1 of 224

He hailed the Turkey deal, which has brought the number of new arrivals down since it was implemented over the summer, describing it as a “model” for other countries. And he said the accorde, brokered by German chancellor Angela Merkel and Turkish president Recep Erdogan, proved that Europe could coordinate on curbing migration without “abandoning its principles.” Mr Schulz's comments, made in German newspaper Suddeutsche Zeitung today, come just two days after a boat crammed with hundreds of Egyptian refugees sank on Wednesday.

Getty Egyptian rescue workers bring bodies ashore at Port Rashid after the boat carrying migrants sank

More than 160 bodies have been recovered so far, according to Egyptian officials. Ahmed Darwish, an Egyptian survivor, said: ""The boat is meant to hold 200, and they put 400 in it. And this is what caused the catastrophe.""

Getty Crowds watch as bodies are brought ashore at Port Rashid, Egypt

The boat, which sank off Burg Rashed, a coastal village on the Nile Delta, was carrying Egyptian, Sudanese, Eritrean and Somali migrants and was heading to Italy. It was one of a number of ships smuggling people across the Mediterranean, with the Egyptian navy having stopped five boats carrying a total of 900 people in the past two weeks alone. Authorities have arrested four suspected people traffickers over the sinking, which comes just months after the EU border agency Frontex warned that growing numbers of Europe-bound migrants were using Egypt as a departure point for the dangerous voyage.

Getty Survivors from the boat which was carrying hundreds of migrants

Getty Survivors from the boat, at Rashid Police Station in Beheira, Egypt

“The Egyptian route is used mainly by migrants coming from Eastern African countries – Eritrea, Somalia, Sudan – and some coming from the Middle East.” Flavio di Giacomo, an IoM spokesman in Rome",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
279941,"Alastair Cook said lifitng the urn was a 'dream come true'

Kevin Pietersen led a thrilling run chase to leave England needing just 21 runs from the last four overs when the umpires called time on the match.

Yet Alastair Cook insisted it must not take away from what his team have achieved after a draw ensured a 3-0 series win – 4-0 would have been an Ashes record for England.

“Every one of those guys can be proud of what they’ve done,” he said.

“I’m very proud of the boys.

“For me to lift the urn is an incredible feeling. It is a dream come true.” England have won the Ashes for a third series in succession following the wins in 2009 and 2010-11 – something they have not achieved since the 1950s.

It was a shame the achievement was not marked with wild celebrations, a packed crowd at The Oval instead furious when the players were forced off early, booing the umpires.

Players from both sides said it was an unsatisfactory conclusion while ECB chairman Giles Clarke went further, calling for a rule change.

“It is totally unsatisfactory the way the game ended,” he said.

“The rules are clearly unacceptable and I expect ICC chief executive David Richardson to change them at the next ICC meeting.

“It’s a great moment, though, and the whole country should appreciate these players.”

England bowler Jimmy Anderson insisted the same group of players could improve before the teams lock horns again in the winter series in Australia.

He said: “We know we can go there and play even better. It feels pretty good to win this and it would have felt even better had we got the last few overs in there.

“But we must cherish the moment because these times don’t come along that often.”",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
293747,"The Blues are preparing a summer swoop for the France international - and had hoped to pay £40m.



But according to Pogba's agent Mino Raiola there is plenty of competition for the midfielder, who he expects his move to cost more than Cristiano Ronaldo's £80m transfer from Manchester United to Real Madrid in 2009.



""Pogba could go to one of six teams,"" Raiola said. ""When the right moment arrives this we will take it but moving isn't an objective itself. We're in no hurry.



""If he goes he will break Ronaldo's transfer record.""",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
143888,"“I'm with an impressive line-up in this backstage photo from 1986: (from left) me, Iggy Pop, Rick James and David Bowie. Iggy had just done a show at The Ritz in New York and just shines out of the picture – the energy that comes off that man is incredible.

I’ve always liked Iggy. He did an album, New Values, in the punk days that I played to death. When you see him live, the way he moves, what he does – nothing is planned.

It was the first time we’d met and I remember him saying: ‘Paul, great to see you. Did you enjoy the show?’ It seemed to matter to him.

Rick James was a force to be reckoned with. He was an underground success here but huge in the US – people used to compare him to Prince. Sadly, he had an early death.

I can’t remember what I said to David that night. I’d met him before and always found him an absolute gentleman. I was a bit awestruck.

I spent half an hour in his company, walked away and just thought: ‘Wow!’",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
196557,"The politician admitted “revolutionary change is never easy” but insisted leaving the European Union would end up being “good for Britain”. Speaking on BBC Radio 4’s Any Questions?, the Brexit supporter also insisted any role for the European Court of Justice (ECJ) after the UK leaves the bloc was “unacceptable”. He said: “The British people voted to leave the EU, it would be a dereliction of duty if Parliament or anyone else tried to thwart the will of the British people – we are leaving.

GETTY Ian Paisley Jr called Brexit a ""revolution"" as he hit out at its critics

We’re in the midst of a revolution and revolutionary change is never easy but this revolution is good for Britain Ian Paisley Jr

“I think it’s important to make it very very clear we’re in the midst of a revolution and revolutionary change is never easy but this revolution is good for Britain and when we get out it will be better. “Now you’re absolutely right, it’s easy to pick holes… and some of the current marketing of policies and current marketing of things and it is important that clear messages should be established. “And unfortunately when clear messages have been established everyone is prepared to jump all over them and say that they are not clear messages. This revolution must go through.”

Brexit transition phase: Cabinet splits three ways Thu, August 10, 2017 Who is pushing for the most gradual departure possible from the EU? And who favours a cleaner break? Play slideshow AFP/Getty Images 1 of 15 HARD BREXIT: Andrea Leadsom",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
347592,"The first images of the ruins of Palmyra have been released

Destroyed ancient artefacts and dilapidated temples are all that is left of the Unesco World Heritage site of Palmyra after ruthless ISIS maniacs took hold of the precious area.



Syrian President Bashar al-Assad's troops finally reclaimed the city after 10 months under the rule of ISIS, but discovered little more than a ghost town remained.



Photographs show how the 2,000-year-old Temple of Bel and the Arch of Triumph have been turned to rubble.



ISIS had taunted authorities and the West in sinister videos showing the bombings of sites.

REUTERS The old citadel of Palmyra is pictured in the background after Assad retook the city

Advertisement

REUTERS A view shows a damaged artefact at the entrance of the museum

The director of Palmyra's museum had fled when ISIS appeared, but the city's retired antiquities chief was tortured for information about the site's treasures.

Reports suggest he was later beheaded.



But despite the chaos, some of the ruins appear to have survived.



Both the Agora, the city's most important meeting space, and the colonnade still seem to be in tact following the recapture of the city - known as ""the bride of the desert"".



The Roman amphitheatre - used by ISIS for staging beheadings - was also found undamaged.

Advertisement

REUTERS The damaged Lion of Al-Lat statue at the entrance of the museum

But the modern district of Palmyra, where 70,000 people lived before the war, was not as lucky as the old city.



After days of fighting, the rows of apartment buildings had collapsed into a pile of rubble.



Isis seized Palmyra in May 2015, gaining worldwide attention as the city was known to host some of the most well-preserved ruins in the world.



As well as destroying iconic temples, ISIS fighters looted graves and used the amphitheatre to stage executions.

REUTERS An aerial view of the historic city of Palmyra

REUTERS Soldiers take positions to watch over the city after recapturing it

But on Sunday, Syrian government forces backed by heavy Russian air support drove Islamic State out.



The loss of Palmyra is one of the biggest setbacks for the extreme Islamist group since it declared a caliphate in 2014 across large parts of Syria and Iraq.



President Assad confirmed the city would be rebuilt.

REUTERS A view shows a damaged artefact at the museum

Related videos ISIL militants driven out of ancient Syrian city of Palmyra

CLOSE

He was quoted on state television as saying: “Palmyra was demolished more than once through the centuries ... and we will restore it anew so it will be a treasure of cultural heritage for the world.”



Syrian state-run television also broadcast from inside the city, showing empty streets and badly damaged buildings.



Maamoun Abdelkarim, Syria’s antiquities chief, said authorities had been “expecting the worst”.



But he said “the landscape, in general, is in good shape”.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
310600,"Man Utd legends v Barcelona legends takes place at Old Trafford this afternoon

Why are Man Utd playing Barcelona?

Both clubs will have their legends on show in aid of charity.

Both teams will wear black armbands to commemorate the recent terror attacks in both cities, while a minute’s silence will also be held before the match.

Each side will have the name of their respective city on the back of their shirts.

Ticket sales from the match will also go towards Manchester United Foundation’s work with young people across Greater Manchester.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
308370,"Tara Palmer-Tomkinson dead: Best friend Duncan James and sister Santa Montefiore have paid tribute

The socialite's older sibling shared a touching tribute on her Instagram page while the Blue hitmaker spoke out about his late ""mischievous"" friend.

The 45-year-old was found dead at her London home after being diagnosed with a brain tumour in January last year.

Taking to the picture-sharing app, Santa, 47, posted a smiley, black and white photo of Tara with her 1,091 followers.

She movingly captioned it: ""My darling sister. I miss you,"" and it quickly received a number of sympathetic comments and likes.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
192496,"GETTY•TWITTER Michael Barnier appeared to mock Brexit on Twitter

Michael Barnier, the former French foreign minister, posted a smiling photo of himself outside the Museum of Broken Relationships in Zagreb. The picture was captioned ""EU27 consultations : guess where we are today? (no pun intended)"".

TWITTER Michael Barnier posted this snap on Twitter, seemingly in reference to Brexit

Mr Barnier was a controversial choice for Brexit negotiator when he was appointed by EU president Jean Claude Juncker, with some commentators describing it as ""an act of war"". During his time as Commissioner for the Internal Market and Financial Services, Mr Barnier was described as ""the most dangerous man in Europe"" after taking on the banking sector and championing a cap on bankers' bonuses. Having repeatedly clashed with the financial services industry, Mr Barnier had a strained relationship with London, with one British paper calling him the ""scourge of the city"".

GETTY Michael Barnier was a controversial choice by the EU, which some called 'an act of war'

Last week, it was revealed Mr Barnier wanted all Brexit discussions conducted in his native tongue. A source told Reuters: ""Barnier wants French to be the working language in Brexit negotiations with Britain."" An EU spokeswoman was later forced to stress that this was not an official plan, claiming: ""There is no language regime for the negotiations.""

GETTY As the EU struggles to reach a trade deal with Canada, Donald Tusk admits it's worrying

Despite the denial, the demands from Mr Barnier, who speaks fluent English, sent a clear message to Prime Minister Theresa May that the European Union will be putting its own interests first when it begins the complex divorce with the UK. Yesterday, saw the EU's reputation as a credible economic force weakening, as it struggled to complete the CETA trade deal with Canada. The groundbreaking agreement should be signed today, but has so far been vetoed by Belgium's Wallonia region over concerns for workers' rights. Crisis talks to save the deal are now in place with Belgium's top politicians, as Donald Tusk, the European Council's President, yesterday admitted its collapse would set a worrying precedent for the EU.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
155073,"GETTY Akio Toyoda has vowed to keep Toyota in the UK even if voters opt for Brexit

Akio Toyoda, chief executive of the Japanese multinational, has promised to keep the company’s large assembly plant in Burnaston, Derbyshire running for at least the next 75 years. Along with its engine plant in Deeside, North Wales, the leading car brand employs close to 4,000 people in the UK.

Those wanting Britain to remain tied to Brussels at the upcoming in/out referendum on Britain’s EU membership have regularly warned up to three million British jobs could be put at risk by a vote to leave the 28-member bloc. But the vow by Mr Toyoda, the great-grandson of Toyota’s founder, is just the latest dismissal of such concerns. It also represents a snub to David Cameron, with the Prime Minister believed to have tried to keep top business bosses quiet until he finishes his renegotiation of Britain’s EU membership. Revealing how Toyota had buried a time capsule under its Burnaston plant 25 years ago, Mr Toyoda told the Financial Times his company would still be there to open the capsule after 100 years. He said: “From now on, like Japan, we may face some pretty tough times in the UK market. “But we want to deepen our roots to deliver ever better cars, so when that capsule is opened after 100 years, all can see we’ve built a truly British company.”

GETTY Toyota employs nearly 4,000 people in Britain

Three million jobs are not at risk if we vote for independence, instead we have the opportunity to be a country free from Brussels bureaucracy which is open for business. Ukip MEP Jane Collins

The Burnaston plant made 172,288 Toyota vehicles in 2014, representing more than 10 per cent of the UK’s total car production. Toyota has now joined a string of car manufacturers to dismiss fears over Britain’s possible exit from the EU. Last year the boss of Vauxhall, Tim Tozer, claimed he would be untroubled if voters opted to cut ties with Brussels, while JCB chairman Lord Bamford said Britain should not fear leaving EU. Nissan Europe chairman Paul Willcox has also claimed his company’s investment in a North-East manufacturing plant would continue irrespective of Britain’s decision to leave or remain in the EU. Ukip’s employment spokeswoman Jane Collins welcomed Toyota’s vow to remain in the UK, whatever the result of the EU referendum. The Yorkshire and North Lincolnshire MEP said “the death knell” was now ringing for europhiles’ scaremongering over Britain’s economic prospects outside the EU. She added: ""Three million jobs are not at risk if we vote for independence, instead we have the opportunity to be a country free from Brussels bureaucracy which is open for business. ""As we see today, 4,000 people employed by Toyota in the East Midlands may soon be joined by more workers. ""The only jobs at risk are the lobbyists, European Commission staff and of course MEPs like myself. ""EU regulation has cost this country jobs; just look at the steel industry for one example. “The sooner we can throw off the shackles of the EU the better off we will all become.""",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
82897,"In a swipe at Brexit voters, the SNP leader said the backlash against the establishment was fuelled by racism. She added: “The last 12 months have seen a narrative develop that the established political and social order is under threat as never before in modern times. “Reactionary forces, some of them fuelled by intolerance and xenophobia, have been seen to be in the ascendency.”

Getty Nicola Sturgeon, Scotland's First Minister, addresses the parliament in Edinburgh

Writing in The National, she added: “The proposals we have published – which would allow Scotland to remain in the single market in what has been described as the “Norway-style” option, are not without their challenges or complexities. “I do not pretend that it will be easy – but this is not a situation of our making, and we are the first and so far only government in the UK to bring forward concrete proposals in the wake of the Brexit vote.” But Daniel Kenealy, a lecturer in devolution and the EU at the University of Edinburgh Lecturer, dismissed Ms Sturgeon’s plan for Scotland after Article 50 has been triggered as merely “an exercise in creative thinking”.

Sturgeon's top moments Fri, December 9, 2016 Scotland's First Minister Nicola Sturgeon in pictures. Play slideshow Getty Images 1 of 33 Nicola Sturgeon visits Glaxo Smith Kline.

The last 12 months have seen a narrative develop that the established political and social order is under threat as never before in modern times. Reactionary forces, some of them fuelled by intolerance and xenophobia, have been seen to be in the ascendenc Scotland First Minister Nicola Sturgeon

He wrote: “The proposal [for Scotland to join the EEA via EFTA and staying as part of the UK] is all-but-impossible and the legal, political and technical barriers standing in the way of it are high, and almost certainly insurmountable.” Mr Kenealy’s blog for the London School of Economics briefly outlines some of the main problems Scotland would face.

NA University of Edinburgh Lecturer Daniel Kenealy

- Scotland would have to be an independent state to be able to join the European Free Trade Association (EFTA) - To meet the conditions of EEA and EFTA membership virtually all areas of Scotland’s policies would have to be devolved, including immigration, employment law and business regulations - While EEA agreements have allowed for some bending of the rules, as with Denmark and the Faroe Islands, Sturgeon’s comparison of Scotland with a population of 5.3 million to the small island group is “stretching the sinews of credibility

Overall, he dismissed the entire SNP proposals as “dishonest” and “shallow in terms of policy”. Mr Kenealy surmises the reasons for Ms Sturgeon’s stance, even though clearly impossible, is down to “politics” and he claims it to be “politically savvy” and a move to try to secure a second independence referendum.

Getty Nicola Sturgeon, Scotland's First Minister",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
185480,"BBC2 Kate takes us in to the world of working farm dogs and feral forest sheep

It’s normally necessary to extract information out of him with thumbscrews but this time he returned full of something almost like enthusiasm. “They actually do stuff there!” he said. “It’s not just fields and trees and that.” On our increasingly urban island we get few opportunities to see the life of the countryside close up. Those of us beyond the school trip age have to make do with Springwatch and last night’s gem Kate Humble: My Sheepdog and Me (BBC2). This took us into the little-glimpsed world of working farm dogs and feral forest sheep. It’s a world where people still drive their beasts down from high pastures and where committees debate whether a dog is “Welsh” enough.

Centre stage throughout was the delightful presence of Teg, Kate Humble’s Welsh sheepdog. It would be pointless trying to describe a Welsh sheepdog, as they have no particular characteristics. Selectively bred over centuries for their shepherding skills, the mark of a Welsh sheepdog is how it herds sheep. At least that was what we were told at the outset. Like most working dog breeds, Welsh sheepdogs are in serious decline and it was Kate’s intention to lend a hand by breeding a litter of pups from Teg.

BBC2 Kate with Teg the sheepdog

The ensuing hour, as Kate herself said, was like a Jane Austen novel in which the TV presenter, in the role of pushy mother, went scouting out potential husbands for Teg at an assortment of country shows. Along the way we saw the dogs at work, up on mountains and flushing semi-wild runaways from the forests, and we delved into the peculiar science of breeding. I felt something like a lost lamb at times, as the rules concerning breed-membership grew ever more perplexing. At first it seemed as if Kate was training Teg in order to activate her in-bred shepherding skills, since this was how the panel from the Welsh Sheepdog Society would determine her pedigree.

BBC2 It was Kate’s intention to lend a hand by breeding a litter of pups from Teg",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
101111,"GETTY Michy Batshuayi has scored 18 goals this season

Spurs are claimed to have held advanced negotiations with the forward, while West Ham are also said to be keen on a deal. The Brentwood Gazette claimed discussions over a £20million swoop for Batshuayi took place at the end of March. But fresh reports in Italy suggest a deal with Spurs is far from complete.

Englishmen who Tottenham boss Mauricio Pochettino has guided Tue, March 29, 2016 Mauricio Pochettino has guided a few star English players since arriving in the Premier League Play slideshow Getty Images 1 of 12 Mauricio Pochettino

According to Corriere dello Sport, Juventus have earmarked Batshuayi as a possible striker target this summer. The Belgium international boasts 18 goals for the season - although it has been a disappointing Ligue 1 campaign for mid-table Marseille. Juve are said to be eyeing a number of strikers as they prepare to lose Alvaro Morata to Real Madrid.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
162824,"YOUTUBE Daniel Radcliffe revealed why he's not in a hurry to see the Harry Potter play

The new play is the eighth story in the Harry Potter series, but is set 19 years after Harry Potter and the Deathly Hallows. The story focuses on the children of the books’ central characters, such as Scorpius Malfoy and Albus Severus Potter. It’s previews opened last Tuesday to fantastic first reviews, with tickets sold out well into 2017. But the question many fans have been wondering is whether the actors from the movie like Daniel Radcliffe will see it, and if not, why not…

YOUTUBE Radcliffe feels it would be too much with fans in the audience for now

When asked by Stephen Colbert in an interview, the Harry Potter star admitted that he hadn’t had the opportunity to see the West End two-parter yet. Radcliffe said: “I feel like I want to see the show. I am genuinely intrigued and I've heard it's fantastic.” What’s holding the star back from seeing the show is the over-excitment of fans in the audience.

Harry Potter stars then & now Mon, March 9, 2015 Pictures of the Harry Potter stars then and now, including Daniel Radcliffe, Emma Watson, Robert Pattinson and Matthew Lewis. Play slideshow IG/WENN 1 of 10 Harry Potter played by Daniel Radcliffe

Radcliffe said: “So not for the time being, but I've heard it's fantastic.” He also revealed he is very happy for Jamie Parker to be playing Harry, calling him a “wonderful actor.” He added: “I'm very happy to see him play me. He can do all the Harry questions now.”

TWITTER Radcliffe is very happy for Parker who plays the older version of Harry

INSTAGRAM The play's previews began last Tuesday evening",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
267610,"He aims to maintain his six points title lead ahead of Frenchman Sylvain Guintoli.

The Yorkshireman starts from the third row of the grid.

Shane Byrne is aiming to complete a half century of victories in the British Superbike Championship at Brands Hatch. The Rapid Solicitors Kawasaki rider, 32 points clear in the standings, snatched his third pole start of the campaign.

Byrne, who has won the last seven races at Brands Hatch, said: “I love the circuit, love the crowd, and at the end of the day it is half an hour from my home. A lot of guys will be pushing hard in the races but if we work hard, fingers crossed, we can do it.”",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
189949,"Maria Lyle wins the T35 200m to add to her 10m gold in Swansea[GETTY]

The 14-year-old from Dunbar in East Lothian, who has cerebral palsy, only received international classification six months ago but since then she has twice broken the world record in the T35 200m.

Yesterday she did not disappoint in her favoured event: a day after claiming the T35 100m title, she won the 200m in a time of 31.05secs - more than half a second outside her world mark.

Lyle said: ""It was cold and windy and my time was a bit slow - but I'm not too bothered as I tried my best. This gives me great confidence going into next year. I need to keep training and doing what I'm doing and hopefully I'll be selected to go to the world championships in 2015.""

Elsewhere, Welsh favourite Aled Davies won the F42 shot put with a throw of 13.66m.

Richard Whitehead, the Olympic and world champion, was surprisingly beaten by Russian runner Anton Prokhorov in the men's T42 200m.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
207600,"Getty Visegrad group countries have allegedly been trying to find ways not to take in asylum seekers

The Visegrád group of countries - Hungary, Poland, Slovakia and the Czech Republic - have reportedly been encouraging Ukrainians to move to those countries as they try to solve their labour shortage problems. According to leading German paper Die Welt, the countries have been encouraging immigration from the Ukraine as a way of not having to take in asylum seekers from the Middle East. Around 100,000 Ukrainians are now living in the Czech Republic and one million in Poland.

Getty St. Michael Cathedral, Kiev, Ukraine

Ukraine in Pictures Thu, August 14, 2014 A Ukrainian warplane was blown out of the sky over rebel-held territory as fierce clashes between government troops and pro-Russian insurgents left dozens of civilians dead. At least 415,800 people have fled their homes due to fighting between government forces and pro-Russian separatists in eastern Ukraine, the UN refugee agency said on August 20. These powerful images show how local residents lives have been affected Play slideshow AFP/Getty 1 of 47 Armed Ukrainian forces detain a pro-Russian militant in the village of Chornukhine in the Lugansk region on August 18, 2014

Over the years the number of Ukrainians moving to the entire EU has been steadily rising. In 2012 there were 150,000. This rose to 240,000 the following year and by 2014 this had hit 300,000. In total, by the end of 2014 there were 849,000 Ukrainians living with the EU.

Getty Map of the Ukraine

By 2015 this had reached 500,000, who had been given ‘first residence’ permits. Around 230,000 Ukrainians were reported to be in Italy at the end of 2014, around 130,000 in Germany, almost 100,000 in Spain and some 40,000 in Portugal. In the UK, which is not part of the Schengen area that allows free movement of people, the Ukrainian Embassy says there are 30,000 of its countrymen and women living here.

Getty Ukrainian Prime Minister Volodymyr Groysman",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
351744,"The 26-year-old has been battling an ongoing ankle injury, and has been out of action since United lost 5-3 to Leicester City in September.

However, he is in line to get a run-out during United's reserve team game against Blackburn Rovers (7pm).

The news was confirmed on United's official Twitter page, as they tweeted: ""Jonny Evans is in contention to feature in #mufc Reserves' Lancashire Senior Cup QF vs Blackburn tonight (7pm).""",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
137552,"The European Champions Cup Final will be between two giants of the French game – Toulon and Clermont Auvergne. But another stellar performance by European Player of the Year nominee Abendanon could produce a major selection headache for England coach Stuart Lancaster.

Lancaster is under pressure to ditch the RFU’s policy of only selecting overseas-based players in “exceptional circumstances”.

Former World Cup-winning England coach Sir Clive Woodward is among those calling for a re-think in light of both Abendanon’s scintillating form for Clermont and Steffon Armitage’s feats in the Toulon back-row.

Abendanon was capped twice in 2007 and moved to Clermont last June after almost a decade at Bath.

But a place in England’s World Cup squad remains his goal.

“Even now my ultimate aim is to still try and get more caps,” said Abendanon.

“I would still love to play for England – that’s why I stayed at Bath for so long. If I knew I would never get any more caps while I was at Bath I would have gone to France sooner.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
110892,"Pablo Hernandez has signed a permanent deal with Leeds and this is how fans reacted

Pablo Hernandez, who arrived at Elland Road on loan from Al-Arabi last August, has put pen-to-paper on a six-month deal with the club.

The 31-year-old has scored three goals in 18 appearances for Garry Monk's side.

Click through the gallery above to see how fans reacted to the January signing.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
117876,"Nintendo Switch fans have been dealt a blow today, as Sonic Mania is delayed until summer.

Sonic Mania was originally tipped for a spring release date, but that has now been pushed back until later this year.

This will give Sega more time to work on new enemies and pre-order bonuses for the Nintendo Switch, PS4, Xbox One and PC game.

Fortunately, however, it's not all bad news, as Sega revealed more details about the mysterious Project Sonic release.

Coming later this year, Project Sonic has now been revealed as Sonic Forces, and will be developed by the team behind Sonic Colors and Sonic Generations.

And much like Sonic Generations, Forces will have multiple play styles.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
7559,"Paul Simon performing in New York earlier this month [REUTERS]

Officers who responded to a disconnected call to police on Saturday night from the marital home in Connecticut arrested the couple on disorderly conduct charges.

The incident resulted in some minor injuries, but officers did not reveal who had suffered them.

Both were released and are due to appear at Norwalk Superior Court on Monday.

New Canaan Chief of Police Leon Krolikowski told reporters that the incident resulted in some minor injuries, but both Simon and Brickell were cooperative when police arrived.

He said: ""They're well known to the community, they're very nice people.

""It's unfortunate that this occurred, but we were obligated to make an arrest.""",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
252108,"Despite the actress, 28, being best known for playing Mother of Dragons, Daenerys Targaryen, in Game of Thrones, she's now going to be starring in a romance movie alongside the hunky Sam Claflin.

Emilia was pictured smiling with her co-stars as she filmed scenes for Me Before You on Formentor beach in Mallorca.

Viewers are used to seeing the actress flashing the flesh in the gritty HBO series, but this time round, she was seen flaunting her toned physique in a pink bikini and wet suit that was pulled down around her waist.

Her brunette locks were naturally wavy and loose around her shoulders, with her also perfecting her beach attire with a pair of pink flip flops.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
231278,"Splash Not the most obvious friendship group

But it's still somewhat surprising that the power couple were spotted hanging out with none other than one-time Labour leadership candidate David Miliband in Los Angeles this week. The unlikely trio were spotted leaving the Palm restaurant in Beverly Hills yesterday and having a quick chat by the curb before heading off in their separate directions.

All three were dressed to impress; Amal looking stunning in a white pleated dress with beige lace-up heels, while George looked typically suave in a grey suit with a blue shirt. David, who was defeated by brother Ed in the race to be the head of the British opposition back in 2010, could well have been talking to the Clooneys about the International Rescue Committee, of which he is the President and CEO.

Splash Palm restaurant is a noted high-end venue in LA

FameFlyNet Amal looked incredible as ever

The couple are known to be supporters of the cause, as are other big names such as Debbie Harry, John Legend and Sir Paul McCartney. David, 50, quit politics after being beaten by brother Ed in the Labour leadership race in 2010, and moved across the Atlantic. His victorious sibling went on to suffer a monumental defeat in the General Election earlier this year, and resigned the next day. George and Amal, meanwhile, recently celebrated their first anniversary after tying the knot on September 27 last year at Ca' Farsetti in Venice.

FameFlyNet Amal had some documents in-hand

Splash Huddle: the trio were deep in conversation

The actor now has a number of projects on the go, including Hail, Caesar! and Money Monster, both due for release in 2016. Amal has also had a busy year. For the spring 2015 semester she was a lecturer at the Columbia Law School, visiting students to speak about human rights litigation. It's no wonder George recently said: ""Often times I feel like an idiot talking to my own wife. It's never good.""

Splash News George looked as handsome as ever",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
346555,"GETTY 'I have a good chance of getting a medal'

Denise Lewis, Jessica Ennis-Hill... Even for those who know nothing about sport, the heptathlon has allowed women to shine, producing some of our most unforgettable athletes. Now Great Britain is set to achieve a hat-trick of heptathlon superstars as 23-year-old Liverpudlian Katarina Johnson-Thompson prepares to strike gold at Rio, competing alongside Jessica. It will give Team GB its surest shot at a medal (if not two) in the history of the sport. With Jessica retiring next year, Katarina is on the starting block to take over.

If it wasn’t for my mum, I wouldn’t even have started athletics Katarina Johnson-Thompson

Yet being the next golden girl isn’t what she’s aspiring to be. “I don’t do athletics for any other reason than achieving certain distances, certain titles and goals in my head,” she says. “All I’m thinking about is getting that gold and it just happens to coincide with us crossing over in our careers.” “This is my job, I just wake up and I train.” Katarina has been going for gold since her last year of primary school when she broke a 25-year record in the high jump. She was encouraged into the sport because of her height (she’s now six foot). “I thought, ‘I’m quite good at this,’ and started adding on more events,” she says. The heptathlon, with its seven different disciplines over track and field, became the inevitable focus for her talent.

GETTY Katarina at the 15th IAAF World Athletics Championships Beijing in 2015

She’d always been an active child, fighting against her dancer mother who’d signed her up for ballet lessons while Katarina preferred the rough and tumble of less genteel activities. “I was one of those girls in class who always had her hair in plaits, was always with the boys, always playing football in the street,” she recalls. “The love of sport was innate. Mum had to bribe me to go to ballet lessons. She travelled the world as a dancer and that’s how she met my dad, in the Bahamas. She wanted that for me but I was too much of a tomboy.” Katarina spent her first year in the Caribbean before her parents separated and she returned to Liverpool. “It was just me and my mum growing up and my mum’s always said that’s why I’m so mature,” she says. “We were best friends and if it wasn’t for her, I wouldn’t even have started athletics because she wanted me to have a hobby. She couldn’t drive and we had to get the coach everywhere to the competitions. I couldn’t have done it without her.” The love of family – and Liverpool – is clearly as important to Katarina as the love of her sport. It gives her an extra push in her daily four-hour training sessions. With critical recovery time taking up the rest of her schedule, home is a particularly important sanctuary (she says her history of injuries was down to not recovering properly, which her coach has finally convinced her is just as important as training). “When I get back after training there’s a massive sigh of relief and I just relax on the couch with the TV,” she says. “I’m a homebird.”

Olympics 2012 in pictures Mon, September 10, 2012 Olympics London 2012 in pictures Play slideshow 1 of 361 Greg Rutherford at the London 2012 parade

Which is why, she says, she agreed to pose for a series of glamorous pictures for Dulux’s Colour of the Year campaign which is, inevitably, Cherished Gold (it wouldn’t have been very optimistic to have chosen Burnished Bronze...). “Glamming up was a whole new experience for me,” Katarina says. “I enjoyed seeing that side of myself, as normally I’m in sports clothes with my hair tied back and no make-up. But it didn’t feel like me.” “I was doing a shoot once and the make-up artist was asking me who I use to do my make-up at events like the Olympics and I told her I just do my own in the morning,” Katarina recalls. “She said, ‘So you go on TV in front of millions of people without any make-up? Not even a little bit of powder before the hurdles?’ She couldn’t believe it’s just not like that at all. Some of the Americans really glam up, but when I’m doing my athletics I just want to sleep as long as I can in the morning. You may want to do yourself up but there’s a balance between that and trying to concentrate on what you’re actually there to achieve.” Katarina only recently left her mum’s home, but transported herself and her two sausage dogs to a house she bought just 10 minutes away. “One of my most cherished memories is the entire family taking the day off work and coming to help so by the time the day was over, my bed was there, my couch, my TV. I had satellite, they’d done everything. “They’re an important part of my athletics career,” she explains. “My mum comes to watch me at every event – she’s very proud of me. I think that’s why I do it – for my mum and nan. My nan loves watching me win and I love winning so she can be happy.” She recalls competing at the London 2012 Olympics when she was only 19. She came 15th, while Jessica Ennis-Hill scooped gold. But instead of remembering her first experience on the track in front of a watching world, Katarina talks more about meeting up with her family afterwards and seeing how proud they were. Her mother, Tracey, will of course be at Rio. “She’s not going to miss it for the world.” But the pressure is beginning to tingle. “You only get a few chances at an Olympic gold medal so I’m starting to realise the enormity of it,” Katarina says.

GETTY 'If it wasn’t for my mum, I wouldn’t even have started athletics'",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
321522,"Theresa May warned Brexit Remoaners not to try to refight the referendum campaign

The Prime Minister spoke after the Government lost a High Court case – led by businesswoman Gina Miller – on her right to invoke Article 50 without Parliament’s approval. The Government will appeal the decision at the Supreme Court on December 5. Asked during her trade trip to India if she thought the campaign to leave the EU had been “honest”, Mrs May told Sky News: “What we need to do now is not focus on what happened during the campaign. People voted on whether or not they wanted to leave the EU.

Advertisement

“They voted to leave the EU and what I’m focusing on now and what I’m determined to do is to deliver on that and make a success of it.

“That’s why I’m here in India looking at the trade relationships we can develop with other countries around the world. I’m going to deliver on global Britain – more jobs, more investment, more trade for British business.” “The Government has a mandate from the British people. We were elected, the Conservative Party was elected into government in 2015. And the Government has a mandate from the British people to leave the EU. “Remember Parliament gave the choice to the people, Parliament voted six to one to say to the British people ‘What is your view’? ‘Should we remain or should we leave?’

GETTY Theresa May and Indian Prime Minister Narendra Modi

Advertisement

Gina Miller has won the case to block Theresa May from Article 50 Born in Guyana, she grew up in Britain and is now based in London where she works for SCM Private, the firm she co-founded in 2014. After a short spell working as a model, she began her career in 1990, working as a marketing and event manager for BMW. The 51-year-old launched SCM Private with her husband in 2009, where she continues to work today. Gina Miller speaks after the High Court decides that the Prime Minister cannot trigger Brexit without the approval of the MP's Ms Miller is the investment manager and philanthropist who is leading the so-called “People’s Challenge” against Brexit. Gina Miller, co-founder of investment fund SCM Private Gina Miller speaks after the High Court decides that the Prime Minister cannot trigger Brexit without the approval of the MP's Gina Miller attends The Business of Brexit debate Gina Miller speaks after the High Court decides that the Prime Minister cannot trigger Brexit without the approval of the MP's

“I’m determined we are going to deliver what the British people want and that is what they said they wanted in the referendum on June 23. But alongside that I’m also determined to deliver on global Britain.” She promised to focus on delivering “a country that works for everyone” as well as Brexit – fuelled by new trade deals which her trip to India was partly designed to pave the way for. “Leaving the EU presents us with a world of opportunities and I’m determined to seize them. “That’s why I’m here in India, delivering on global Britain. And I have to say the response has been very good.

GETTY Theresa May arriving in Bangalore, India

“During this visit, we’ve seen £1billion worth of deals being signed and we’ve come to an agreement with the Indian government that we will work together with them on developing our trade relationship for the future. “What does that mean? It means more jobs, more investment in the UK more trade for British businesses and that’s good for everyone.” She would not be drawn on whether she expected a transitional deal after 2019 – the expected date for Brexit – in which the UK kept paying into EU budgets and had access to the single market. “All I’m focusing on is preparing to trigger Article 50 and then we will be in those formal negotiations,” she said. “I’m determined to get the best deal for the UK in those negotiations.

GETTY Theresa May in Bangalore, India

“But I recognise that at the point at which we leave people will want to know where they stand and that’s why I’ve already said we will introduce a Great Repeal Bill next year and within that we will bring EU law into UK law at the point at which we leave the EU so there will be certainty for employers and employees on things like workers’ rights. ""The negotiations that we are going to be entering into with the EU will be about determining what our future relationship with the EU is. “I recognise that people want certainty, which is why I’ve already said that they can be certain that EU law will be brought into UK law at the point at which we leave, so that everybody knows that at that point things like workers’ rights will be protected and will continue to be protected.” She said voters had considered various issues when they made their decision in June, including immigration: “They wanted us to have control of movement of people from the EU into the UK, control of our laws and control of our budget.”

Saudi Arabia's King Salman bin Abdulaziz al-Saud (R) meeting with British Prime Minister Theresa May in the capital Riyadh, Saudi Arabia, 05 April 2017. May is visiting Saudi Arabia as part of her Middle East trip to boost diplomatic ties in the region Theresa May in the cabinet, sitting below a painting of Britain's first PM Robert Walpole, signs the official letter to European Council President Donald Tusk invoking Article 50 and the United Kingdom's intention to leave the EU on March 28, 2017 Theresa May in the cabinet, sitting below a painting of Britain's first PM Robert Walpole, signs the official letter to European Council President Donald Tusk invoking Article 50 and the United Kingdom's intention to leave the EU on March 28, 2017 Theresa May in the cabinet, sitting below a painting of Britain's first PM Robert Walpole, signs the official letter to European Council President Donald Tusk invoking Article 50 and the United Kingdom's intention to leave the EU on March 28, 2017 British Prime Minister Theresa May meets Scottish First Minister Nicola Sturgeon in Glasgow, following the announcement that Scotland is to hold a second Independence Referendum Prime Minister Theresa May, wearing an L.K.Bennett coat and dress as she was photographed by Annie Leibovitz for American Vogue Prime Minister Theresa May with her husband Philip as she was photographed by Annie Leibovitz for American Vogue Pubs will get a £1,000 discount on business rate bills Prime Minister Theresa May is joined by children nominated by UK charities and a local school choir to switch on the Downing Street Christmas tree lights. December 8 2016. British Prime Minister Theresa May (C) stands with children from a local school choir, during the switch on of the Christmas tree lights outside Number 10 Downing Street in London on December 8, 2016. British Prime Minister Theresa May is greeted by Prince Salman bin Hamad bin Isa Al Khalifa, the Crown Prince of Bahrain, during a bilateral meeting at the U.K villa on December 6, 2016 in Manama, Bahrain. British Prime Minister Theresa May (R) and Polish Prime Minister Beata Szyd?o (L) shake hands during a press conference in number 10 Downing Street in central London., Britain, 28 November 2016. British Prime Minister Theresa May (R) during a joint press conference with Polish Prime Minister Beata Szydlo at 10 Downing Street on November 28, 2016 in London, England. British Prime Minister Theresa May (R) meets with Secretary General of NATO Jens Stoltenberg (L) at 10 Downing Street on November 23, 2016 in London, England. British Prime Minister Theresa May addresses delegates at the annual Confederation of British Industry (CBI) conference in central London, on November 21, 2016 British Prime Minister Theresa May MP makes a keynote speech at the Annual CBI conference, 21 Nov 2016 Britain's Prime Minister Theresa May is welcomed by German Chancellor Angela Merkel upon her arrival at the chancellery in Berlin German Chancellor Angela Merkel (R) greets British Prime Minister Theresa May upon her arrival for talks between U.S. President Barack Obama and western European leaders at the Chancellery on November 18, 2016 in Berlin, British Prime Minister Theresa May is greeted at Bangalore's Kebpegowda International Airport Prime Minister Theresa May speaks at the annual Lord Mayor's Banquet at Mansion House, central London. British Prime Minister Theresa May and her husband Philip May attend the Lord Mayor's Banquet at Guildhall on November 14, 2016 in London, England. Prime Minister Theresa May at the temple Prime Minister Theresa May visits the Sri Someshwara Hindu temple in Bangalore on the final day of a three-day trade mission British Prime Minister Theresa May is welcomed to the Sri Someshwara Temple in Bangalore India Prime Minister Theresa may greets people in Bangalore British Prime Minister Theresa May (L) makes a donation to the Royal British Legion's Poppy Appeal with WW2 veteran Roy Miller (R), 92 in Downing Street, central London on October 31, 2016. British Prime Minister Theresa May (L) shakes hands with King Hamad bin Isa Al Khalifa of Bahrain (R) at 10 Downing Street in London, Britain, 26 October 2016. King Hamad bin Isa Al Khalifa is on an offical visit. (L-R) Camilla Duchess of Cornwall and British Prime Minister, Theresa May attend a reception to celebrate the 30th anniversary of JDRF the type 1 diabetes charity at The Guildhall on October 26, 2016 in London, England. Prime Minister Theresa May delivers a speech during the fourth day of the Conservative Party Conference 2016. n her first speech to conference as Prime Minister Theresa May is expected to reach out to the centre ground and try to appeal traditional Labour voters. Theresa May Prepares First Conference Speech As Prime Minister Theresa May Prepares First Conference Speech As Prime Minister Prime Minister Theresa May walks in a forest with her husband Philip at the start of a summer holiday in the Alps in Switzerland. Prime Minister Theresa May walks in a forest with her husband Philip at the start of a summer holiday in the Alps in Switzerland. Prime Minister Theresa May walks in a forest with her husband Philip at the start of a summer holiday in the Alps in Switzerland. Britain's Prime Minister Theresa May visits a joinery factory in London, Britain August 3, 2016 Britain's Prime Minister Theresa May (L) speaks with a worker as she visits a joinery factory in London, Britain August 3, 2016 Polish Prime Minister Beata Szydlo and British Prime Minister Theresa May during a meeting in Warsaw, Poland Polish Prime Minister Beata Szydlo and British Prime Minister Theresa May during a meeting in Warsaw, Poland British Prime Minister Theresa May speaks during a joint press conference with Slovakian Prime Minister Robert Fico, during her visit in Bratislava, Slovakia, 28 July 2016 Slovakian Prime Minister Robert Fico welcomes British Prime Minister Theresa May Italian Prime Minister Matteo Renzi receives British Prime Minister Theresa May as she arrives at Villa Pamphili Theresa May during a joint press conference with Italian Prime Minister Matteo Renzi at Villa Doria Pamphilj in Rome, Italy British Prime Minister Theresa May speaks during a news conference with her Italian counterpart Matteo Renzi during a meeting in Rome, Italy Prime Minister Theresa May with Irish Taoiseach Enda Kenny inside 10 Downing Street Prime Minister Theresa May (centre) with First Minister Arlene Foster (left) and Deputy First Minister Martin McGuinness at Stormont Castle in Belfast, as she said that the UK's departure from the European Union (EU) must work for Northern Ireland Prime Minister Theresa May is greeted by First Minister Arlene Foster and Deputy First Minister Martin McGuinness Theresa May first visit to Northern Ireland French President Francois Hollande (R) shakes hands with British Prime Minister Theresa May (L) upon her arrival at the Elysee Palace in Paris on July 21, 2016 French President Francois Hollande (L) greets Britain's Prime Minister Theresa May at the Elysee Palace in Paris, France, July 21, 2016 French President Francois Hollande (L) greets British Prime Minister Theresa May (R) as she arrives for a meeting at the Elysee Palace in Paris, France, 21 July 2016. May is on her inaugural visit as Prime Minister to France German Chancellor Merkel welcomes British Prime Minister May in Berlin Prime Minister Theresa May as she meets German Chancellor Angela Merkel at the Chancellery in Berlin for talks German roll out the red carpet for British Prime Minister Theresa May Theresa May meets German Chancellor Angela Merkel in Berlin Prime Minister Theresa May as she meets German Chancellor Angela Merkel at the Chancellery in Berlin for talks Theresa May and German Chancellor Angela Merkel address a press conference after talks at the chancellery in Berlin Merkel receives May Theresa May's first Prime Minister's Questions Prime Minister Theresa May leaves 10 Downing Street in London for her first PM's questions Prime Minister Theresa May holds talks with US Secretary of State John Kerry in her official residence in Downing Street, London The PM Theresa May working on the plane en route to Edinburgh to meet The First Minister of Scotland Nicola Sturgeon Theresa May Chairs Her First Cabinet Meeting As UK Prime Minister Theresa May arrives in Edinburgh for talks with Nicola Sturgeon Prime Minister Theresa May meets with First Minister Nicola Sturgeon at Bute House in Edinburgh, Scotland Prime Minister Theresa May meets Scotland's First Minister Staff applaud as Britain's new Prime Minister Theresa May, and her husband Philip, walk into 10 Downing Street after May had met Queen Elizabeth David Cameron resigns as Theresa May is appointed new Prime Minister at 10 Downing Street The new Prime Minister, Theresa May, followed by her husband Philip John, arrives at 10 Downing Street, London New British Prime Minister Theresa May (R) and her husband Philip John (2R) walk into 10 Downing Street in London Staff applaud as Britain's new Prime Minister Theresa May, and her husband Philip, walk into 10 Downing Street after May had met Queen Elizabeth in Buckingham Palace Staff clap as new Prime Minister Theresa May walks into 10 Downing Street, London, after meeting Queen Elizabeth II and accepting her invitation to become Prime Minister and form a new government Theresa May is appointed new Prime Minister at 10 Downing Street New Prime Minister Theresa May arrives with her husband Philip at Downing Street, London. July 13, 2016 Britain's new Prime Minister Theresa May Theresa May becomes PM Queen Elizabeth II welcomes Theresa May at the start of an audience in Buckingham Palace, London, where she invited the former Home Secretary to become Prime Minister and form a new government Theresa May becomes PM Theresa May scooped half of the votes in the second round of the Tory leadership race Home Secretary Theresa May leaves Parliament on October 20, 2010 Theresa May speaks as she launches her bid to become the next Conservative party leader at RUSI Whitehall Theresa May leaveing a cabinet meeting in 10 Downing Street Britain's Prince Philip, Duke of Edinburgh looks on as Britain's Queen Elizabeth II shakes hands with Home Secretary Theresa May Home Secretary Theresa May drinks a toast in the Guildhall during The Lord Mayor's Banquet Theresa May stands with Prime Minister David Cameron and Deputy Prime Minister Nick Clegg before the arrival of the President of Mexico David Cameron, Theresa May, Queen Elizabeth II and Chinese President Xi Jinping look on during the Official Ceremonial Welcome for the Chinese State Visit Theresa May speaking at the Conservative Party conference in 2000 Home Secretary Theresa May leaves Parliament on October 20, 2010 Theresa May launching her bid to become the next Conservative party leader at RUSI Whitehall Theresa May and Philip May attend The Sugarplum Dinner & Charity Auction Duchess of Cornwall meets Home Secretary Theresa May during a visit to the Rape and Sexual Abuse Support Centre Home Secretary Theresa May attends a memorial service to commemorate the tenth anniversary of the 9/11 terrorist attacks David Cameron introduces Ken Clarke to his economic team of Theresa May, William Hague and Shadow Chancellor George Osborne in 2009 Theresa May attends a two-day meeting of Interior ministers of the so-called G6 group at the Moritzburg Castle in Germany Theresa May, speaking at the Conservative Party Conference in Blackpool, 2001 Theresa May attends the Children Of Courage Awards in 2006 Theresa May embraces Iain Duncan Smith at the annual Conservative Party conference October 2003 in Blackpool Home Secretary Theresa May addresses delegates on the third day of the annual Conservative Party Conference in Birmingham Home Secretary Theresa May visits the Olympics security control room, in the Olympic park, Stratford Britain's Prime Minister David Cameron, Foreign Secretary William Hague and Home Secretary Theresa May arrive to attend a ceremonial welcome for Indonesian President Queen Elizabeth II talks with Prime Minister David Cameron and Home Secretary Theresa May as they attend the Ceremonial Welcome for The President of the Republic of Korea Mayor of London Boris Johnson and Home Secretary Theresa May visit residents and shopkeepers in Clapham Junction, in south London, on August 9, 2011, following a third night of unrest in London Theresa May and French Interior Minister Bernard Cazeneuve speak to the media at a press conference after signing an agreement to tackle the migrant crisis in Calais Theresa May is shown the bridge of HMC Protector by Commander Colin McAuslan Theresa May and Philip May attend a Service of Thanksgiving to mark the 70th Anniversary of VE Day Conservative MP for Maidenhead Party Conference, Theresa May speaking in 1999 Theresa May arrives on Horse Guards in central London during the visit of South Korean President Theresa May MP during Whitbread Book of the Year Awards in 2005 Home Secretary Theresa May addresses delegates during the Spring Forum Theresa May, British Home Secretary confers with Annemie Turtelboom, Belgian Home Affairs minister prior to a Justice and Home Affairs council Home Secretary, Theresa May, addresses delegates on the third day of the Conservative party conference in 2010 Theresa May arrives at the Glamour Women Of The Year Awards in 2010 Theresa May, arrives in Downing Street in 2010 David Cameron (R) and Shadow Secretary of State for Work and Pensions Theresa May in 2009 Theresa May MP attends the Asian Women of Achievement Awards in 2009 The ConservativeTheresa May, MP and Shadow Secretary of State for Work and Pensions and Shadow Minister for Women speaks at the Conservative Party Spring Forum in 2009 Theresa May, the Conservative Party Chairman, concludes her opening speech at the annual Conservative Party conference in 2003",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
38267,"Mesut Ozil dines out with friends at a restaurant in Istanbul

After a run of poor form, Ozil has been given an extended break by Arsene Wenger and the Gunners man took the opportunity to fly to Turkey.

He was snapped leaving a restaurant with friends in Istanbul and was seen with former Miss Turkey winner Amine Gulse.

Click through the gallery above to see all the best snaps!",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
172076,"GETTY Shona Robison and her party was accused of 'distressing' the NHS due to missed targets

Opposition MSPs rounded on Health Secretary Shona Robison over her party's ""disastrous decade"" in charge of the service. It came as it emerged nearly 20 patients a day have had hospital operations cancelled due to a lack of beds, staff or equipment in a month. The statistics showed show that in September, 560 (2 per cent) of procedures in Scotland were scrapped for ""capacity or non-clinical"" reasons. These include unavailability of beds, staff and equipment as well as staff illlness, dirty equipment and theatre sessions over-running.

The September proportion is the highest since May. Meanwhile, it emerged the problem of bed-blocking had worsened for the fourth month in a row. Two years ago Ms Robison vowed the issue of patients left languishing on wards when they are ready to leave would be completely abolished. Yet the average number of bed occupied in September was 1,391, with a month on month increase since May. There were 1,378 people delayed compare with 1,370 the previous month.

GETTY Nearly 20 patients a day have had hospital operations cancelled due to a lack equipment

This SNP government has left our NHS staff over-worked, under-valued and under-resourced Anas Sarwar, Labour health spokesman

The statistics follow a damning report from Audit Scotland which warned the country's health ""is not improving"" as the NHS faces ""significant challenges"". Labour also highlighted stastics showing the number of available hospital beds had this year fallen to 21,871 from 27,051 in 2007/08. The party's health spokesman Anas Sarwar, said: ""These are damning figures that show the scale of the SNP’s mismanagement of our NHS. “This SNP government has left our NHS staff over-worked, under-valued and under-resourced.

GETTY Labour's Anas Sarwar blamed the SNP government for making NHS staff 'overworked'

""Health Secretary Shona Robison is out of ideas, out of her depth and running out of time."" Alex Cole-Hamilton for the Lib Dem called on ministers to give ""NHS boards the support they need in order to be able to keep operations on track."" He added the bed-blocking figure should worry ministers, saying: ""They show more than 1,000 patients in hospital every day, who have been declared ready to leave, specifically because the help they need in the community simply isn't there."" The latest statistics, which were released by Information Services Division Scotland, also showed accident and emergency departments again missed waiting targets.

GETTY The average number of beds occupied in September was 1,391, with a month on month increase since May",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
264039,"An impressive 450,000 Brits will fly from London Heathrow this weekend [GETTY]

As the last school bell of the summer rings out and as parents and professions countdown to long-ago booked leave, British roads and airports will be congested as two million people leave the country on holiday. A staggering 450,000 will fly from London Heathrow this weekend - the country's busiest airport. Spain tops the list of continental holiday hotspots, beating both Greece and Turkey, according to travel organisation Abta figures.

[ NC]

The list shows more British holidaymakers travelling further afield as Dubai, Mexico and Florida creep up the most popular holiday destinations. Abta chief executive Mark Tanzer said: ""This weekend sees the start of the main holiday exodus. ""While a favourable exchange rate in many destinations will increase the appeal of overseas holidays, we also expect the warm summer weather we've recently experienced to make the UK popular for late bookers."" But those planning a 'staycation' in Blighty may face sweltering queues in congested traffic as transport information company Inrix confirms that the first major jams of the school holiday period will begin Friday, with the five Saturdays that follow being the most congested days.

This weekend sees the start of the main holiday exodus Mark Tanzer, Abta chief executive",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
335771,"The Jump faces the axe as the casualty count continues to climb

The controversial series, dubbed ‘The Celebrity Hunger Games', could be scrapped amid multiple severe injuries and extraordinary insurance costs, which has seen the show stung with enormous backlash. Channel 4 is reluctant to reprise their winter sports competition, according to the Sunday People, after the current series comes to an end later this month.

Advertisement

""This year has been riddled with accidents,"" a source told the paper. ""It has been one disaster after another, and people high up have had enough of the complications. ""It's just become a bit of a shambles with everything that's gone on - injuries, huge insurance costs and the constant headache of replacing contestants - not to mention the fear of somebody doing themselves even more harm.

CHANNEL 4 Beth Tweddle broke her back after a particularly terrifying accident

Tina Hobley, Sarah Harding and Linford Christie join the line up for The Jump 2016 Holby City star Tina Hobley joins the contestants on The Jump 2016 Olympic legend Linford Christie joins the contestants on The Jump 2016 Olympic swimmer and new mum Rebecca Adlington joins the contestants on The Jump 2016 Irish singer Brian McFadden joins the contestants on The Jump 2016 Girls Aloud's Sarah Harding joins the contestants on The Jump 2016 Ex Eastender Sid Owen joins the contestants on The Jump 2016 Olympic gymnast Beth Tweddle joins the contestants on The Jump 2016 Towie star James Argent joins the contestants on The Jump 2016 It girl Tamara Beckwith joins the contestants on The Jump 2016 Made in Chelsea star Mark Francis joins the contestants on The Jump 2016 Ex Eastender, Luisa Lytton joins the contestants on The Jump 2016 Superman himself, Dean Cain joins the contestants on The Jump 2016

Advertisement

""This series has caused real concerns back at Channel 4 HQ in London, where top brass are wondering how this has all been allowed to happen."" The dangerous sets have been boarded put this week while extra precautionary safety measures are put in place ahead of Sunday night's live show. Several stars have fallen victim to the reality series, including Olympic gymnast Beth Tweddle, who broke her back and could have been left paralysed. The 30-year-old - who retired from gymnastics in 2013 - had her fractured vertebrae fused together after she fell while training for the programme. She is now waiting for an assessment from the doctors as to when she can return home and has spoken out to thank the ""fantastic"" medical staff.

CLOSE

Beth said in a statement: ""The medical staff here in Austria have been fantastic and I couldn't have wished for better people to be around me at this time. ""I've started to feel a lot better in the past 24 hours and I've begun walking by myself."" She continued: ""It's still a case of taking one day at a time, but I'm setting myself goals and I'm determined to be up and about as soon as I can. ""The doctors are happy with my progress and next week we will have a better idea of when I can be discharged from hospital. ""Thank you to everyone that has sent me get well messages. My Mum and Dad have been reading them to me and, one day, I'll be able to reply to you all, it really has meant a lot to me, so thank you."" But Beth is just one, in a worryingly lengthy line of stars who have pulled out of the competition with war wounds.

CHANNEL 4 Beth revealed she's taken her first unaided steps since her accident

Mark-Francis Vandelli pulled out after breaking his ankle; Rebecca Adlington injured her shoulder in a stunt which went horribly wrong; Holby City actress Tina Hobley fractured her arm in two places, and Linford Christie confirmed his withdrawal on Thursday following a hamstring injury. Elsewhere, Joe Swash - who was roped in last minute to replace Beth - revealed he's broken his shoulder in training before even making his debut on the slopes. A source added: ""Previously the series was filmed in Natters, where it was pretty tame - there was a Starbucks coffee within walking distance, so it was all very much within the confines of civilisation.

CHANNEL 4 Joe Swash revealed he's broken his shoulder in training",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
144422,"GETTY Prince William was greeted by a sea of well-wishers following the news of Kate's pregnancy

They were forced to announce their happy news early after the Duchess of Cambridge cancelled a visit to Oxford yesterday because she was unwell. Kate, 32, thought to be about seven weeks’ pregnant, stayed at Kensington Palace under the care of the Queen’s surgeon gynaecologist while William continued with the engagement. He said: “She’s feeling OK thanks. It’s been a tricky few days – a week or so – but obviously we’re basically thrilled. It’s great news. Early days.” The Duke, 32, added: “We’re hoping things settle down and she feels a bit better.” A royal source said Kate had the same degree of severe morning sickness as two years ago when she spent three nights in hospital with it. Her condition, hyperemesis gravidarum, led the couple to reveal early that she was pregnant with their first child, Prince George. Kate remained in London yesterday monitored by physician Alan Farthing assisted by obstetrician Guy Thorpe-Beeston. Her doctors have kept her out of hospital because they knew what to expect and have been able to combat the symptoms earlier, treating dehydration that accompanies the vomiting. Around 87 per cent of women who suffer acute morning sickness in their first pregnancy go on to endure it in their second, usually between six and eight weeks into the term. The new baby, fourth in line to the throne, is thought to be due in April, around 21 months after George was born. The royal siblings will have a similar age gap to Kate and her sister Pippa, who is 20 months younger. There are 27 months between William and Harry.

GETTY Prince William talking to five-year-old Bethlily Barton

It was a present for George, I didn't know they were having another baby Bethlily Barton

Second-in-line William suggested the world should focus on more important national and international events. It was thought to be a nod to brother Harry who is organising the Invictus Games for wounded military personnel from 13 countries in London this week. Deflecting more questions about his wife, he headed back to the capital saying: “I’m going to go and look after her now.” The royal couple are thought to have told the Queen, Prince Charles and Camilla last week – all are said to be delighted – but did not inform key aides until Sunday. They quickly took the decision that, as with George, they would have to reveal the news well before the normal 12-week scan. Kate had three engagements this week and they knew she was too unwell to travel to Oxford. William suggested his wife could be back carrying out official duties in a few weeks when one well-wisher sympathised with Kate’s condition and said he was sorry she could not attend. The Duke replied: “I know, she wishes she could be here – a few weeks’ time.” William was inundated with congratulations on his visit to St Hugh’s College, Oxford, to open the £21million Dickson Poon University of Oxford China Centre Building.

GETTY Kate was meant to accompany William on this trip

The future king told his hosts: “I’m sorry that Catherine could not join me today. She is so sorry to miss it and she hopes to come back in the future to meet you all for herself.” Dame Elish Angiolini, principal of St Hugh’s, said: “We extend our warmest congratulations to you and the Duchess of Cambridge on your wonderful news of a new addition to your family. “Our sorrow for her absence is more than compensated by the joyful news shared by the whole country.” As the crowd clapped, William smiled bashfully. “Thank you,” he replied as students lining his route cheered. But he hinted he may not be relishing sleepless nights with a crying newborn. When he met Erica Payne, 27, with her 12-week-old daughter Isabel who was being very quiet, William said: “They’re good when they stay like that. Quiet.” In London, Prince Harry was quick to welcome the announcement but could not resist a light-hearted dig at his elder brother. Speaking as he visited competitors training for the inaugural Invictus Games, Harry said it was “very exciting news”. He went on: “I can’t wait to see my brother suffer more”, adding that if the Duke and Duchess’s second child was a girl he would “love to see him try and cope with that”. After watching the final training sessions, Harry said: “I hope the two of them have the opportunity to go through the process again with a little bit of peace and quiet.” He described Kate as “pretty poorly” but “doing the best she can”. Asked whether he could give the new baby any advice or “strategy” on being a younger sibling, he said: “There’s never a strategy. “I think George will be over the moon. I think he will be thrilled having another small younger brother or sister.” When it was put to him that the new addition to the family would further reduce his own chances of being king, he laughed and replied: “Great!”",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
365079,"The other lads have a little giggle about it but we all have our time-fillers, whether it's playing on the X Box or watching DVDs or football on the telly.

We have just finished a 27-date tour of the UK and Ireland and there was a lot of travelling in between. Who knows how much knitting I got through but it certainly made all the car and bus journeys more bearable.

I'm not on to jumpers and all that just yet but that's the next step. It is easier than you think; once you've mastered a stitch you just keep going. You need patience, but there is something very therapeutic about it.

Maybe it also has something to do with watching Kirstie Allsopp on the telly and having this fantasy that some day I will live in the country and make lots of nice things.

It is weird to think I am a boyband (or manband) member who has taken up knitting but it fills idle time nicely.

I needed something to do during endless car journeys and when we were stuck on the tour bus and I remembered my auntie teaching me how to knit when I was a kid.

I got into knitting scarves a couple of years ago, around the time The Overtones took off.

The results can be - how shall I say it? - patchy but I don't throw them out because that makes them individual and a one-off and maybe that fits with my personality.

I am thinking of taking some classes because I haven't mastered using patterns yet and when I try to introduce a new colour into a scarf I am doing it can go horribly wrong.

The results can be - how shall I say it? - patchy but I don't throw them out because that makes them individual and a one-off and maybe that fits with my personality. A dropped stitch here and there or a colour that does not really blend in reflects what I am like as a person.

Joining a class is a big step for me. My confidence levels are not that high yet. I was on a train going to Wales not so long ago and there was a guy behind me with his girlfriend.

He was a big dude who looked like he would be into heavy metal music but he was knitting a lovely cable-stitch jumper. I thought: ""If he can do it in public then so can I.""

I get my wool from the Trinity Hospice charity shop in Clapham. It's not secondhand wool; I think they get it at a discount from a factory and they sell it for only £2.50 a ball.

It takes about two and a half balls per scarf so they work out at about £7 each.

I knit scarves for family and friends. I use quite thick wool because that means you can also use big, manly needles and it means you can be finished in about three hours.

You can really bash them out but so many people put in orders it is hard to keep up and they need to have more patience, especially now I am running a competition on our website for fans to win a ""Timmy Scarf"".

There will be three prizes with little Timmy Scarf labels sewn in, and I think that is kind of cute.

It's not the norm for a pop band to give away knitwear but I don't think we're the norm as a band anyway; we are all quite quirky.

We have such lovely fans.

I have been sent a couple of very lovely scarves but then you should be careful what you wish for. I once tweeted about loving Meerkat Manor and I have since been inundated with cuddly meerkat toys and stuff. My spare room is full of meerkats now and they are taking over my life.

As for the knitting, I take my wool and my needles with me everywhere. Sometimes we can be hanging around backstage for hours and that is when I knit away. My New Year's resolution was to be more creative. That includes writing more songs but it also covers my knitting.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
225031,"The 32-year-old was snapped up by Villa on a free after being released by West Ham at the end of last season.

Cole, who won 56 caps for England, has put pen to paper on a two-year deal at Villa Park.

The winger becomes Paul Lambert's second signing of the summer, following former Arsenal defender Philippe Senderos.

""I'm really excited. It all happened really quickly, I got a call maybe a week or 10 days ago and it just felt like it was a really exciting place to come at this moment,"" Cole said.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
29205,"Sanches asked to skip Bayern Munich’s game against Werder Bremen yesterday amid uncertainty surrounding his future. Liverpool have been heavily linked with a move for the Portugal international recently with Jurgen Klopp keen to bolster his squad before the window closes on Thursday. The Reds were linked with a move for Naby Keita earlier in the summer but were knocked back by RB Leipzig in their attempts with the Bundesliga outfit refusing to budge on their valuation. Liverpool are expected to make a move for the midfielder next summer when his release clause is activated, but Liverpool are reportedly anxious to add to their midfield options for this season.

GETTY Renato Sanches is in talks with Liverpool over a possible move

TWITTER But Monaco have also registered an interest in the Bayern Munich midfielder

And Sky Italy claim the Merseyside club are in talks with Sanches over a possible transfer this week. The 20-year-old has struggled to make an impact at the Allianz Arena since moving from Benfica last summer. And it is claimed Sanches has his heart set on leaving Bayern this summer in order to regain his form ahead of next year’s World Cup.

Liverpool transfers: Which stars are most likely to sign? Tue, January 16, 2018 Which stars are most likely to sign for Liverpool in the summer transfer window according to Football Whispers (1 = less likely, 5 = most likely) Play slideshow Liverpool FC via Getty Images 1 of 9 Which players are most likely to sign for Liverpool this summer?",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
98831,"Rodgers lost his job as Liverpool boss on Sunday just hours after his side's 1-1 draw with Everton.



Former Borussia Dortmund boss Jurgen Klopp is set to replace the Northern Irishman at Anfield by the end of the week.



One of the main accusations levelled at Rodgers during his Merseyside reign was how he wasted nearly £300million on signings since taking over in June 2012.

Brendan Rodgers: Career in pictures Sun, October 4, 2015 Express Sport takes a look at Brendan Rodgers' career in pictures. Play slideshow Getty Images 1 of 17 Former Chelsea reserve team coach, Rodgers left the Blues to take charge of Championship side Watford in November 2008

This summer Holland star Depay was linked with a move to Anfield but instead joined rivals Manchester United in a £25million deal.



At the time Rodgers insisted he was not interested in the 21-year-old, but recently admitted he actually was.



""PSV had given us permission to have conversations with him,"" Rodgers told Dutch magazine Voetbal International.



""Apart from a huge talent, he came across as a good boy to me, but Liverpool were looking for a central striker and Memphis, until then, had primarily played as a left winger.""

GETTY Liverpool tried to sign £25m Manchester United new boy Memphis Depay

GETTY Rodgers admitted he tried to sign Depay",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
244177,"In a fresh swipe at the Labour leader, the former Prime Minister said the public must decide whether Mr Miliband ""has a problem"".

The barbed comments came as former Labour Deputy Prime Minister Lord Prescott warned Mr Miliband will lose the election if he runs ""as a president"".

Mr Blair's remarks are the latest in a long line of attacks on his successor.

He suggested before Christmas that Labour will lose the election because it is fighting as a ""traditional left-wing party"".

In the latest intervention, he told the BBC that voters are defecting to Ukip and the Greens because they ""want to see their leaders leading.""

He said: ""The new always has a certain amount of appeal. Having put a lot of emphasis on that myself, what you realise when you actually get into government the problems require far more practical solutions and however 'new' you say you are, politics still operates in the same way.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
74348,"PA US Secretary of State John Kerry held talks with new PM Theresa May in Number 10

Mr Kerry held talks with new Prime Minister Theresa May in 10 Downing Street this afternoon, with the pair discussing the UK’s future outside of the EU. Speaking in Downing Street after the meeting, Mr Kerry hailed the “excellent” talks after Mrs May had restated Britain’s commitment to the ‘special relationship’ between the two countries. Barack Obama’s foreign policy chief also appeared to backtrack on the outgoing US President’s comments during the EU referendum campaign. Mr Obama had claimed Britain would be at the “back of the queue” for a trade deal with the US in the event of a Brexit vote, sparking a furious backlash and allegations the President had been dragged into David Cameron's 'Project Fear' campaign. The President has already appeared to step back from those remarks he made in April, with Mr Obama recently warning against post-Brexit “hysteria”. And Mr Kerry appeared to confirm a shift in attitude in the White House as he spoke of the “imperative” for the US, Britain and EU to “work together to maximise the economic opportunity” of the UK’s exit.

He said: “The Prime Minister and I had an excellent discussion and I'm very grateful to her for her restatement of the commitment to the very strong transatlantic partnership. ""We talked particularly about efforts to try to deal with counter-terrorism, the importance of our co-operation continuing. ""We also talked about Ukraine and Syria in particular. ""Most importantly we affirmed the imperative for the United States, Great Britain and the European community to work together to maximise the economic opportunity, minimise the disruption, deal with this in a way that has the wellbeing of the citizens of all of our countries and regions in mind in order to move our economies as fast as possible. ""I think the Prime Minister is very much committed to finding a calm, thoughtful, reasonable way forward that meets those needs. ""So I was encouraged by it and I look forward to conveying her very best wishes to the American people and President Obama.""

PA The US politician said he was 'amazed' at the speed with which Mrs May had replaced David Cameron

The Prime Minister and I had an excellent discussion and I'm very grateful to her for her restatement of the commitment to the very strong transatlantic partnership. John Kerry",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
133193,"About 233,000 Prius hybrid vehicles are being recalled by Toyota due to braking problems [PA]

The company said the recall applies to about 233,000 Prius vehicles made between March and October 2009 and about 9,000 Lexus HS250h models made between June and October 2009.

Toyota said the Prius vehicles affected are sold worldwide. The Lexus sedans are sold in the US and Japan.

The carmaker said brake pressure parts in the vehicles could crack due to vibration, slowing response times. It said there were no accidents or injuries caused by the problem so far.

Toyota suffered a blow to its reputation from a series of massive recalls in 2009 and 2010, including faulty braking, sticky gas pedals and defective floor mats.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
154399,"BBC • GETTY Ralf Little has signed up for the tenth series of Doctor Who

The 36-year-old will begin filming alongside the Time Lord himself, Peter Capaldi, and his new companion Pearl Mackie in Cardiff imminently. The Oldham-born actor, who shot to fame as Anthony Royle in the late nineties hit, has already delved into the franchise, having recorded the voice of political activist Guy Fawkes in video game Doctor Who: The Adventure Games. As it stands, the comical star’s undisclosed character is shrouded in mystery, with no details suggesting whether he’ll be a villain or a hero as the BBC have promised to keep the details under wraps. Little’s addition to the programme comes after Matt Lucas confirmed he was reprising his role as the bumbling Nardole, who viewers met in Christmas episode The Husbands Of River Song.

BBC Peter Capaldi returns as the Time Lord once again but this time he's got a new companion

Game of Thrones characters in Doctor Who Fri, October 16, 2015 Actors and Actresses who have starred in Game of Thrones and Doctor Who. Play slideshow IG • BBC 1 of 14 Maisie Williams - She is best known as the feisty Arya Stark in the HBO fantasy drama but she is set to take on a mysterious role in Doctor Who. The part will be one of her biggest parts to date

The 42-year-old gave fans, who have affectionately dubbed themselves Whovians, with a welcome update on-location from the show’s set, as filming for the highly-anticipated new cycle gets well underway. Holding the camera in the short clip, Lucas spoke of his excitement at being back on the show, as well as revealing a glimpse of Capaldi and newcomer Mackie. “It’s me here - not David Walliams, but the other one,” he said. “I’m ecstatic because it’s my first day back on Doctor Who. “Originally I was just in the Christmas special but now I find myself returning for more adventures.” He added: “I’m very excited and we’re here on location today, and look - can you see them? There’s the Doctor himself and young Bill.”

BBC Matt Lucas is reprising his role as the bumbling Nardole

TWITTER The actor shared a sneaky glimpse from the set in Cardiff",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
33616,"SKODA Production of the latest Skoda Octavia has begun

Skoda's latest generation Octavia, is the company's most-advanced version of the car to date. The looks are punchier and smarter, there are now more personalisation than ever and a whole host of new tech and gadgets have been tucked inside. Octavia has been given a facelift and is now fitted with full-LED headlights.

Skoda Octavia 2017 in pictures Mon, December 19, 2016 The brand new Skoda Octavia 2017 in pictures. Play slideshow PH 1 of 44 Skoda Octavia 2017

Various versions of the new Octavia have already be launched in the UK including the Estate, the rugged Scout and performance vRS. The Octavia vRS was the fastest production car the company have produced, with 230bhp until they introduced the vRS 245 which benefits from an extra 15PS. Skoda Board Member for Production Michael Oeljeklaus said that the new Octavia marks a new chapter fro the company.

SKODA The Octavia vRS 245 is the fastest ever production car Skoda have produced

“With the start of production of the new OCTAVIA, we are looking at the next chapter in the success story of our bestseller. ""Our entire ŠKODA team, from technical development, purchasing, production and logistics to quality assurance, has again done a great job.

SKODA The new Octavia is being built at the company's main plant in Mlada Boleslav",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
111193,"The 20-year-old has been in explosive form for Tottenham of late.

A double against Watford on New Year’s Day followed by a brace in the 2-0 win over Chelsea on Wednesday night has helped him continue his meteoric rise in the Premier League under Mauricio Pochettino.

Although this is only his second season in England’s top flight, he is making a lot of clubs sit up and take notice.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
325436,"GETTY George Osborne will make the comments in Cardiff today

The Chancellor will accuse political opponents of a ""creeping complacency"" about the prospects for recovery. He will cite turmoil in the Middle East, an economic slowdown in China, plunging commodity prices and a risk of stagnation. And in a clear swipe at Labour, he will say progress ""could still easily be reversed"" by politicians advocating ""billions of pounds more debt-fuelled public spending"".

Mr Osborne, making a speech in Cardiff, is expected to say: ""Anyone who thinks it's mission accomplished with the British economy is making a grave mistake. ""Last year was the worst for global growth since the crash and this year opens with a dangerous cocktail of new threats. ""For Britain, the only antidote to that is confronting complacency and sticking to the course we've charted.""

GETTY The Chancellor is tipped to replace David Cameron as Tory leader

He will conclude: ""Though the year is only seven days old, already we hear their predictable calls for billions of pounds more debt-fuelled public spending. ""They reject all the reforms we propose to deliver better-quality public services for less taxpayers' money. ""Today I want to issue this warning: unless we finish the job of fixing the public finances, to get Britain back into the black by finally spending less than we borrow, all of the progress we have made together could still easily be reversed.""",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
196860,"The 25 year old has gained a cult following on Instagram thanks to her ‘Bikini a Day’ account.

As well as regularly sharing images from her travels and on the beach with her 1.8 million followers, the blonde beauty has a fitness and beauty website with her business partner Devin.

In an interview with Women’s Health for their latest issue, Natasha shared her health and diet secrets.

She said: “I got my stomach from my mum, and both my sisters have it as well – we all have great stomachs.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
106589,"It comes as after a month-long investigation into his age confirmed he was at least 22 years old when he committed the crime - not 17, as he had claimed. Maria Ladenburger’s body was found in a river on October 16 last year near the southwestern German city of Freiburg, where she volunteered helping migrants in various shelters and homes. On the night of the 19-year-old's death, she was ambushed, raped and drowned as she cycled home from a party.

CEN Maria Ladenburger’s body was found in a river on October

Her death sparked national outrage, which saw fresh waves of hatred towards refugees in the country. Police arrested Hussein Khavari after linking his DNA to traces found at the crime scene. When questioned, Khavari claimed to be only 17 years old - meaning he would only serve a maximum 10-year prison sentence if found guilty. However, an age report commissioned by the prosecutor’s office has confirmed he was at least 22 years old at the time of the teenager’s murder.

CEN Maria's murder sparked national outrage against Angela Merkel's immigration policies

As part of the investigation into his age, German authorities used X-ray images of the suspect’s clavicle and tarsal bones, which were studied in detail. The results of the investigation will now clear the way for Khavari to be tried as an adult - where he faces a life sentence. The suspect has been in investigative custody during the age testing, and refused to be questioned by forensic medical experts.

CEN Maria's parents asked mourners to donate to a charity helping refugees instead of buying flowers",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
319367,"Police are now investigating the “racist crime” after they were inundated with complaints when the ""white zones"" signs appeared in a street and an underpass in Newbury, Berkshire. The racist flyers show a masked cartoon character posing with a Hitler salute, along with the slogan: “White zone, national action.” A spokesman from Thames Valley Police said the posters were spotted in Chestnut Crescent and the underpass under the A4 and into Almond Avenue.

Advertisement

TWITTER Thames Valley are investigating

Advertisement

The spokesman said: ""Thames Valley Police is appealing for information after several racist flyers have been posted in Newbury. ""Posters advocating 'white zones' were discovered. Officers are asking for people to come forward with any information as to who may have placed these stickers."" Sergeant Holly Nicholls said the shocking signs had been removed. She added: ""Thames Valley Police has received a complaint from a member of the public.

INS The White Zone poster appeared at locations in Newbury

GOOGLE MAPS The posters appeared in Chestnut Crescent in Newbury",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
245046,"Gareth Williams worked at MI6 headquarters in Vauxhall, London []

There is an address in South London where even the police can’t go. Detective Chief Inspector Jackie Sebire, the officer leading the investigation into the baffling death of MI6 agent Gareth Williams – the so-called “Spy in the Bag” case – must have wished her powers extended to 85 Vauxhall Cross. But they don’t. That address is the home of MI6 and although Sebire is a highly- experienced murder detective she doesn’t have security clearance to even enter the building much less question its inhabitants. Instead her investigation depended on the mediation of Detective Superintendent Michael Broster of SO15, the counter-terrorism branch, which works closely with the intelligence services. Only in the final stages of the inquest into Williams’s death this week did it emerge that no verbatim notes were taken of interviews with his MI6 colleagues and that a black holdall and nine memory sticks had been found at his desk but not handed over to the investigating officers.

We are also extremely disappointed over the reluctance and failure of MI6 to make available relevant information Gareth Williams' family

Now 50 MI6 staff are facing DNA tests after the coroner Dr Fiona Wilcox, in a narrative verdict, ruled that it was likely Williams was “unlawfully killed”. Investigators are understood to believe that a colleague either from MI6 or the Government’s secret listening post at GCHQ was in the Pimlico flat when Williams died. For his family – sister Ceri and parents Ian and Ellen – the inquest has raised as many questions as it has answered. And the most disturbing question of all is: does MI6 think it’s above the law? The family has accused the intelligence service of withholding vital clues and failing to make “basic inquiries” until a week after Williams disappeared. “We are also extremely disappointed over the reluctance and failure of MI6 to make available relevant information,” they added.

Dr Wilcox echoed those concerns when she said that the forgetfulness of some employees at MI6, where Williams was on secondment from GCHQ, “stretched probability” and she refused to rule out the possibility that someone from the world of intelligence was involved. From the moment the 31-year- old’s body was discovered in a North Face bag in the bath of his flat the response of MI6 has been puzzling. It took staff seven days even to report Williams – a conscientious time-keeper – missing then they appeared keen for police to be first into the apartment that MI6 has used for many years as temporary accommodation for employees.

The flat’s heating had been turned up high, despite the warmth of August, speeding up the decomposition of the body. The placing of the bag containing Williams into the bath prevented the giveaway leakage of fluids through the floor. There were suggestions that the flat had been “swept” by someone who was forensically aware, to remove as many clues as possible. Dr Wilcox said there was no evidence to suggest MI6 was involved in the death but “it is still a legitimate line of inquiry” and she added that “many agencies fell short” in the aftermath. Sir John Sawers, MI6 chief, has apologised “unreservedly”, saying that lessons had been learned. But have they?

The problem may be that deep within MI6, in its culture and attitudes, lies a belief that the law is for other people. The very nature of its work (MI6 deals with foreign intelligence, MI5 with domestic) means it is often on the boundaries of legality. The service is already under investigation for its part in sending Libyan dissidents into the hands of Muammar Gaddafi’s secret police. Conservative MP Andrew Tyne, chairman of the all-party parliamentary group on extraordinary rendition, this week called on Foreign Secretary William Hague to investigate whether MI6 officers had briefed journalists over the Libyan case – in breach of the Official Secrets Act.

The 1994 Intelligence Services Act allows MI6 officers to carry out acts abroad that if done in Britain would be in breach of criminal law. It would be hardly surprising if that attitude spreads to their staff at home. Michael Smith, author of SIX: The Real James Bonds, says: “MI6 would recoil at any suggestion that it sees itself as above the law but the inherent secrecy of organisations like MI6 does tend to make them think that keeping everything they do secret, even the slightest thing, is so important that it transcends everything else. “We’ve definitely seen that here, which is why the coroner and some police officers are so angry, justifiably so.”",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
129244,"Former United manager Ferguson’s book was officially launched today and tackles the summer-long saga over Rooney’s future, whilst claiming the forward “wouldn’t absorb new ideas” in training.

Rooney has started the season strongly under Ferguson’s successor Moyes – scoring five goals - and the United boss is confident he will continue to impress.

United face Real Sociedad in the Champions League tonight and Moyes said: “I have no concerns. I think Wayne is completely focused on his football. He has been since the first day of pre-season. He is in good form, looking after himself and playing well.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
228069,"Elon Musk, who co-founded online payment site PayPal, says artificial intelligence (AI) is our ""biggest existential threat"".

Speaking at the MIT AeroAstro Centennial Symposium in Cambridge, Massachusetts, USA, Mr Musk said: ""I think we should be very careful about artificial intelligence.

""If I had to guess at what our biggest existential threat is, it’s probably that. So we need to be very careful with artificial intelligence.""

South Africa-born Mr Musk, 43, said governments should step in and regulate AI 'just to make sure that we don't do something very foolish'.

He said: ""With artificial intelligence we’re summoning the demon. You know those stories where there’s the guy with the pentagram, and the holy water, and he’s like — Yeah, he’s sure he can control the demon? Doesn’t work out.""",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
245913,"Up to 40 Conservative MPs are planning to vote for a Labour amendment to the Government’s EU Referendum Bill unless concessions are made.

It could mean the Prime Minister will suffer a damaging defeat on the first day the Commons returns after the summer break.

The threat follows a row over the Government's decision not to impose the usual “purdah” period in the run up to the referendum planned by the end of 2017.

Purdah restrictions prevent Government press officers and Whitehall budgets being used in the run up to elections and referendums.

Ministers claim that a purdah period is not practical during the EU referendum because Government business could be brought to a halt.

But Tory Euro-sceptics have accused ministers of attempting to ""rig"" the historic poll on Britain's European future.

Before the summer, the Government promised to revise the plans to win back the support of rebels but nothing has yet been put forward.

As a result, Tory backbenchers are understood to be prepared to back the Labour amendment which seeks to restrict public spending during the referendum campaign.

One Tory MP said this ""will raise huge suspicion that the Government isn't playing fair on the referendum"".",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
88360,"The Lyon striker favourited a tweet that explicitly linked him with a move to the Emirates.

However, the Ligue 1 top scorer has since removed the favourite after it understandably drew attention on the social media.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
315809,"Can you guess what life will be like in 2116?

Packing for a holiday can be a stressful experience, as you panic over what essentials to take that won’t exceed the luggage limit. But experts reveal this won’t be a problem for holidaymakers by the year 2116.

Advertisement

A new report by a group of academics, future architects and urbanists has looked at what life may be like 100 years from now. And they’ve predicted that huge drones will be able to carry entire building wherever you want to go - meaning you can take your entire house on holiday with you.

PA You'll be able to take your whole house on holiday

A view of what London could look like in 15 years The Pinnacle will be built in central London Elizabeth House near the London Eye City Pride at Island Point The view of Bishopsgate

Advertisement

And forget traditional holiday destinations like Spain or the Caribbean. In 2116, families will be able to take commercial flights to space, as colonisation on the Moon and Mars will have already taken place. They also said people will live in ‘earth-scrapers-, which will go up to 25 storeys underground. And in another space saving move, ‘bubble cities’ will be created for humans to live underwater.

PA Underwater cities will be a popular place to live

In hotels, apartments and even own homes, people will have 3D furniture. Exact replicas of large scale strictures will be made out of recyclable materials. Smart LED room surfaces mean you won’t have to argue over how to re-decorate your home. Walls, floors and ceilings will be able to adapt to suit your mood.

PA You'll be able to enjoy your summer holiday on the Moon",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
211789,"The pound to euro exchange rate remains the same despite Berlin tragedy

A lorry smashed through the market at Kaiser Wilhelm Memorial Church, last night.

Currently, 12 people have lost their lives and at least another 50 have been seriously injured.

The Russian ambassador, Andrey Karlov, was also shot dead in Turkey’s capital, Ankara last night.

The heightened geopolitical tensions in Europe has caused neither the pound nor euro to dip against the other.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
66875,"UK drivers who have lied to their insurance company about penalty points, to get a cheaper insurance quote, could risk having their policy made void. In addition to this, these drivers risk police prosecution and having their car crushed, according to figures released by the RAC. Over half a million drivers confessed to keeping their driving records a secret in an attempt to score cheaper insurance premiums. However, motorists who are caught out, risk having their cover invalidated.

To add to this, if the police discover the deliberate deception of the truth, they can issue you more points and unlimited fine and even a driving ban. What’s more, the uninsured car can then be seized and crushed by the traffic police. It is estimated that around 650,000 motorists have lied about the amount of points they have on their licence when taking out a new policy.

Cheap car insurance - Most popular and affordable cars to insure REVEALED Sun, March 19, 2017 Cheap car insurance - Most popular and affordable cars to insure REVEALED Play slideshow GETTY 1 of 15 1. Vauxhall Corsa - £2,065 average yearly cost

Now experts at RAC are warning that the problem could increase as 18 per cent of those surveyed said they would ’t inform their insurer if they got any points.

The findings of our research are worrying RAC Insurance director Mark Godfrey

Drivers withholding information from insurers or bending the truth can also have their insurance premium invalidated. For example, lying about where your car is kept at night and whether or not you use it for commuting can also invalidate your insurance. Ignorance is certainly not bliss in this case as motorists can still face the same fines and punishments as those who deliberately withhold information.

GETTY Motorists who lie on their insurance about penalty points could see their car be crushed

RAC Insurance director Mark Godfrey said: “It is the duty of every driver to inform their insurer of any circumstance that might affect the contract they have with them, both during the insurance term and at renewal. “Not declaring penalty points is a serious matter as it puts drivers at risk of holding invalid insurance as well as potentially incurring substantial penalties from the police, or even a prosecution.” Speeding seems to be the most common offence with nine out of ten saying they’d been flashed by a camera.

GETTY Lying about penalty points could invalidate your licence",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
191633,"GETTY - STOCK A 'brain training' game can help improve the memory of people in the early stages of dementia

Cognitive training has shown benefits but packages are usually repetitive and boring, affecting patients’ motivation. Now Cambridge University researchers have developed Game Show, and tested its effects on cognition and motivation.

Participants play it on an iPad, taking part in a make-believe game show to win gold coins. A show host encourages the player to maintain and progress beyond their last played level.

Early signs of Dementia Tue, December 20, 2016 Dementia affects the ability to remember, think and reason. Here are the early signs to look out for in yourself and loved ones. Play slideshow Getty Images 1 of 12 Early signs of dementia

Good brain health is as important as good physical health Professor Barbara Sahakian

The results, published in The International Journal of Neuropsychopharmacology, show that patients who played the game made around a third fewer errors than those on basic cognitive training. They also needed fewer trials and improved their memory score by around 40 per cent.

GETTY - STOCK Researchers have developed Game Show which tests effects on cognition and motivation",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
365730,"The 18-year-old has had a remarkable rise to prominence, making a goalscoring debut in February to being on the brink of an England call-up to Euro 2016.

""I am delighted to have signed a new contract,"" he said.

""I have always been a Manchester United fan, so to be playing in the first team really is a dream come true.

""I am grateful for having the chance to prove myself.

""To be able to play football at the biggest club in the world means everything to me and my family.""",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
366309,"REUTERS Louis van Gaal disappointed to take just a point from Manchester Derby

The Red Devils currently sit fourth in the Premier League standings, level on points with West Ham and two behind leaders City and second-place Arsenal. Van Gaal admits he's disappointed for the Old Trafford faithful after his side failed to make the most of their chances against City, but remains hopeful in the title race.

Manchester United boss Louis van Gaal in pictures Mon, October 5, 2015 The arrogant, dominant and honest (his words not ours) Louis van Gaal joined Manchester United in 2014. Express Sport have rounded up our favourite pictures of the Dutch boss. Play slideshow Foto Leo Vogelzang BV 1 of 19 THOSE pictures with Dick Advocaat

When asked if United are serious title contenders, he said: ""You have to win against these kind of teams, but the way we have played gives hope for the future."" The Dutchman added: “When you see this game, I think the fans were very proud of the players because, when I go back to the dressing room, they were applauding us.

GETTY Louis van Gaal remains positive in Premier League title race",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
361574,"The row came as a man appeared in court charged with the murder of Christina 16, who was stabbed to death in an apparently random attack on her way to school last week.

Phillip Simelane, 22, spoke only to confirm his name during the 10-minute hearing at Birmingham Crown Court.

Hours earlier West Midlands Police used the force’s Twitter account to post a link claiming: “Crime on buses has fallen by 65 per cent over the last five years with an average of one crime per 147,000 journeys.”",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
139952,"GETTY/PARAMOUNT Fans went wild over Christina Ricci photoshopped photo

Christina - who plays Wednesday Addams in the famous 1990s movies - looks identical to her mum in the snap that's been doing the rounds online. The actress can be seen posing with her hand on her hip in the black and white image, which shows her with black hair and pale skin, flaunting some serious cleavage in a plunging black dress.

Christina Ricci (Wednesday Addams) dressing as Morticia Addams. pic.twitter.com/SELzUssVp9 — Wahab (@Qatami) September 21, 2015

Despite fans sharing their excitement online though, it's since been revealed that the shot has just been cleverly photoshopped. According to Yahoo! Movies, the photograph was edited from a promotional image of actress Anjelica Huston in the iconic outfit from either The Addams Family or Addams Family Values.

Despite the majority being fully aware by now that the pic has been edited, that hasn't stopped fans continuing to gush over how great Christina looks. One person posted: ""Jaws #Dropping At Image Of Christina #Ricci #Dressed As Morticia Addams"" as another added: ""Wow I wanna be her. Christina Ricci dressed as Morticia!"" Another person shared: ""Christina Ricci looks absolutely gorgeous dressed up as Morticia Addams. Seriously dude.""

PARAMOUNT Christina as Wednesday Addams in the much-loved movies

GETTY Actress was photoshopped to look like Morticia",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
171654,"Urs Zihlmann • Caters Only 450 people are allowed to visit the caves each year

Vietnam's Han Son Doong cave is the largest in the world. It’s more than 200 metres high - which means it’s big enough to fit a 40-storey skyscraper - and the tunnels are five kilometres long. At 150 metres across, the cave is wide enough to fit 10 double decker buses end to end, or a 747 plane. The cave is so big and unique that it even has its own climate.

Caters This incredible cave in Vietnam is 40 storeys deep

The cave also has its own jungle, and clouds form in its caverns, thanks to the change in temperatures from the hot air outside meeting the cooler air inside the cave. It’s definitely not an easy cave to reach - you’ll need to trek through jungle for half a day to get there, and you’ll have to wade knee deep through rivers to reach this jaw-dropping location. This isn’t one that you want to forget your camera for. Swiss photographer Urs Zihlmann took these incredible shots on a five-day trip with more than 40 other photographers, after being inspired by a feature in National Geographic magazine.

Caters Han Son Doong is the world's largest cave

Only 450 are allowed to visit the cave in Ke Bang National Park each year. Visitors must work with one tour operator - Oxalis - who work with the Vietnamese government officials to ensure the cave is protected. More and more tourist attractions are feeling the strain of tourism, with one tropical island in Thailand recently closing its doors after it may have seen irreparable ecological damage from high numbers of visitors. Even with porters willing to carry your photography equipment and luggage, the five-day trek is only suitable for those who have caving experience.

Urs Zihlmann • Caters Visitors need to take a five-day trek through a jungle

Inside the world's most stunning caves Thu, November 26, 2015 Stunning images inside some of the the World's biggest caves Play slideshow John Spies / Barcroft Media 1 of 25 World's Biggest Cave

Urs Zihlmann • Caters Han Son Doong in Vietnam",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
248666,"Fans of the Red Devils are able to vote for their favourite strike, with no less than 10 making the shortlist. The results will be announced at the club's awards ceremony on 19 May, and Blind feels that Di Maria's stunning strike against Leicester is one of the main contenders alongside Juan Mata's Liverpool volley and Wayne Rooney's audacious finish versus Aston Villa.

I think the goal from Angel [Di Maria] against Leicester was very nice Daley Blind

Blind told United Review: “I think the goal from Angel [Di Maria] against Leicester was very nice."" “But also the goal from Juan [Mata] against Liverpool was great – there was so much pressure in the game and he scored like that, it was unbelievable. ""Also, the week after that, Wayne [Rooney] scored an amazing goal against Aston Villa, so I don’t think I have much of a chance! But you never know – I’ll keep my fingers crossed.""",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
89339,"The Brazil midfielder is better known for crunching tackles rather than his goals, but he set the Blues on the way last night with an early opportunistic finish.



And after Daniel Georgievski scored an own–goal just before halftime, Ramires smashed in his second to erase memories of Chelsea's home defeat by Basle. He now has three goals in as many games for Chelsea – he also scored against Swindon in the Capital One Cup – and with manager Jose Mourinho running out of options up front, perhaps he is the answer. Fernando Torres lasted just 11 minutes before limping off with a knee injury and is banned from this Sunday's clash with Norwich anyway, following his sending–off against Tottenham last Saturday.



His replacement, Samuel Eto'o, is yet to convince in a Chelsea shirt, while Demba Ba seems to be completely out of favour.



This was a crucial win for the Blues, wrapped up when Frank Lampard hit a last–minute fourth, but it was only their third in their last 13 away games in the Champions League.



Most importantly, it eased the pressure after Basle's shock win at Stamford Bridge in their Group E opener and put a smile back on Mourinho's face after a difficult week.



The Special One walked out of his pre–match press conference in a huff after becoming irritated with questions about Kevin de Bruyne.



The Belgian is the latest player in the Mourinho doghouse, left behind to train with the kids while the seniors flew to Romania.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
298640,"Villa had led from the 16th minute through Andreas Weimann, something to celebrate in itself given it was their first goal since September, but then they collapsed in the last six minutes.

Benteke was sent off in the 65th minute of his best game since coming back from injury for slapping Ryan Mason in the face.

Mason, who shoved into Benteke to launch the row, could have been red-carded himself when he leaned his head into the Villa man.

Benteke's reaction cost Villa enormously as they tumble yet again towards relegation problems after six successive defeats. They are only two points clear of the bottom three.

Yet for so long it looked as if it would be Tottenham under pressure, coming into this game with one victory in seven and struggling to cope with Benteke.

Nacer Chadli's equaliser in the 84th minute and substitute Harry Kane's free-kick winner, deflected in off Nathan Baker's head in the last minute, changed the picture for them.

Spurs are now six points ahead of danger but they will have to do better than this because for so long they were tepid, weak of spine, and benefited hugely by the opposition's best player being sent off.

This should have been a doddle for Spurs given their overwhelming record against Villa - they haven't lost to them since 2008 - but Benteke forced them to rethink.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
37845,"The Leicester City striker has impressed while on loan at Championship outfit Blackburn this season that has seen him score once.

A product of Manchester United's youth academy, the 21-year-old made just one appearance for the Red Devils as Ryan Giggs handed him a start against Hull City in May 2014.

And now the Welshman could be on his way to link up with former United player Phil Neville, according to the Daily Mail.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
331042,"Amy showed the youngsters how to decorate cupcakes

Amy-Beth Ellice, 16, visited the charity’s Indigo Young Carers service to give the youngsters a break from their responsibilities with a spot of fun baking. There are around 178,000 young carers – average age 12 – looking after relatives in England and Wales. Many miss out on opportunities to play and learn.

Advertisement

Amy-Beth, from Essex, showed the youngsters at the east London-based charity how to decorate cupcakes using Candy Craft’s new chocolate pen, available to buy this autumn. The pen enables the user to write, mould and decorate in delicious liquid chocolate. The teenager with her own bakery business has produced a recipe book, Amy’s Baking Year, and writes for OK! magazine.

TIM CLARKE Amy has her own bakery business and has produced her own recipe book

She said: “It was a real privilege meeting and spending time with the young carers at Barnardo’s Indigo service. “It’s humbling to hear how these young people selflessly give up so much of their time helping to take care of their loved ones. ""It was lovely to be able to bake with them and show them how rewarding it can be. ""I find baking really therapeutic as well as being a fun thing to do with family and friends.” Barnardo’s Indigo Services Manager Jo Chaney said: “This was a chance for our young carers to leave their caring responsibilities at home and take part in something interesting and fun. “It was an opportunity to meet a successful cookery writer who is an inspiring role model to young people. ""Hopefully, the event will motivate them to get experience in the world of work and perhaps pursue a career in cooking or baking.” * To buy Amy's Baking year by Amy-Beth Ellice visit the Express Bookshop",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
115941,"Liverpool striker Solanke opened the scoring in the 16th minute at the Obolon Arena, before an own-goal from Ukraine’s Pavlo Lukyanchuk sealed the victory.

Aidy Boothroyd’s side were, however, given an early warning of Ukraine’s intent when Manchester City’s attacking midfielder Oleksandr Zinchenko created the first chance by feeding Stanislav Bilkenny, whose shot was just off target from inside the penalty area.

But England were soon ahead. Ainsley Maitland Niles and Kyle Walker-Peters saw their initial attempts blocked, before Nottingham Forest midfielder Kieran Dowell played in Solanke, who finished well from about 18 yards.

Ukraine came close to levelling early in the second half when only a crucial intervention from goalkeeper Angus Gunn prevented Artem Besedin from scoring an equaliser from close range.

Boothroyd, however, then introduced Axel Tuanzebe for his U21 debut as well as striker Dominic Calvert-Lewin and, soon after, their lead was doubled.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
140326,"With fond memories of Ray Cooney’s Caught In The Net a decade ago, I hoped this revival of the Whitehall farceur’s Eighties romp about a Tory minister trying to arrange an afternoon assignation with a Number 10 secretary would be a treble treat, because the 81-year-old Cooney also acts and directs.

If only. While some of the audience were lubricated enough to guffaw by the end, for me this excruciatingly unfunny evening was a triple whammy of ghastliness, with lame writing, sloppy direction and a performance by Cooney where the kindest thing you can say is it’s not the worst on the stage.

At first I thought the tacky Crossroads Motel set was a knowing joke but it is actually meant to be a smart Westminster billet used as by parliamentary grandees.

I wondered if this shed light on a bygone era before they all bought second homes on expenses, but it becomes clear Cooney doesn’t care how real MPs talk or behave.

The gags are laboured and witless, as is a good deal of the acting, with Nick Wilton over-sweating it as the portly private secretary who is both pimp and unlikely lothario. Michael Praed looks and sounds the part as randy Tory minister Dicky Willey (ha ha!) but comedy is more of a stretch and he only intermittently remembers he’s meant to be high on happy pills.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
225927,"GETTY No smoking sign: This enigma still exists on planes despite being 30 years out of date

Passengers may often look up and notice the illuminated No Smoking sign hovering above their head during a flight. It’s right next to the sign indicating travellers should fasten their seatbelt – but unlike its counterpart, the No Smoking sign hasn’t been needed for almost three decades. Yet there it sits on every commercial aircraft – why? One clue lies in the original function of the signs. Back when smoking was allowed on flights, prior to 1988, there would be a smoking section and a non smoking section on the plane.

Changing anything on an aeroplane requires a detailed approval process

The signs would be illuminated or left off to indicate which section passengers were sitting in. One of the main reasons the signs still exist is that the lifespan of a commercial aircraft is fairly long – and the signs remain from when they were necessary in the eighties. Dan Zeehandelaar, an aeroplane logistics and enterprise software expert, explained on Quora: “Many of the MD80, 737, 757, 767 planes that comprise today's airline fleet were designed and certified in the 80s.” As these planes are still in use, it makes sense that airlines wouldn’t waste money stripping out interiors simply to eliminate one obsolete feature.

Top 10 airline secrets Tue, November 22, 2016 Air travel secrets: Here are the top 10 secrets of the airline industry revealed. Play slideshow Getty Images 1 of 10 Economy seats are safer - Studies suggest that you are more likely to survive a crash if you are sitting at the back of the aeroplane

He added: “Changing anything on an aeroplane requires a detailed approval process, which the airlines must have decided wasn't worth it.” Other pilots and industry experts agree with Dan, citing the complex procedure as the reason aeroplanes still have No Smoking signs. In the United States, the regulations requiring aircraft to have the signs are still on the books. The Federal Aviation Administration (FAA) mandates the signs, and the outdated rule has seemingly never been amended.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
65203,"The drama unfolded yesterday as it was revealed police discovered a ""suspicious substance"" when they arrested five people while targeting a terror cell with alleged links to the deadly attacks in Paris and Brussels. The car, believed to be a taxi or a chauffeur-driven vehicle, was outside Manchester Airport's terminal three building this morning when smoke began to billow from under the bonnet. Moments later the vehicle dramatically burst into flames.

Twitter/Scott Wallser Smoke billowed from the car at Manchester Airport

Advertisement

A shocked witness said: ""The driver stopped his car and there was smoke coming out of the bonnet and then it went up in flames."" Miraculously it is not believed anyone was hurt in the fireball and flights in and out of the airport were not affected. Just moments later, at the same airport, a teenager was arrested on suspicion of Syria-related terrorism offences. The 18-year-old man from Birmingham was held by counter-terrorism officers after returning to the UK, West Midlands Police confirmed. It is not thought the fireball was related to the terror arrest.

Advertisement

A force spokesman said: ""Today's arrest follows the arrest of a man and a woman on Monday, April 4. The pair, a 24-year-old man and a 20-year-old woman, both from Birmingham, are currently on police bail. ""There was no risk to any passengers at Manchester Airport or to the wider public in relation to these arrests."" The drama at the airport came just hours after police arrested four men and a woman as part of an investigation involving MI5 and authorities in France and Belgium, discovering what they described as a ""suspicious substance"".

GETTY The drama unfolded at Manchester Airport

The suspect material was discovered at an address in Birmingham, where men, aged 26, 40 and 59, and a 29-year-old woman were arrested. A 26-year-old man was also arrested at Gatwick Airport in the early hours of Friday and all five were held on suspicion of being concerned in the commission, preparation or instigation of acts of terrorism. Police said they are not linking the three incidents. Counter-terrorism officers were today given seven further days to question three of the men, two aged 26 and one aged 40, and a 29-year-old woman, West Midlands Police said. A 59-year-old man has been released on bail ""with strict conditions"". West Midlands Police (WMP) said the arrests formed part of an extensive inquiry into ""any associated threat"" to Britain following terrorist atrocities in the French and Belgian capitals. Officers are continuing to search a number of properties in Birmingham.

PA Manchester Airport is one of the busiest in the UK",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
109765,"GETTY With hot weather over the next weeks, growth in the garden will slow

Temperatures hit 33C in the south yesterday and although it wasn’t unexpected because forecasters had accurately predicted a heatwave, it was still quite a shock to the system if you were out and about. With more hot weather a strong possibility over the next few weeks, growth in the garden will slow and the lawn will need fewer cuts. In fact, it’s wise to keep the grass longer than normal during hot weather to help reduce evaporation of water from the surface. Either mow less frequently or raise the cutting height on the mower.

Pond owners should be aware that amphibians need to be able to retreat to cool water during hot spells. Frogs and toads are invaluable for keeping the slug population down, so protect their habitat by keeping a close eye on the level of water in ponds and water features. Water evaporates at an alarming rate over the course of a few hot days. Top it up with rain water if available, which contains less nitrates than tap water.

GETTY Keep bird baths filled to provide a vital lifeline for thirsty wildlife

With natural water sources drying up, birds, bats, bees and hedgehogs will all be feeling the heat and in need of a drink. Keep bird baths and shallow containers filled to provide a vital lifeline for thirsty wildlife. Other low key, fulfilling jobs that can be done without working up a sweat include: Collecting seeds from annuals and spent perennials. The seeds need to be completely dry before they are stored and by gathering them on a sunny day you are half way there. This job doubles up as dead-heading too, which may promote new flowers on some of the plants. Mediterranean herbs such as thyme, rosemary and basil will thrive in the heat. Harvest their new fresh growth and dry it out before storing in airtight containers for use in the winter.

GETTY Wildlife including hedgehogs will be in need of a good drink in the summer heat

GETTY Herbs like thyme, rosemary and basil will thrive in the heat",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
359446,"CHRIS NEILL:MAVERICK Manchester United fans dodge traffic to get autographs with their heroes

Manchester United stars Paul Pogba, Marcus Rashford and Chris Smalling were shocked yesterday when supporters dodged traffic to get a glimpse of them.



Just half a mile away from United’s Carrington training ground, Red Devils fans dodged traffic to get close to their heroes.



Standing in front of heavy goods vehicles heading to a local industrial estate, the determined supporters stopped cars carrying United players at the first set of traffic lights coming out of Carrington.



During a crazy 40-minute spell, United aces Pogba, Rashford, Smalling and Marouane Fellaini were approached by fans for autographs.

Young fans run into traffic for Man United autographs Fri, August 19, 2016 Click through the gallery for shocking images of young fans dicing with death in an attempt to collect Man United autographs Play slideshow Chris Neill/Maverick Photography 1 of 12 Click through the gallery for shocking images of young fans dicing with death in an attempt to collect Man United autographs

Paul Pogba - the world’s most expensive player following his £89million return to Old Trafford from Juventus last week - was being driven in a large Mercedes van when it got swarmed at a red light.



The chauffeur driving the France international didn’t know what to do with the lights set to turn green, giving Pogba no chance to sign autographs.



United centre-back Smalling was driving his black Bentley when fans unbelievably stood in front of it and banged on the doors for attention at a GREEN light.



Like Pogba, the England star had no real opportunity to stop without risking a crash.



However, teenage striker Rashford was able to sign autographs with a black marker pen for some lucky fans - although he did so keeping both eyes firmly on the traffic lights in front of his car.

CHRIS NEILL:MAVERICK Marcus Rashford keeps one eye on the traffic lights as he signs autographs

CHRIS NEILL•MAVERICK Fans try to get the attention of the world's most expensive player Paul Pogba

CHRIS NEILL:MAVERICK A heavy goods vehicle came within inches of some young fans

Rashford almost missed going through the lights in all the confusion, with other drivers nearby stunned at the lengths some went to for a moment with the stars.



A source told Express Sport: “It was extremely dangerous, by the grace of god no one was knocked over.”



“Kids were within inches of being clipped by vehicles, one vehicle was close to mowing down six children.



“I’m staggered that no one was injured yesterday.”



One driver in a heavy-goods vehicle added: “It’s only a matter of time before someone gets killed here.”

Man United players caught in a selfie storm Fri, August 19, 2016 Click through the gallery for the best snaps as Man United were swarmed by a pack of selfie hunters Play slideshow Eamonn and James Clarke 1 of 8 Click through the gallery for the best snaps as Man United were swarmed by a pack of selfie hunters

Last night the Manchester United squad were swarmed by fans hunting selfies as they checked into the Lowry Hotel.



United stay in the Manchester city centre hotel the night before match days and were checking in ahead of their Premier League clash with Southampton tonight (8pm).



Jose Mourinho is expected to hand record signing Paul Pogba his second debut against the Saints, returning to the club four years after he left for Juventus.



Mourinho is confident his new man is the real deal, but played down claims he is on par with Cristiano Ronaldo and Lionel Messi.



“First of all, when you speak about the best players in the world, you go immediately to the ones that score a lot of goals,” Mourinho said.



""Can Paul score the same number of goals as Ronaldo and Messi? Not even 25 per cent, I believe. I don’t believe in a season he can score 20 goals. Goalkeepers, defenders, midfielders don’t generally win the Golden Ball.

GETTY Paul Pogba is set for his second Manchester United debut tonight

Bon anniv Titi happy birthday Titi #thierryhenri @equipedefrance A photo posted by Paul Labile Pogba (@paulpogba) on Aug 18, 2016 at 10:06am PDT",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
169089,"GETTY Three-time Olympian Beth Tweddle tells about her travels

Born in Johannesburg, she was raised in Bunbury, Cheshire.



MOST MEMORABLE HOLIDAY?



It’s difficult to pick just one. I loved Florida when I went with my family in 1996. There’s something for everyone: Universal Studios, Walt Disney World, Busch Gardens and some great beaches. We went to Jávea on the Costa Blanca in Spain last year for our first family holiday in a long time. It was really chilled and just nice to spend time with my family.

AND YOUR WORST?



I’m lucky. I don’t think I’ve ever had a bad holiday although I once had a nightmare with a delayed connection. I ended up in Florida with no bags and no friend to meet me because she assumed that I’d missed the flight and would be on the next one.

BEST HOLIDAY READ?



I read a mixture of books usually recommended by my best friend. I’ve just finished The Fault In Our Stars by John Green which I enjoyed but it was a real tear-jerker.



GETTY Beth Tweddle is the most successful British gymnast of all time

HOW DO YOU SPEND YOUR TIME ON HOLIDAY?



For the first few days I like to chill by the pool, read and catch up with whoever I’m on holiday with. I spend so much time away from home so I like to make the most of my time with them. After a few days I need to do some kind of activity, such as horse-riding or jet-skiing. I’m so used to being active all the time. I’m not very good at sitting around.

GETTY Beth took a turn on the ice for TV show

WHERE WOULD YOU REVISIT?



I went to South Africa last year and I would definitely go back. I have a close connection with the country as it’s where I was born. On my trip I went on safari, visited a local charity and went to the top of Table Mountain where I just couldn’t resist getting a photo of me doing a handstand. The view was amazing.

GETTY The family holiday to Florida has stayed with Beth",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
67995,"Security has been stepped up across Paris

A statement on their website said: ""In light of the recent tragic events in France and in support of our community and the victims of these horrendous attacks, Disneyland Paris has decided not to open its theme parks on Saturday 14 November.

""Our thoughts and prayers go out to all of those affected by these horrible events.”

Disneyland Paris, situated 20 miles east of the centre of Paris, is one of Europe’s busiest tourist attractions with 14 million people visiting last year.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
168294,"As the opening bars of Heaven Must Be Missing An Angel stuttered forth from the sound system in the Kon-Tiki bar I advanced, dry-mouthed, across the floor to request a dance... I didn’t get the girl, of course.

The problem with discos back then was that there was always someone bigger and slightly older than me, some kind of athletic, rugby-player sort, who cut in and took over.

I slunk back to our family’s holiday chalet to the strains of Jimmy Mack, leaving my missing angel and the rugby oaf snogging over by the potted palms. But if Martha Reeves would never sound quite as good after that evening, the romance and excitement of the dance floor remained.

On my first night out with my future wife, a decade or so later, it didn’t take us long to abandon the terrible play we’d bought tickets for (a painfully unfunny musical about a convent called Nunsense) and dash off to the Limelight club in Shaftesbury Avenue to dance to Earth, Wind & Fire’s September and Kool & The Gang’s Get Down On It. If that’s not the perfect first date, I don’t know what is.

Is love still blossoming on Britain’s dance-floors? Probably, but there are a lot fewer of them according to figures released last week by the snappily-named Association Of Licensed Multiple Retailers (ALMR).

In fact the number of nightclubs in Britain has halved in the past 10 years from 3,144 in 2005 to 1,733 currently.

Everything from changes in the licensing laws (so that you can just as easily dance for free in a late-night bar as pay to get into a club) to the introduction of college tuition fees (cutting down on students’ disposable income) has been cited as a reason for the fall in numbers.

But if the bigger nightclubs are closing their doors, I suspect there are still plenty of smaller, niche places where you can get on up and get on down, and these are surely a lot more fun.

My 21-year-old son has been mourning the closure of his favourite venue, an establishment called Willow in York, but he tells horror stories of vast, hangar-like dance halls where the business of being searched for weapons and drugs by gimlet-eyed bouncers has certainly taken the shine off an evening.

I don’t think I have ever been to a club, small or large, I didn’t enjoy because I love dancing and though marriage and children have taken life off in different directions there are still times, as on a family holiday recently, where my wife and I find ourselves out on the dance floor.

Our two sons and daughter, of course, sat on the perimeter cradling their drinks and trying to ignore us but if you can’t embarrass your own children, then who can you embarrass?

I still get frustrated by the complete incompetence of many amateur DJs though.

There is a classic episode of Father Ted in which the priest doing the Dj-ing at a charity event forgets all his records except for Ghost Town by The Specials... one of the gloomiest singles ever made.

But even DJs choosing their records from thousands on an Apple laptop are still capable of following a classic dance track such as Michael Jackson’s Billie Jean, guaranteed to fill the dance floor, with a slow ballad which will just as quickly empty it.

It’s hard to avoid this though, if you run a disco, as you should, by playing the records the crowd requests. During the mid-1980s I owned a mobile disco with my friend Paul.

We both had big record collections and would take boxes of discs carefully selected to cover almost any request or occasion. Different types and ages of people would come up and ask for their favourites but it’s not too difficult to keep the floor busy mixing, say, the Beatles, funk and Glen Miller as long as the pace of the music is similar.

One evening, at a rugby club in Coulsdon, Surrey, we were doing really well until one of the guests came up and asked for the strange American single that was then, quite inexplicably, sitting at number two in the charts.

It was the one record we’d prayed no one would request.

We hoped he might wander away and forget about it but he kept reappearing in front of the decks.

“You must have it,” he insisted, “and it’s my wife’s absolute favourite.”

Which is how, on a glorious summer’s evening, a packed and sweaty crowd who had been punching the air to everything from Duran Duran’s Planet Earth to Dexys Midnight Runners suddenly found themselves back at their tables, silent and openmouthed as performance artist Laurie Anderson hummed her way through eight minutes and 21 seconds of her unlikely hit record.

O Superman: guaranteed to empty a disco faster than a speeding bullet...",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
312706,"Now you can create your own toffee popcorn cake

Advertisement

A whopping 75 per cent of Brits admit they have struggled with “soggy bottoms” when baking, and a further one in five said their baking attempts usually end in disaster. But if you want to get a bake worthy of The Great British Bake Off, a new handy step-by-step guide could help. Electrical retailer ao.com have released a guide to making a truly stunning toffee popcorn cake. You will need 4 eggs, butter, flour, sugar and vanilla essence.

Add the butter and sugar and beat together and then add all of the eggs. Add the vanilla essence and pour the resulting mixture into the tin. Bake for 30 minutes at 180 degrees centigrade. Repeat for two eight inch cakes and two six inch cakes.

Advertisement

The Great British Bake Off 2016 contestants Candice: The Great British Bake Off 2016 Val: The Great British Bake Off 2016 Kate: The Great British Bake Off 2016 Selasi: The Great British Bake Off 2016 Benjamina: The Great British Bake Off 2016 Andrew: The Great British Bake Off 2016 Michael: The Great British Bake Off 2016 Rav: The Great British Bake Off 2016 Tom: The Great British Bake Off 2016 Jane: The Great British Bake Off 2016 Lee: The Great British Bake Off 2016 Louise: The Great British Bake Off 2016

Level the two high inch cakes using a sharp knife and sandwich together with the buttercream. Cover the cake with a thin layer of buttercream - you may want to place it on a cake stand or raised platform to make this easier. Using a biscuit cutter, cut circles into the smaller sponges, scooping the sponge out with a spoon. Fill one hole with popcorn, before sandwiching the other one on top using buttercream as a ‘glue’.

AO.COM Cover the cakes with a thin layer of buttercream

Cover this smaller cake with a thin layer of buttercream. Make a toffee sauce by melting butter, sugar and cream together over a medium heat until dissolved. Simmer for two minutes and then remove from the heat and add icing sugar, beating together until smooth. Then make the toffee shards - add sugar and water to a pan and dissolve sugar over a low heat.

AO.COM The finished cake is sure to impress",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
171403,"GETTY Mr Goldsmith said he would fund an extra 500 police for the Tube network

The Tory hopeful said concerns about a suicide bombing on the London Underground or the capital's trains and buses had ""gone through the roof"" in the wake of the Paris and Brussels attacks. ""Each and every one of us"" faces an increased threat of being caught up in a fresh terror attack as Islamic State (ISIS) fighters plot their next strike on a European capital, he said.

Tapping into voters fears over the threat of a copy-cat attack by ISIS fighters, Mr Goldsmith said he would fund an extra 500 police for the Tube network by stripping away perks from transport staff. The Conservative MP for Richmond said: ""We know that the threat has grown. ""We know that anxiety levels have gone through the roof when it comes to the threat of terror, particularly the use of our public transport system. ""We all know that there are those who wish London harm, that we are, in this city, a prime target - each and every one of us.""

London 7/7 bombings Thu, July 7, 2016 On July 7th 2005 Aldgate, King's Cross, and Marylebone Underground stations, as well as a number 30 bus on Tavistock square, were attacked by a group of terrorists in London. Play slideshow AFP/Getty Images 1 of 60 The wreck of the Number 30 double-decker bus in Tavistock Square, Central London, following the July 7 terrorist attacks

The policy would be paid for by scrapping free passes available to friends and relatives of Transport for London (TfL) staff. Mr Goldsmith insisted that ""tens of millions"" could be found by cutting the perk in order to fund the extra officers to ease people's concerns about an attack on the transport network. But TfL estimates the perk only costs between £5million and £7m. London Mayor Boris Johnson, who was campaigning with Mr Goldsmith, dismissed the possible removal of the pass as a ""relatively trivial detail"".

GETTY The Conservative MP for Richmond said the threat has grown

GETTY Tory mayoral candidate Zac Goldsmith

GETTY All TfL staff will continue to receive free travel

All TfL staff will continue to receive free travel, but Mr Goldsmith proposed removing the perk allowing workers to also nominate one person living at their home address for a taxpayer-funded travelcard. Mr Goldsmith said it was an ""unfair situation"" and while ""the figure is disputed ... it is at least tens of millions and if that is so that is money that would, in my view, be better spent providing 500 additional British Transport Police on our Tube network"". ISIS issued a chilling video earlier this week warning that London was next to be hit by a terror attack at least as deadly as the Paris massacre.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
261584,"“We had several hairy moments on that trip, because [in the Belizean jungle] you’re never quite sure who people are when they turn up,” says Kevin. “Criminals on the run come over the border, heavily armed. Poachers come over and opportunist thieves, too.”

The incident occurred in Belize, Central America, where Kevin was spending time with a family who have swapped life in Britain for a home deep in the rainforest.

At one point in Escape To The Wild – his new property series on Channel 4 – he found himself in a jungle, wondering if he was about to be confronted by poachers.

Kevin McCloud has experienced a few tricky property encounters, from grumpy homeowners to tetchy planning officers. But the travails of Grand Designs must feel like a dream compared to the housing issues in his latest show.

Some people have a subconscious fascination with the dangerous, particularly when it’s beautiful

Things got scary when Kevin’s armed host, Richard, heard something sinister in the undergrowth and fired a warning shot. “We suddenly heard this noise, like the howl from a howler monkey.

I said, ‘What is that? Some form of ape?’ But Richard said, ‘No, that’s a man signalling to another man…’

“My heart was racing. Until then, the violence was just a statistic, so to come face-to-face with the possibility of someone arriving with a gun, wanting to strip you of all your goods, perhaps even your life – it was frightening.”

The unwelcome visitors slunk away, but it was a stark reminder of the peculiar challenges involved in life on the wild side.

Escape To The Wild sees Kevin, 56, visiting four families who have traded comfortable lives in rat-race Britain for houses in beautiful but extreme environments.

Also featured are Karyn and Boris, a former hotel manager and IT worker from Bath who live on a tiny tropical island in the South Pacific with their three boys.

“It took us five days to get to Karyn and Boris because a volcano erupted in the Tongan archipelago and grounded our flight,” says Kevin, who saw the tower of smoke at close quarters when he eventually flew over.

“We were in a turbo prop aircraft, which are more stable in ash clouds than jet engines, so I was relaxed. But the woman behind me was coughing her guts up thanks to the ash.”

On the island, Kevin got a taste of the downsides of living in paradise, too. To fertilise their batch of crops, the family travel to a cave on a nearby island to collect bat faeces. “It was one of those jaunts that my producers couldn’t resist the idea of me being involved in,” he grumbles.

Danger and discomfort are everyday realities for the expats. Richard and his wife Alisa have lost pet dogs to jaguars. Claire and Richard, who live in a timber hut in sub-Arctic Sweden, endure temperatures of -20°C to -40°C.

“On the days when it hovered around zero it felt balmy,” Kevin says.

In the most extreme case, Lucy and Jago are building on a volcano that could erupt at any point. Why do they do it?

“Some people have a subconscious fascination with the dangerous, particularly when it’s beautiful,” Kevin adds. “Living in these places makes them feel more alive, more in control of their destinies.”

One question the series tries to answer is whether the families are happier for their moves. “I think it makes people much more fulfilled,” Kevin nods. “It has given them a sense of completion.

“I don’t have the same capacity for resilience that these people have. I do likebeing self-sufficient. But I also enjoy coming back to a bath and a glass of claret. I’m not Bear Grylls. Not yet anyway.”

Kevin McCloud: Escape to the Wild, Monday, 9pm, Channel 4",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
356263,"Loris Karius has returned following surgery on a broken hand but can't displace Simon Mignolet from the No.1 spot.

Emre Can and Ragnar Klavan have both been ruled out.

Leicester's club record signing Islam Slimani is not in the squad and Kasper Schmeichel returns following a minor hernia operation.

Nampalys Mendy and Jeff Schlupp are both out with injuries.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
60084,"Senior figures within the party are said to be furious at the Corporation’s coverage of the election, saying it has been tainted by pro-Labour bias. One senior Tory said: “The BBC coverage has been ridiculous. They have consistently failed to challenge [Jeremy] Corbyn and have run Labour re-announcements with glee.” Outrage has been particularly focused on last week’s TV debate with various party leaders where it was claimed the audience was heavily biased in favour of left-wing views.

AFP Conservatives have shown the recent TV debate as an example of BBC bias

The audience had been selected by polling company ComRes, who had been hired by the BBC, to represent voter intention. During the broadcast Home Secretary Amber Rudd appeared to be almost constantly heckled while Mr Corbyn was usually cheered. The Prime Minister’s joint chief-of-staff Fiona Hill wrote a formal letter of complaint to the corporation’s Director General Lord Hall after the live broadcast.

The TV election debate – in pictures Wed, May 31, 2017 The televised debate saw Jeremy Corbyn, Amber Rudd, Paul Nuttall, Caroline Lucas, Angus Robertson, Tim Farron and Leanne Wood go toe-to-toe Play slideshow PA 1 of 15 The politicians taking part in the debate

Everyone is massively f****d off with the BBC. It’s not just the debate, it’s the whole tenor of their coverage Senior Conservative

A Cabinet minister said: “I would love the BBC to start demonstrating some impartiality but we haven’t seen it during this campaign. “The bias in the audience for the TV debate was horrifying - Amber should not have had to put with that. The BBC need a really good going over after the election - they are just not impartial.” But Tories are said to have wider concerns about the broadcaster than just the election coverage.

PA Amber Rudd (R) is quizzed by Mishal Husain during the BBC TV debate

Another senior Conservative said: “Everyone is massively f****d off with the BBC. It’s not just the debate, it’s the whole tenor of their coverage.” Senior figures also point to the BBC adopting Labour’s “dementia tax” rhetoric when discussing the party’s controversial social care concerns. They have also been angered by the focus on cuts to the police force in the wake of the London Bridge terror attack despite the insistence by the former terror tsar Lord Carlile that the argument is “completely misleading”.

Getty Tim Farron (L) and Jeremy Corbyn take part in the BBC debate

Conservative figures also point to the BBC’s alleged lack of attention to Mr Corbyn’s history of opposing anti-terror laws. When Boris Johnson appeared on Radio 4’s Today programme yesterday and tried to raise the issue of the Labour leader’s track record he was repeatedly interrupted by presenter Mishal Husain.

Getty Amber Rudd (L) and Ukip's Paul Nuttall during the BBC debate",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
57515,"MATTALEXANDER Jo Pavey hopes to always be able to run

When athlete Jo Pavey claimed an unexpected double medal success on the track this summer she gained a whole new fan club. Not only did avid sports fans cheer her home but so did many middle-aged mums. They sawa kindred spirit in the motherof two who was just a few weeks short of her 41st birthday. “People have been so kind to me since I won my medals this year,” says Jo, who won bronze in the 5,000m at the Commonwealth Games in Glasgow before clinching gold in the 10,000m at the European Championships in Zurich 10 days later. “I think I gained lots of new fans among women who identified with me a bit. I was older, had two young children and was having to juggle everything to do my job. My life was a lot like theirs in those ways.

I hope what I did this summer will encourage other women and mums especially to put on their trainers and go for a jog too

“Maybe some of them felt that hitting 40 isn’t the end but a time when you can actually be more active and take up something like running. You don’t have to do the miles I do each week but just a few regular short runs can make a huge difference to your health. “Lots of women have told me that I have inspired them to run which is very humbling and something which makes me very proud.” Jo has been running since childhood when she joined her local athletics club in Exeter, Devon, close to where she still lives. Her husband Gavin is also her coach. Ironically Jo’s running career fully blossomed at a time when she expected it to be winding down. “I’d got to a point in my life when I desperately wanted to be a mum,” says Jo, whose children are Jacob, five, and Emily, one. “I didn’t have big expectations on the running track this year, especially after havingEmily last September. I thought if my running career was coming to an end, that’s how it will be because I really wanted children. “I had both my children by caesarean section. With Jacob it was because of complications to do with a bleed and I had an elective caesarean with Emily because of what had happened with her brother. Because my tummy muscles were cut, my recovery took longer than I expected. “This wasn’t great for my return to running but my priority was always my babies’ safe arrival. “I was still breastfeeding Emily in April this year with the trials for England and the GB team in May. I’d have been happy just to scrape into those teams and never imagined I’d do so well. I continued to train very hard when I could and made every session really count.

“However it was hard juggling everything. Sometimes the kids would be playing on a rug on the trackside with Gavin as I ran round. I tried my hardest but accepted that it was the best I could do with limited time. Yet because there wasn’t the same old pressure, I felt much more relaxed and didn’t stress about it as I would have in the past.” It meant Jo, who has run at four Olympic Games, earned a place on the podium at both championships after first celebrating with her family in the crowd. “It was actually really amusing. For years I’d been trying but never won gold. Then just when I thought my chance had probably gone forever I beat girls years younger than me. It was amazing.” Jo has suffered all manner of running-related injuries over the years from muscle tears to stress fractures. Yet she has always bounced back, even after a knee operation went wrong and kept her sidelined for more than two years. Like her fellow endurance runner Paula Radcliffe, Jo has asthma which she controls with inhalers. Since having children she also picks up a lot more bugs and colds, which can affect her training. However with the prospect of competing at the Rio Olympics in 2016, when she will be almost 43, she has no plans to hang up her spikes just yet. “I hope I will always run. Once I’ve retired from elite running I will keep running to stay fit. It will be a very different type of running but one I’m looking forward to. “I live in a beautiful part of Devon and it will be great to do some of the more challenging parts such as Dartmoor and the beaches. At the moment I stick to familiar training routes I’ve done hundreds of times.

GETTY Jo Pavey became the European 10,000m champion this summer",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
369751,"Christopher Robin hated the creations of his father A.A. Milne, pictured with his son []

The poem Vespers, about a golden-haired boy saying his bedtime prayers, has enchanted generations of children and parents alike. But for the little boy kneeling at the foot of the bed the poem – and indeed his whole identity – would become an instrument of torture for him for most of his life. Indeed Christopher Robin Milne would refer to the refrain as “the one work that has brought me over the years more toe-curling, fist-clenching, lip-biting embarrassment than any other.” As the star of the children’s stories and poems written by his father AA Milne, Christopher Robin Milne was the most famous boy in the world. When his father went on a literary tour to the United States in 1931 all anyone wanted to know about was how little Christopher Robin was getting on. In terms of global renown, Parents Magazine placed him on a par with the child prodigy Yehudi Menuhin, Hollywood child star Jackie Coogan and no less a personage than young Princess Elizabeth.

Even when he was no longer little, Christopher Robin’s efforts to forge a life independently of his father’s literary creation always led back to the same place: to Winnie-the-Pooh, Eeyore, Tigger and his own childhood self. Customers at the bookshop he ran for more than 20 years in Devon would invariably arrive armed with an autograph book and a child in tow who was longing to meet the real-life Christopher Robin. The gangly, bespectacled figure they encountered behind the shop counter never refused to oblige but it was always with a weary air of resignation. It is doubtful he would welcome the publication of Return To The Hundred Acre Wood, a new sequel to the Pooh stories written by David Benedictus with the approval of the AA Milne estate, more than 80 years after the original was first published.

As one critic wrote, Christopher Robin spent more than 40 years “trying to get off his knees from saying his prayers”. The most mild-mannered and self-effacing of men in all other aspects of life, on the subject of his father he could be brutal in his condemnation. As a schoolboy he declared: “One day I will write verses about him and see how he likes it.” In later life his reproaches were more calculated to wound. “When I was three my father was three. When I was six he was six... he needed me to escape from being 50. “It seemed to me almost that my father has got to where he was by climbing upon my infant shoulders, that he had filched from me my good name and had left me with the empty fame of being his son.”

O nly when he emulated his father and took up the author’s pen himself was he able to reconcile himself to what he regarded as his father’s exploitation. But by then AA Milne was long dead after many years of ­virtual estrangement from his son. The popular perception of the Pooh stories is that they were written by a deeply affectionate father for his adored only son. The reality was rather less benign. Though never unkind to the boy, Alan Alexander Milne was cast very much in the Edwardian mould of fatherhood: ­affable enough but distant. The truth is that when the child was born on August 21, 1920, both Milne and his wife Dorothy de Selincourt were hoping for a girl. “We did rather want a Rosemary,” Milne confessed in response to congratulations from a friend. “But,” he added, “I expect we shall be just as happy with this gentleman.” Mother and father each chose a name for the baby but called him Billy, which then became Billy Moon after his mispronunciation of his surname. Early photographs of the young Christopher Robin show a doe-eyed child whose longish hair and delicate ­features made it difficult to determine the gender.

His biographer Ann Thwaite claimed: “His long hair reminded his mother of the girl she had wanted and the father of the boy he himself had been.” As an adult Christopher Robin described his boyhood self as “small for his age, underweight, needs ­fattening up and girlish.” His father was from a solid middle-class background. AA Milne was ­educated at the independent school run by his father in Kilburn, North London, where one of the school­masters was HG Wells. While at ­Cambridge, where he wrote for the student magazine Granta, he was noticed by the editors of satirical magazine Punch and taken on as a contributor, ­rising to assistant editor. By the time Christopher Robin was born, Alan Milne, who was then already 42, was also a well-known playwright and novelist as well as a humorist and satirist. He and Dorothy – always known as Daphne – lived in Chelsea.

H ewrote his first children’s poems during a spell of rainy weather during a family ­holiday in Wales. They were published in 1924 as the collection When We Were Very Young and illustrated by Punch cartoonist EH Shephard. As was customary for well-to-do families of the age, Christopher ­Robin’s upbringing was largely left to a nanny. Contact with his parents was limited to brief periods at breakfast, tea time and in the evening just before bed. To compound the parental ­alienation Alan and Daphne spent ­little time together, meaning their son’s time had to be further divided between them. This resulted in Christopher Robin inheriting his father’s facility for mathematics and from his mother an aptitude for working with his hands.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
92866,"Commuters outside London's Kings Cross station were greeted by a rather peculiar sight this morning, as a badly-damaged Toyota Prius with the giveaway personalised number plate 'M4Y' was discovered crumpled against a red Postbox.

While Londoners snapped photographers of James' abandoned car, people also noticed that a similar vehicle, this time with the number plate 'H4MMOND', was spotted at the Hackescher Markt in Berlin.

Jeremy Clarkson, on the other hand, seems to have avoided a ""crash"" so far.

Jeremy, James and Richard have been busy touring the world promoting The Grand Tour in the run-up to the launch and Jeremy appeared on The Jonathan Ross Show on Saturday night to talk about the eagerly-anticipated Amazon series.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
63969,"The new film based on the book by the best-selling author, is her screenwriting debut.

In the new featurette, Rowling gives greater insights into the film’s plot, 1926 USA setting and Newt’s character.

The author says: “My heroes are always people who feel themselves to be set apart, stigmatised or othered.

“That’s at the heart of most of what I write and it’s certainly at the heart of this movie.”",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
38469,"Jurgen Klopp has provided an update on his goalkeeping situation.

The Reds have struggled for a consistent No1 for a number of years with current shot stopper Simon Mignolet coming under constant scrutiny.

Liverpool have been fearless in the attack this season but it is at the back which has cost them a huge chunk of points.

Supporters have been strongly calling for Klopp to dip into the transfer market to rectify the issue between the sticks.

But the German boss believes he has found the answer right under his nose in the form of Loris Karius.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
184408,"Jacob Laukaitis, a keen traveller mesmerised by the secretive state, created the film to show people the country in a way they'd never seen before. The 22 year-old online entrepreneur has traveled to over 50 countries in the last three years, while running his own business. Instead of focusing on the politics of the secretive nation, he said he wanted to show people what their daily lives would look like if they were to visit the country as a tourist. As all travelers are accompanied by guides at all times and every picture has to be sanctioned at the risk of a hefty prison sentence, he encouraged viewers to watch the video ""with a little pinch of salt"". Sharing the video online, Jacob wrote: “You can never be sure whether things were staged or not in North Korea because you are only shown what they want you to see.

YOUTUBE Jacob Laukaitis made the film to show people the country in a way they'd never seen before

“You can't choose where or when you will be going to specific places, they simply tell you to hop on a bus and ask you to get off at one point or another.” During his trip, Jacob visited the Pyongyang Metro, which is the deepest in the world. There he said locals seemed to turn away from his group, seemingly unwilling to speak or interact with them.

On the 2nd evening in North Korea our guides took us to the tallest stone tower in the world - the Juche Tower in central Pyongyang. We were the last group allowed in that day and even though it was extremely windy, the views were breath-taking. It turned out that #Pyongyang was a beautiful city streching for as far as my eyes could see. Good stuff! A photo posted by Jacob Laukaitis (@jacoblaukaitis) on Apr 17, 2016 at 8:40am PDT

Later the group went to the top of the Juchu Tower – the tallest stone tower in the world. They were also taken to a nursery, where the children performed a synchronised dance for them. Other highlights included a visit to the demilitarised zone between North and South Korea as well as a ride on a primitive rollercoaster. In the eye-opening video, Jacob revealed that as a visitor he was made to stay in a hotel that was placed on its own island.

Jacob told Express.co.uk: ""I've also been very interested in North Korea ever since I was 15 years old. “All the stories from people who have managed to escape the country, all the propaganda about Korea's leaders, military, the political situation and many other things fascinated me. ""There was no way I was not going to see it for myself. The thing about traveling to North Korea is not the places you visit or the things you see.

Inside North Korea Thu, July 28, 2016 Take a look inside North Korea and the unseen world of Kim Jong Un. Play slideshow REUTERS 1 of 59 North Korea leader Kim Jong Un visits the Chollima Building Materials Complex",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
172107,"GETTY The migrant quota system is said to be in tatters

The bloc's controversial deal to disperse hundreds of thousands of migrants appears to be in tatters as just 30 asylum seekers, including 21 from Syria and nine from Iraq, yesterday became the first to be flown from Greece to Luxembourg.



The EU is lurching ever closer to total disintegration as it emerged that in the six weeks the controversial migrant quotes were agreed, barely 100 of the 160,000 people to be moved from Italy and Greece have been shifted under the EU's flagship quota policy.



And at the current rate it will take a staggering 150 years to meet its target - with Greek Prime Minister Alexis Tsipras warning: ""It's a drop in the ocean, but we hope the drop will become a stream and then a river of humanity.""



The first flight was delayed by three weeks after the initial group of Syrians due to be moved refused to go Luxembourg.

EPA Sixteen member states have not offered up a single place to migrants so far

Migrant crisis explained in numbers Fri, July 22, 2016 A monthly record of 218,394 migrants and refugees reached Europe by sea in October, the UN says, almost as many as the total number of arrivals in 2014. We take a look at the shocking statistics facing the humanitarian crisis. Play slideshow AFP/Getty Images 1 of 47 137 migrants of African origins were rescued by coast guard boats off the coast of Libya

It's a drop in the ocean, but we hope the drop will become a stream and then a river of humanity Greek Prime Minister Alexis Tsipras

EU Migration commissioner Dimitris Avramopoulos said: ""It is now time to step up a gear.""



Brussel leaders had hoped that the controversial deal would patch up frosty relations between warring neighbours who cannot agree over who should shoulder the burden of the crisis.



Nimby member states have already refused to take their fair share of refugees.



Some of the continent's biggest players - most notably France and Germany - have effectively reneged on the agreement already.



And on Tuesday Hungary's parliament approved a resolution to reject the quotas, which will pave the way for the Government to launch legal action against Brussels to avoid having to take part.



Slovenia has also considered taking similar steps.

EPA EU nations are squabbling over who should take in migrants

As part of the September accord, European nations agreed to relocate 120,000 migrants over the next two years.



But Germany - which is facing an overwhelming refugee crisis of its own - has made just TEN of the 27,536 places it agreed to available. The country should be taking in around 38 migrants a day under the scheme, meaning 1,584 should already have been rehomed.



Meanwhile neighbouring France, which said it would house 19,714 migrants, has so far offered up places to a paltry 40 and has accepted none. Under the plans, by this stage the French should have provided sanctuary to 1,134 people.



Just two Scandinavian nations - Sweden and Finland - have taken in any migrants at all under the quota system. They have accepted 86 people between them, all from Italy.



Britain opted out of the quota system, because it is not part of the Schengen Zone, but the Government is not opting out of helping the migrant crisis fuelled by the war in Syria.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
172648,"Andressa Urach is now fighting for her life after the cosmetic procedure went wrong.

Ms Urach hit the headlines when she claimed to have had an affair with footballer Cristiano Ronaldo – a claim he strongly denied.

The 27-year-old came second in Brazil's best bottom contest in 2012 and went on to star in the Brazilian version of reality show The Farm.

Ms Urach, who now presents Brazil television channel RedeTV!, underwent a procedure which involves injections of two types of fillers – hydrogel and PMMA – into the upper legs in order to inflate the thighs and bottom.

However in July this year Ms Urach found herself in excruciating pain when the products began to cause her leg muscles to rot.

In an interview with Brazil's R7 website, she said: ""The hydrogel was not absorbed by my body and started to harm me.

""Now I've discovered that the PMMA is sticking to my muscles and causing the tissue to rot.

""That's why I am feeling such strong pains. I'm taking morphine every four hours and antibiotics to alleviate the suffering.""

At the time Ms Urach underwent a procedure to drain 400ml of the hydrogel from each leg but the pain continued.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
28622,"The pair came to blows during a pre-season training session in Miami in July.

Both players were involved in a heated argument as tensions boiled over before their team-mates had to step in to separate them.

Not long after the incident, Neymar completed his record-breaking £198million move to Paris Saint-Germain.

And Semedo, who only joined the Catalan giants in the summer, reckons Neymar’s frustrations at wanting to leave the Nou Camp took its toll.

“The episode with Neymar didn’t harm me. It was a normal situation in training, but it took on another dimension,” Semedo said.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
128204,"The Gunners recorded a convincing 4-1 home win over the Black Cats to keep up the pace on Leaders Chelsea, who beat Everton 1-0.

It was Frenchman's first start since the Londoners' 5-1 thrashing at the hands of Liverpool on February 8 due to issues off the field.

The 27-year-old was dropped for Arsenal's important Champions League encounter with Bayern Munich, but hit the ground running on Saturday by bagging a brace within the first 31 minutes at the Emirates.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
37160,"Ings has been sidelined since October after damaging his cruciate knee ligaments just days after his England debut.

Ings broke down in training leaving Liverpool light up front.

The 23-year-old had scored three goals in eight appearances for the Reds after joining on a free from Burnley.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
107746,"Speaking on Sunday, the President said the storm will cost a lot of money but the Federal Government is focused on saving lives. Arriving at the White House after a weekend retreat at Camp David in Maryland he praised Federal agencies’ response to the storm. He added: “The bad news is that this is some big monster. We’re going to Florida very soon.”

GETTY Hurricane Irma has been described as a ""big monster""

President Trump approved a £11.37billion ($$15billion) bill on Sunday that means residents and businesses can apply for grants for temporary housing, home repairs, low-cost loans to cover uninsured property losses and other programs. The federal government will also reimburse counties for emergency protective measures including evacuation and sheltering costs, as well as most of the costs for debris removal. Donald Trump announced the plan via his Twitter account on Saturday, he said: “Hurricane Irma is of epic proportion, perhaps bigger than we have ever seen. Be safe and get out of its way, if possible. Federal G is ready!

Hurricane Irma: Damage in Florida latest pictures Wed, September 13, 2017 Strong winds and rain batter Florida as Hurricane Irma hits Play slideshow Getty Images 1 of 50 Jose Orosz walks his dog Karen by a beachfront home destroyed by Hurricane Irma

“Our incredible US Coast Guard saved more than 15,000 lives last week with Harvey. Irma could be even tougher. We love our Coast Guard!” The US President was under-fire about his leadership over a series of blunders when managing Hurricane Harvey, telling families “good luck to everybody” before the storm hit Texas. He has also been accused of being late in his response to Harvey and in signing the bill.

GETTY Donald Trump praised the response from Federal Government

Hurricane Irma: Damage in Cuba latest pictures Sun, September 10, 2017 The latest pictures of Hurricane Irma as the storm hits Cuba. Play slideshow AFP/Getty Images 1 of 17 Local residents return home after the passage of Hurricane Irma in Caibarien, Cuba

Hurricane Irma has become a major test for Trump’s leadership with people making comparisons to George Bush’s slow response to Hurricane Katrina in 2005. Hurricane Irma has left more than three million homes and businesses without electricity in Florida and the blackout may last for weeks, local electric utilities said. This is similar to when Category 5 Hurricane Andrew struck South Florida in 1992.

GETTY More than three million homes have been left without electricity",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
316713,"Coleen and Wayne Rooney are expecting a new baby in Janaury

Wayne and Coleen, both 29, broke the news they are expecting their third child together on social media.

The gorgeous WAG took to Twitter and gushed about her pregnancy to her 1.2million followers.

""Baby number three is on the way... January,"" she said. ""We are so happy and excited.""

The Manchester United captain mimicked his wife of seven years by sharing the news with his own followers.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
212899,"Gangs of men are preventing people from straying into once vibrant areas of the country for fear of violence, and abuse that even law enforcement has been unable to control. There are as many as 40 places named in confidential police reports - despite repeated denials from officers - according to a report by US think-thank Gatestone Institute. In Duisburg, neighbourhoods have been reportedly “divided” by Lebanese gangs who deal drugs, extort businesses and frequently rob. A 17-page report prepared for the NRW State Parliament revealed the extent of the problems.

GETTY German police have been attacked by migrants in some areas of Germany reports suggest

GETTY Officers have been afraid to enter some areas, according to reports

In Berlin or in the north of Duisburg, areas exist where police “hardly dare to stop a car”. Rainer Wendt, President of the German Police Union, said: “Because they know that they'll be surrounded by 40 or 50 men.” Mr Wendt said attacks amount to a ""deliberate challenge to the authority of the state - attacks in which the perpetrators are expressing their contempt for our society."" German media has been monitoring the situation. Recently, N24 Television described a popular shopping and residential area, Duisburg-Marxloh, where police have become “powerless”. The channel reported: “The descent of the district is nightmarish. Now clans claim the streets for themselves."" The pockets of lawlessness have deeply upset communities with some witnesses to the violence claiming the problems are being exacerbated by the German government, which has relocated hundreds of thousands of asylum seekers and refugees into these areas.

GETTY Duisburg has been one of the areas described as a ""no-go one"" by German media

The report for the NRW State Parliament described the situation in Duisburg's Laar district, claiming the area is run by two Lebanese families. It states: ""The streets are actually regarded as a separate territory. Outsiders are physically assaulted, robbed and harassed. Experience shows that the Lebanese clans ""can mobilize several hundred people in a very short period of time by means of a telephone call."" Peter Biesenbach of the opposition Christian Democrats (CDU) said: ""If this is not a no-go area, then I do not know what is."" Recently, German paper Bild wrote ""Ghetto Report Germany” - a piece describing ""burgeoning ghettos, parallel societies and no-go areas” in Germany. The police report leaked to Der Spiegel claimed in Duisburg, spiralling levels of violent crime perpetrated by migrants from the Middle East and the Balkans have turned parts of the city into de facto ""no-go zones The report was produced by NRW police headquarters and warns the government is losing control over problem neighbourhoods According to Der Spiegel: ""There are districts where immigrant gangs are taking over entire streets for themselves. Native residents and business people are being intimidated and silenced. People taking trams during the evening and nighttime describe their experiences as 'living nightmares.” Police officers are allegedly subjected to high levels of aggression. In Duisburg there are currently an estimated 60,000 Turkish Muslim residents, making it one of the most Islamized cities in Germany, as well as thousands of Bulgarians and Romanians .

This summer, the neighbourhood descended even deeper into a spiral of violence N24

Duisburg's Marxloh district, one of the most problematic in Germany, has been described as ""a memorial to Germany's failed integration policy."" More than half of the district's 20,000 inhabitants are migrants coming from 90 different countries. The areas in question are also rocked by poverty with many inhabitants being on welfare. In Marxloh, this figure is 50 per cent. N24 said about the area: ""Once Duisburg-Marxloh was a popular shopping and residential area. Now clans claim the streets for themselves. The police are powerless. The descent of the district is nightmarish. ""Police will enter some parts of Marxloh only with reinforcements. Several patrol cars are needed to respond even to commonplace rear-end collisions. Too often, they are surrounded by an aggressive mob, spat upon and threatened. “Last year, police were deployed to Marxloh more than 600 times with four or more patrol cars. ""This summer, the neighbourhood descended even deeper into a spiral of violence. Family clans claim streets for themselves. Citizens hardly dare to go outside at night. In the smallest matter, violence is kindled.""

'Merkel must go!' Protest in Dresden as Merkel arrives to celebrate German Unity Day Mon, October 3, 2016 Protesters jeered at German Chancellor Angela Merkel as she attended celebrations in Dresden to mark 26 years since Germany's reunification called German Unity Day. Play slideshow 1 of 14

Osnabrück Police Commissioner Bernhard Witthaut told Der Westen: ""Every police commissioner and interior minister will deny it. But of course we know where we can go with the police car and where, even initially, only with the personnel carrier. ""The reason is that our colleagues can no longer feel safe there in twos, and have to fear becoming the victim of a crime themselves. We know that these areas exist. Even worse: in these areas, crimes no longer result in charges. “They are left to themselves. Only in the worst cases do we in the police learn anything about it. The power of the state is completely out of the picture.""",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
125593,"Derek Hill has been involved in the Dementia Challenge campaign [FREE PIC]

Chief executive Derek Hill argues that while there may be no magic cure, there are treatments that can slow the disease down and improve life for the sufferer.

He has been involved in the Dementia Challenge ­campaign promoted by Prime Minister David Cameron.

Hill said: “There are all sorts of things you can do to help people with dementia and getting a diagnosis is the key.”

Ixico has developed software which is used to analyse brain scans and aid the diagnosis of dementia. Now the company is planning to join Aim to fund the next stage in its development.

Its systems are already used by drug companies to select patients for clinical trials and it is piloting its Assessa product in some NHS hospitals, alongside diagnosis by doctors. With its roots in ­academic research at University ­College London, the firm is merging with Aim-listed Phytopharm.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
227413,"The future monarch made the comments during a Catholic church service in west London this morning.

Prince Charles said we have a ""duty of care"" towards the families of those who have been viciously executed on camera by terrorist groups in the Middle East, such as Islamic State.

I have been deeply distressed by the horrific scenes of violence and persecution coming out of your beloved Iraq

He told the congregation: ""We hear much at present about the 'duty of care'.

""Then, ladies and gentlemen, I am bound to ask whether there is not a duty of care towards the victims of violence and their families who, like you, are daily distraught by the graphic transmission of violent images of their loved ones.""

In a touching exchange, 64-year-old Maijida Nissan, whose Iraqi brother has been bombed twice, thanked the prince for his continued work to help draw attention to the plight of persecuted Christians.

He replied: ""It's the least I can do.""

Mrs Nissan then told Charles she was praying, and he told her: ""We all do.""

Afterwards, she admitted that it was her niece who pushed her to speak to the royal family about the plight of her brother's family.

She said: ""I am very happy that he came here, and thanks to God that he came here.

""God brings him here.""",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
215687,"Germany’s Chancellor Angela Merkel is expected to demand that the British Prime Minister give the green light to a pan-European force if he wants to secure his much-heralded negotiations before an in/out referendum by 2017.

A source in Berlin said: “If you want favours, you have to give favours.""

""If Cameron wants a 'flexible Europe', he must let other members integrate further,"" they told the Telegraph.

""Yes - opt out, opt out, opt out - and then shut up.”",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
1194,"GETTY Thousands of customers are moving bank accounts

Barclays, NatWest, HSBC, RBS and Lloyds Bank have lost the most customers, while failing to attract new clients, according to current account switching figures released today by Bacs.



Overall Barclays saw more than 33,000 customers leave between just April and June last year, and only around 6,000 new accounts, to leave it down by around 27,000.



Taxpayer-backed Natwest had the second-worst retention rate with more than 31,000 leaving over the quarter and 15,000 new accounts opened, meaning it collectively lost 16,000 people.



Lloyds Bank was down by around 15,000, while HSBC had lost 13,000 accounts in total.



On other hand Santander saw the biggest gains winning over an extra 66,000 customers over the period.



However, the provider has since upset customers by raising the fees on its most popular 123 current account by a massive 150 per cent earlier this month.



Customers now have to pay £5 a month - or £60 a year, but the account offers an interest rate of three per cent on in-credit balances of up to £20,000 - an attractive perk to manny savers.



Halifax, Nationwide Building Society and Tesco Bank also made net gains between over the three months as customers opening new accounts through the current account switch service.



Halifax offers new customers £100 to switch to it as well as a potential £5-a-month reward.



Under the switching service it takes seven working days to switch accounts and all outgoing and incoming payments are automatically moved to the new account.



Payments accidentally made to or requested from the old account are automatically redirected to the new account for 36 months after an account is switched.

But overall around one million current account customers switched to a new provider last year - an 11 per cent fall compared with 2014 - again heightening concerns about competition in the market.



Richard Neudegg, head of regulation at uSwitch.com, said: ""Despite 2015 seeing some of the best financial incentives for switchers, many still struggle to see the value in switching.

""The banks need to up their game and do more to help their customers understand their current account usage by prompting them with clear information.""



In September, a new multi-million pound drive was launched to raise awareness of the current account switching scheme.



A spokesman for Bacs suggested the figures could also be a reflection of providers doing more to encourage customers to stick with them rather than switch.



He said: ""The number of switches we see is largely influenced by the activity of individual banks and building societies - and that includes not just incentives to switch but also incentives to remain with the existing banking provider, as they work to retain their customers in an increasingly competitive marketplace.



""The current account switch service has been designed to encourage that competitiveness by removing barriers to changing banks for individuals, as well as for small businesses and small charities. And, since it launched at the end of 2013, more than 2.5 million accounts have been moved using the service.""

GETTY Barclays is losing the most customers overall

GETTY Customers are switching bank accounts for better deals",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
4271,"Ravi Beefnah, 34, has placed his Audi A5 at the entrance of the dealership in Chelmsford, Essex, covered in warnings to potential buyers.

The white Audi - which is covered in red lettering - has been parked legally outside the entrance to the dealership for two months since late February.

His brazen one-car protest has even gone viral and pictures of the motor have been viewed more than 100,000 times online on media sites Twitter and Facebook.

Mr Beefnah, a care manager, explained he made the brazen move over claims the dealership failed to resolve a long-running complaint relating to oil consumption problems on the brand new vehicle he purchased in March 2011.

He said: ""I came up with the idea after becoming fed up with the dealership.

""You just don't expect problems when buying a brand new car from what is supposed to be a reputable company.

""I decided that the car's not fit for purpose and I'm not going to be able to drive it so I might as well get some use out of it.""

One of the warnings written on the vehicle states: ""Audi acceptable oil consumption for this car is 12.75 pints (7.2 litres) of oil per every 9,000 miles.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
39763,"WARNER BROS Alan Rickman as Severus Snape in the Harry Potter films

His illness was kept private before his death and a family statement released today, read: ""The actor and director Alan Rickman has died from cancer at the age of 69. He was surrounded by family and friends."" The British thespian was known for his memorable roles in Hollywood films Robin Hood: Prince of Thieves, Die Hard, Love Actually and Sense and Sensibility.

But perhaps his most well-known screen incarnation was the terrifying Professor Severus Snape in the Harry Potter franchise. Harry Potter author J.K. Rowling – among other celebrities - paid tribute to the star on social media after the sad news was announced.

WARNER BROS The video starts off with a young Snape at Hogwarts

My thoughts are with Rima and the rest of Alan's family. We have all lost a great talent. They have lost part of their hearts. — J.K. Rowling (@jk_rowling) January 14, 2016

WARNER BROS Snape and Harry have a tense moment

She told her 6.4 million Twitter followers: ""There are no words to express how shocked and devastated I am to hear of Alan Rickman's death. He was a magnificent actor & a wonderful man."" To celebrate the life of the star and one of his moment famous roles, here are all of Severus Snape's most important scenes from the Harry Potter films in chronological order. The emotional compilation, put together by a user called kcawesome13, has amassed close to 10 million views since it was first uploaded onto YouTube by a dedicated Harry Potter fan back in January 2014.

WARNER BROS Severus Snape and Lily Evans first meet

""Alan Rickman portrays Snape's character beautifully, despite knowing very little about Severus' motivations (contrary to popular belief!) in the films shot before the 7th book was published,"" the user wrote alongside the clip.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
108793,"Polls opened on Sunday morning, with Angela Merkel looking assured of a fourth-term as Chancellor. But a large number of people look set to vote for the anti-Muslim AfD, a swing which could see far-right politicians enter the Bundestag for the first time in over half a century. The party is currently polling at nearly 13 per cent and could end up with nearly 100 representatives, making them the main opposition to any coalition Mrs Merkel puts together.

GETTY President Frank-Walter Steinmeier is worried about the AfD

GETTY President Frank-Walter Steinmeier casts his vote

Writing for the newspaper Bild, President Frank-Walter Steinmeier of the Social Democrats, appeared to warn AfD supporters could triumph if other voters stayed at home. He wrote: “It has perhaps never been as clear that the elections are about the future of democracy and Europe. ""If you don't vote, others decide.”

GETTY Angela Merkel casts her vote

Both Mrs Merkel and her main challenger, Social Democrat leader Martin Schulz, are concerned that a low turnout could work in favour of smaller parties like the AfD. In Germany's proportional election system, low turn-out can boost smaller parties, giving them more seats from the same number of votes. Last year’s regional elections saw Merkel's party suffer setbacks to the AfD, which profited from resentment at her 2015 decision to open German borders to more than one million migrants.

GETTY German Social Democrat (SPD) and chancellor candidate Martin Schulz and his wife Inge Schult cast th

Mr Schulz, who has described the AfD as ""gravediggers of democracy” “a party of haters” and, yesterday, also urged people to vote yesterday. He said: ""Young people, think about Brexit. Think about Trump. “Go vote. Take this right to vote seriously, and use it.” In a bid to challenge the right-wing surge, Mrs Merkel's interior minister, Thomas de Maiziere, promised government would combat Islamic terrorism by strengthening European borders and bolstering security at home.

He criticised the AfD as ""a wolf in sheep's clothing"" and said Germany's domestic intelligence agency was studying ""whether right-wing extremists are seizing power and exerting influence on the party"". The AfD was founded in 2013 with the original goal of opposing large bailouts of financially strapped euro zone countries but from 2015 shifted its focus to immigration. Mainstream parties have ruled out governing with the AfD. It has come under increased scrutiny in recent weeks after its top candidate Alexander Gauland said the German integration minister should be dumped in her parents' homeland of Turkey, and that Germans should be proud of what their military did in World War One and Two.

German election: Photos from the election Mon, September 25, 2017 Latest pictures during the upcoming general elections in Germany Play slideshow REUTERS 1 of 22 Demonstrators scuffle with police during the protest against the anti-immigration party Alternative for Deutschland AfD, after German general election (Bundestagswahl) in Berlin",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
296318,"For fans who can’t wait for the release of Star Wars The Last Jedi this Christmas, there’s some new canon books coming out in the near future. Announced back in May, the new books are part of a series called Journey To Star Wars: The Last Jedi and will help fill in some of the narrative gaps not seen in the movies. Entertainment Weekly have had a preview of them as Comic Con begins and it looks like these novels are full of Easter Eggs for The Last Jedi. Michael Siglain, creative director of Lucasfilm Publishing said: “It’s just a different journey than last time [The Force Awakens]“There are still some Easter eggs in a couple of pieces that will make sense after seeing the film, but this one is more thematically tied to The Last Jedi.”

LUCASFILM Star Wars Journey to The Last Jedi books synopses REVEALED: Episode 8 Easter Eggs aplenty

Star Wars: The Last Jedi BEHIND THE SCENES Sun, July 16, 2017 In Star Wars: The Last Jedi, the Skywalker saga continues as the heroes of The Force Awakens join the galactic legends in an epic adventure that unlocks age-old mysteries of the Force and shocking revelations of the past Play slideshow Lucasfilm 1 of 25 Star Wars: The Last Jedi

Phasma (September 1) Siglain revealed: “You have a very mysterious character. You don’t know who this person is. You don’t know what her background is. All you see is that expressionless mask. “And so the thought was, well, what if we could shed some light onto who she is. She does have a secret in her past that she guards. And when that secret is threatened to be revealed, what will she do to keep that secret hidden? “She is a ruthless and a cunning character. This takes that to the next level. You will be afraid of this character. You will know why she is a captain in the First Order. “[This novel will] show how she got off the planet that she was on initially and came to the First Order and what did she have to do to get there and what will she do to protect her secrets. “It cuts between the present and the past and shows her as this fearsome warrior on this brutal world that she was on. The First Order comes to that planet, and she sees a great opportunity when they arrive.”

LUCASFILM Leia: Princess of Alderaan follows a young Princess Leia

Leia: Princess of Alderaan (September 6) Siglain said: “This is where she started. It’s still a YA novel, so it’s still her going against her parents who are trying to protect her. “There’s a very strong connection to some things from The Last Jedi, which, again, once you see the film will make sense. “[Set on the eve of her 16th birthday] she’s realising that there is more to the galaxy and to her life than what’s going on. And she’s at a point where her parents just being secretive. “She decides to become involved in the fight against the Empire, regardless of what her parents think. As a parent, what situation does that put you in? “Do you want your daughter to fight for what is right, or are you trying to just protect her so she doesn’t get hurt? And as a 16-year-old, do you really know as much as you think?”

LUCASFILM The Legends of Luke Skywalker follow what Luke's been up to for the last three decades

The Legends of Luke Skywalker (October 31) Siglain revealed: “For kids coming out of that movie [The Force Awakens], for casual fans coming out of that movie, you hear about Luke Skywalker for that whole film, but you only see him for two seconds at the end. “He doesn’t even say anything. This book is a book that goes into some of those stories that were told, some of those legends of Luke Skywalker [over the last 30 years]. Are they true? Well, maybe. Maybe not. “The framing device for this is there are a bunch of kids on a cargo ship that’s traveling to the casino world of Canto Bight. “Someone says something about Luke Skywalker, and they say, ‘Oh, he was just a myth. That’s just a legend.’ And others say, ‘No, no, no. I know a story about him.’”

LUCASFILM Canto Bight is a collection of four short stories set on the casino world",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
248450,"Prince Harry and the Duke and Duchess of Cambridge have joined Twitter

A Kensington Palace account has been set up, under the handle @KensingtonRoyal, to provide the latest ""updates, pictures and videos"" of the young Royals.

Since appearing online this morning, the account has already been followed by over 45,000 people who are all eager to keep up-to-date with the latest goings on at Kensington Palace.

The first tweet, which has been favourited over 1,000 times, read: ""Hello from Kensington Palace! Welcome to our new Twitter account.""

The next post then confirmed who will be featured on the account: ""This account represents The Duke and Duchess of Cambridge and Prince Harry - follow for updates on their work and the #RoyalFoundation.""

The Royal arrival was greeted by hundreds of well-wishers from around the globe, who each welcomed them onto the social network.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
141169,"GETTY - STOCK A nutritional drink may offer some protection against Alzheimer’s symptoms

The product, Souvenaid, was tested in a trial involving 311 patients with mild cognitive impairment (MCI), a memory loss condition known to be a pre-cursor of Alzheimer's. Taking the supplement every day for two years led to a “significant stabilisation” of everyday thinking performance and reduced brain shrinkage, said the study authors. However it was no better than a fake placebo drink at preventing patients from going on to develop Alzheimer's, leading a number of experts to warn that the results should be treated with caution. The patients, from Finland, Germany, the Netherlands and Sweden, were randomly assigned either the supplement or the placebo without knowing what they were getting.

GETTY - STOCK The product, Souvenaid, was tested in a trial involving 311 patients with mild MCI

While this nutritional intervention is not a cure for Alzheimer's, it effectively shows that the earlier in the disease process we intervene, the greater the advantage for the patient Professor Tobias Hartmann - Trial co-ordinator

Comparing the two groups showed that taking Souvenaid reduced a measure of how badly a person is able to cope with everyday tasks such as handling financial transactions and remembering major events by 45%. In addition brain shrinkage in the hippocampus, a brain region vital to memory, was 26% less in patients given the supplement. Trial co-ordinator Professor Tobias Hartmann, from Saarland University in Germany, said: “While this nutritional intervention is not a cure for Alzheimer's, it effectively shows that the earlier in the disease process we intervene, the greater the advantage for the patient. “Importantly, reduced atrophy in the patient's brain shows that the benefit extends beyond symptomatic effects, something never before achieved.""

7 things you should do EVERY day to stave off dementia Tue, July 18, 2017 Memory boost: Seven things you should do every day to stave off dementia. Play slideshow Getty 1 of 8 7 things you should do EVERY day to stave off dementia

Findings from the LipiDiDiet trial are reported in the journal The Lancet Neurology. The study failed to achieve its primary goal, which was to show improved scores in a specific test of memory and thinking designed to pick up early symptoms of Alzheimer's. Dr Doug Brown, director of research at the charity Alzheimer's Society, said: “This trial of Souvenaid did not meet the success criteria that would be needed for developing new drugs so we cannot be confident of the drink's benefits. “Although there was less cognitive decline in people taking the daily drink over two years, the same number of people still went on to develop dementia as those who had a fake drink every day.

“We certainly can't conclude that the drink slows progression of Alzheimer's disease. “People who are worried about their memory should not rush out and buy this drink without first talking to their doctor to find out if it could be suitable for them. “Dr David Reynolds, chief scientific officer at Alzheimer's Research UK, said: “While taking this drink won't do people any harm, there is mixed evidence of possible benefits and this study did not reveal the effects on memory and thinking that the researchers were hoping to measure. “As this was a relatively small study, it is difficult to detect signs of a robust effect or to draw any firm conclusions from the results.

GETTY - STOCK MCI is a memory loss condition known to be a pre-cursor of Alzheimer's",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
165399,"The wall dubbed 'The Great Wall of Calais' is being built in France

The massive £2.5m wall, funded from the British public purse, will be completed by the end of the year, according to the Government.

Running 0.6 miles along the motorway leading to the French port at Calais, the wall has been designed to prevent stowaways getting into lorries or getting into the road.

The Home Office said the wall will stop migrants using projectiles in attempts to “disrupt, delay or even attack vehicles approaching the port”.

On Saturday, the first of the concrete panels which make up the wall were moved into place.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
224919,"The Love Actually star is a big fan of Sir Arthur Conan Doyle's fictional sleuth, and she is convinced the part could be played by a female.

She tells The Daily Telegraph, ""I have always been a huge Sherlock Holmes fan. I would love to play a character like that, but that's a problem if you're a female. I'm always likely to be overlooked for not being male.""

Thompson is adamant she would make a good Holmes, and hopes more women will be seen in leading roles in the future, adding, ""Is the heroic role unisex? Or does it mean there is an area of life which remains unexplored, which contains stories which remain untold? I suspect that's the case and it will be very interesting as this generation gets into its stride to see what those stories turn out to be.""

Actors who have recently played the detective include Robert Downey, Jr., Benedict Cumberbatch, and Jonny Lee Miller, who starred opposite Lucy Liu as a female Dr. Watson in U.S. TV series Elementary.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
349980,"The 33-year-old expectant mum looked radiant as she arrived at London's Hyde Park to watch The Strokes with her baby bump on full display.

Dressed in a black empire-line midi-dress with a pretty lace trim, Fearne emphasised her blossoming figure.

The former Radio One star added an extra injection of punk to her look as she kept warm in a studded black cardigan.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
299189,"When is Easter Sunday 2017? Christians around the world are preparing to celebrate the resurrection of Jesus on Easter Sunday on April 16. Unlike Christmas, the day changes every year because it does not have a fixed date and is based on the lunar calendar.

GETTY Easter falls on a different date every year, find out when it takes place in 2017

Easter always falls on the first Sunday after the first full moon on or after March 21 in Western Christianity. But the Eastern Orthodox church normally celebrate Easter on different dates because they use a different calendar. This year is highly unusual because both branches of Christianity will celebrate Easter on the same day - April 16.

Top 10 things people give up for lent Wed, March 1, 2017 Lent 2017: From chocolate to meat and fizzy drinks, these are the top 10 things people are giving up this Easter. Play slideshow Getty 1 of 11 Easter 2017: What to give up for lent

One tradition associated with Easter is the giving out of eggs. Christians consider the egg to symbolise death and rebirth. A twist on the tradition sees chocolate eggs handed out to children as treats or hidden in an Easter egg hunt. In many European countries, people paint hard-boiled eggs in elaborate designs and take them to church to be blessed. Christians often bake a traditional Simnel cake or a hot cross bun to go with their traditional Easter family meals. WHEN IS PALM SUNDAY THIS YEAR? – CLICK HERE TO FIND OUT

GETTY Easter is the holiest and most important of Christian holidays

When is Good Friday? Good Friday is on April 14 this year and will commemorate the day that Jesus was crucified by the Romans after being betrayed by Judas. Catholics do not observe mass on the sombre bank holiday and no bells are rung until the Easter Vigil on Saturday when people wait for the resurrection.

GETTY Orthodox Christians observe Easter on a different date but this year the celebrations overlap

When is Easter Monday? Easter Monday is on April 17 - the day after Easter Sunday - and is a bank holiday in the UK. Roman Catholic traditionally sprinkle houses with holy water on Easter Monday.

GETTY A popular pastime for children is to go on an Easter egg hunt",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
56812,"SWNS Quarter of a million people are expected to turn out to watch the riders

Hunts across the country are expected to see more than 250,000 people gather to watch the pageantry of impressive horses, hound packs and riders in their striking red coats. Yet more than a decade after the Hunting Act outlawed the pursuit of foxes with packs of dogs, the public remains against its return - even among people living in rural areas, reveals a new poll. The Conservatives promised a free say on repealing the Hunting Act during its last election campaign but a vote has still not been put to the Commons.

A poll by the League Against Cruel Sports published today shows opposition to fox hunting remains high across the country, with 84 per cent saying it should not be made legal again. Even in the countryside there is strong opposition. The Ipsos Mori survey of 1,986 people shows how 82 per cent of people living in rural areas said they opposed hunting compared to 69 per cent four years ago. League Against Cruel Sports chief executive Eduardo Goncalves said: “The Boxing Day hunts are portrayed as a glorious pageant taking place in front of a huge number of people who support them, but the truth is very different.

SWNS In rural areas, 82 per cent of people oppose fox hunting

The annual Boxing Day hunt Sat, December 26, 2015 The annual Boxing Day hunt Play slideshow Newsteam 1 of 15 Members of the Ludlow Hunt embark on the Boxing Day Hunt through the centre of Ludlow

“The fact is 84 per cent of the public do not want fox hunting made legal.

84 per cent of the public do not want fox hunting made legal Eduardo Goncalves of LACS

“Just because families might venture out on Boxing Day to see the hunt, stroke the dogs or watch the horses, doesn't mean they support repealing a law to enable the hunt to chase and kill wild animals with their dogs for sport.” The Countryside Alliance said nobody connected to one of the more than 300 hunts in England and Wales registered with Council of Hunting Associations had been convicted of hunting offences in the past two years. Since the Act was brought in in 2005, 94 per cent of the 423 people successful prosecuted under the Act were for casual hunting or poaching and had nothing to do with registered hunts, the organisation said.

SWNS The League Against Cruel Sports bemoaned the fact the Boxing Day hunt is treated as a pageantry",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
44504,"GETTY Danny Welbeck is thrilled after scoring his second goal which sealed the win

Wife Coleen was in more extrovert celebratory mood as she jumped up from the posh seats to offer a jig of delight as her husband reached another memorable milestone. A successfully despatched penalty was no mean feat for the Three Lions captain, who was once again placed under the intense glare of the unyielding spotlight. Before a ball had been kicked in this European Championship qualifier, Wembley had witnessed the pomp and circumstance of Rooney’s 100th cap celebrations. Complete with sons Kai and Klay, a proud Rooney received his special memento from Sir Bobby. The past, though, counted for nothing as Rooney wriggled into the Slovenia penalty area, shaken and stirred, after the visitors had taken a shock 57th-minute lead. It was too much for skipper Bostjan Cesar, who tripped the Manchester United forward leaving Rooney to plant the ball on the spot and attempt to hold his nerve in an England time of great need. Despite Slovenia being one of the biggest exporters of pharmaceutical drugs, England until then had supplied their own sleeping tablets to send a near full house into a coma. England’s diamond, with Raheem Sterling at the tip of it, had failed to sparkle. Roy Hodgson’s side had been devoid of energy and ideas. ‘Rooney Never Tired – 100 Not Out’ screamed one of the banners.

There was certainly no lack of drive and power as he let fly from 12 yards and keeper Samir Handanovic’s outstretched right palm was not strong enough to deny the 29-year-old his 44th England goal. So it’s now another one down – he is level with Jimmy Greaves – and two to go, Gary Lineker (48) and the imperious Charlton (49), before he can claim the record in his own right. The fact that England went on to win with two goals from Danny Welbeck and continue their 100 per cent record in this featherweight group shouldn’t disguise the fact that until Rooney got going England had been bogged down and offered little enterprise. Not that a subdued Wembley offered any inspiration. Hopefully, once it’s possible, England will take to the road again and sample more heady atmospheres in arenas like Anfield and St James’ Park. Wembley was also still carrying the scars of its continuing flirtation with American football. You can spend a wasteful £757million but still end up with a pitch that would shame the Dog and Duck. It had been a subdued start with little passion – the complete opposite of the boisterous affair the previous night in Glasgow between Scotland and the Republic of Ireland. In fact, England only woke up when Jordan Henderson inexplicably headed past a startled Joe Hart from a free-kick lofted into the area by Milivoje Novakovic.

REUTERS Wayne Rooney is handed a golden cap by England's leading goalscorer Sir Bobby Charlton

After Rooney’s swift reply, England discovered some poise and purpose to continue their stroll towards France 2016. Rooney set Sterling free in the box only for Handanovic to smother, but there was no escape for the Slovenian keeper from England’s next purposeful attack. He did well to block Adam Lallana’s deflected strike but the ball eventually fell to Welbeck whose connection wasn’t the sweetest, but it was enough for the Arsenal striker to claim a 12th senior international goal. Slovenia looked thunderstruck, not knowing what had hit them after previously reducing the Three Lions to some aimless efforts at goal. Worse was to follow as England made it 3-1 through the best move of the game. Lallana fed the adventurous Kieran Gibbs before a wonderful one-two between Welbeck and Sterling was clinically finished by the Gunner. It was relief more than joy for England who knew they hadn’t set the evening alight and who looked vulnerable on the counter attack, Phil Jagielka doing well to block Kevin Kampl just as the Slovenian was about to pull the trigger.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
104794,"Manchester United have a fight on their hands if they want to get Koke [GETTY]

The summer deadline has long slammed shut, but the January transfer window is just around the corner. Here is a roundup of all the latest news, rumours and gossip...

Wolfsburg playmaker Diego has welcomed talk of him being linked to the Premier League and admits he wouldn't mind joining Arsenal or Southampton

Manchester United and Liverpool have been overtaken by AC Milan in the race to land promising Atletico Madrid talent Koke

Arsenal and Liverpool target Yohan Cabaye has indicated he could leave Newcastle at the end of the season as he wants to be playing in the Champions League again

Club chat and other gossip

Manchester United target Leighton Baines could be out for up to six weeks after fracturing his toe during the Merseyside derby against Liverpool at the weekend

Arsenal boss Arsene Wenger has admitted he used to fear playing Aaron Ramsey at the Emirates

Chelsea boss Jose Mourinho is looking battle-hardened with his closely-cropped haircut",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
289097,"The Italian striker had a quiet chat at the club's Melwood training complex as the Reds trained ahead of their Premier League clash against Aston Villa.

Balotelli and Rodgers both seemed relaxed as the players enjoyed a mini game at the end of the session.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
122624,"Attwood's injured Leicester rivals Geoff Parling and Ed Slater are already out of contention and, as shown in the All Black Tests in the summer, there is no certainty Lancaster will stand by his Six Nations second-row pairing of Courtney Lawes and Joe Launchbury.

Attwood, meanwhile, is a lock in the image of the greatest of them all, Martin Johnson, so much so he gained Johnson's admiration and favour when the then-England manager took his squad to Australia in 2010.

But disciplinary issues - a notorious suspension later that year - and injury stalled the process and it is only now, at 27 with 12 caps but only two as a starter, that Attwood is making a credible challenge to the established order.

In his case, less is more: drastically down from 20st in New Zealand four months ago to 18st 10lb, so becoming a sleeker specimen while deriving the benefit of Bath's fast start to the season, just as the team have from his.

""I don't feel losing weight is necessarily the reason I've found some form but it was a conscious decision to get back to the weight I was when I started in the Premiership with Gloucester,"" he said.

""It's a trade-off between ballast, power output, and durability, and you have to compensate with sound technique, and one thing experience gives you is technical proficiency.

""But this is not me I've single-handedly reinventing myself as a rugby player. It's much more collective than that. The way things are going at Bath is painting a very fortunate picture for me.""",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
220108,"GETTY Steven Gerrard and Ryan Babel recently played alongside each other in a charity match

Gerrard's former team-mate said he didn't think he was a racist after a supporter posed the question on Twitter. Diouf was quoted as saying Gerrard ""never liked black people"" and said the former Liverpool captain would only welcome black players to the club if they were English.

Gerrard has since refuted the claims and Babel appears to agree that Diouf is wide of the mark. ""What do you make of Diouf's claims Stevey Gerrard didn't like black players that weren't English,"" asked a Liverpool supporter on Twitter. Babel Replied: ""I did not get that feeling from Stevie G so I think he got it wrong.""

@smtm_LFC i did not got that feeling from Steve G so i think he got it wrong. — Ryan Babel (@Ryanbabel) September 15, 2015",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
181485,"Being outside the Union works: Turkey is set to become the EU's third biggest trade partner

Ankara is desperate to become a part of the union, but has continued to forge close business ties with the single market in the mean time.

As much as 80 per cent of foreign direct investment into Turkey comes from the EU.



And if a deal is made to make a customs union between the two sides to cover services and agriculture, Turkey could become the bloc's third largest trading partner.

An agreement could come sooner rather than later, according to Turkey's deputy prime minister Mehmet Simseky.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
263663,"ITV Sherrie Hewson opened up on her devastating relationship on Loose Women

The actress, 65, stressed that the man in question was not her former spouse Ken Boyd, whom she divorced in 2011, but someone she was with at a much younger age. ""I was in this really aggressive relationship and I was so frightened,"" she told co-stars Andrea McLean, Linda Robson and Jane Moore.

""For some reason, I married this man. It's ridiculous and I'm ashamed and I can’t bear even to think about it, and he was aggressive. ""In this so-called marriage, I believe I was violated many times. But I didn't have the power, I didn’t have the nerve, I was terrified, I was young, I had nobody to turn to.""

ITV Sherrie was fighting tears as she told her story

Today maybe I could have gone to somebody and he would have been prosecuted Sherrie Hewson

Becoming tearful as she spoke about one particularly nasty incident, the Benidorm star continued: “The only time that it became… you know, I was out somewhere and he was very abusive and hit me, and the police were called, and they said 'They're married'. Then they walked away from me and just left me. “As it happened, I ran. I just ran out of the door. I ran into the road and into a car, banged on this car’s window, the poor girl opened the car door and I got in the car and I went ‘put your foot down’ and bless her, she drove away with me.” The panel suggested that the law now has swung “too far the other way”, with Hewson adding: “Today maybe I could have gone to somebody and he would have been prosecuted. “The person who I’m talking about now - he died a few years ago - he should have been prosecuted but I wasn’t brave enough to go to a police station because they’d already rejected me.

ITV The panel were discussing anonymity for rape suspects

WENN It was an all-round eventful show for the team

“So I don’t know where the middle ground is."" Today’s show also host McLean pausing during one segment to reveal the breaking news that Alan Rickman had passed away. Gasps were heard in the audience as special guest Jodie Prenger called him a “phenomenal actor”.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
156948,"GETTY Donald Trump was attacked by Marco Rubio (left) and Ted Cruz (right)

Republican rivals Marco Rubio and Ted Cruz attacked the Republican front-runner in a televised debated this morning. Mr Rubio appeared to accuse Trump of jumping on a bandwagon, saying: ""A lot of these positions that he's taken now are new to him."" Mr Cruz added: ""In 2013, when I was leading the fight against the Gang of Eight bill [an immigration bill backed by Mr Rubio], where was Donald?""

I will, and the wall just got 10 feet taller Donald Trump

Dismissing the criticism, Mr Trump insisted he would force Mexico to pay for a 1,000-mile along the US-Mexican border. Earlier in the day, former Mexican leader Vicente Fox hit out at the proposal, saying: ""I'm not going to pay for that f****** wall."" In response, Trump said: ""I will, and the wall just got 10 feet taller.""

GETTY Trump (centre) wants to build a wall on the US-Mexico border

Mr Trump has scored early victories in New Hampshire, South Carolina and Nevada and is well ahead in national opinion polls. But he has some ways to go to clinch Republican nomination, which is decided by the number of delegates sent to the July party convention. So far the outspoken billionaire leads the race with 81 delegates, with Mr Cruz and Mr Rubio well behind at 17 apiece.

GETTY He also clashed with Ted Cruz over his views on universal healthcare",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201224,"Real allowed Mariano to join Lyon for £9million in June before agreeing to sell Alvaro Morata to Chelsea later in the summer.

Boss Zinedine Zidane wanted to bring in a No.9 to replace him and lined up Kylian Mbappe as a potential option.

But he couldn't get a deal over the line and it's left Real short of frontline options.

Gibson told Sky Sports' La Liga Weekly podcast: ""Mariano is an interesting one. I didn't think there was any need for Real Madrid to sell Mariano for 10million euros.

""If Morata had left [at that point he hadn't], he'd have been the next in the pecking order, he'd have been more willing to be that back-up striker.

""I was surprised they allowed both to leave.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
302633,"Steve McClaren won just six Premier League games in eight months in charge at Newcastle

Rafa Benitez was named as his successor this afternoon after days of speculation about McClaren's future, but the Premier League side finally opted to relieve him of his duties with Newcastle hovering in 19th place.

McClaren has released a statement following the outcome on his time at Newcastle while providing a message to the fans too.

“I am obviously very disappointed with the decision,"" McClaren's statement said.

“I appreciate any frustrations relating to the team’s results and the club subsequently finding itself in a battle to avoid relegation. I remain confident, however, that we would have stayed in the Premier League with a view to building for next season.

“Whilst there has been a lot of intense speculation surrounding my position over recent days, my sole priority has been to maintain my professionalism and carry on with my work to best prepare the team.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
141044,"The hugely popular Queen Vic landlord announced he would be taking a ""short break"" from EastEnders and fans had been wondering for months when and how that would be.

During Danny's departure from the show, his character Mick Carter received the harrowing news that his daughter Nancy (played by Maddy Hill) had been hit by a car in Bulgaria.

Although she was out of the country with her current boyfriend Tamwar Masood (Himesh Patel), caring dad Mick booked a seat on the next flight to be with his daughter.

According to reports from the Daily Star, 5.5 million viewers tuned into EastEnders to see how Mick would be written out for Danny's temporary break.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
127908,"WENN Bill Cosby has fired his attorney after less than a year

It has been claimed that the American actor has axed Christopher Tayback - who took over from Marty Singer as Cosby's main lawyer - and has since hired Angela Agrusa as his new attorney for civil case. The news comes just days after the former Assistant U.S. Attorney failed to derail a criminal trial, that could see Cosby behind bars for up to a decade, on July 7. Tayback replaced Singer last October after a judge ruled that Cosby would have to give a new deposition in the California civil case brought by Judy Huth, who has alleged that The Cosby Show star sexually assaulted her at the Playboy Mansion four decades ago.

WENN Cosby has been accused of rape, drugging and/or performing inappropriate sex acts by over 50 women

Tayback, who is the son of actor Vic Tayback, who played Mel on American sitcom Alice in the late 1970s, boasted some success during his turn as Cosby's lawyer. In March, a Los Angeles judge delayed Huth's deposition while Cosby's criminal case proceeded in Pennsylvania. However, Cosby is still facing trial over an encounter at his home with Andrea Constand in 2004.

WENN Bill is believed to have hired Angela Agrusa as his new attorney

Constand claims that the comedian drugged and raped her, while Cosby alleges that their tryst was consensual. Cosby's legal team were also unsuccessful at arguing that Cosby's immunity deal a decade ago with the then-district attorney not to prosecute in return for testifying fully in a deposition for a civil suit filed by Constand should be honoured, however a judge disagreed, as did an appeals court. The 78-year-old's new lawyer Agrusa has already come out fighting and told The Hollywood Reporter in a statement: ""Trying Mr. Cosby in a court of public opinion as imbalanced media coverage promotes, runs directly counter to our judicial systems most fundamental guarantees of fairness under the law.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
149881,"The Gunners have been pursuing defensive additions in the transfer market with Arsene Wenger needing to bolster his backline.

Valencia's Mustafi was first-choice but talks stalled with the La Liga club as Arsenal looked at other options.

Turkey international Toprak was turned to with the 27-year-old highly-rated in the Bundesliga.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
234339,"The presidential candidates were superimposed as Game Of Thrones characters to fill the endless broadcasting minutes as votes were counted.

Former president Park Geun-hye was ousted, prompting several candidates to compete for her job.

In turn, broadcaster SBS recast candidates Moon Jae-in, Ahn Cheol-soo and Hong Joon-pyo, into characters from the hit HBO fantasy drama.

SBS took a picture of the candidates and placed them to make it seem as if they were competing for Westeros’ Iron Throne, including riding on the back of Daenerys’ dragon.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
299624,"Reports suggested that the Reds would talk to Lille about cutting Origi's loan deal short following another injury to Daniel Sturridge and Mario Balotelli's early season struggles.



But Brendan Rodgers today confirmed that the move was dead in the water, saying: “What chance is there of bringing Origi in January? Well I don’t think there is any.



“That was never the case. The young player that we signed last summer was always on that understanding.



“There was no discussion about it, it was one where he had to stay at Lille.



“Obviously I’ve seen reports about him coming back early, but that was never ever the case.



“We signed the player, and that was one of the main reasons we signed him. He would have to stay at Lille for this season.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
368901,"GETTY Rangers striker Jon Daly says he'll lift the pressure from McCoist's shoulders

The manager was panned for the flop at Alloa when the Gers were cruising to a final place in the Petrofac Training Cup leading 2-0 – but lost three goals in the last 20 minutes. But it looks like those in power at Ibrox will not pull the trigger and that’s something Daly welcomes. McCoist is not just a good manager in Daly’s eyes, he also displayed his care and compassion by attending the funeral of the Irish striker’s father last year, quite unannounced. Daly, 31, said: “I was only at the club three or four months and my father passed away. “He gave me the week or so to go back home, and then on the day of my dad’s funeral I turned around and he was standing at the back of the church. That meant a lot to myself and my family. It showed me the type of man that he is.

It is up to us as players to make sure we turn that around for him and try and make things a little bit easier for him Jon Daly

“And because of that it hurts me that he is under pressure and that he is feeling it. I don’t think he deserves to be under pressure, but that’s football. “It is up to us as players to make sure we turn that around for him and try and make things a little bit easier for him. “The Alloa result was disappointing but I don’t think the manager deserves the level of criticism he got. “We need to get back to the business of winning games and help him out, because he does everything he can for us.” McCoist didn’t hide from the criticism, and took full responsibility. However, he has revealed he has been inundated with messages of support from fans and senior figures in the game. The Rangers boss said: “We had a disastrous last 20 minutes and lost three goals to a team in our division. “As disappointing as it is we have to focus and move on. “I said we would have bumps along the way and that was one of them. You always question yourself after a poor result and that hasn’t changed. If you are asking questions of your players you should ask questions of yourself.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
318039,"Pep Guardiola kept his Manchester City players behind after their draw with Southampton

Guardiola conducted an immediate inquest after Manchester City produced their worst Premier League performance of the season, even though the 1-1 home draw with Southampton took them back to the top of the table on goal difference.

Only once before in his glittering managerial career has the Spaniard gone five games without a win – in his first season as Barcelona manager in 2008-09 – and bizarrely it follows City’s storming 10-win start to the season.

Guardiola attempted to shrug off why he had kept his players in for so long by joking: “The red wine was good and I took a little bit longer!

“No, we were together, we speak, but it was nothing special. We have to analyse what is the situation.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
253457,"The group of girls shown in the video, thought to be those kidnapped from a Nigerian school

The 17-minute video shows around 100 girls wearing veils and praying at an undisclosed location.

They are thought to be part of the group which was abducted on April 14 after the rebel group Boko Haram stormed a secondary school in the northeastern village of Chibok and seized 276 schoolgirls.

Some of these managed to escape but around 200 are still missing.

The group has killed thousands of people in the last five years, as well as destabilising parts of northeast Nigeria.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
330915,"The phytophthora ramorum fungus, which was fi rst recorded in America, destroys larch and oak trees as well as other plants, including rhododendrons and bilberries.

Experts were shocked to find it had appeared at Whinlatter Forest, an area near Keswick which is popular for walking, mountain biking and adventure activities.

The Forestry Commission, which owns the land, announced that it has launched a 19-day programme to fell at least 27 acres of larch trees.

Spokesman Gareth Browning said he was concerned that trees which form part of a nearby Go Ape adventure playground could also become infected.

He added: “After we have completed the felling we will replant mostly with conifer treesof species which do not get ramorum disease.”

While the felling takes place, the B5292 road through the forest will be closed on weekdays, along with some trails and visitor facilities. Phytophthora ramorum was first identified by scientists in 1995, in California and Oregon.

It has since spread to mainland Europe and more recently to the UK, where the first outbreak was reported in 2002. Symptoms include bleeding cankers on the tree’s trunk and dieback of foliage.

The origins of the pathogen are still unclear and the only effective way of controlling the disease isto detect the fungus early and to destroy the infected trees. Worryingly, outbreaks of ramorum in the UK have increased since it was first spotted.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
251389,"Helen Thompson died four months after her wedding after collapsing following a violent seizure [CATERS]

Helen, 28, died four months after marrying her childhood sweetheart James, who said she collapsed after a violent seizure at their home.

The seemingly healthy bride was diagnosed with a blood clot on the brain after a scan.

Just two hours later, doctors told the family there was nothing more they could do for her. She was dead within 24 hours.

Bricklayer James, also 28, said yesterday: “Because she was on the contraceptive pill, she was at a higher risk of clots. But this was very rare.

“The doctors said they had never seen a case like this before. It was just so fast. Helen was such a wonderful person. She was my soulmate and I can’t believe I have lost her. She has been my best friend since I was 12 years old, and my partner since we were 18.

“When I left her one day she was fine and the next day she was dead, I still don’t believe it.”",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
215685,"GETTY Tourism in Britain is set for a Brexit boost as we outperform the rest of Europe

The World Travel & Tourism Council report predicted that the sector will grow here for the next two years in the wake of the referendum vote to quit Europe. It said tourism in the UK is expected to “hold up well” in 2016 and 2017. It forecast that tourism will this year grow by 3.6 per cent - a much stronger performance than the rest of Europe.

The WTTC said: “Europe will be challenged by lower visitor spend, but will still grow by 2.2 per cent.” And in France the forecast has been downgraded from 2.9 per cent to 1.1 per cent growth due to a spate of terrorist atrocities. But the WTTC said that globally tourism can withstand threats such as terrorism. It said: “Global Travel and Tourism continues to register strong growth despite challenges from terrorism, political turmoil, global economic developments, and the Brexit decision.”

Top 25 British beaches Thu, June 23, 2016 We take a look at Britain's best beaches. Woolacombe in Devon came out on top as Britain's holiday spots showed they could more than hold their own against Mediterranean getaways. Play slideshow Getty Images 1 of 25 Barafundle Beach is a secluded paradise

Tourism is a major industry in the UK, accounting for 9.6 per cent of all jobs in 2013 according to Deloitte.

Travel & Tourism in the UK is expected to hold up well in 2016 with growth of 3.6 per cent World Travel & Tourism Council

In that year tourism employed 3.1 million and was worth £127billion or 9 per cent of GDP. The WTTC said tourism is doing well here partly because the weaker pound post Brexit is attracting more overseas visitors and encouraging more Britons to holiday at home. It said: “Travel & Tourism in the UK is expected to hold up well in 2016 with growth of 3.6 per cent.

GETTY Tourism in the UK is expected to “hold up well” in 2016 and 2017",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
268151,"McLaren driver Jenson Button has suggested he will retire from Formula 1 after Sunday's Abu Dhabi Grand Prix. The 36-year-old was set to have a sabbatical in 2017 with McLaren holding his place until 2018. However, the 2009 world champion told the drivers' news conference today that he is not planning on returning to the sport. ""I go into this weekend thinking it's going to be my last race. I think that's the best way,"" Button said.

GETTY Jenson Button has confirmed he will call time on his career at the end of the championship

GETTY Jenson Button with his McLaren team-mate Fernando Alonso

""At this moment in time, I don't want to be racing in F1 beyond this year."" ""It is true that I have a contract in 2018 but at this moment in time I am not going to be racing in 2018. ""The whole point of this [contract for 2018] was if in three months' time I had eaten myself stupid and I changed my mind. ""But I don't want to go into this race thinking it's not my last race and it is.""

GETTY Jenson Button won the 2009 World Championship with Brawn

Sunday's race will be his 305th grand prix, with only Ferrari pair Rubens Barrichello and Michael Schumacher driving in more. He plans on keeping himself fit by targeting next year’s World Half Ironman Championships and is in talks about competing in sports cars and possibly Le Mans. But Button, who began his career with Williams in 2000, is ready to answer any call from McLaren should Fernando Alonso or his replacement Stoffel Vandoorne be sidelined. He said: “I’ll be keeping myself fit – probably fitter than I am now as I want to qualify for the half ironman. “But if this weekend is my last race then I can walk away with no regrets. I have achieved what I wanted to achieve.

Fascinating F1 Facts Sun, July 24, 2016 As the Formula 1 Grand Prix revs up for action, Haynes has delved into its extensive archive of imagery which has appeared in its numerous F1 Owner’s Workshop Manuals to give us 16 fascinating F1 Facts. Play slideshow Ford 1 of 16 Fittipaldi, who took his final Grand Prix win at Silverstone in 1975, said of the car: 'It would tell you what it was going to do before it did it.'",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
188226,"European Tour John Jacobs has died at the age of 91

Jacobs had been a professional golfer with a moderately successful career, appearing at the 1955 Ryder Cup in the wake of his best ever finish of 12th at the Open Championship. But his greatest legacy came from his non-playing career. He served as tournament director-general of the European Tour from 1971 to 1975, during which time the modern tour was born, and fought for years to expand the tour beyond Britain alone. Sandy Jones, the PGA’s chief executive, paid tribute to Jacobs, a man he’d known for a long time.

GETTY John Jacobs, pictured with legendary golf commentator Peter Alliss

“John Jacobs will be fondly remembered by those of us who were privileged to know him,” Jones told The Scotsman. “Quite simply he was a legend of the game and his name will sit at the top table with all the golfing greats.” Jacobs also went on to act as Ryder Cup captain in 1979 and 1981 although his second term was shrouded in controversy after surrounding the legendary Seve Ballesteros. The Spaniard had only played a minimal number of European Tour tournaments because of a dispute over appearance money.

GETTY John Jacobs was a big advocate for driving ranges to help expand golf

However, Jacobs told Ballesteros that he would vote for him to win one of the wildcard spots and he was eventually selected. Jacobs also released a number of golf instruction books included ""Practical Golf"" which is often listed as a seminal text for amateur golfers. “Make it do-able"" was Jacobs' coaching mantra.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
321154,"Bruce Forsyth returned to Strictly for a Children in Need special

The 87-year-old may have retired from the BBC dancing show two years ago, but he clearly couldn't stay away for too long. His jokes were cheesier than ever, as he kicked off the Strictly special, which featured the stars of Call the Midwife.

Advertisement

One of Bruce's jokes included: ""I remember when I had to call a midwife once. I rushed my wife to the hospital and kept saying to her 'Push darling, push harder' - and I felt ever so embarrassed afterwards."" Co-host Tess Daly then asked why, to which he replied: ""Well the door said pull!""

BBC Fans have taken to Twitter to share their love for Bruce

BBC Strictly special featured Call the Midwife stars

Advertisement

Despite viewers pointing out how cringeworthy Bruce's comeback was, majority still loved every minute of it. One posted: ""Oh I love #BruceForsyth I miss him on @bbcstrictly It was #NiceToSeeYouToSeeYouNice on @BBCCiN Brucie!"" as another added: ""I don't think I'll ever be capable of loving anyone more than I love Bruce Forsyth & it scares me."" A different person shared: ""Brucieeeeeee!!! As much as I love Claudia , I do miss Bruce forsyth."" Another said: ""Brilliant to see Brucie back for the children in need strictly #childreninneed #bruceforsyth (sic)""

Martin Freeman stars in the Star Wars themed sketch Sir Terry Wogan and Warwick Davis star in a Star Wars themed sketch Peter Andre makes a vist to the Eastenders set One Show presenter Matt Baker shows his support The Children in Need presenters for the night One Show presenters Matt Baker and Alex Jones Lewis Hamilton shows his support with Pudsey Sir Alan Sugar stars alongside Star Wars stormtroopers One Show presenter Alex Jones shows her support Tess Daly welcomes back Sir Bruce Forsyth to the Strictly dancefloor Call the Midwife stars take to the Strictly dancefloor One Direction show their support on the night Strictly judges welcome Call the Midwife stars for a one off special Scott Mills takes on a Royal Marines physical challenge David Tennant shows his support Sir Tom Jones and Rob Brydon take to the stage Helen Mirren shares her support One Show's Rickshaw challenge 2015 The One Show's rickshaw challenge team

BBC The Strictly judges took part in the CiN skit

This year's charity extravaganza sees Dermot O'Leary replace Terry Wogan, who was forced to pull out of his hosting duties at the last minute, after a back injury left him unable to participate. This is the first time that he has missed the show in its 15-year history. “We are pleased to announce that fellow Irishman and Radio 2 presenter Dermot O'Leary will be stepping into Sir Terry Wogan's shoes for tonight's Children in Need from 7.30 to 10pm, hosting alongside Tess Daly and Fearne Cotton,"" a BBC spokesperson revealed.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
124914,"Photographer Roger Clark took the opportunity to snap this picture while the squirrel was stuck [SOLENT]

The squirrel has regularly squeezed through the bars of the pen designed to protect the bird food.

However, wildlife photographer Roger Clark had the last laugh when he discovered the rodent stuck inside.

Roger, 69, who put the cage around the feeder at his home in Chandler’s Ford, Hants, said: “Normally it would flee, but this time it struggled and struggled to escape and I could get in for a close-up.”",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
346326,"Barry Burton is on the search for his daughter in the new Resident Evil trailer

The sequel spin off will be launched in four weekly digital episodes starting on February 18.

The full schedule includes: Episode 1: February 18, Episode 2: February 25, Episode 3: March 4, and Episode 4: March 11.

The episodes can be bought individually for £4.99 or fans can wait to buy the complete season for £19.99.

There are big bonuses attached to buying the complete collection through the Season Pass however, with fans also receiving two extra episodes telling the backstories of Moira Burton and Natalia Kora.

Raid Mode will also get new bonus content including the return of Albert Wesker and Hunk (Season Pass) as playable Raid characters.

Players can also alternatively wait till March 18 to buy the boxed retail copy of the game, which will include Wesker, an additional Hunk for Raid Mode and Raid Mode Throwback Map Pack, additional costumes for Claire, Moira, Barry and Natalia for the campaign and Raid mode.

Fans will be able to buy all additional content as DLC extras, while the final price for the boxed version has yet to be released.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
236558,"Saunders is set to announce his next title defence later today but it is widely expected to be against Monroe, known as the Mongoose.

Saunders had been due to face Avtandil Khurtsidze earlier this month but the Georgian was forced to withdraw after being arrested in New York.

But now the 27-year-old is due to defend his WBO middleweight title for the second time on September 16 and he is keen to get the war of words started early.

“The Mongoose - I’m going to show you what I’m going to do,” Saunders said, raising his middle finger to the camera.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
259015,"There comes a point where a chap needs a change from topiary balls of box and pyramids of yew when it comes to winter form in the garden. Don’t get me wrong – my own patch is filled with these evergreen delights, so much so that I keep waiting for a visitor to ask if we are living in TV’s Trumpton.

But as well as these formal evergreens, something which is architectural but just a tad more relaxed is a real advantage at this time of year.

Nothing is more striking in this respect than the false castor oil plant – Fatsia japonica. It looks wonderfully exotic but, as a native of Japan and South Korea, you would imagine that it would be a touch on the tender side.

Well, in severe winters it may well be killed back a little – especially if heavy snowfall weighs down its branches. But it always seems to bounce back, and not just in the milder counties.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
225898,"GETTY Men are increasingly using their mobile devices as substitutes for real relationships

Virtual assistants such as Siri and Cortana are increasingly being used by male users to fulfil some of their deepest desires, new research has found. The apps are being used to carry out sexual conversations by users who do not have a human companion. And it seems that the majority of these users are lonely men who are desperate for love.

GETTY Siri has been on every iPhone since the iPhone 4S

The revelation comes from Ilya Eckstein, the chief executive of Robin Labs, which developed a virtual assistant to compete with the likes of Siri. He revealed that his company's service, called Robin, is being used for up to 300 conversations a day by some men, ""mostly teenagers and truckers without girlfriends"", who don't have partners of their own. ""This happens because people are lonely and bored.... It is a symptom of our society,"" he told The Times. ""As well as the people who want to talk dirty, there are men who want a deeper sort of relationship or companionship."" Eckstein estimated that around five per cent of all interactions with the Robin chatbot were ""clearly sexually explicit"".

IMDB The film Her sees Joaquin Phoenix fall in love with a virtual assistant

Eckstein claimed that some of these users, may even be developing romantic feelings for their devices. This remarkably similar to the plot of the 2013 science-fiction film Her, starring Joaquin Phoenix as a man who falls in love with a virtual assistant, voiced by Scarlett Johansson. Eckstein added, “People want to flirt, they want to dream about a subservient girlfriend, or even a sexual slave. It may just be more for laughs, or something deeper underneath the surface.”",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
337301,"The cat fight continues between Sally Bercow and her lover's wife Erica Scott-Young

Alan Bercow, is a 57-year-old, vertically challenged business man suffering male-pattern baldness and boasting looks which might charitably be described as 'plain'. But this has not prevented two successful professional women involving themselves in a very public cat-fight. Today it appeared Erica Scott-Young had won the battle for her love-cheat husband’s affections. She was all-smiles for the waiting paparazzi as she physically and metaphorically stood side by side with Alan Bercow as they left their £2million Chiswick family home.

EXPRESS Sally Bercow said she is heartbroken due to her marriage in crisis

Advertisement

NATIONAL Ms Scott-Young said she wouldn't comment as she didn't want to be a media whore

Ms Scott-Young said she “feels sorry” for Sally Bercow, wife of House of Commons Speaker John Bercow, who is also cousin to her lover Alan. Yesterday she refused to comment on the illicit encounters between Mrs Bercow and her husband Alan, saying she didn’t want to be a “media whore”. But she still found opportunity to blast Mrs Bercow for feeding her own “ego and narcissism”. When tearful Mrs Bercow described herself as “f****** heartbroken” that her marriage was in tatters and that Alan had gone back to his wife, Ms Scott-Young scathed: “You have to have a heart to have it broken.”

GETTY Sally Bercow said her marriage fell apart when her husband John Bercow moved into Westminster

Advertisement

Mrs Bercow said it “took two to tango”, but today Ms Scott-Young said: ""I wasn't the partner. I wasn't tangoing. ""I don't really want to comment on it, it's something very private and I think it's all been said. ""And I feel a bit sorry for her actually and it's a bit of a car crash really isn't it."" ""I just think all this needs to stop. We need to get back to work. It's a very private matter, well it should be a very private matter. There are innocent parties."" As Alan Bercow left the family home he was asked how good he was at the tango.

REX Sally Bercow said it took two to tango",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
248293,"People suffering with insomnia have a higher risk of developing the lung condition. Asthma affects approximately 300 million people worldwide, with major risk factors including smoking, obesity and air pollution. Symptoms of depression and anxiety have previously been associated with a risk of developing asthma in adulthood. Asthma is a long-term condition - but symptoms can get worse while people have asthma attacks.

GETTY Insomnia: People who said they woke up to early had an increased risk of developing asthma

“Insomnia, defined as having difficulties initiating or maintaining sleep, or having poor sleep quality, is common among asthma patients, but whether insomnia patients have a higher risk of developing asthma at a later stage has not been thoroughly investigated,” said Dr Linn Beate Strand, Sleep researcher and author of the study. Using data from a long-running health survey in Norway, researchers investigated the association between insomnia and the risk of developing asthma. The researchers analysed the results to assess the risk of asthma among 17,927 participants aged between 20 and 65 years. Participants were asked to report problems getting to sleep, sleep maintenance problems and poor quality sleep.

Asthma triggers Mon, September 5, 2016 Asthma can be triggered by the weather, your emotions and even sex. Knowing what your triggers are, will help you cope and deal with your asthma more effectively. Play slideshow 1 of 11

GETTY Insomnia: Insomnia is the inability to sleep properly

A key finding in our study is that those people with chronic insomnia had more than three times the risk of developing asthma Dr Ben Brumpton

They also reported any asthma symptoms at the start of the study and at the end of the study. Results showed that those participants reporting difficulty falling asleep often and almost every night during the last month had a 65 per cent and 108 per cent increased risk of developing asthma over the following 11 years, respectively. Similarly, those who reported waking too early without being able to go back to sleep often or almost every night had a 92 per cent and 36 per cent increased risk of developing asthma. For people who reported poor quality sleep more than once a week, the risk of developing asthma increased by 94 per cent.

GETTY Asthma: Insomnia can increase risk of developing the lung condition",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
323299,"Exploring the world of the War of the Roses with a near-novelistic degree of pace and intrigue, while always remaining scholarly and insightful, The Hollow Crown is every bit as entertaining and readable as Jones's previous history blockbuster, The Plantagenets. Jones takes us from the military triumphs of the soldier-king Henry V - who he describes as ""a paragon of wisdom, manliness and courage"" - in the early parts of the 15th century right up until the accession of his namesake, Henry VIII, in 1509, at the age of 17. In between he tells a gripping and bloodthirsty tale of dynastic feuding between the Lancastrians and the Yorkists, each of whom appeared at times to have seized the upper hand until a strange accident of fate, or simple betrayal, saw them cast down again.

The Hollow Crown by Dan Jones tells the bloodthirsty tale of the War of the Roses [AMAZON]

Advertisement

One of the leading figures in this chronicle, the dashing but lecherous Edward IV, epitomises this topsy-turvy system; after he initially seized power from the saintly but mentally deficient Henry VI in 1461, he reigned until 1470, only to be toppled by a Lancastrian rebellion led by Henry's feisty queen, Margaret of Anjou. In most cases, this would have led to permanent removal from the throne, but only a matter of months later, he rebuilt his support, encountered the Lancastrian forces at the Battle of Barnet, and won a convincing victory, crowned by the exile of Margaret and the extra-judicial killing of Henry in the Tower in 1471. There are few heroes in this book. Even the shining virtue of Henry V, who won one of our most famous victories in history at the battle of Agincourt in 1415, is thrown into relief by his mass execution of prisoners and casualties afterwards, on the grounds that his intention to secure total victory against the French could only be frustrated by the continuing survival of those who had fought against him. This might be politically sound, but it still makes him seem a harsh ruler. But then, as Jones points out adroitly, it was a harsh age. The great noblemen of the time, such as William de la Pole, Earl of Suffolk, and Richard Neville, Earl of Warwick, enjoyed riches, power and influence that many of their countrymen could only dream of, but when their luck ran out, their fate was invariably brutal; Suffolk ended his life coldly murdered by a group of sailors en route to exile, though not before suffering the indignity of a mock trial and enduring a botched execution that took half a dozen strokes of a rusty sword to kill him.

The book verges on greatness, but there are a few minor flaws. Jones's descriptions of the many battles and killings that take place in the period are engaging and visceral, but his over-reliance on bloodthirsty terms such as ""hacked to death"" and ""cut to pieces"" might make even those of the hardiest complexions slightly queasy. His style, which is lively and fast-paced throughout, occasionally could have done with a moment or two of contemplation; it would have been useful to have had a greater insight into the everyday lives of the anonymous men who ended up dying on equally anonymous fields the length and breadth of the country. And the sheer number of characters means that a cast list would have been welcome. Nonetheless, these are insignificant cavils when set against his greatest achievement, which is writing a work of popular history that has as many cliffhanging moments of surprise and suspense as any TV miniseries, and is every bit as entertaining.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
354181,"According to sources in Spain, Adidas are prepared to help fund a mega-money move for Messi.



The German sportswear giant will replace Nike as United's kit manufacturer next season in a deal worth £750million over 10 years.



And Adidas could help United lure Messi away from the Nou Camp.

Advertisement

Speculation has intensified around the 27-year-old's future after reports of a falling out with Barca boss Luis Enrique surfaced.



Messi was subsequently linked with Chelsea and Manchester City, although it has emerged that only United have a realistic chance of buying the Argentina superstar and staying in line with Financial Fair Play (FFP) regulations.



Messi has a £195m release clause at Barca while taking into account his wages would push any deal to the £300m mark.

At the Ballon d'Or awards on Monday night - where Messi finished runner-up to rival Cristiano Ronaldo - he cast fresh doubt over his future.



Asked if he wanted to finish his career at Barcelona or at Newell's Old Boys in his hometown of Rosario, Messi said: ""I'm not sure what's going to happen, whether I'd go to Newell's.



""I don't know where I'll be next year although I've always said I want to end my career at Barcelona - but nobody knows what the future holds.""",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
123310,"City analysts expect a virtually cloud-free performance when holiday firm TUI Travel reports annual results on Thursday.

Led by chief executive Peter Long TUI has said it is con-fident of raising full-year operating profits by 9 per cent, although it predicted a £40million hit from foreign exchange volatility.

Broker Numis Securities said: ""We believe TUI Travel is a better quality business than Thomas Cook and do not anticipate any surprises.""

---------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Retailer Pets at Home is expected to show it has bolstered its lead in the pet care market when it posts first-half results on Thursday.

The chain, which runs 385 pet shops, is poised to almost double pre-tax profits to £41.3million as it expands its operations, Bank of America Merrill Lynch said.

It is now the largest pet veterinary services provider in Britain following the integration of Vets 4Pets, which it acquired in March last year.

---------------------------------------------------------------------------------",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
160452,"GETTY A gambler made the ultimate gamble when he placed £100 thousand on Hillary Clinton

The bet was placed by an unknown person in Exeter, Devon on October 10 when it appeared likely Secretary Clinton would become the 45th president of the United States. And while today many people have their heads in their hands, whoever this punter is has lost more than most.

GETTY The bet was placed by an unknown person

Ladbrokes would not reveal details of the bet other than to confirm it was placed by a debit card. If Hillary Clinton succeeded in becoming the president the punter would have won £125,000, a £25,000 profit.

GETTY If Hillary won the election, the person would have profited £25 thousand

The Exeter customer was the second person to bet such a substantial amount on Clinton to win after a woman placed a 500,000 euros bet on the 68-year-old to become the first female president of the United States.

Donald Trump in numbers Wed, November 9, 2016 A look at some numbers that define Donald Trump Play slideshow 1 of 10

GETTY The odds were in favour of Clinton winning",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
353961,"Rolls-Royce have given a seat on their board to ValueAct

Bradley Singer, partner and chief operating officer at the hedge fund, joins at once as a non-executive director of the aero-engine giant. ValueAct has built up a 10.8 per cent stake in Rolls, whose chairman Ian Davis denied the appointment would change group strategy. Rolls is already shedding dozens of senior managers as part of a £200million cost-saving programme. Singer said: “I have been deeply impressed with the senior leadership team and directors of Rolls-Royce.”

Advertisement

GETTY Poundland's chief is to step down

POUNDLAND chief Jim McCarthy will step down after a decade overseeing dramatic growth at the retailer. The 60-year-old, under whose leadership the discounter has floated on the stock market and expanded from 146 stores with £310million sales to a £1billion business with over 900 outlets, will retire in September. Taking over is Kevin O’Byrne, a former finance director at electricals chain Dixons Retail who went on to become boss of the DIY giant B&Q. McCarthy’s 40-year career included running T&S Stores, which he sold to Tesco, and heading up Sainsbury’s convenience stores business. Poundland shares fell 11¼p to 170p.

GETTY Spotlight picked up an Oscar one at this years Academy Awards

Advertisement

IT MAY be the international distributor for Oscar winner Spotlight but Entertainment One’s film business is falling short in the best supporting role. Shares in the Peppa Pig owner plunged 23½p to 149½p as nine-month revenues fell three per cent. A strong TV performance, where revenue rose 39 per cent, was offset by a 14 per cent drop in fi lm revenue. Box office takings were down nearly 24 per cent to £124million – reflecting a lower number of releases while some movies flopped – but eOne talked up this year’s releases including David Brent: Life On The Road. It also hailed “exceptionally strong” Peppa sales in America, where retail sales soared by about 275 per cent last year.

GETTY Tesco floor staff can expect a pay increase",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
235464,"Kimberly doesn't seem to mind that a fan has her tatooed on her back [REX]

The so-called superfan has ensured a lifetime commitment to the 31-year-old by getting a portrait of her permanently etched on her back.



“I have a fan from Manchester who got a tattoo of my face on her back.



I thought that’s my face tattooed on somebody’s back ... for ever,” says Kimberly who is appearing on Superstars And Superfans on the TLC TV channel tonight.

I have a fan from Manchester who got a tattoo of my face on her back Kimberly Wyatt",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
277989,"The West Side Story star drowned off California in 1981, aged 43, while sailing with husband Robert Wagner and fellow star Christopher Walken.

Now the certificate has been changed eight months after an inquiry into her death was reopened over concerns about bruises found on her skin.

Detectives said they still cannot tell if her death was the result of foul play and that while she did drown, it is unclear how she got into the water.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
105780,"Damien Green was assessing the Home Secretary’s performance during the live TV debate after she stepped in for the Prime Minister. The Conservative MP was quickly stopped in his tracks during his interview as the Shadow Foreign Secretary butted in to brand Theresa May a “coward” for not taking part in the debate. Speaking on the BBC, Mr Green began by describing the leaders' debate as a clear indication of what a Jeremy Corbyn government would look like, “a coalition of chaos”. He said: “It’s completely ridiculous, like what a lot of Tim [Farron] said during the course of the evening.

BBC Emily Thornberry interrupted the Tory politicians interview to begin a shouting match

“What you saw tonight well illustrated the differences between the parties. “You had Amber Rudd, calm, in control, realistic, discussing serious issues in an adult way, and you saw what a Jeremy Corbyn government would be like. “Although all the other parties, by in large agreed on higher taxes, higher spending, more borrowing, higher immigration, they still disliked each other and squabbled. “That was the coalition of chaos made flesh, that is what a Jeremy Corbyn led government would look like and you could see there’s now a clear choice for the British people, which faces them next week.”

BBC Emily Thornberry criticised the Prime Minister for not taking part in the live TV debate

I just don’t understand why she wasn’t here. What is she afraid of? Emily Thornberry

As Mr Green finished his point, the Shadow Foreign Secretary stepped in to begin a furious row with the Tory politician as she targeted the Prime Minister for not taking part in the debate. She raged: “I just don’t understand why she wasn’t here. What is she afraid of? “I have to say, I think to myself if she can’t get out and debate, how the hell can she be saying to the British public she can negotiate.” Ms Thornberry then turned her attention directly to Mr Green and continued her tirade. “Why is she such a coward,” she said.

The TV election debate – in pictures Wed, May 31, 2017 The televised debate saw Jeremy Corbyn, Amber Rudd, Paul Nuttall, Caroline Lucas, Angus Robertson, Tim Farron and Leanne Wood go toe-to-toe Play slideshow PA 1 of 15 The politicians taking part in the debate",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
168657,"Police officers Sue Mills and Lisa Cutts weighed in on the case that has been keeping the nation captive for the past six weeks during an appearance on This Morning. The officers were asked their professional opinion on the identity of the Balaclava Man on the BBC drama and also whether Roz Huntley (played by Thandie Newton) was guilty of killing forensics expert Tim Ifield (Jason Watkins). Sue surmised that family friend and solicitor Jimmy Lakewell (Patrick Baladi) was in fact the Balaclava Man and that he tried to kill AC-12 detective Steve Arnott (Martin Compston).

“Jimmy Lakewell, he represented [Michael Farmer] as a sex offender,” Sue explained, saying that the lawyer would make the vulnerable man the fall guy by giving him a “numpty duty solicitor”. She went on to suggest that Jimmy “fancies” Roz and could be helping her to cover up the real person behind the murders. Sue concluded: “Lakewell has set Michael up. Lakewood could have been the Balaclava Man.”

ITV The two detectives shared their theories on Line of Duty

ITV The detectives concluded Jimmy Lakewell was the Balaclava Man on Line of Duty

Lakewell has set Michael up. Lakewood could have been the Balaclava Man Sue Mills

Lisa then gave her thoughts and theories on the case, explaining: “My money’s on Jimmy Lakewell.” She continued: “Well, I would want a big team. I would say Jimmy Lakewell is behind it, where he’s in league with everyone else. I would say Michael Farmer has probably not done any of it.” Their theories come after the BBC released a teaser trailer for the finale which will bring season four to a close, hinting that things were not looking good for chief antagonist Roz and that she could get killed off in a showdown at the offices of AC-12.

ITV Real-life police detective Sue Mills reveals her Line of Duty theories

Line of Duty: Meet the cast Mon, March 27, 2017 Line of Duty series 4: Who is in the cast and where have you seen them before? Play slideshow BBC 1 of 17 Line of Duty: Meet the cast

BBC Thandie Newton and Jason Watkins in Line of Duty season 4",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
113323,"Chelsea have been pursuing the Monaco ace for a number of weeks as Antonio Conte looks to add depth to his midfield.

However, with talks having stalled recently it is understood that the Blues are in danger of being beaten to Bakayoko’s signature by Manchester United.

Jose Mourinho has already got one over his former employers by persuading Romelu Lukaku to join him in a £75million move from Everton instead of returning to Stamford Bridge, and the Portuguese boss could be set to strike again.

Bakayoko is high on Conte’s list of summer transfer targets, but Chelsea’s inability to get a deal over the line has left United with a shot at stealing the 22-year-old.

Red Devils fans understandably find the situation rather amusing, having already laughed at Chelsea’s expense over the transfer saga surrounding Lukaku’s move.

Scroll through the gallery above to see some of the funniest reactions as Manchester United fans troll Chelsea over Tiemoue Bakayoko.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
237850,"Broadcast regulator Ofcom has opened a new investigation into the incident after Gifty Louise, 20, could be heard to say ""I f*****g told you so"" as Sam Lavery was revealed to be safe from elimination.

The swearing could be heard during the family show as Sam, 17, was seen to hug her mentor Simon Cowell.

Following an advert break, 43-year-old Dermot was forced to issue an apology to viewers, reiterating that emotions were “running high” in the studio.

An Ofcom spokesperson said: ""Ofcom is investigating this programme, which included the most offensive language before the 9pm watershed.""",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
303697,"At the same time, the prospect of additional American Football fixtures at Wembley could fill the void in the event calendar if one or two England matches were moved to grounds around the country.

However, recent failures to fill the 90,000 capacity ground, coupled with an appetite for international football around the rest of the country, has led to a complete rethink.

After spending £759m on a showpiece ""home"" of football, the FA initially refused to consider moving games out of London.

Contractual obligations to the long-term Club Wembley clients means that England have to play all home internationals at the new stadium for the first 10 years of its operation.

The chance to host more NFL games has proved the key to FA chiefs rethinking their ""Wembley-only"" policy for England matches after only 50,000 tickets were sold for the visit of San Marino tonight.

Wembley National Stadium Limited, a wholly-owned subsidiary of the FA, is looking to host four NFL fixtures in 2015, one more than the three scheduled for this year, as they work towards one day running a full franchise out of England.

The FA's desire to extend their business with the Americans will also have another consequence - Tottenham will not be able to use Wembley as a temporary home while White Hart Lane is rebuilt during the 2017-18 season.

In the congested autumn period, Wembley will not want to risk a lucrative long-term NFL tie-in just to help Tottenham out on a one-off basis.

At the same time, the Premier League yesterday revealed there would have to be ""very compelling reasons"" for a club to split home fixtures between two different grounds in the same season.

Although ultimately it will be a board decision, the ""overwhelming preference"" is for all games to be played in the same stadium to preserve the integrity of the tournament. Even Tottenham's European group fixtures would be hard to schedule in at the stadium's busiest time of year.

Senior figures at the FA were keen to stress last night that the prospect of moving England games to various stadia around the country is far from a certainty and would still require a certain amount of ""open-mindedness"" from the board.

However, stadiums such as Old Trafford, St James' Park, Anfield and Villa Park could all be considered after successfully hosting games when England were last on the road as Wembley was rebuilt between 2000 and 2007.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
291278,"The 26-year-old has been heavily linked with a £15million move away from QPR following the club's relegation from the Premier League last term. Aston Villa, Newcastle, Chelsea and Tottenham are reportedly keen to land the striker, who scored 18 goals during his debut campaign in the top flight.

He's aiming to go to a top-half team Chris Ramsey

However, the former two clubs are set to miss out on his services as Austin looks to avoid a relegation scrap in favour of a top-half club. Should Chelsea and Spurs fail to meet QPR's £15m valuation, Austin is happy to remain at Loftus Road in the Championship.

GETTY Charlie Austin will only join a top-half Premier League team this summer",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
302903,"Loic Remy is out of favour at Chelsea

The Palace manager is set to agree a season-long loan deal with Chelsea for the out-of-favour striker.

An option is in place to sign Remy for £12.5million next summer as Palace aim to add pace to go with the power of new record signing Christian Benteke.

Remy, 29, is keen to link-up again with Pardew after enjoying his most prolific spell in the Premier League at old club Newcastle in 2013-14.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
57193,Princess Diana sitting on the steps of her home at Highgrove [GETTY],express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
338832,"Cheryl's ex Jean-Bernard Fernandez-Versini appears to have made quite the impression on Chloe Sims

The Only Way Is Essex cast member was introduced to the French restaurateur, 35, during a night out with mutual friends at London's Drama nightclub. The 34-year-old beauty was introduced to Jean-Bernard through Rita Ora's close pal Vas J Morgan, who also appears on the hit ITVBe show. ""He seems like a nice, fun guy - very good looking and very French! He asked if I was on the same show as Vas"" she dished in her column for Star magazine.

Advertisement

ITVBE Chloe features on hit ITVBe show The Only Way Is Essex

Cheryl in pictures Cheryl arrives in the South of France for Judges Houses Cheryl arrives in the South of France for Judges Houses Cheryl arrives in the South of France for Judges Houses Cheryl and Simon Cowell reunite for X Factor Judges Houses Cheryl and Simon Cowell reunited for X Factor Cheryl and Simon Cowell are pictured during Judges' Houses Cheryl fans are hoping to see her return as a Judge in the next series of X Factor Cheryl flaunted her post-baby body as she made her catwalk debut Cheryl looked stunning as she strutted down the runway in a very sexy ensemble Cheryl stepped out in public for the first time since giving birth to baby Bear Cheryl flaunted her washboard abs at Game 4 Grenfell Cheryl looked sensational in the outfit which accentuated her slender waist Cheryl and Liam head out for a date night Cheryl flashes incredible abs on first holiday with Liam Payne since birth of baby Bear Cheryl appeared to go make-up free for the outing Cheryl and Liam cosied up for smouldering snaps Cheryl cradles her tum in a tight black dress Cheryl proudly shows off her blossoming figure for the campaign Cheryl showcases a huge baby bump in her latest shoot for L'Oreal Liam Payne and Cheryl arriving at The Fayre of St James's Church Cheryl showed off a rotund belly as she arrived at a carol concert Cheryl chose a clingy green dress for her outing Cheryl covers 'baby bump' in plunging jumpsuit as Liam Payne pregnancy rumours continue Cheryl is rumoured to be expecting a baby with Liam Payne Cheryl pictured for the first time since rumours started that she is expecting her first child with One Direction singer Liam Payne Cheryl showed off her curves at the L'Oreal event in a high waisted black outfit Cheryl and models attend the L'OreAL Gold Obsession Party Cheryl wore a camel coloured jumper dress and coat Cheryl wows in black thigh high boots and off the shoulder black dress at the Vogue 100 party Cheryl certainly turned heads at the Vogue bash Cheryl looked sensational in pink dress at Cannes Film Festival Cheryl kept her make-up simple with a pink lipstick to match her dress Cheryl arrives on the red carpet at the Cannes Film Festival Cheryl and her boyfriend Liam Payne walked the red carpet at Cannes in May Cheryl wore a stylish tropical bomber jackert for her date with Liam at the Sexy Fish restaurant Cheryl in an elegant pink gown looks happy in the arms of boyfriend Liam Payne Cheryl wearing high heeled boots she has designed for stylist Cheryl flaunts her cleavage moody black and white picture Cheryl Fernandez-Versini shows off her long legs in this X Factor press shot Cheryl Fernandez-Versini naked after LFW 2016 Cheryl posted a picture of her fab bikini body Cheryl Fernandez-Versini Looks stunning in a royal blue velvet figure hugging dress at the Pride of Britain awards Cheryl Fernandez Versini at the Music Industry Trust Awards Cheryl and Liam Payne on a date night Cheryl Fernandez-Versini at the L'Oreal Paris Studio Pro at London Fashion Week, L'Oreal Paris & Gareth Pugh party Cheryl Fernandez-Versini, Nicola Roberts and Kimberley Walsh attend Nicola Roberts 30th birthday party Cheryl and Liam pose for a selfie posted on Liam's social media account Cheryl Fernandez-Versini and Liam Payne ina picture he posted on Instagram Brit Awards Show 2016 Cheryl Fernandez-Versini on the red carpet at the Brit Awards 2016 Cheryl Fernandez-Versini at the X Factor press launch Cheryl shares a selfie from Barbados Cheryl Fernandez Versini pictured cosying up to Liam Payne in December 2015 Cheryl Fernandez-Versini on stage during the X Factor live finals in November, 2015 Cheryl Fernandez-Versini 2015 calendar cover Cheryl Fernandez Versini at the X Factor live finals in 2015 Cheryl Fernandez-Versini arrives for her judging role at L'Oreal Paris' makeup artist competition Cheryl Fernandez-Versini and Jess Glynne in Rome for the judges houses round of X Factor Cheryl Fernandez-Versini poses back stage at the X Factor studios Cheryl Fernandez-Versini leaves Ant & Dec's joint 40th birthday bash with her husband Jean-Bernard Fernandez-Versini Cheryl Fernandez-Versini shows off her tiny frame at the Music Industry Trusts Awards Cheryl Fernandez-Versini poses back stage before the first live X Factor show Cheryl Fernandez Versini pictured during X Factor live show Cheryl Fernandez Versini and fellow judge Simon Cowell during the live X Factor show Cheryl Fernandez-Versini Kimberley Walsh and Nicola Robertshe pictured on the red carpet before the 2015 Pride of Britain Awards Cheryl Fernandez-Versini arriving at the X Factor press day Cheryl-Fernandez-Versini poses for a shoot ahead of X Factor Cheryl-Fernandez-Versini Cheryl Fernandez-Versini looking hot in an image she posted on Instagram Cheryl Fernandez-Versini in a 60's inspired outfit at the X Factor auditions arrivals Simon Cowell pulls a funny face behind Cheryl Fernandez-Versini before the July X Factor auditions begin at Wembley arena Cheryl Ann Fernandez-Versini arriving at the X Factor London auditions in July, 2015 Cheryl shared this flawless no make-up selfie on her Instagram account, tagging it #messyhurrdon'tcurr Cheryl Fernandez-Versini pictures from new single Only Human Cheryl Fernandez-Versini pictures from new single Only Human Cheryl Fernandez-Versini pictures from new single Only Human Cheryl Fernandez-Versini pictures from new single Only Human Cheryl Fernandez-Versini pictures from new single Only Human Cheryl Fernandez-Versini in the ITV X Factor 2015 trailer Cheryl performed live on Children in Need 2014 'The X Factor' celebrities at Fountain Studios, London, Britain - 15 Nov 2014 The Xtra Factor Cheryl Fernandez-Versini is seen at the live X Factor show in London. The X Factor judges are seen at the Saturday live show in London, this week's theme, Big Band Week. The X Factor judges are seen at the Saturday live show in London, this week's theme, Big Band Week. Cheryl Fernandez-Versini performs her new song 'I Don't Care' at the X Factor live show in London Cheryl Fernandez-Versini performs her new song 'I Don't Care' at the X Factor live show in London The X Factor judges are seen at the X Factor live show in London on Nov 2nd Cheryl Fernandez-Versini performs her new song 'I Don't Care' at the X Factor live show in London Cheryl Fernandez-Versini performs her new song 'I Don't Care' at the X Factor live show in London Cheryl's new album 'Only Human' Cheryl's new album 'Only Human' The X Factor The X Factor

Despite her crush, Chloe insisted that nothing physical happened between them, with the mother-of-one instead ending her night in the company of a McDonald's. But while Jean-Bernard may have made a good impression on Chloe, it seems it wasn't quite the same story with X Factor judge Simon Cowell, who recently slammed him for being ""out of order"" on the set of the talent competition. The 56-year-old music mogul revealed that the businessman would sometimes ""scream"" when things got intense between the acts during the live shows.

Advertisement

WENN Chloe described Jean-Bernard as a 'nice, fun guy'

GETTY Cheryl and Jean-Bernard announced their divorce in December last year after 18 months of marriage",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
163207,"REUTERS North Korea claims to have created a hangover-free alcoholic drink

The rogue state’s newspaper - the Pyongyang Times - says Kim Jong-un’s top scientists have created the “suave” liquor which will spare drinkers from wincing when they awake, despite boasting 30 to 40 per cent alcohol. The ginseng sprit is reportedly made by replacing sugar with “scorched glutinous rice” The paper said the new ‘brandy’ “exudes national flavour” without dampening your national zeal the next morning.

GETTY The Pyongyang Times claims the drink will not give hangovers

Using the headline ""Liquor wins quality medal for preserving national smack”, the paper details how the Taedonggang Foodstuff Factory has been working for years on the drink. It states: ""Koryo Liquor, which is made of six-year-old Kaesong Koryo insam, known as being highest in medicinal effect, and the scorched rice, is highly appreciated by experts and lovers as it is suave and causes no hangover.” It also claims the drink ""has already been registered as a national scientific and technological hit”.

GETTY The ginseng root has the ingredient which gives the liquor its hangover free feel

Andray Abrahamian, who travels to North Korea on business described the liquor as “ok“ but he is ""not that keen on it as a tasty treat”. He said: ”There are some high quality liquors made in North Korea, though in my experience there is no such thing as hangover-free booze anywhere in the world.”

Its not the first time the hermit nation has made bold statements on its own alleged achievements. Last year, it claimed they had produced a cure for Mers, Sars and even Aids. Earlier this month North Korea claimed it had successfully tested the world's first H-Bomb.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
7002,"GETTY Almost half of travellers have a regular routine when they jet off abroad

Nearly half (45 per cent) arrive before the check-in has even opened while a quarter of those polled always have an alcoholic drink, no matter what time of day Half of Brits head to the boarding gate as soon as it is announced while a cool 40 per cent wait for the rush to pass - and a daring one in 20 wait until the final call. And our habits even extend to in-flight snacks, with a third indulging in pretzels which they rarely touch on land. Carolina Martinoli, director of brand and customer experience at British Airways which commissioned the research, said habits are important part of a holiday.

To mark its multi-million pound investment in its World Traveller catering, said: ""Travelling by its very nature requires people to relinquish an element of personal control. ""So we know it helps people to have routines in place to manage that, be that one person being in charge of the passports, getting to the airport early or being ready at the gate as soon as the flight is called. ""These habits are an important part of the holiday ritual and they don't stop at the airport - in-flight habits such as keeping a phone and money in a pocket or choosing what to eat on-board are all part of it too. ""This is why our investment in our long haul catering is proving so popular. It caters to all those needs, from the travellers who want to try new food to those who like to squirrel snacks away for later."" The study of 2,000 Brits, carried out to mark BA's multi-million pound investment in its World Traveller catering, found that 72 per cent of Brits consider themselves 'organised' travellers.

SWNS BA found 72 per cent of Brits reckon they are an organised traveller.

Nearly half (45 per cent) leave plenty of time to check-in for their flight - getting to the airport after the desk has opened, but with time to spare. When it comes to eating and drinking, travellers also have their own habits, with 28 per cent of people seeing flying as an ideal opportunity to indulge. Thirty-five per cent will tuck into meals, snacks and beverages as soon as it is served on board so they have finished everything when the flight attendant comes around to collect the rubbish, while almost half will hold on to at least some of it to have later in the flight. But 36 per cent admit they often consume food and drink in the air that they wouldn't usually have on the ground. More than a third are more likely to eat pretzels while flying and 28 per cent eat more nuts on a plane than they do on the ground. Sweets, chocolate and cheese and biscuits are also among the foods people are more likely to eat in the air.

Philippsburg plane crash: Photos after plane and air ambulance crash mid-air Tue, January 23, 2018 A plane has crashed with an air ambulance helicopter in Philippsburg, Germany, in a mid-air collision which has killed at least four people Play slideshow REUTERS 1 of 6 Accident site near Philippsburg

Researchers also found many travellers follow a set routine when boarding the plane with 52 per cent always going to the toilet beforehand, even if they don't need to. Half of British fliers will head to the gate as soon as it is announced, while 40 per cent will hold back to miss the rush, without leaving it until the last minute. A daring one in 20 admit they won't make a move to the gate until the 'final call' message is flashing up on screens. It also emerged despite overhead lockers being available, 59 per cent of Brits will keep their passports with them during the flight, while 67 per cent will keep hold of their money. Others will also leave their phone, tablet and food and drink in the seat pocket rather than storing it overhead. And while four in ten will look after their own travel documents, 35 per cent of Brits say they are often put in charge of keeping hold the of the passports and tickets for everyone they are travelling with. But the study also found travellers from France are among the least likely to have the same rituals on holiday, with just 29 per cent sticking to the same routine when they go away.

SWNS 24 per cent will sup an alcoholic beverage if it's an appropriate time of day.

German, Swedish and Israel fliers are also less likely to stick with the same habits. By comparison, 69 per cent of Chinese people and 64 per cent of Indians admit they generally so the same thing. However, Brits were found to be the most consistent with their food choices in the air and on the ground, with just 36 per cent saying they often eat snacks and meals in the air which they wouldn't usually have on the ground. But more than seven in 10 people from India admit their diets differ when they are on a plane. Meanwhile, while travellers in Norway are most likely to consider themselves as organised (87 per cent), those from Hong Kong are at the other end of the scale with just 60 per cent believing they are on top of everything when they travel.

SWNS 28 per cent see flying as an opportunity to indulge in food and drink.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
313564,"Dr Darren McKeown said many teenagers have been ""mis-sold"" the idea that such procedures will help them keep their youthful complexions. The Scot said he never carries out unnecessary work but warned that others in the largely unregulated industry will happily accept very young clients. Dr McKeown, who features in a new BBC Scotland documentary this week, said it was not unusual to see women in their 20s at his Glasgow clinic. In the programme, a 23-year-old student called Kay comes in for a consultation about Botox after becoming worried about her ""wrinkles"".

Advertisement

She says: ""I think it is becoming increasingly more and more popular. People are more influenced about what's in the media and they want to look and achieve certain looks and this is one way to do it. ""I have quite a lot of fine lines, wrinkles around my eyes and I have got some a-symmetry to my face that I feel is noticeable."" However, Dr McKeown tells her she will not need any treatment for years to come. Speaking to the Sunday Express yesterday, he said: ""A lot of girls of that range and younger – the youngest I’ve had through the doors was 16 – have been mis-sold this concept that if they have Botox early, they’ll never age and that’s just not true. “I think it does more harm than good when you start intervening too early. “If I don’t think something is necessary I just won’t do it.

“But there is a grey, difficult area somewhere in between where they don’t necessarily need it but equally I don’t want them to go elsewhere where they’ll maybe get something more radical done and then return to me for corrective procedures. “I quite often, unfortunately, see people who come to me after they’ve had bad experiences with things going wrong or rather having not been done very well but it’s just the way it is in this industry because it’s not very well regulated.” The Scottish Government is introducing regulation from April for private clinics which carry out Botox and other ""non-surgical cosmetic interventions"". Dr McKeown, who also has a practice in London’s famous Harley Street, welcomed the move but said it would not weed out all the cowboys. He added: “That will hopefully remove some of the worst excesses of the industry although I don’t believe it will be possible for the regulators to completely clean the industry of lot of the bad practice but at least they can reduce it.” The 34-year-old, from Hamilton, Lanarkshire, had a nose job, a lip implant and fillers as a younger man and now regrets having the work done. He said: “At that young age we are all a little bit insecure and we are not quite sure where we are and what we’re doing and we make decisions that aren’t necessarily founded on a lot of reason. “I am very conscious that it does not look all that natural when you get older and I think if you get things done too early in life you will live to regret it.” Professor Debra Gimlin from the School of Social Science at Aberdeen University has researched attitudes to cosmetic surgery in the USA and Britain. She said: ""Attitudes towards Botox are more relaxed because it is not permanent but I think if the younger generation really knew the pain, bruising and everything else that goes with cosmetic surgery which you rarely hear about they would maybe think about it twice."" *Facelifts and Fillers in on BBC One Scotland on Wednesday at 10.40pm",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
101736,"The 24-year-old hasn't had much of a look in as Spurs have struggled under Mauricio Pochettino this term.

Though Spurs currently find themselves 10th in the Premier League, they are just two points adrift of the top four.

Stambouli's former club Montpellier won trophies on a shoestring budget, and the Frenchman believes Spurs can lift the Premier League one day, as long as the players show more self belief.

""Montpellier were a very small club,” Stambouli told Standard Sport.

“Tottenham are maybe not Manchester City or Chelsea if you see the money, but Montpellier were very small.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
79785,"The Great Barrier Reef is one of the world's most spectacular sights [GETTY IMAGES]

GREAT BARRIER REEF Stretching more than 1,200 miles up the Queensland coast, the awe-inspiring Great Barrier Reef is one of the world's great wonders.



Among the best ways to experience it is donning a mask and fins and delving into the vivid undersea kingdom for a close-up view of dazzling corals, sea turtles, sharks, rays and tropical fish.



You can also explore the reef by sailboat, take a scenic flight, gaze at marine life through a glass-bottomed semi-submersible and linger in a resort (or camp) on a remote coral-fringed island.



THE DAINTREE RAINFOREST Fan palms, ferns and mangroves are just some of the 3,000 or so plant species in the ancient, World Heritage-listed Daintree Rainforest, which is alive with a chorus of birds, insects and frogs. Guided day walks, wildlife-spotting night tours, mountain treks, interpretive boardwalks, canopy walks, four-wheel-drive trips, horse riding, kayaking, croc-spotting cruises and tropical-fruit orchard tours and tastings are among the many ways to experience one of the most extraordinary ecosystems on the planet.

Brisbane is the perfect place to visit if you love your art, music and food [GETTY IMAGES]

BRISBANE Brisbane is an arts-loving city with a packed calendar of food and music festivals, top dance and theatre performances, cutting edge exhibitions (such as at the Queensland Art Gallery) and big-name concerts.



There's great sports events and plenty of ways to enjoy the subtropical climate year-round.



The river city boasts vibrant open-air markets, colourful boutiques and a fantastic cafe scene, while award-winning restaurants and burgeoning nightlife mean you'll never run out of options when the sun goes down.



SUNSHINE COAST The endless summers and surfer chic culture of the Sunshine Coast bewitch all who step on to its sandy shores.



There's a wholesomeness to the Sunny Coast that's as natural and unaffected as its idyllic surf beaches and balmy sea breezes. Early mornings see a steady flow of surfers, joggers, cyclists and walkers making the most of the beach scene and cappuccino culture.



Noosa, the coast's boutique resort town, where barefoot surfers mingle effortlessly with the designer-clad beach elite, is the elegant yet unpretentious star of this sandy crown.

The Whitsunday Islands contain a whole host of activities and mysteries to explore and take part in [GETTY IMAGES]",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
72834,"Episode twelve, titled [censored] to [censored], will see The Grand Tour tent on the edge of Loch Ness, Scotland, once again.

The return is due to an ""amazing"" discovery made by hosts Jeremy Clarkson, 56, Richard Hammond, 47, and James May, 54, since the last show.

Taking a road trip around central Europe while exploring some of the rudest place names the region has to offer, chaos and laughter is bound to ensue.

Richard can be heard saying: ""Jeremy, this car is better than yours,"" before Jeremy replies: ""Well, it just isn't, is it? You're being a… what's the word?,"" before the camera pans to the road sign ""Dick"".",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
131468,"Samsung unveiled its latest and greatest smartphone at major Unpacked events in London and New York last week. With an Infinity display that stretches across the entire front of the phone the new Galaxy S8 is, without doubt, the best looking device the world has ever seen. There's also a powerful new processor tucked inside which is reportedly faster than Apple's iPhone 7 Plus and new cameras should provide a hugely improved photographic experience. The S8 also features wireless charging and, like all of Samsung's flagships, it is water resistant The Galaxy S8 and larger S8+ are both available to pre-order now but before fans get too excited there could be a problem with using this flagship smartphone.

Samsung Galaxy S8 release - Latest smartphone in pictures Wed, March 29, 2017 Play slideshow EXPRESS NEWSPAPERS 1 of 35 Samsung Galaxy S8 release in pictures

Fingerprint scanners aren't anything new but, due to the Galaxy S8 featuring a home button embedded under the display, this important security feature had to moved from the front to the rear of the case. Again, this isn't something we've not seen before as many Android phones have a rear-mounted fingerprint scanner. The problem for Samsung is its placement right next to the camera lens - most phones have it situated underneath the camera. It's thought the Korean tech giant had initially wanted to use a new technology to keep the scanner on the front of the device but had to change their plans after mixed results. A recent report from the Korean Herald stated that ""Samsung poured resources into Synaptics’ fledgling technology last year but the results were frustrating. ""With the production imminent, the company had to decide to relocate the fingerprint scanning home button to the back of the device at the last minute.""

SAMSUNG

And it seems this decision is already causing some problems for the Galaxy S8. With the scanner so close to the camera there could be a tendency to get mucky fingerprints all over the lens. This problem could become even worse for users when Samsung Pay is released in more countries as, like Apple Pay, the system only works via fingerprint recognition. Samsung appears to be aware of the issues this may cause and is alerting users to make sure they keep the camera clean. As users set up the fingerprint authentication, a note will pop up in the camera app explaining that “A clean lens makes for better shots. Clean your camera lens to keep taking better pictures.”

EXPRESS NEWSPAPERS Samsung Galaxy S8 does feature facial recognition

One thing that might rescue the S8 from receiving endless complaints about the rear scanner is its new iris recognition. Samsung introduced this technology on its doomed Galaxy Note 7 smartphone, although its results were mixed. Express.co.uk tested the iris scanner on a number of occasions and found it struggled when wearing glasses and when being used in low light. Samsung now say they've improved the iris technology and introduced facial recognition on the Galaxy S8 so users can select a secure biometric authentication method that works best for them This should mean that the device is able to recognise its owner even in challenging conditions. We will be bringing you a full review soon and will be putting this new security feature through its paces in the coming weeks.

Apple iPhone 8 - Leaked photos, prototypes, concept images, and renders Sun, January 1, 2017 iPhone 8 is shaping up to be one of the most impressive Apple smartphones to date, with glass panels on the front and rear of the device, a curved borderless OLED display and no Home Button Play slideshow INSTAGRAM • APPLEDESIGNER 1 of 54 Apple iPhone 8 will debut a brand-new all-glass look, with a curved OLED display

Samsung might not be the only tech firm moving its fingerptint scanner. It appears Apple could be forced to make the same compromise with its next iPhone. A sketchy new rumour from second-hand sources within Foxconn suggests Apple is looking to relocate the Touch ID fingerprint scanner to the rear of the device. Apple first introduced its fingerprint scanner with the iPhone 5S, with the Touch ID sensor integrated intro the Home Button at the bottom of the display. With the Apple iPhone 8 set to dramatically reduce the size of the bezels around all four edges of the display, this will no longer be possible. There have long been murmurs of Apple embedding the fingerprint sensor beneath the display glass – something this latest rumour disputes.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
363391,"Valdes is a free agent after leaving Barcelona at the end of last season and is currently recovering from knee ligament surgery, which ruled him out of the summer's World Cup.

United have confirmed that the Spain international will complete his rehabilitation under the guidance of their medical staff before training with the first-team squad at Carrington.

If all goes according to plan regarding Valdes' fitness, the three-times Champions League winner could then sign a deal to join United on a permanent basis.

Valdes, who also helped Barcelona win six La Liga titles in a 500-plus game career with the Catalan giants, had been tipped to sign for Liverpool to provide possible competition for Simon Mignolet.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
190932,"Under the rules of engagement that could have been a shoot-down

Mr Kerry said: “We condemn this kind of behavior. It is reckless. It is provocative. It is dangerous. And under the rules of engagement that could have been a shoot-down.”

“People need to understand that this is serious business and the United States is not going to be intimidated on the high seas … We are communicating to the Russians how dangerous this is and our hope is that this will never be repeated.”

A US official said the repeated flights by the Sukhoi SU-24 bombers – which also flew near the USS Donald Cook destroyer a day earlier – were so close they created wake in the water.

The official said it was one of the most aggressive interactions between the former Cold War enemies in recent memory – despite the fact the planes appeared to be unharmed.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
97174,"GETTY Paul Pogba (left) helps Olivier Giroud celebrate his goal

The Juventus midfielder capped off a superb display with a towering header as hosts France thrashed England's conquerors Iceland 5-2 earlier this evening in their Euro 2016 quarter-final clash. Les Bleus will now face Germany, who beat Italy on penalties in their last-eight encounter, in the second semi-final on Thursday. And Pogba, who is being watched by a number of top European clubs this summer, is already excited about the next game.

England head home after Euro 2016 exit Tue, June 28, 2016 The England squad are heading home after being knocked out of Euro 2016 Play slideshow PA 1 of 16 Roy Hodgson and the England squad are heading home from France after being knocked out of Euro 2016

""It was a good match, a great victory, we scored five goals, and we're pleased to be in the semis, against Germany it will be nice game,"" Pogba said. ""I was pretty good out there but wherever the coach picks me I give 100%. ""I'm not going to say we'll score five goals every game but we're really pleased.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
209304,"The Liberal Democrat leader, who has been heavily criticised for his calls to block Brexit, claimed that people should be given a vote on the potential destination of any exit. Speaking on ITV’s The Agenda, Mr Farron told his fellow panellists he would not vote to trigger Article 50 of the Lisbon Treaty – which begins the UK's formal exit from the EU. His comments caused an angry reaction from viewers who branded the Lib Dem a “traitor” and questioned his legitimacy to be involved in the discussion. Mr Farron said: ""I am not sure anybody is very clear where we are going on Brexit.

ITV Tim Farron continued his calls to block Brexit against the will of the British people

I will not vote for Article 50, because that is to impose a stitch up on the British people Tim Farron

“There is no doubt that the majority voted to leave on June 23 – so that’s the direction the Government has a mandate to proceed on. “My sense though is while the electorate were asked to vote for departure, they were not asked for destination. “And, there are so many – there are 50 ways to leave your lover, says Paul Simon and there are least that many ways to leave the European Union, and which one did you vote for?” The Lib Dem leader added: “My sense is if the British people are not offered a referendum on the terms of the deal; I will not vote for Article 50, because that is to impose a stitch-up on the British people.

ITV The leader of the Liberal Democrats came under attack on social media for his comments

“They voted for departure, they did not vote for destination.” The MP for Westmorland and Lonsdale said Theresa May would be “jumping out of a plane without a parachute” if she was to begin the formal process of leaving the bloc, before confirming if you can legally ensure the clause can be reversed once triggered. In yet another rant against the will of the British people, he claimed there was no mandate for a ‘hard’ Brexit and argued Leave voters would have been against a “hard Remain” if the opposite result was reached. The Lib Dem said: “The narrowness of the result means that there isn’t a mandate for – what we seem to call now – ‘hard’ Brexit.

“If it had been the other way around – 52-48 for Remain – we would not now be having a ‘hard’ Remain where we sign up for the euro and we’re all speaking Esperanto.” Mr Farron’s comments triggered an angry response from social media users who rebuked his claims and questioned his credentials for even being able to make the argument. One Twitter user posted: “Tim Farron just shows the lack of talent in the Lib Dems if this is the best they have.” Another wrote: “Can someone tell me why this first form, out of depth schoolboy continues to get the oxygen of media coverage?”

Brexit aftershocks: Who's next to leave the EU? Wed, September 14, 2016 Britain has voted to leave the EU. So who's next? We look at which European countries want to hold their own EU referendum. Play slideshow Express 1 of 10 Frexit, Nexit or Auxit? Who will be next to leave the EU

Others claimed they used their Leave vote precisely to demand a ‘hard’ exit from the Union. One Brexiteer wrote: “No mandate for soft Brexit. “I voted for full control of immigration, sovereignty and laws. Out of the EU!” Another user posted: “Article 50 is a smokescreen of delay, ‘hard’ Brexit is the only way to save the UK from destruction – Farron is a traitor.” Mr Farron’s negativity towards Brexit has also attracted heavy criticism from eurosceptic politicians, with Ukip’s Peter Whittle launching an open attack on the Lib Dem leader.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
298583,"The Sin City beauty was raised a Catholic but converted to Evangelicalism, where she quickly realised she didn't agree with the Church's firm stance on homosexuality and premarital sex.

In a new interview with The Daily Beast, Alba recalls upsetting her friends and leaders in the Christian youth group she was involved in as a teenager.

She reveals, ""It was very twisted. I fell in love when I was 16 and had this major crush on... I guess he was a drag queen. He was bisexual and a ballerina, and this was while I was at the Atlantic Theater Company in Vermont.

""We used to go to this gay club and I'd dance with him all night, four nights a week. I was so in love with him and thought, 'There's no way this guy's going to hell,' because in my church, it was, 'Anybody who's gay is going to hell' and 'Premarital sex is evil', and I thought, 'There's no chance! This guy is amazing!' So that went right out the window.""

Alba has previously stated that her experience in both churches led her to abandon organised religion all together in favour of a more spiritual experience.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
303408,"Villa boss Paul Lambert will the happier of the two managers having arrested a slide of consecutive defeats that had threatened to plunge his side into the relegation scrap. But the stalemate leaves Cardiff rooted in the top flight drop zone and in danger of losing further ground when Sunderland and Crystal Palace play on Wednesday’s night. Cardiff’s failure to beat a Villa side bereft of confidence will raise further questions of Vincent Tan’s decision to replace Malky Mackay with the unproven Ole Gunnar Solskjaer, who could have been in the opposing dugout last night having almost joined the Midlands club two years ago. Solskjaer met with Villa owner Randy Lerner when Alex McLeish was sacked but the Norwegian didn’t feel it was the right time to leave Molde. He pulled out of talks and Villa subsequently appointed Paul Lambert having coaxed him to leave Norwich. Solskjaer hadn’t taken much persuading when Tan made an approach last month but there are plenty of people who are yet to be convinced about his ability to keep Cardiff up. Their win at home to Norwich on February 1 remains Solskjaer’s solitary league victory since taking charge of the Welsh club. Cardiff were without Craig Bellamy after he started a three-match having accepted an FA charge of violent conduct following a clash with Jonathan de Guzman in the south Wales derby. Bellamy will miss Saturday’s FA Cup tie with Wigan and the Bluebirds’ league clash at home to Hull City the following week. Craig Noone replaced the Welshman in Solskjaer’s starting 11 having missed the defeat at Swansea with a hamstring problem and he was Cardiff’s best player early on. After a poor start from both sides the game jolted into life after 14 minutes when Cardiff hit the woodwork twice in 30 seconds. First Brad Guzan tipped Fraizer Campbell’s shot on to the post after an excellent ball from Wilfried Zaha. Then after collecting the loose ball Noone beat two players and hit a fierce drive that looped up off Ashley Westwood and onto the crossbar, with Guzan well-beaten.

The home side were buoyed by the near-misses and thought they should have had a penalty five minutes later when Nathan Baker appeared to pull down Kenwyne Jones but referee Chris Foy wasn’t interested.



Villa almost gifted Cardiff an opener on the half hour mark when Ron Vlaar sliced Jordon Mutch’s header back towards his own goal but the defender recovered to clear the danger after Campbell had beaten Guzan to the bouncing ball. From the resulting corner Jones rose well but his header was high and wide.



Lambert started with Gabriel Agbonlahor and Christian Benteke up front but the duo barely saw the ball in the first half as Villa struggled to string more than a handful of passes together.



The visitors looked woefully short of confidence after successive Premier League defeats to West Ham and Everton and failed to launch any serious threat on David Marshall’s goal.



When Marc Albrighton did find Benteke on the counter-attack right on the stroke of half-time his header was blocked by Ben Turner.



Villa rallied briefly after the break but once again they were failing to turn decent positions into clear chances.



Cardiff almost snatched a goal at the other end when Campbell appeared to control a long ball with his hand, the officials missed it, but the striker could only drag his shot wide of the post having beaten Vlaar.



The home side were almost made to pay for the miss shortly after when Villa right back Leandro Bacuna surged forward from his own half, played a one-two with Agbonlahor, but after powering into the box he pulled his effort wide of the post.



Bacuna turned provider moments later when he found Benteke with an excellent ball in behind the Cardiff back four but his shot was blocked by the excellent Turner.



It was the visitors who looked the most likely to score towards the end and they almost left the Cardiff City Stadium with all three points.



Once again it was David Marshall who was the hero for Cardiff, brilliantly turning a Delph shot around the post after a wicked deflection of the boot of Steven Caulker.



Marshall ended the night with another stunning save from Weimann to take his season tally passed 100, making him officially the busiest keeper in the top flight, and Cardiff fans can only wonder what sort of position they would be in without him.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
7759,"Bitter winds threaten to scour the country through December and into the New Year as the nation hunkers down for a full-throttle Arctic blast. The Government has this morning issued the first health warning of the season ahead of bitter cold weather setting in over the next 48 hours. Temperatures across Britain are forecast to nosedive bringing lows of -6C (21.2F) to the north and freezing or below elsewhere. Icy winds will make it feel close to -9C (15.8F) in parts towards the end of next week with even London, Kent and the southwest touching -4C (24.8F).

EXPRESS Forecasters have issued ice and snow warning as temperatures drop

WXCHARTS Bitter winds threaten to scour the UK through December

During the last part of November we expect widespread heavy snow with thunder at times and bitter winds Piers Corbyn - forecaster for WeatherAction

Latest weather models show a rapidly growing risk of heavy snow across Scotland, Wales, the east coast and parts of central England. There is even a chance of wintry showers as far south as London, Kent and the West Country before the end of this month. The cold snap is expected to hold out through the start of winter - which officially starts next Friday - with some forecasters warning to wrap up into January. Long range forecasters have re-sounded warnings to prepare for heavy snow, bitter winds and sub-zero temperatures possibly until spring.

GETTY Forecasters said they expect heavy snowfall

Stormy conditions in Scotland and the north will whip up gale-force blizzards and thunder snow while the south is also facing an imminent winter whiteout. A combination of ""wild"" jet-stream activity and a shift in cold air over the Arctic - a so-called displaced Polar vortex - are thought to be the main drivers. A La Nina cooling of the eastern Pacific which has been linked to colder than average winters in the UK will add to the mix. Piers Corbyn, forecaster for WeatherAction, said: ""During the last part of November we expect widespread heavy snow with thunder at times and bitter winds.

""Strong northerly gales will contribute to bringing blizzard conditions with snow possible across much of the country. ""The jet stream is making wild north to south swings and we are also seeing a displacement of the Polar vortex which will allow cold winds in from the Arctic."" The Met Office with Public Health England (PHE) has today issued the first cold weather health alert of the season. The Level-2 'Alert and readiness' warning states there is a ""70 per cent chance of severe cold weather/icy conditions"" this weekend.

WXCHARTS Snow will hit large parts of the country towards the end of November

Paul Gundersen, chief operational meteorologist at the Met Office, said: ""Colder air has now reached most parts of England, with temperatures expected to fall further by Saturday, when the cold will accentuated by strengthening winds. ""Wintry showers are also likely in places, but any snow showers are expected to be confined largely to higher ground. ""A temporary incursion of warmer air is expected on Monday, with the colder air forecast to return by Tuesday."" Dr Thomas Waite, of the extreme events team at PHE, added: ""Those most at-risk include older people, very young children and those with conditions like heart and lung disease.

UK weather 2017: Autumnal beauty across Britain Mon, December 18, 2017 Stunning photographs show the beauty of Britain during the Autumn months Play slideshow Nick Lucas / SWNS.com 1 of 34 Sunrise on a cold frosty morning at Acres Down, near Lyndhurst in The New Forest. December 18 2017

""That's why every cold season we urge people to look out for family, friends and neighbours who may be at risk."" Extreme winter weather is forecast into the start of December with heavy snow and stormy conditions likely further south, he added. He said ""Into the first week of December we are warning for widespread snow and blizzards especially in Scotland and the north. ""It will remain cold and we could se severe gales in northern regions.

GETTY STOCK Experts warn about icy conditions

""Sleet or snow is likely to fall further south, even reaching southwest England and the southeast."" Forecasters think cold weather will hold out through December and January as Britain wraps up for the coldest winter since 2010. Britons hoping for a sprinkling of the white stuff over the festive period may be in luck with a White Christmas becoming increasingly likely. Subtle changes in air pressure over the North Pole will affect the weather this winter, according to long-range forecasters.

WXCHARTS Forecasters said low solar activity points towards a harsh winter

The Arctic Oscillation (AO), which describes the relationship between the Arctic and regions to the south has shifted into a strongly negative phase. Otherwise known as a 'cold phase' this pattern weakens westerly winds and allows colder Arctic air to sink southwards towards Britain. James Madden, forecaster for Exacta Weather, said this with the onset of La Nina and low solar activity points towards a brutally harsh winter. He said: ""La Nina is likely to have some effect on conditions this winter including its impact on the Arctic Oscillation (AO). ""We are looking at some periods of exceptionally cold weather particularly from January with snow also likely to factor.

Snow in UK as winter weather hits Britain Tue, January 16, 2018 Snow has blanketed swathes of Britain Play slideshow PA 1 of 68 A gritter has slid off the road near Trefnant in Denbighshire, Wales",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
110811,"Chelsea star Costa could leave the club for China, with an £80million transfer fee supposedly on the table. The Blues have cash to spend after already selling midfielder Oscar to the Chinese Super League for £60m.

Chelsea fans react to Diego Costa and Antonio Conte's reported bust-up Fri, January 13, 2017 Diego Costa has reportedly been dropped for Chelsea's clash with Leicester after a bust-up with manager Antonio Conte Play slideshow Getty Images 1 of 10 Chelsea fans react to Diego Costa and Antonio Conte's reported bust-up

They will always have a Plan B and a Plan C Mark Schwarzer

And Schwarzer insists manager Antonio Conte will have a replacement striker ready to sign if Costa does quit the club. “I don’t think it’s unrealistic (that Costa will leave) at all,” Schwarzer told MOTD2. “All these clubs have enormous scouting networks.

GETTY Chelsea striker Diego Costa missed yesterday's game at Leicester

GETTY Costa (left) joined Mark Schwarzer at Chelsea after leaving Atletico Madrid",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
81678,"Kirstie Allsopp is opening up her Devon mansion as a holiday home[WENN]

The 42-year-old TV star has decided to rent out her Devon mansion as a holiday home - and is charging £3,500 a week for the property which sleeps up to 14 people. The stunning home - which featured in the show 'Kirstie's Homemade Home' when it was transformed into her dream property - was purchased by the brunette back in 2008 for £300,000. Kirstie spent £150,000 renovating the property after it lay empty for 39 years, and used reclaimed and recycled furniture when decorating the house, including in the living room.

The TV star's mansion can be rented out for £3,500 per week [Classic Cottages]

The stunning property sleeps up to 14 people [Classic Cottages]

According to firm Classic Cottages - who Kirstie is letting the house through - they already have had reservations for the home two years in advance. So holidaymakers not looking to stray too far from home can head to the six-bedroom property for a week of relaxation and enjoy the stunning landscape that the surrounding area has to offer. The house is situated in Welcombe’s rugged landscape and is just a short walk from the National Trust beach of Welcombe Mouth, with a pub just a mile away.

The mansion was bought by Kirstie for £300,000 in 2008 [Classic Cottages]

An open plan kitchen and dining room makes it perfect for family's to cook in [Classic Cottages]

As well as a beautiful open plan kitchen and dining room, the property also boasts a gaming room with a ping pong table, cosy bedrooms and a children's room too. According to the Mail Online, Mary Harlow - who is the operations manager for Classic Cottages - said the company have had the home on their books for five years, taking it on shortly after Kirstie bought it. She said there has been ""good but static"" interest from renters throughout that period, with some preliminary reservations coming in as far as two years in advance. ""I think obviously the fact that it’s [Miss Allsopp’s] has some attraction but it’s also a big family home and right by the beach, so perfect for a family holiday,"" she added.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
234138,"Google's Boston Dynamics' Atlas robot has been upgraded so it is able to keep itself upright as it travels over stones and rocks. After each step the robot takes it moves its foot around in another foothold, checking its weight to see if it is a safe space to balance on. The robot is so advanced it can stand up after falling over, run, balance on a narrow beam, clean, karate kick and throw a paper airplane.

YOUTUBE /the robot can balance on uneven ground and work out where to place its foot next

According to Boston Dynamics, the robot can ""walk bipedally leaving the upper limbs free to lift, carry, and manipulate the environment."" ""In extremely challenging terrain, Atlas is strong and coordinated enough to climb using hands and feet, to pick its way through congested spaces."" The breakthrough comes as Stephen Hawking warned artificial intelligence could spell the end of civilisation.

GETTY The dvelopment came as Stephen Hawking warned humans could be replaced by robots

Artificial intelligence is now progressing rapidly Stephen Hawking

He said: ""I believe there is no deep difference between what can be achieved by a biological brain and what can be achieved by a computer. ""It therefore follows that computers can, in theory, emulate human intelligence – and exceed it. ""Artificial intelligence is now progressing rapidly.

GETTY Vladimir Putin has also sanctioned robots to colonise the moon

""Recent landmarks such as self-driving cars, or a computer winning at the game of Go, are signs of what is to come. ""Enormous levels of investment are pouring into this technology. The achievements we have seen so far will surely pale against what the coming decades will bring.”

GETTY Stephen Hawking said robots that can do human tasks could be dangerous

Think you know Mr Robot? Thu, July 14, 2016 Highly rated American thriller series Mr Robot, is full of surprises. Here are 10 more interesting facts about the show Play slideshow HBO 1 of 11 Think you know Mr Robot? look through our gallery to find out fun facts about the hit tv show",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
117122,"Arsenal have rejected several bids from Manchester City and now face losing Alexis Sanchez on a free transfer next summer.

It was understood a conditional agreement was reached for Sanchez to move to the Etihad Stadium but was dependent on Arsenal securing a replacement.

The fee was said to be £55million, plus £5m add-ons, for the Chilean international, but the deal fell through when Gunners target Monaco youngster Thomas Lemar decided against a move to the Emirates.

However, Simon Jordan, the former owner of Crystal Palace, suggested Arsenal will lose their player but he will not cause a rift in the club while he is still a player.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
78177,"These Mother's Day desserts are the perfect way to treat your mum [PH ]

When it comes to food few things beat mum's cooking. A bite of her homemade Victoria sponge may evoke hundreds of childhood memories so why not treat her to some of your culinary prowess on March 30? To celebrate Mothering Sunday, Poppy Smadja, from one of London’s finest patisseries, Poppy & Sebastian, has teamed up with Baileys to create three indulgent and distinctive desserts, each uniquely infused with the creamy liqueur. The sumptuous sweets - coconut cream, creme brulee and peanut butter choux buns - are ideal for a post-lunch treat or an indulgent afternoon tea.

COCONUT BAILEYS CREAM

These indulgent domes are infused with the creamy liqueur and have a refreshing raspberry centre [PH]

A dome of indulgent coconut cream infused with Baileys with a raspberry puree centre Serves: 6-8 Coconut cream: 200ml semi-skimmed milk 50g dessicated coconut 200ml whipping cream 2 medium egg yolks (70g) 60g caster sugar 35ml Baileys Original Irish Cream (0.9 units) 6g gelatine leaves Raspberry puree: 200g Raspberries 35g Caster Sugar Decoration: Apricot jam for glazing Coconut flakes Edible Flowers such as pansy (optional) or raspberries Utensils: Greaseproof paper Ice cube trays (or silicone moulds) 7cm semi-sphere silicone moulds (or muffin moulds) Method 1. To make the puree place raspberries and sugar into a bowl and blend with a hand blender or mash with a fork. Spoon puree into flexible ice cube trays or silicone moulds and freeze for about an hour. 2. Meanwhile make the Baileys and coconut cream, pour the milk and Baileys into a pan and bring to the boil. 3. Separate yolks from eggs and whisk yolks and sugar until thoroughly combined. When milk comes to the boil pour a third over the egg yolks. Whisk and pour the egg yolk mix back into the cream. 4. Stir until mix thickens nicely and pour into a bowl. 5. Separate the gelatine leaves and place one by one into a bowl of cold water and allow them to bloom for five minutes. Take them out of the water and squeeze out all the excess water. Stir into the warm custard and put in the fridge for about an hour stirring every fifteen minutes until mixture cools to below body temperature. 6. Whisk the whipping cream into soft whip consistency and fold into the custard. Pipe this into 7cm semi-sphere silicone moulds or muffin moulds. 7. Take the raspberry inserts out of the freezer. Unmould and insert right into the centre of the Baileys and coconut creams. 8. Place the moulds on a tray and freeze for a couple of hours. To assemble 1. Remove the frozen creams from the freezer and take them out of their moulds. Brush with a little apricot jam and cover with flaked coconut. 2. Decorate with a raspberry or an edible flower.

BAILEYS CREME BRULEE DESSERT

A delicious vanilla cream infused with Baileys with caramel top [PH ]

A delicious vanilla cream infused with Baileys on a crisp, sweet shortcrust pastry base with caramel top Serves: 8 Sweet pastry: 250g plain flour 75g unsalted butter, diced 50g icing sugar 25g whole eggs 25g almond powder ½ tsp salt Vanilla cream: 325g double cream 2 medium egg yolks (85g) 50g caster sugar 10g Baileys Original Irish Cream (0.9 units) 1 leaf gelatine 1 vanilla Pod Caramel: 500g caster sugar Utensils: Tart moulds (or mini-muffin moulds) Piping bag (or as an alternative you can use greaseproof paper) Silicone moulds (optional for caramel) Blow torch (optional for caramel) Clingfilm Method Sweet pastry: 1. To make the sweet pastry, rub flour, butter and salt together until you have breadcrumbs and there are no lumps of butter left. 2. Stir in the icing sugar and the almond flour. 3. Stir in the eggs until it comes into a ball (this can also be done in a mixer with a paddle attachment on a low speed). 4. Flatten out in to a square (3cm thick), wrap in cling film and leave to rest in the fridge for at least an hour but preferably 12 hours. Roll out the pastry to 2mm thickness and cut into circle a few millimetres wider than your tart moulds – ideally 4cm. 5. Line the tart moulds making sure all the corners of the pastry are pushed into the bottom edges of the tart mould. Cut the excess off the top with a little knife and chill for 20 minutes. 6. Bake at 180 degrees for 15 minutes (no need to use baking beans in mini-moulds). Vanilla cream: 1. Place cream in a heavy bottom saucepan and scrape in the seeds of the vanilla pod. Gently bring the cream to boil. 2. Whisk the egg yolks in a separate bowl then whisk in the sugar until completely combined. 3. As soon as the cream reaches the boil, pour half over the egg yolks, whisk and return the mixture back into the pan. Bring the heat right down and stir until the mixture thickens. Pour in the Baileys and stir. 4. Place the gelatine leaves into a bowl of cold water to bloom for five minutes, remove and strain out all the water and stir into the warm custard. Pass through a sieve then allow it to cool down a little. 5. Pour the cream into the baked tart shells and place in the freezer until the cream sets. Caramel: 1. You can sprinkle sugar over the tarts and blowtorch to make a traditional crème brulee. 2. Or, place sugar into a frying pan, allow the sugar to melt as you jiggle the pan around (do not stir) guiding the caramel evenly around the pan. When amber (do not let it brown too much as it will taste bitter) pour over greaseproof paper until you have a very thin coating of caramel. Allow to set and break shards over the tart, decorating in your own fashion. 3. The third option, is to make the caramel as above but pour the hot caramel into semi-sphere silicone moulds the same width as the tart mould. 4. Fill the cavities with caramel right to the top. Use marigold gloves and be very careful – hot caramel burns are not pleasant. Lift the mould over the saucepan and very quickly turn upside down emptying the mould of all the excess caramel. 5. You should be left with a very thin coating of caramel on each mould. Leave to set then remove the caramel half-domes and place the semi sphere (dome facing upwards) on to the custard tarts.

BAILEYS AND PEANUT BUTTER CHOUX BUN

A sweet, fluffy choux bun with a Baileys and peanut butter cream centre [PH ]",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
52360,"WNS The large creature's 11ft long carcass was discovered by a couple walking their dog

The large creature's 11ft long carcass was discovered by a couple walking their dog - but no one has been able to identify what it once was. Melanie Rees, 41, said she and husband Mike, 47, were used to seeing jellyfish and other small creatures washed up on the sands at Morfa Beach, Port Talbot - but never anything this big. Mrs Rees said: ""I couldn't believe how big it was.

""At first I thought it was a piece of driftwood or a big log as it was so far off the beach.

I couldn't believe how big it was Mrs Rees

""But when we got closer, I could see thousands of flies and I knew it had been an animal. ""I couldn't believe how big it was. I think it could be a whale, but I'm not sure. I don't think a whale would wash up that far.""

WNS

WNS

WNS Mrs Rees said no one has been able to identify what it once was

Scariest washed up sea monsters Mon, September 25, 2017 Unknown washed up sea monsters that haven't been identified prove the ocean is a terrifying place Play slideshow @preetalina/Twitter 1 of 29 This creature washed up on the shores of a Texas beach",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
56036,"The revelation comes as a slapdown to Remainer claims the City of London will not survive once Britain breaks from the European Union.

And the amount of businesses floated is 51 per cent higher than in 2016 and more than anywhere else in Europe.

This morning, in the 99th and 100th initial public offerings (IPOs) of the year, Israeli miner Shefa Yamim and Belfast drug-maker Fusion Antibodies were admitted to the exchange.

In total, companies raised more than £14.8billion by listing on the exchange in the past 12 months - almost four times higher than the closest European rival and the second-highest in the world after New York.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
131167,"Lisa Bratt, who had unexplained headaches for years, pictured on her wedding day [SWNS]

Fitness instructor Lisa Bratt, 40, collapsed in agony with bleeding on the brain and a stroke following years of unexplained headaches.

She was rushed to hospital but tests revealed her brain was unresponsive.

Her husband Paul, 38, then discovered she had a donor card and made the heartbreaking decision to let doctors remove her organs.

Part of Lisa’s liver was donated to a sick three-year-old boy, allowing him to go home for Christmas, and her heart saved a 40-year-old woman. Her lungs, kidneys and the other half of her liver went to four more people.

Paul, of Hartlepool, recalled: “When I got there I knew she had already gone. Doctors warned me that even if she had come through, she wouldn’t have remembered her life.

“She was so fit – she had just qual­ified as a fitness instructor. Doctors think she had the condition there for years, lying dormant, waiting.

“I never left her bedside, it was horrible. But I’m extremely proud that Lisa was able to save others.

“When we found she had helped that little boy go home for Christmas it was overwhelming – I’m tearing up just thinking about it.”

Lisa was kept clinically alive while doctors took her organs before pronouncing her dead.

Paul, an off-shore platform inspector, then had to break the news to their children, Natasha, 21, Michael, 10, and Joshua, nine.

He added: “Lisa was the best mum and the best wife. She was kind, loving, happy-go-lucky.

“She will be looking down on us, knowing she has helped all those people. That was Lisa – she’d do anything for anyone.”",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
337325,"Temperatures are set to soar to 28C in Britain

The UK will be HOTTER than Bondi Beach with a five-day heatwave starting on Monday - smashing the record for the hottest day of the year. Forecasters predict temperatures to reach 23C before they soar to 28C - bringing revellers the country's hottest ever early super-summer. Sun-starved Britons are expected to flock to the beaches over May bank holidays and festival goers will bask in the glorious sunshine over Glastonbury from June 24 to 28 and other major events including Wimbledon from June 29 to July 12 and the FA Cup final on May 30. The Met Office said Wednesday is shaping up to be the hottest day of the year so far beating the 71.4F (21.9C) recorded in London on Friday. Roasting air sweeping in from the Mediterranean on Tuesday will lift temperatures higher than Mallorca, the Costa Del Sol and even rivalling Bondi Beach, in Sydney, Australia (24C).

GETTY A woman tucks into an ice cream

Advertisement

It comes after unseasonable warmth at the end of last week brought the hottest day for almost six months. Forecaster Craig Snell said swathes of the country can forward to around 12 hours of unbroken sunshine on Wednesday. He said: ""It is looking similar to last week as high pressure builds again bringing warm air in from the Continent. ""We will see some good spells of sunshine making it dry and warm and with air from France and the and the Mediterranean meaning it will also be much clearer than the end of last week. ""Wednesday is likely to be the hottest day of the year so far with highs of 24C (75F) in the south, above average for the time of year."" Temperatures double the average maximum (11C) this early in the month mean Britain could yet see the hottest April day in almost 70 years.

GETTY Britons are expected to flock to parks and beaches to enjoy the glorious sunshine

With more than a fortnight until the end of the month the mercury could top the 29.4C (84.94F) recorded in Camden, London, on April 16, 1949. James Madden, forecaster for Exacta Weather, said this week could be a taste of things to come in the run up to summer. He said: ""The latter part of this month and into May is likely to see some much drier and even warmer conditions developing for many parts. ""This could see temperatures ranging in the mid 20s as these conditions become more widespread, in particular, in parts of the south. ""This could result in our first proper taste of summer and widespread warm to hot temperatures."" Glorious sunshine and blue skies today brought day trippers out in their droves to Britain's parks and beaches. The south saw the best of the weekend weather with rain bringing a more miserable feel elsewhere at times.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
16066,"GETTY What you eat can play a huge role as you tackle the menopause

When researching other cultures, scientists have found that the menopause is not experienced in the same way by women all over the world. In Japan for example women have one-sixth of the rate of breast cancer that we have in the West and the reason is their diet. Studies in the US have shown that when Japanese women adopt a Western diet they develop a breast cancer rate similar to ours. So it is not a genetic factor particular to Japanese women but something in their diet that distinguishes them. By maintaining a healthy diet of phytoestrogen-rich foods we can mirror what women in India and Japan have been doing for centuries and like them, enjoy strong bones, healthy hearts and minimal menopausal symptoms. Phytoestrogens are naturally occurring substances in food that have a hormonebalancing effect. Almost all fruit, vegetables and cereals contain phytoestrogens in varying strengths and compositions but it is the isoflavones that are the most beneficial kind. An average Japanese woman's daily intake of isoflavones is between 20-80mg, women from the Indian subcontinent about 45mg, while American and British women generally consume between 1-3mg per day. As a guideline you should try to include 45mg of isoflavones per day in your diet. A typical serving of tofu (55g) or soya milk (600ml) will contain approximately 35-40mg of isoflavones so you do not need a lot to achieve a good daily amount. Here are some of the foods you need to start including in your diet both before and during the menopause in order to reap the benefits.

A small portion of fish can supply us with almost half of our protein requirements for the day as well as providing good levels of B12 and iodine, which are essential for healthy functioning of the thyroid and metabolism

SOYA Soya beans are especially rich in phytoestrogens. They contain more protein than cow's milk without the saturated fat or cholesterol and are the only food considered to be a complete protein because they contain all eight amino acids. Soya is also high in essential fatty acids and soya milk is naturally free from cholesterol. Yet beans take hours to cook so the next best forms of soya are soya milk, tofu, soya flour, soy sauce and miso. Avoid soya that says ""isolate"" on the label as it has been refined and not made from the whole beans. LINSEED These are highly beneficial because they contain not only omega-6 oils but also decent quantities of omega-3 oils. Linseeds are rich in phytoestrogens but while soya contains isoflavones, linseeds contain lignans which are a different type. Lignans carry the same benefits as isoflavones but are also antiviral, antifungal and antibacterial. A regular intake has been associated with lower incidence of cancer of the breast, ovaries, uterus, prostate and colon. One tablespoon of linseeds is estimated to be the equivalent of one portion of soya. They are small so it is easy to mix them with other foods.

Stir into yogurt or drizzle linseed oil over salads, roasted vegetables or jacket potatoes. OILY FISH This includes mackerel, tuna, sardines, herrings and salmon. A small portion of salmon (115g) can contain up to 3,600mg of omega-3 fatty acids, while a piece of cod of the same size will contain only 300mg. A small portion of fish can supply us with almost half of our protein requirements for the day as well as providing good levels of B12 and iodine, which are essential for healthy functioning of the thyroid and metabolism. Omega-3 fish oils have a positive effect on stiff, aching joints which are a common problem during menopause. There is a tendency for women to gain weight during the menopause because of changes in metabolism. Omega-3 oils can increase metabolic rate which means you burn more calories and store less fat. GRAPES To get a good supply of disease-fighting antioxidants you should eat a wide variety of fruits and vegetables, preferably organic. Try to avoid peeling them as the skin contains valuable nutrients. Grapes are especially beneficial.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
142409,"The 25-year-old was targeted by burglars less than a week before her former X Factor co-star Simon Cowell's mansion was also hit while he slept.

A chilling phone call was played back during a court hearing today, with it being revealed that Rita and her sister, Elena, were both asleep upstairs when two men broke into the house.

During the 999 call, Rita told the operator: ""Oh my God I don't have a knife, I know they're going to come upstairs.""

According to BBC News, Harrow Crown Court heard that Elena woke up at 5.50am to find a man rifling through her bedroom, before she ran up the stairs and had her sister call the police.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
157840,"The dashing ex-soldier Ross Poldark (played by Turner) and his stunning head-strong wife Demelza (Eleanor Tomlinson) are due to add another child to their brood this season, revealed by the red-head’s new pregnancy in last season’s finale.

In a rare break from filming the popular BBC show, Luke Norris (Dwight Enys) can be seen jiggling the precious infant, before he carefully passes them over to his friend.

Aidan - dressed in his dapper 18th century costume - then appears to be enjoying a moment of bonding with the child as he presses his face against theirs while relaxing in the southern sunshine.

At one point, the 34-year-old star leans over and plants a loving kiss on top of the baby’s head, who is all bundled up in a cream blanket for the changeable coastal weather.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
59266,"Lennon feels the days of big spending in Scottish football are over [GETTY]

Lennon reckons the likes of Rangers and Aberdeen will choose a cannier approach to the massive task of trying to catch Celtic.

Reacting to claims from former Rangers director and would-be-investor King that the massive cash sum was needed to challenge the Hoops, Lennon suggested spending fortunes to bridge the gap is not in the minds of rival club owners – especially at Ibrox just two years after liquidation.

I think the owners of clubs are far too astute for spending big money

Lennon said: “£50m is a lot of money and I’m not convinced that the owners would want to go down that road again too quickly. I think the owners of clubs are far too astute for spending big money and trying to chase it.

“I think they will build brick by brick over maybe the course of two, three, four seasons and really try to close the gap.

“We haven’t spent an amazing amount of money over the last couple of years so we have some stock in the bank if we need it.

“But no, I can’t imagine clubs like Aberdeen or Rangers at this stage, will start throwing millions of pounds at it to chase it.”

Lennon has admitted that the edge has gone in the top flight without Rangers challenging Celtic for the title.

He has also made it clear that while Rangers’ return to the top flight could be sealed by this time next season, it’s not just the Ibrox club who will benefit.

With his side on the verge of a third successive league title as they head to Partick tonight, Lennon added: “Going into the future, for the next four of five years, I think we will look very strong.

“There’s no question that when Rangers come back that will certainly boost their coffers but it will also boost our coffers as well.”

Lennon is already looking at transfer targets for next season and it’s understood the Hoops are tracking Sochaux striker Cedric Bakambu.

The 22-year-old has netted eight times this season and is tipped to make an international breakthrough with France in the near future.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
159437,"The weekend got off to a nightmare start for thousands of motorists after a vehicle burst into flames at around 5pm.

Images on social media show the vehicle well alight on the side of the road on the northbound carriageway between Junctions 19 and 20.

Other drivers have taken to social media to vent their frustration, with images showing long queues of stationary traffic.

One wrote: ""For the love of whatever god people pray too can someone sort the #m6 out. This isn’t a motorway it’s a constant car park.""

Traffic was briefly stopped in both directions after a man was spotted on the wrong side of a bridge railing but it appears as though the southbound carriageway is now moving.

Nine mile long queues have been reported on the northboud carriageway stretching between Junction 18 to Junction 20, according to Manchester Evening News.

The fire compounded what was already a miserable afternoon for M6 motorists, after a collision in the roadworks between junction 18 and 19 on the northbound carriageway closed two lanes earlier in the day.

North West Motorway Police said the motorway should be fully re-opened by 10.30pm.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
194134,"EPA The bird was captured by villagers in Lebanon

The griffon vulture flew over the Lebanese border from an Israeli game reserve where it had been released in a bid to introduce more raptors into the wild. But residents of the Lebanese village Bint Jbeil caught the bird, which has a vast wing span of 1.9m (6ft 5in), after growing suspicious of an alleged tracking device that had been attached to its tail. The device was actually a GPS transmitter which Tel Aviv university had been using to keep an eye on the raptor’s location.

GETTY The raptor is believed to have suffered minor injuries

GETTY Tel Aviv university tracked the bird as part of an effort to repopulate the area with raptors

The bird was later set free after it became clear that it was part of a repopulation programme and not serving as an Israeli spy. It is believed to be in a weak condition after the ordeal and is being treated for minor injuries after its capture. Israeli officials said: “In a discreet operation with the Lebanese and with the great help of UN forces and the UN liaison unit, the Israel Nature and Parks Authority was able to return the vulture that was caught a few days ago”.

GETTY This is not the first bird to have been suspected of spying for Israel",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
41897,"Samuel Eto'o has been linked with a move to Chelsea

Earlier today Anzhi released a statement saying they wouldd be changing the way they were doing business as they looked to cut their budget by almost £50m a year.



And according to reports in Spain, that has alerted Chelsea to the availability of Samuel Eto'o and Willian.



According to Mundo Deportivo, Jose Mourinho will move for Eto'o after managing the player during his time at Inter Milan.

Samuel Eto'o would be an expensive new addition at Chelsea

Chelsea could also move for Willian

We failed to clinch rapid success. Now Anzhi will develop its academy according to the medium-term plans of club development Anzhi's president Konstantin Remchukov

Chelsea were also hotly linked with Willian when he made the move from Shaktar Donetsk to Anzhi in January for £30m, and it looks like they may revisit their interest in the player with the Russian club looking to sell.



A statement on Anzhi's website suggests that the cut-backs are part of an attempt to comply with UEFA's financial fair play rule, with the club putting increasingly greater focus on home-grown players at the same time as looking to offload ""big signings"" who have not brought the Anzhi the success the club craved.



Anzhi's president Konstantin Remchukov said on Twitter: ""The main news is that Anzhi will undergo a reformatting.



""Many of our expensive stars will leave Anzhi, while the club's budget will be decreased to $50-$70 million (£32.5-£45.5m) a year.



""We failed to clinch rapid success. Now Anzhi will develop its academy according to the medium-term plans of club development.""

Chelsea missed out on Willian in January

Samuel Eto'o had a good relationship with Jose Mourinho at Inter

There are mixed reports in Russia regarding the real motivation for Anzhi's dramatic change in tack, however.



Some sources suggest that the change in tack is due to Anzhi owner Suleyman Kerimov suffering health problems, but it is also thought that Kerimov may have decided to pull the plug after suffering massive losses in his other business interests.



Kerimov has reportedly invested over £130m in Anzhi since purchasing the club in 2011 but is thought to have lost £241m recently after a contract with a Belarussian business partner broke down.

Suleyman Kerimov has changed his mind about Anzhi

Eto'o joined Anzhi from Inter for £24m in August 2011 and the 32-year-old is believed to be the highest paid player in the world.



Whether Chelsea are willing to foot Eto'o's reported £350,000-a-week salary to bring the Cameroonian to Stamford Bridge remains to be seen.



Also up for sale at Anzhi are former QPR and Blackburn defender Christopher Samba and former Chelsea, Arsenal and Portsmouth midfielder Lassana Diarra, both of whom could attract Premier League interest.



Igor Denisov, Yuri Zhirkov and Aleksandr Kokorin have already been shipped out to Dinamo Moscow, while former Manchester United coach Rene Meulensteen has also left the club just 16 days after replacing Guus Hiddink as manager.

Lassana Diarra is up for grabs",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
167672,"GETTY George Osborne is to give his 2016 Budget in March

When is the Budget 2016?



Mr Osborne will reveal his Budget for the year ahead on Wednesday 16th March. The Chancellor is set to present his speech after Prime Minister's questions at around 12.30pm.



What will he announce?



The Chancellor is still trying to slash the UK's budget deficit, by cutting Government borrowing while boosting income through taxes.



But Mr Osborne has been struggling to get a grip on Government spending and borrowing, and is now expected to overshoot his target for the year - and could have to admit failure in the Budget.



It could mean more brutal tax grabs are on the cards to plug budget gaps.



What changes to pensions will be made?



Britain's ageing population and the Government guarantees on state pensions is putting the UK on track to spend more on welfare by 2019.



So Mr Osborne is looking at where he can make cuts - he has been forced into a u-turn over changing pension tax relief.



But it's thought he could still announce changes to lifetime and annual savings allowances.

Are taxes going to be raised?



The Chancellor could increase fuel duty in line with inflation on petrol and diesel, after prices have recently dropped, according to experts. It's also feared that insurance tax could be raised.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
356608,"He spent a fortnight unconscious, after which he was initially unable to climb the stairs at his Dorset home without stopping, lift any of his children or walk to the stable-yard.

The British eventing star suffered head trauma following a crashing cross-country fall during last October's World Young Horse Championships in Le Lion d'Angers, France.

Now, though, the 47-year-old can look forward to making a fifth Olympics appearance next month, riding his brilliant 2015 Badminton Horse Trials winner Chilli Morning.

""I'm extremely lucky to be on this team,"" he said. ""It would be very special to win a medal. It would be more of an achievement thinking about where I have come from. It has taken me a long time to get here.""

Zara Phillips, the Queen's granddaughter, failed to qualify for a second successive Olympics. She missed out on Athens and Beijing.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
130281,"Prepaid plans have become popular as funeral costs have gone up (Picture modelled)

Doctor’s fees and charges for the church, ministers, organists, choirs, grave-digging and burial plots are not included in plans that are offered by key providers.

Prepaid plans have become popular as funeral costs have gone up by seven per cent a year for the past decade, way above the current savings rates and rate of inflation.

With the average cost of a basic funeral now £3,704 for a burial and £2,863 for a cremation, plans are an attractive proposition for people who don’t want to place this financial burden on loved ones.

However, an investigation by ­consumer watchdog Which? found the provisions within some plans to beat rising costs are falling short.

Most providers link costs to the retail price index (RPI), currently 2.9 per cent, which is much less than the ­soaring costs of funerals.

As a result funeral plans taken out with Age UK and Dignity in 1998 left families facing a £1,200 shortfall last year.

Which? analysed 21 prepaid plans from key providers and found that while they all cover the funeral director’s costs in full, many just paid a contribution towards “third party” costs such as doctor’s fees, booking a church, digging the grave and buying plots for burials.

Only the Co-operative and Family Funerals Trust offer to guarantee all third party costs, apart from the price of the plot itself.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
38687,"Javi Manquillo failed to impress during his loan spell at Liverpool

That is according to French publication L’Equipe, who claim the Atletico Madrid right-back will join the Ligue 1 club on a season-long loan.

The Spain Under-21 international returned to Atletico earlier this month when Liverpool cancelled his two-year loan deal after just one season.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
350527,"The BBC outside the home of Sir Cliff who has denied all allegations[PA/GETTY]

South Yorkshire police have confirmed the magistrate which approved the warrant was not aware the BBC had been given the date of the operation.

The singer's Berkshire home was searched last Thursday by police investigating an allegation of abuse, which has been strenuously denied by Sir Cliff.

Senior law figures have now claimed that the failure to inform Sheffield Magistrates' Court about the deal with the BBC could have rendered the warrant unlawful.

Speaking to The Times, Lord Macdonald, the former director of public prosecutions, said: ""To apply for a search warrant, having come to an arrangement with a media organisation in advance, so that the warrant can be used to create an event designed to reflect favourably on the behalf of the police, is completely disreputable conduct on the behalf of the police.

""It is possible that the failure to disclose these facts renders the warrant unlawful.""",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
138762,"President Trump has been embroiled in an exchange of threats and insults with Pyongyang, which has prompted China and Russia to call for dialogue in a bid to stop war breaking out. Now, North Korea’s state media agency has hit out at the US and claimed Washington is, in fact, the real threat to international security. A new KCNA editorial reads: “The US is the one and only nuclear war criminal, the first country that developed nuclear weapons on the earth and inflicted a catastrophic nuclear disaster upon humankind. It is also illfamed source of worldwide nuclear proliferation. “Reality proves that the US ambition to conquer the world by force of nukes still remains unchanged.

GETTY North Korea claims the US is the real threat to global security

“The US tries to justify its resumption of nuclear test under the cloak of ‘ensuring global peace and security’ while shelving its hideous criminal acts of wrecking global peace with nukes and finding fault with others. It is the height of the US-style shamelessness. “All countries around the world should become a slave of the US welding nuclear stick or die. This is the brigandish logic of the US. “The US is the arch criminal and the worst cancer-like entity threatening global peace and security.” Earlier this week, North Korea's foreign minister has accused President Trump of lighting ""the wick of war"" with his repeated insults and threats.

North Korea v USA explosive latest pictures Wed, September 20, 2017 Images depict how tensions have escalated between North Korea and the United States. Kim Jong-Un boasted of North Korea's ability to strike any target in the US after a second ICBM test that weapons experts said could even bring New York into range - in a potent challenge to President Donald Trump Play slideshow AFP/Getty Images 1 of 45 North Korea's intercontinental ballistic missile (ICBM), Hwasong-14 being lauched at an undisclosed place in North Korea

Ri Yong Ho, Pyongyang's foreign minister, hit out at the US President and said the tensions will not be settled with words. He said: ""With his bellicose and insane statement at the United Nations, Trump, you can say, has lit the wick of a war against us. ""We need to settle the final score, only with a hail of fire, not words.""

REUTERS Kim Jong Un watches the launch of a Hwasong-12 missile",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
157337,"GUN RUNNER: Wilshere scores Arsenal’s superb opener [REUTERS]

Arsenal are two points clear at the top of the Premier League with Welshman Ramsey the most in-form player of the season. Norwich were the latest team to feel the force of the Gunners, with Ramsey scoring his ninth goal of the season following a slalom run that left three Norwich defenders and goalkeeper John Ruddy beaten and on their knees. Ramsey, 22, is aiming to carry the momentum into the Champions League match against last year’s finalists Borussia Dortmund at the Emirates tomorrow. It will provide Arsenal with their sternest test of the season and Ramsey cannot wait. “I am just confident at the moment,” he said. “That is what football is all about, you need a lot of confidence to be playing well and if you haven’t got it then your game struggles. “But I’m feeling very confident, which helps you be composed in front of goal. “The defenders came rushing on so I dummied it, pretended to shoot and then I was in the six-yard box and it worked again and I put it past the keeper.

Rumours circulate over the security of Chris Hughton's job [GETTY]

You need a lot of confidence to be playing well Aaron Ramsey

“A few of my team-mates were in there as well, so if I didn’t put the ball in the net then I would have had an earful.” Having already beaten Marseille and Napoli in the Champions League, Arsenal sit top of Group F, and Ramsey added: “We have had a good start and we’ll look to do the same again on Tuesday. “Dortmund are a fantastic team, well organised and threatening. They got to the final last year and it will be a massive test for us. “We’ve been on a fantastic run since losing to Aston Villa at the start of the season and we will be confident.” That word again. Ramsey was not even meant to be playing against Norwich as manager Arsene Wenger started without the Welshman, resting him with Dortmund in mind. He was also well aware that Ramsey had played every minute of every Premier League game up until Saturday, as well as 180 minutes for Wales in the international break. But a head injury suffered by Mathieu Flamini brought him into the action after 37 minutes. Arsenal were already 1-0 up by then after scoring the team goal of the season so far, with five quick-fire one-touch passes coolly finished off by Jack Wilshere’s first-time finish.

Confident Ramsey thinks Arsenal will continue to lead from the front [GETTY]",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
293633,"The 22-year-old is now high on the list of Klopp's priorities for January according to reports in Italy. The German, who replaced Brendan Rodgers in October, has had a make-shift forward line at his disposal since taking over. Both Daniel Sturridge and Christian Benteke were injured when he came in and Danny Ings has since been ruled out for most of the season.

Liverpool's January transfer targets Sat, January 16, 2016 Express Sport looks at Liverpool's top January transfer targets Play slideshow Getty Images 1 of 28 Who could Jurgen Klopp sign during the January transfer window?

He started Divock Origi in his first game against Tottenham, but the 20-year-old is yet to find the net for Liverpool. Sturridge is set to return to action this week after declaring himself fit while Benteke has also struggled with injury and form at Anfield. And Calcio Mercato, an Italian website, report that Icardi is the man Klopp wants to add to his fire power.

GETTY Mauro Icardi is on Jurgen Klopp's radar",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
13837,"Malcolm Turnbull defended his strict plans to ban for life those arriving uninvited on boats, rejecting criticism from lawyers who say it breaches human rights. Even if the people are genuine refugees, they will be blocked from resettling in the country. Mr Turnbull said the move would “send the strongest possible signal” to people smugglers.

GETTY Malcolm Turnbull and migrants at Nauru

GETTY The Nauru detention centre

The door to Australia is closed to those who seek to come here by boat with a people smuggler Malcolm Turnbull

He said: “That absolutely unflinching, unequivocal message has to be loud and clear. “The door to Australia is closed to those who seek to come here by boat with a people smuggler. It is closed.” Under Australia’s current immigration laws, migrants caught trying to reach the country by boat are sent to detention camps on Papua New Guinea's Manus island and the tiny South Pacific island nation of Nauru. They can either return home, be resettled on Manus or Nauru or go to a third country. The new legislation will apply to the 1,200 people currently held in Nauru and Manus from July 19, 2013, including those who have returned home and anyone who arrives in the future.

Migrant crisis explained in numbers Fri, July 22, 2016 A monthly record of 218,394 migrants and refugees reached Europe by sea in October, the UN says, almost as many as the total number of arrivals in 2014. We take a look at the shocking statistics facing the humanitarian crisis. Play slideshow AFP/Getty Images 1 of 47 137 migrants of African origins were rescued by coast guard boats off the coast of Libya

Mr Turnbull added: “This is a battle of will between the Australian people, represented by its government and the gangs of people smugglers.” However, human rights and refugee campaign groups have spoken out against the lifetime ban. They say it would contravene the UN Refugee Convention, which states that no country will impose penalties on refugees due to their illegal entry or presence. However, Mr Turnbull hit back saying: ""We have taken legal advice and we are satisfied it is within power and consistent with our international obligations. “ The plans will be introduced in parliament next week.

REUTERS Malcolm Turnbull (R) speaks as he stands with Immigration Minister Peter Dutton

Pressure on Australia to find a country willing to take some of the 1,200 detainees grew after Papua New Guinea's Supreme Court ordered the closure of the Manus Island detention centres earlier this year. The United Nations and human rights groups have condemned alleged abuses in the centres. But campaign groups for migrants fear more families will be divided if the plans get the green light.

EPA Malcolm Turnbull wants to crack down on people smugglers",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
17705,"But for the 2011 champion, participating is merely a distraction from preparations from this autumn's event at Hazeltine, with the clash against the United States never far from his mind.

The Northern Irishman said: ""My priority is the Ryder Cup, not my own golf, but this is the biggest and best tournament in the world and I am proud and privileged to be part of the field.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
132864,"GETTY It's thought champagne helps prevent the onset of dementia

Champagne might be expensive but there's an excuse to splash out on a bottle now. Scientists claim three glasses of the bubbly beverage every week can boost the spatial memory - this is the part of memory responsible for recording information about one's environment.

Helpful, right? It's thought this is all down to a compound found in the black grapes used to make a bottle of bubbly. Introducing the Pinot noir and Pinot meunier hero grapes. These two 'super grapes' are said to prevent the onset of the brain diseases. If you're worried about dementia, here's how to check if you're showing early signs of the disease.

GETTY The expense of champagne can now be thought of as a health benefit

GETTY There's a certain grape in the bubbles that helps with memory loss

So could it really be true drinking up to three glasses of champagne every week helps prevent dementia and Alzheimer's disease? Professor Jeremy Spencer conducted research at Reading University. Most of the experiments were conducted on rats. The Proff revealed: ""These exciting results illustrate for the first time that the moderate consumption of champagne has the potential to influence cognitive functioning, such as memory. Such observations have previously been reported with red wine, through the actions of flavonoids contained within it. ""However, our research shows that champagne, which lacks flavonoids, is also capable of influencing brain function through the actions of smaller phenolic compounds, previously thought to lack biological activity.

GETTY Professor Jeremy Spencer conducted research at Reading University into the drink

Top 10 most common winter illnesses Mon, March 20, 2017 The top 10 most common winter illnesses Play slideshow Getty Images/Brand X 1 of 10 Also known as the winter vomiting bug - when people are ill with vomiting and diarrhoea, it's important to drink plenty of fluids to prevent dehydration. Young children and the elderly are especially at risk",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
47462,"New videos show North Koreans taking photos next to the enormous replica of Pyongyang’s Hwasong-15 missile as they spent New Year's Eve at the Pyongyang Ice Sculpture Festival on Kim Il Sung Square. Kim Jong-un has famously claimed the Hwasong-15 missile is capable of hitting the US mainland. There were also ice sculptures of North Korean landmarks, snowmen and dolphins - all illuminated by coloured lights to make them stand out as revellers gathered to welcome 2018. At midnight, a stunning firework display lit up the skies above Pyongyang in a spectacle to match capital cities across the world.

North Korea celebrates new year with terrifying war-themed display Tue, January 2, 2018 North Korea residents celebrated New Year’s Eve with a chilling fireworks display while despot leader Kim Jong-un used his message to threaten nuclear war on Donald Trump Play slideshow REUTERS 1 of 7 Fireworks are seen above the Taedong River during New Year celebrations as visitors pose for a photo in front of an ice sculpture of an intercontinental ballistic missile at the Pyongyang Ice Sculpture Festival in Kim Il Sung Square in Pyongyang

REUTERS•AFP The strange sculptures were among the highlights of Pyongyang's New Year celebrations

Meanwhile Kim Jong-un’s New Year address gave no indication that the hermit nation is planning to give up its missile programmes, with the dictator warning Donald Trump he has a “nuclear button” on his desk. He told the nation: “We must mass-produce nuclear warheads and ballistic missiles and speed up their deployment. “We should always keep readiness to take immediate nuclear counter-attacks against the enemy's scheme for a nuclear war. “The US should know that the button for nuclear weapons is on my table. This is reality, not a threat. “The entire area of the US mainland is within our nuclear strike range. “The United States can never start a war against me and our country.”

AFP A group of men stand before an ice sculpture depicting a Hwasong-15 ballistic missile

However, with the Winter Olympics in South Korea fast approaching, the North Korean leader appeared keen to improve ties with his neighbours in the South. He said the North and South could meet urgently to discuss the North sending a delegation. The leader added: “The Winter Olympic games that will be held soon in the South will be a good opportunity to display the status of the Korean nation and we sincerely wish that the event will be held with good results.” Before Christmas South Korean and US Marines braved freezing conditions to carry out intensive training exercises at the Winter Olympics site in Pyeongchang.

REUTERS Thousands of North Koreans came out to ring in the new year",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
109670,"Romanian migrant Vladimir Melinte, 28, walked up to fellow gambler Florin Cristea before striking him in the face with a powerful blow.

The injured victim - who suffered a fractured eye socket and bloody nose - can then be seen stumbling back before the yob leads him out of the door.

West Midlands Police released the footage following the attack at the William Hill branch in Whimore Reans, Wolverhampton on September 4 last year.

Melinte was arrested following a nationwide appeal and hauled before Wolverhampton Magistrates Court yesterday.

The dad-of-one admitted inflicting grievous bodily harm without intent and sentencing was adjourned until March 28 for a pre-sentence report to be prepared.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
303650,"Former Real Madrid striker Ronaldo has revealed he would love to see Liverpool playmaker Philippe Coutinho at the Santiago Bernabeu. Speaking on Spanish radio station Onda Cero, the former Brazil international admitted: ""I would love to see Coutinho at Real Madrid."" Coutinho has emerged as a key player for the Reds since his move from Inter Milan in January 2013 and has also been linked with a move to Real rivals Barcelona.

Premier League's hottest WAGs Sat, December 26, 2015 Express Sport brings you the Premier League's hottest WAGs Play slideshow Instagram•KayaHall 1 of 22 Manchester United man Phil Jones is seeing Kaya Hall

GETTY Timothy Fosu-Mensah signs new four-year deal at Old Trafford

Manchester United defender Timothy Fosu-Mensah, 18, has put pen to paper on a new deal at Old Trafford, keeping him at the club until June 2020 with the option of another year. The Holland Under-21 international said: ""I am delighted to have signed a new contract here at Manchester United. ""I have enjoyed every minute since I joined this great club and I want to continue the progress that I feel I have made so far. ""I am learning every day from the manager and the coaching staff. I appreciate the trust that the club has in me and I want to repay that with my performances on the pitch.""

I am delighted to have signed a New contract here At Manchester United������ pic.twitter.com/6X7KAtdFQP — Timothy fosu-mensah (@timboo95) October 19, 2016",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
158002,"Brighton, Kemptown was founded in East Sussex in 1950. In the 2017 General Election, the people of Brighton, Kemptown voted for Lloyd Russell-Moyle of the Labour Party. The party received 28703 votes - 58 per cent majority.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
280955,"Murray lost 6-3 7-5 to world number three Federer and was angry with his performance. ""I don't remember hitting very many good shots after the 4-1 game. I blew it, it's a shame,"" said Murray. Having lost the first set, Murray responded by claiming a double break in the second, but Federer fired back and won six of the final seven games to seal an impressive victory. The Swiss star's win evens up their head-to-head record at 11 wins apiece.

""I started the match off pretty slow tonight,"" Murray added.



""[Federer] came out quick. Then I had a couple break points in back-to-back games to get into it in the first set. I didn't get either of them.



""Then obviously was well up in the second and blew it. It's a shame.""



The Briton had been hoping to make an impression in Cincinnati with the US Open just around the corner, but it is Federer who looks imperious heading into Flushing Meadows in under two weeks.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
195995,"KODI • GETTY Kodi has spoken-out about popular software add-on repository, TVAddOns

Kodi has lashed out against the online add-on repository TVAddOns. The hugely-successful media player said it hoped TVAddOns would be “shut down” because “they bring nothing but misery to everyone”. For those who do not know, Kodi is an open-source media player that's available to install on a range of devices. The software was previously known as XBMC, or Xbox Media Centre, since that was the only hardware is was designed to run on. In a nutshell, it turns any desktop computer, server, smartphone, tablet or set-top box into a media player able to stream files from the internet, your home network or local HDD storage. The Kodi software itself is perfectly legal, however, it does enable users to install additional applications (dubbed add-ons) that allow them to access copyrighted material – uploaded, shared or streamed from other users across the globe. Unlike the Apple TV, Google ChromeCast or others, the Kodi media player is not restricted by licensing agreements, or a curated app store.

Kodi guide - All the devices you own that can run this streaming app Thu, March 9, 2017 KODI is legal if used correctly and here's all the devices that can run this streaming software. Play slideshow PH 1 of 8 KODI GUIDE - which devices are compatible

That means Kodi users can download a plethora of community-built apps, that might not be approved under the guidelines that govern the Apple App Store, Google Play Store, and others. This enables some users to abuse the media player to gain access to copyright-protected content providers, including Sky Sports HD, BT Sport, Sky Cinema, Netflix, BBC Worldwide and others. TVAddons is a hugely-popular repository for these Kodi add-ons, offering software solutions for Kodi that enables users to access illegal streams of premium sports and movie channels for free. The website went offline back in early June, with its website and Facebook page unceremoniously shut down. However, TVAddons has recently re-emerged online.

KODI • TWITTER Kodi TV claims TVAddOns brings ‘nothing but misery’ in a tweet

Kodi community and project manager Nathan Betzen has previously spoken-out about streaming content illegally on the open-source Kodi media player.

If you decide to use Kodi in a way that's illegal, please leave us out of it Nathan Betzen, Kodi

""Even though pirate streaming appears to be illegal in Europe, we still stand by our neutral policy,” he wrote in the official blog. ""We are developers and not the police, and we have no interest in acting as police for our own software. ""Kodi will remain as free and as open as it always has. Feel free to continue using Kodi however you want. ""To us Kodi is and always will be just a tool, like a hammer, and how you choose to use that tool is up to you.""

Top 10 most pirated movies for the week leading up to September 18 2017 Mon, September 18, 2017 Top 10 most pirated movies for the week leading up to September 18 2017, according to TorrentFreak Play slideshow DISNEY 1 of 10 1. Pirates of the Caribbean: Dead Men Tell No Tales

He added: ""We do ask that if you decide to use Kodi in a way that's illegal, please leave us out of it. ""People who steal cars don't tweet a picture of their stolen car to Ford Motor Co. We ask that if you watch pirate streams, that you not tweet us about those streams."" The recent tweet about TVAddons suggests Kodi’s view on online piracy has toughened somewhat. TVAddons was quick to respond, tweeting that whoever was in charge of Kodi’s social media account ""is definitely not in touch with your userbase"". The news comes days after new research by FACT revealed that there are now one million Kodi Boxes in use across the UK.

KODI.TV The open-source media player is able to run on a vast array of different hardware

The FACT research was conducted in association with the Police Intellectual Property Crime Unit, Intellectual Property Office, Police Scotland, and anti-piracy outfit Entura International. It estimated that up to 25 per cent of Britons who view content online, access content illegally. According to the FACT report, the UK is one of the countries most affected by the increasing demand for Kodi boxes. Those supplying the Kodi Boxes range from individuals building boxes for a select few friends and family, to sprawling organised crime networks. There has been a steady stream of reports of individuals who have been arrested for selling these devices, however, FACT claims these are just the ""tip of the iceberg"".

TVADDONS TVAddons hosts a slew of plugins for Kodi, some of which enable access to paid-for content for free",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
100937,"GETTY Ousmane Demeble's mother will reportedly determine his future transfer

Demebele has been turning heads in Ligue 1 this season for Rennes, becoming the youngest player in history to score 10 goals in the French top flight. Manchester United, Arsenal and West Ham are all reportedly showing interest in the 18-year-old, along with European giants Bayern Munich and Barcelona.

Who should Arsene Wenger sign on an Arsenal spending spree? Tue, March 22, 2016 Arsene Wenger is reportedly set to go on a spending spree at Arsenal, but who could he sign? Play slideshow AFP/Getty Images 1 of 8 Arsene Wenger could reportedly go on a mass spending spree this summer, according to The Sun

However, according to his representative Sambague, any future move for the young striker will solely be decided by his mother Fatimata. ""Fatimata, she will decide Ousmane's future,"" his agent told The Guardian.

""When he wanted to leave last summer, his mother told him she wanted him to stay at Rennes and sign his first professional contract. ""In the end he had no choice."" But it seems the teenager will have no shortage of offers to mull over with his mother, after his agent confirmed he had been in contact with a number of interested clubs.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
292969,"Many of the victims – some as aged as young as 11 – came from troubled backgrounds

The NCA said it will ""examine a number of potentially criminal matters identified during a recent inspection of Rotherham Metropolitan Borough Council"".

The National Crime Agency (NCA) has announced its ongoing investigation into child sexual exploitation in the South Yorkshire town was to be extended in light of today's new report – which branded the council ""not fit for purpose"".

The council's culture is unhealthy: bullying, sexism, suppression and misplaced 'political correctness' have cemented its failures

""The council's culture is unhealthy: bullying, sexism, suppression and misplaced 'political correctness' have cemented its failures. The council is currently incapable of tackling its weaknesses, without a sustained intervention.""

It said: ""This inspection revealed past and present failures to accept, understand and combat the issue of child sexual exploitation (CSE), resulting in a lack of support for victims and insufficient action against known perpetrators.

Rotherham Council was found to have had a culture of complete denial about the town's child sexual exploitation scandal, in the new report by government official Louise Casey.

Mr Pickles also told MPs he will impose early elections for the council in 2016.

Meanwhile, Communities Secretary Eric Pickles announced measures to replace the council's ""wholly dysfunctional"" political leadership with Government commissioners.

It is believed more than 1,400 schoolchildren and vulnerable young girls were abused

Last year, a previous report found that more than 1,400 children had been subjected to rape, violence and trafficking by gangs of mainly Asian men in the South Yorkshire town between 1997 and 2013.

Ms Casey fully endorsed the findings of Professor Alexis Jay's report which triggered widespread controversy when it was published in August last year.

Many of the victims – some as aged as young as 11 – came from troubled backgrounds or children's homes.

Dozens were plied with alcohol and drugs before being used for sex or pimped to others.

Other children claimed to have been ""raped once a day"" for years.

Earlier today, in fresh allegations, a corrupt police officer and and two councillors from Rotherham were accused of having sex with victims of child abuse.

Two local politicians – including one serving councillor – and a corrupt officer have been accused of having forced sex with the child abuse victims.

The policeman also regularly passed on key information to other abusers, The Times reported.

The NCA have been notified about the allegations against the councillors, the newspaper added.

The National Crime Agency confirmed to Express.co.uk that an ongoing criminal investigation is being held into the abuse accusations in Rotherham.

Responding to the allegations against a police officer, a spokesman for the Independent Police Complaints Commission (IPCC) said: ""The IPCC's independent investigation into the conduct of 10 South Yorkshire Police officers in relation to their handling of reported child sexual exploitation in Rotherham is ongoing.

""This is a large and complex investigation. Since we announced our investigation we have received 20 individual complaints. Work is ongoing to assess these complaints to determine whether they are new allegations or matters already under the remit of our investigation.

""We have also been liaising with the National Crime Agency in relation to their investigation examining criminal allegations of non-familial child sexual exploitation (CSE) in Rotherham to ensure nothing is done to prejudice any future potential criminal prosecutions and both investigations deal with the victims as sensitively as possible.""",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
291835,"The actor was in shock when a fellow inmate in New York's Hudson Correctional Facility told him the sad news that Gandolfini had suffered a fatal heart attack in Italy on 19 June (13).

Brancato, Jr., who is serving time for his part in the murder of an off-duty cop in 2005, tells the New York Daily News, ""I couldn't believe my ears. I thought it was a mistake.""

The 37 year old, who was discovered by Robert De Niro, hails Gandolfini as an inspiring mentor, adding, ""I admired him so much as an actor and so much as a person. I've been privileged to work with some of the most renowned people in Hollywood. He was right there with them.""

A funeral for the acting legend is to be held in New York on Thursday morning (27Jun13) at the Cathedral Church of St. John the Divine.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
72982,"“So, it’s like a divorce. He’s a very bitter ex-spouse saying, ‘I want my money, and I’m going to get it out of you!’

“Well, swing for it, sing for it – you are not going to get it!”

Brussels will desperate for Mrs May to commit to a large divorce settlement, with leaders wanting to plug a huge funding black hole left by Britain.

Chancellor Angela Merkel has been pressured by her country to raise concerns about increased German payments to the EU, while out-of-touch politicians claim there are “no concrete worries” about the bloc’s budget.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
66913,"A number of flights to UK airports have been diverted after ""smoke smells"" were reported on board. EasyJet said four of its flights were diverted due to ""atmospheric circumstances"". A British Airways spokeswoman said the carrier has had ""some reports of smells on board"" but the aircraft continued to their destinations. Liverpool John Lennon Airport stated that ""atmospheric conditions"" are believed to be causing flights to divert.

An easyJet spokeswoman said: ""EasyJet can confirm that four of its flights flying in the west of the UK have reported smoke smells in the cockpit today, believed to be linked to atmospheric circumstances due to storm Ophelia. ""Two flights returned shortly after take-off and two flights requested an expedited landing as a precaution only. ""We understand other airlines have experienced similar events and we continue to liaise with the Met Office as to the likely cause. ""The safety and welfare of our passengers and crew is easyJet's highest priority. We would like to apologise for any inconvenience experienced by the diversions.""

GETTY Ophelia has wreaked havoc in Ireland and forced plans to divert and make emergency landings

Video footage which has emerged shows an Aer Lingus flight which experienced an extremely rocky landing at Dublin Airport. The clip shows the aircraft swaying from side-to-side before touching down on the runway. Sean Hassett watched flight EI491 land this afternoon. He wrote on Twitter: “My parents flight landing @DublinAirport, well done to the pilot of EI491, my heart was in my mouth!”

PA Ophelia gave the sky over London an eerie yellow hue

Ophelia is also responsible for a bizarre yellowish skyline that could be seen in various parts of the UK. The cyclone suckedup winds from the Saharan Desert, blowing dust across Spain and towards Britain, giving the sun an eerie, red tint. On twitter, #yellowsky and #redsun were both trending.

Hurricane Ophelia: Latest charts and maps Mon, October 16, 2017 See all the latest path maps, wind speeds and charts of Hurricane Ophelia. Play slideshow REUTERS 1 of 18 Hurricane Ophelia image captured by NASA is seen in space",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
54616,"AP This is the first picture of the evil gunmen who killed at least 132 school children

Nine members of staff were also killed after seven gunmen stormed the school in Peshawar, walking from class to class shooting students yesterday.



A moratorium on the death penalty was imposed in Pakistan in 2008 and since then only one execution has taken place.



But, today, government spokesman Mohiuddin Wan said: ""It was decided that this moratorium should be lifted. The prime minister approved.



""Black warrants will be issued within a day or two.""

TWITTER/AP The first pictures have emerged from the deadly Peshawar school attack

That innocent one is now gone in the grave, and I can't wait to join him, I can't live anymore Akhtar Hussain - father of 14-year-old victim Fahad

Prime Minister Nawaz's decision to reinstate the death penalty came as Pakistan began a three-day period of mourning.



Funerals and prayer vigils for the victims were held across the nation and in other schools.



Akhtar Hussain, father of 14-year-old victim Fahad, had tears streaming down his face as he buried his son.



He added: ""They finished in minutes what I had lived my whole life for, my son.



""That innocent one is now gone in the grave, and I can't wait to join him, I can't live anymore.""

TWITTER At least 132 school children were killed in the attack

The first pictures from inside the school have emerged showing pools of blood on the ground and bullet holes littering the walls.



The images were taken by BBC News journalist Mishal Husain, who described the school as having a ""very eerie atmosphere"" and looking ""desolate"".

AP Pakistan has begun a three-day mourning period following the Taliban attack

All seven gunmen who attacked the school died in the attack [AP]

The Pakistan Taliban has claimed responsibility for the attack which had been met with disgust from world leaders.



The Afghan Taliban also criticised the attack which they described as ""un-Islamic"".



The Pakistan Taliban said the attack was in response to US drone strikes in the group's safe havens in the north-west of the country that have killed their members.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
356557,"A new special series from Marvel, called simply Star Wars: Darth Vader, picks up immediately after the end of Revenge Of The Sith and explores the former Anakin Skywalker’s first years in the infamous black outfit. Writer Charles Soule and artist Giuseppe Camuncoli will find Vader as he joins Emperor Palpatine in viewing the Death Star, and go from there. It won’t be long, it seems, before we know exactly how he got hold of his lightsaber. “The first arc is going to revolve around Vader's construction of his red lightsaber,” Soule revealed. TOP 5 LIGHTSABER BATTLES OF ALL TIME - WHAT'S NUMBER ONE? CLICK HERE.

Advertisement

MARVEL Darth Vader's backstory is revealed in a new comic

“Because at the end of Revenge of the Sith, he obviously loses his blue saber when he gets all chopped up and Obi-Wan takes it to eventually give to Luke down the road. “So we end up with a character who is known as having this iconic sword, like his magical red sword, but he doesn't have it yet. So what better way to start a big huge series than with a quest for a magic sword? “We're going to explore the mythology around lightsabers to some degree, which will be very fun. “I’m really lucky that I get to tell that story. Seems like a big piece of the puzzle for him.”

Star Wars sexiest women Carrie Fisher in 1983 film Star Wars: Episode VI - Return of the Jedi Carrie Fisher attends Giorgio Armani Fashion Show, 1980 Natalie Portman plays Senator Padmé Amidala in Star Wars: Episode III Revenge of the Sith Natalie Portman arrives for the screening of the film La Tete Haute at Cannes Felicity Jones in Rogue One: A Star Wars Story Felicity Jones attends the 70th EE British Academy Film Awards Daisy Ridley in Star Wars: The Force Awakens Daisy Ridley wows at the Oscars Keira Knightley attends the opening night gala screening of 'The Imitation Game' Natalie Portman in Star Wars Carrie Fisher as Princess Leia Carrie Fisher as Princess Leia in the original Star Wars trilogy Natalie Portman stripped down to her underwear in the film 'Your Highnes' Keira Knightley arrives at the world premiere of 'Pirates of the Caribbean 2: Dead Man's Chest' Natalie Portman looks stunning at Cannes Film Festival Lupita Nyong'o arrives at the 86th Annual Academy Awards Carrie Fisher as Lorna in the 1975 film 'Shampoo' Felicity Jones in Rogue One: A Star Wars Story Daisy Ridley on the Tonight Show Natalie Portman has gone for the see-through look Natalie Portman's dress doesn't leave much to the imagination Felicity Jones arrives at the 18th Annual Hollywood Film Awards Lupita Nyong'o at the 87th Annual Academy Awards Carrie Fisher as Princess Leia in Star Wars Daisy Ridley arrives at the Premiere of The Eagle Huntress Keira Knightley in A Dangerous Method Senator Padme Amidala played by actress Natalie Portman Keira Knightley attends HFPA & InStyle's 2014 TIFF Celebration Felicity Jones attending the EE British Academy Film Awards Felicity Jones arrives at the Star Wars: The Force Awakens premiere in London Queen Amidala played by actress Natalie Portman Lupita Nyong'o arrives at the Star Wars: The Force Awakens premiere in London. Although Carrie was well-known for her role as Princess Leia in the original Star Wars trilogy, she didn’t like growing up in her mother's shadow

Advertisement

SG This is the moment at which the story will start",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
269597,"First revealed for the new-gen console at E3 2015, Backward Compatibility has proved a popular feature with fans, who have cast over three million total votes on Xbox Feedback for the Xbox 360 titles they’d like to play.

Other stats connected to its popularity include Xbox One preview members logging more than 83 years playing Xbox 360 backward-compatible titles on Xbox One.

Microsoft have also confirmed that the Xbox One, the only current next-generation console to offer backward compatibility for free, will get the new feature November.

There will be more than 100 Xbox 360 titles and hundreds more to follow, according to the tech giant.

Another big boost for fans will be the fact that all future Xbox 360 Games with Gold titles will be playable on Xbox One, meaning Xbox Live Gold members will have more free games to play each month on Xbox One.

The feature is currently available to Xbox Preview Program members, but is set for launch to everyone in November.

There are currently around 23 titles listed on Xbox's website ready for release and will hopefully see a number of high-voted for titles, such as Black Ops 2 and Skyrim, added ahead of its winter launch.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
328378,"Medics were called to assess the hurt crew and passengers when the flight landed in Kuala Kumpur

The company, MAS, confirmed MH1 encountered turbulence over the Bay of Bengal during its flight from Heathrow on Sunday.

A statement from MAS said: ""During the flight, the passenger seatbelt light was turned on due to air turbulence.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
144781,"Mr Lamberts said the Brexit deal is only taking time away from more important negotiating points when it could quickly be resolved. He said: ""If we have to be honest, we want the UK to honour all its liabilities but then, of course, we have to deduct from that the parts of the assets that the UK owns. ""As long as we agree on the baseline, on the principles, I would go as far as saying ‘let an audit company do the reckoning and say how much is due by when.""

BBC/GETTY Philippe Lamberts accused the UK of wasting time during Brexit negotiations

Speaking to the Victoria Derbyshire programme, the co-leader of the European Free alliance accused the UK of recklessness as Brexit talks progress. He said: ""The British government at the moment is conducting the negotiation in a reckless way. The sense is that the clock is ticking. ""Negotiating a deal – with all the best of will – in two years is already a challenge but we have lost a considerable amount of time. ""And you may say Theresa May delivered a grand speech in Florence but we did not see any of the intentions that she declared translated into actual negotiating propositions since then. It’s like delaying tactics!""

We did not see any of the intentions that she declared translated into actual negotiating propositions Philippe Lamberts",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
35653,"GETTY Bacary Sagna reckons Kylian Mbappe can become the new Thierry Henry

Mbappe is only 18 but has attracted the interest of all of Europe's top clubs after bursting into the big time this season following promotion from Monaco's productive academy. He embellished his growing reputation with a goal and impressive display in the Champions League round of 16 first leg against Manchester City and Sagna does not think it will be long before he is a regular in the France senior team. ""Mbappe is a very good player,"" he said. ""Now he is being compared with Thierry Henry and he plays like him. He is young but if he continues to improve like this, he will play for the national team for sure.

GETTY Kylian Mbappe looks on during a Monaco training session ahead of their clash with Man City

Champions League odds: Who will lift the trophy? Mon, December 11, 2017 Which team is favourite to lift the Champions League trophy? (Odds provided by SkyBet, accurate as of 11/12/17) Play slideshow VI-Images via Getty Images 1 of 17 Which club are favourites to win the 2017/18 Champions League?

""I see Monaco playing every week on television and I see the potential they have. They play with freedom - it's just amazing."" But Sagna is confident City's own young wing wizards, Leroy Sane and Raheem Sterling, can outshine Mbappe in tonight's second leg. ""I play with Raheem and Leroy every day,"" he added. ""I see them progressing and how important they are for the team. They have pace and sill and have great potential.""

GETTY Bacary Sagna has backed Raheem Sterling to outshine Kylian Mbappe in the Champions League",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
245435,"Solicitor Ian Christian speaks on behalf of the families of the victims, former residents of the Orchid View nursing home, outside the inquest in Horsham [PA]

Penelope Schofield, the West Sussex coroner, said there was ""institutionalised abuse"" a t Orchid View care home in Copthorne and that its employees should be ""ashamed"".

Her comments come after a five-week inquest heard details of the shocking conditions elderly residents endured at the Southern Cross-run home.

Residents were given wrong doses of medication, left soiled and unattended due to staff shortages and there was a lack of management.

Call bells were often not answered for long periods or could not be reached by elderly people, and the home was deemed ""an accident waiting to happen"".

Ms Schofield said: ""There was institutionalised abuse throughout the home and it started, in my view, at a very early stage, and nobody did anything about it.

""This, to me, was from the top down. It was completely mismanaged and understaffed and failed to provide a safe environment for residents.""

Ms Schofield said it was ""disgraceful"" that the home, which has since closed, was allowed to be run in the way it was for around two years.

And she criticised the Care Quality Commission (CQC) which gave Orchid View a ""good"" rating in 2010 - a year before it shut.

She said: ""I question how this could be the case and I question whether the inspection that did take place was fit for purpose.""

She added: ""It's a heart-breaking case. We all have parents who will probably need care in the latter part of their lives.""

The inquest looked at the deaths of 19 pensioners at the West Sussex care home after whistleblower Lisa Martin, an administrator at the home, contacted police to raise concerns about the standard of care.

The coroner ruled that all of these residents suffered ""sub-optimal"" care. But five of the residents - Wilfred Gardner, 85, Margaret Tucker, 77, Enid Trodden, 86, John Holmes, 85, and Jean Halfpenny, 77 - died from natural causes ""which had been attributed to by neglect"".

The multimillion-pound home was said to have had a ""five-star"" feel when it opened in September 2009 which ""seduced"" families into believing it was well-run.

But one staff member at the £3,000-a-month home said: ""It was like a car that looked good from the outside but it was knackered.""

Residents were left soiled and unattended due to staff shortages while in a single night shift staff made 28 drug errors.

It was shut down in late 2011 after an investigation by the Care Quality Commission (CQC) and a serious case review has been ordered.

Bereaved relatives called on the government to usher in ""dramatic changes"" to improve care standards.

Linzi Collings, Mrs Halfpenny's daughter, said: ""How the corporate failings of Southern Cross could create these events and how such terrible standards could go unnoticed by the authorities for so long has left us baffled.

""In this day and age you expect measures to be in place to protect vulnerable members of society from being subjected to such horrendously poor care.

""We believe dramatic changes are needed to the current care system, starting firstly with greater accountability for care home owners if they are found to be making unnecessary mistakes and offering substandard services.""

Judith Charatan, whose dementia-suffering mother Doris Fielding died, said: ""The Government needs to wake up and take heed. More funding, resources, better training and increased standards amongst those that work in this industry are the only ways to truly tackle the crisis.""

The inquest raises fresh questions about the standards in care homes across the UK.

In 2011 the BBC Panorama documentary revealed systematic abuse at the Winterbourne View private hospital near Bristol, where staff used restraint techniques to inflict pain and humiliate vulnerable patients.

Six staff members were jailed and five handed suspended sentences for their role in the abuse following a high profile court case.

The Government has announced it will increase the number of inspections of care homes to once a year to improve standards.

But criticisms remain that staff lack the training, management and funding to provide proper standards of care.

The case comes after the Health Secretary Jeremy Hunt warned that a million elderly people in Britain are left forgotten and isolated because friends and relatives fail to visit them.

A Department of Health spokesperson said: "" The lack of care and concern shown towards these care residents was truly appalling.

""We have made it clear that there must be a sharper focus on taking tougher action when things go wrong and holding those responsible to account.

""Confidence in the regulation regime has been shaken, but we have now turned a corner. We welcome Andrea Sutcliffe's - the new Chief Inspector for social care - commitment to protecting vulnerable people from abuse and neglect, and to ensuring they receive better care.

""We need to make sure that providers and staff are always meeting the basic requirements for care residents so they are protected from harm, treated with dignity and respect, involved in their care, and given the chance to live a fulfilling life.

""We need to make sure everything possible is done to protect people from poor care wherever it might take place.""",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
203312,"That's the verdict of former Formula One driver Juan Pablo Montoya, who's branded the Pole's potential return to the sport as a ""joke"".

Kubica has not competed in F1 since seriously injuring his right hand, right arm and right leg in a rally crash in 2011.

But he's been tipped to return in 2018 with Williams in the market for a replacement for the departing Felipe Massa.

Kubica is expected to be given a test drive after next Sunday's grand prix at Abu Dhabi's Yas Marina Circuit.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
346822,"DAILY MAIL: Arsene Wenger has conceded the Premier League title to Chelsea after Arsenal were beaten at Swansea.



DAILY MIRROR: Mauricio Pochettino admitted his Tottenham players bottled it as they were sent crashing by Stoke.



THE SUN: Alan Pardew gave Toon owner Mike Ashley the thumbs-up as Newcastle stormed to a fifth straight win.



ALSO: Gareth Barry faces a lengthy lay-off after suffering ankle ligament damage in Everton's draw at the Stadium of Light.



DAILY STAR: Paul Merson branded Arsene Wenger childish last night for spitting his dummy over his 'clueless' rant.



DAILY EXPRESS: Louis van Gaal insists he is training his players' brains at Manchester United but taxing their minds might be a better way of putting it.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
347176,"Gotze was expected to leave Bayern after being told his opportunities in the first team would become limited even with the arrival of new manager Carlo Ancelotti. He was linked with a move to Liverpool and former club Borussia Dortmund, but then pledged his future to Bayern this week, claiming he was 'looking forward to the new season'.

Liverpool fans will have to get used to plenty of tender moments between Jurgen Klopp and Mario Gotze if the German World Cup winner reunites with his former boss at Anfield in the summer There are plenty of examples of the pair getting up close and personal in their Borussia Dortmund days Klopp handed Gotze his first team debut at Dortmund back in 2009, and has a fatherly relationship with the 23-year-old Klopp wraps the young playmaker up in a hug The pair chill out in training They share a tender moment on the pitch after reaching the quarter-finals of the Champions League in 2013 They can obviously have a laugh together too, as these cracking pictures from a club photoshoot demonstrate Robert Lewandowski, Marco Reus and Sebastien Kehl also get involved Klopp and Gotze embrace Klopp drapes a protective arm around Gotze after a Bundesliga match in 2011 The eccentric Reds boss looks slightly intense here... Klopp still maintained a good relationship with the young star after he made the switch to Bayern Munich Judging by this snap of the two, Gotze looks like he would be more than happy to work with the 48-year-old again...

Advertisement

However, Bayern have since urged the 23-year-old to reconsider his decision, with CEO Karl-Heinz Rummenigge telling German magazine Kicker he's not part of Ancelotti's first-team plans. ""We made everything clear to Mario, he knows what the club thinks and he knows what the future coach thinks,"" Rummenigge said.

Advertisement

And German newspaper Bild today claim his move away from the Allianz Arena is back on and will happen in one of two ways. The first option is for the attacking midfielder to stick out one more year until his contract expires and leave for free next summer. Or the Germany international will look to impress at Euro 2016 next month in the hope of attracting a host of suitors and leave this summer.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
355183,"John Churchill is using his late mother's money to campaign for Brexit

Prophetic Hilda Churchill told son John that there might be an opportunity to vote to leave the “Common Market” and he should use any money she left to help. Now John, a retired electrical engineer, has remained true to her wishes and spent £2,500 she had saved to campaign for her in local newspapers. His notices state staying in the European Union would result in a single economy and, eventually, a single country.

Advertisement

The first 7in x 2.5in message cost £400 and appeared in the Western Daily Press on Saturday. John, 78, of Stroud, Glos, says retired nurse Hilda died in her nineties in 1997. He said yesterday: “She never really expressed her political views to me – except when it came to this Common Market thing.

SWNS John's mother never liked the 'Common Market'

Advertisement

“Her feeling was that we never wanted to be in in the first place. “She said, ‘One day you will be able to use my money to get us out of the Common Market’. “If there was a referendum which came up, she wanted me to use her money – anything that she left me – for it.

SWNS

SWNS The first message cost £400 and appeared in the Western Daily Press

“I'm certain that if she was here to vote today she would vote to leave the EU. That was the grassroots Labour position. “My mum was caring and feisty. She knew her mind quite well.

An illuminated ""In or Out"" sign is pictured outside a house in Hangleton near Brighton in southern England, on June 23, 2016, as Britain holds a referendum on wether to stay or leave the European Union A taxi driver holds a sticker for the A Political fashion. Fashion label Sibling showcased their latest collection during London Collections: Men 2016, with a view to remain IN for the EU referendum A The London Eye lit up to show the share of Tweets mentioning Leave 58% (red) and Remain 42% (blue) during #BBCDebate A Leave supporter poses in Clacton-on-Sea as UK Independence Party (UKIP) leader Nigel Farage visits Leave supporters holds placards as they sit in Clacton-on-Sea Argyll and Bute Counting Officer Charles Argyll and Bute Counting Officer Charles Reppke takes the EU Referendum ballot box for the Isle of Gigha off the Loch Ranza ferry from Tayinloan at Ardminish on the Isle of Gigha Argyll and Bute Counting Officer Charles Reppke takes the EU Referendum ballot box for the Isle of Gigha off the Loch Ranza ferry from Tayinloan at Ardminish on the Isle of Gigha A Leave campaigner holds a placard UK Independence Party (UKIP) leader Nigel Farage poses in front of a new campaign poster in Clacton-on-Sea UK Independence Party (UKIP) leader Nigel Farage poses in front of a new campaign poster in Clacton-on-Sea The Palace of Culture and Science is illuminated in Union Jack colours by Warsaw's capital authorities in support of Britain staying in the EU, in Warsaw People hold signs in Trafalgar Square during a 'Yes to Europe' rally for young people People dress up in costume to voice their Brexit vote UK Independence party leader Nigel Farage and Labour party MP Kate Hoey pose on a passenger boat as they accompany a Brexit flotilla of fishing boats on the river Thames past the Houses of Parliament A boat carrying supporters for the Remain in the EU campaign including Sir Bob Geldoff shout and wave at Brexit fishing boats as they sail up the river Thames A boat carrying supporters for the Remain in the EU campaign including Sir Bob Geldoff shout and wave at Brexit fishing boats Nigel Farage's pro-Brexit boat among the flotilla of boats sail up the river Thames in a mass protest Boats decorated with flags and banners from the 'Fishing for Leave' group that are campaigning for a 'leave' vote in the EU referendum sail by the British Houses of Parliament as part of a People wave balloons and and flags as a flotilla of fishing vessels campaigning to leave the European Union sail up the river Thames in London Nigel Farage's Brexit bus Brexit Stunt on the River Thames A boat carrying supporters of the IN campaign to remain in the EU sails past the Tower of London in central London A boat from the 'Fishing for Leave' campaign group and smaller boats from the 'In' campaign join a flotilla along the Thames River A flotilla of boats sail up the river Thames in a mass protest Nigel Farage's Bexit campaign bus Prime Minister, David Cameron attends a press conference on the European Union Referendum, in London Prime Minister, David Cameron attends a press conference on the European Union Referendum, in London Nigel Farage holds up his British passport during the Express debate UK Independence Party (UKIP) leader Nigel Farage prior to a debate on the European Commission",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
348773,"There have been no takers for Lembit Opik (pictured) and Gillian McKeith's joint stage tour. []

The stars became estranged after the actor began dating Farrah Fawcett in the late 1970s, but they reunited following her death in 2009.

Relations became strained again when they filmed their U.S. reality TV show, Ryan & Tatum: The O'Neals, and spoke about their issues as they promoted it - but the turning point came during separate appearances on Piers Morgan Tonight.

Speaking on the show on Thursday night (04Aug11), Morgan told his guest Kathy Griffin, ""I stayed at Sharon Osbourne's Malibu beach house last weekend and Ryan O'Neal has a house next door...

""He was playing frisby with his dog on the beach and he told me because of that double interview they've now got back talking and things are moving in the right direction. I was very pleased to hear that.""

However, O'Neal is now having problems with his other children - son Redmond has been charged with two felonies following his arrest for drug possession on Tuesday (02Aug11), while his elder son Griffin was involved in a car crash on the same day.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
305353,Willy Boly: Braga may not be particularly entertaining in attack but they are certainly solid in defence. Their French defender has won 80% of his aerial duels so far [AFP/Getty Images],express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
30374,"GETTY Everton star Wayne Rooney has retired from England duty

But the England manager also challenged the younger members of his squad to step out of Rooney’s shadow and show they have the leadership qualities to drive the national team forward. Southgate, who has given first call-ups to Watford midfielder Nathaniel Chalobah and Leicester defender Harry Maguire, had planned to meet with Rooney to discuss selecting him for the World Cup qualifiers against Malta and Slovakia after leaving him out of his last two squads, only to be told by the 31-year-old he wanted to focus on his return to Goodison. Nevertheless, Southgate spent 30 minutes trying to persuade the Everton star and said the door would be left open in case of a change of heart. “Have I seen players change their minds? I think we all have,” he said. “Do I see the value of a senior player and what he may add in terms of experience and developing some of the other players? Definitely. “Part of that question should go to Wayne – you’ve got to respect his decision and the thinking behind that.

Wayne Rooney highlights: Ups and downs from his England career Wed, August 23, 2017 Click to reveal Wayne Rooney's best and worst moments for England Play slideshow Getty Images 1 of 11 2003: Youngest ever England player aged 17 years, 11 days

Have I seen players change their minds? I think we all have England boss Gareth Southgate

“But it is a good question. We have to see where he was at, where the squad was at, where everything else was at. It would be foolish to say no, because anything is possible. “That’s why I made the call to him this week because there’s a recognition that my decisions in March and June were based on the way he was playing and the form he was in then. That’s been different this season.” Southgate backed plans, reported in yesterday’s Daily Express, for the FA to stage a tribute to Rooney at Wembley in the coming months insisting that his 119 caps – the most for an outfield player – and his England record 53 goals deserve celebration. “I know already there is discussion around that and absolutely we should be recognising his career with England and showing appreciation,” he said. With Joe Hart’s position as first-choice goalkeeper in jeopardy from Jack Butland, Southgate will be looking to Gary Cahill, Harry Kane and some of the other younger players to show leadership qualities from the moment the squad meets up on Sunday. “Wayne’s been somebody it may have been easy to hide behind for people,” Southgate said. “He’s the one who has carried that burden. That’s been unfair on him. Now everybody has the chance to take the mantle.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
371241,"The Germany international joined Roma last week for around £7.7m after the Serie A club exercised their option to sign him on a permanent deal following his loan spell last season. But the 23-year-old is set to be quickly moved on with considerable interest in him.

Glamorous Argentinean singer Lorelei Taron is married to a Manchester United flop at Stamford Bridge Lorelei Taron is married to Radamel Falcao This bikini-clad wag is the wife of a Chelsea leader John Terry is married to wife Toni This wag is married to a Brazilian winger at Chelsea Willian is married to Vanessa Martins This wag's husband is very much a family man Oscar is married to Ludmila Emboaba Aleksandra Pavic is married to a Blues midfielder Nemanja Matic is married to Aleksandra Pavic This bikini babe was reportedly seeing a Chelsea bad boy Costa's ex-girlfriend Michele Zuanne claims he cheated on her with her sister Semaan is married to a former Arsenal man Cesc Fabregas is seeing Daniella Semaan

Advertisement

According to Italian newspaper La Repubblica, Rudiger's agents are set for talks with Chelsea chairman Roman Abramovich and director Marina Granovskaia. The report claims Roma will sell for around £19.3m with the defender's former club Stuttgart receiving 10 percent of the fee.

Chelsea have been linked with Rudiger's team-mate Kostas Manolas and Napoli's Kalidou Koulibaly as incoming manager Antonio Conte looks to strengthen his defence. Rudiger is currently with the German national team as they prepare for Euro 2016.

Advertisement

The Germany international joined Roma last week for around £7.7m after the Serie A club exercised their option to sign him on a permanent deal following his loan spell last season. But the 23-year-old is set to be quickly moved on with considerable interest in him.

With Loic Remy the latest name to be linked with a move away from Stamford Bridge, Express Sport takes a look at which members of the Chelsea squad Antonio Conte will keep and which he will discard when he joins the Blues this summer Thibaut Courtois: There are rumours that the Belgian is unsettled, but Conte must convince him to stay as the 23-year-old is a goalkeeper to build a team around - Keep Asmir Begovic: While unhappy at his lack of game time, Begovic is a competent professional and will quietly wait for his chance - Keep Cesar Azpilicueta: Solid and reliable, will undoubtedly retain his place in the starting line-up - Keep John Terry: While the Chelsea icon admitted earlier in the season that he had not been offered a new deal, a U-turn at the end of the campaign saw the Blues stalwart sign a contract extension - Keep Gary Cahill: Wobbled this season but has enough quality and experience to remain part of Conte’s plans - Keep Kurt Zouma: Was becoming a fixture in the first team until his sickening injury, and could play a part in the Chelsea defence for years to come - Keep Branislav Ivanovic: Another who struggled this season but Mourinho’s departure has lifted a weight of his shoulders and the Serbian looks like he can be relied upon once more - Keep Ola Aina: Needs more time to see if he can cut it at the top level - Keep Baba Rahman: Starting to become more settled in England and has done enough to be given a shot by the new manager - Keep Matt Miazga: Strong debut against Aston Villa and has the potential to be a big player in the Premier League - Keep Eden Hazard: Linked with Paris Saint-Germain and Real Madrid, but has recently confirmed his wish to stay on at Stamford Bridge - Keep Cesc Fabregas: A world class talent on his day, and an integral part of the title winning 2014/15 squad - Keep Ruben Loftus-Cheek: Impressive when thrown into the first team, but will want more opportunities to shine or he might have to look elsewhere - Keep Nemanja Matic: Found himself overshadowed by Mikel this season, and Jose Mourinho is reportedly looking to take him to Manchester United - Axe John Obi Mikel: Revitalised this season and would provide consistency in the squad - Keep Oscar: Been inconsistent for a number of years and could be used as a makeweight for a potential Paul Pogba deal, although a lack of Champions League football makes this more difficult - Axe Pedro: Like Oscar, shows the odd flash of brilliance and an upturn in form has come at a good time for him - Keep Willian: Chelsea’s best player last season, and Conte should be desperate to keep hold of him - Keep Kenedy: Still new to the club and needs time to bed in - Keep Diego Costa: Reported to be unhappy in England and keen on a move to Atletico Madrid. Conte should cut his losses if a replacement can be found - Axe Bertrand Traore: Shown enough in glimpses this season to warrant a greater role at the club - Keep Loic Remy: A shadow of his former self and in desperate need of a move - Axe Alexandre Pato: Wonderful debut at Villa Park but is it enough to earn a new deal? It looks highly unlikely - Keep Conte should also look to bring youngsters Andreas Christensen, Nathan Ake and potentially Juan Cuadrado back into the fold after all three have enjoyed impressive loan spells this season

According to Italian newspaper La Repubblica, Rudiger's agents are set for talks with Chelsea chairman Roman Abramovich and director Marina Granovskaia. The report claims Roma will sell for around £19.3m with the defender's former club Stuttgart receiving 10 percent of the fee.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
365010,"Find the perfect dishes for your Christmas feast in our selection

Mince pies Lidl Snowy Lodge 6 Luxury Mince Pies, £1.15 The filling is rich and fruity with a kick of cognac, but it’s overpowered by dry and heavy pastry. 6/10 Asda Extra Special 6 Luxury Mince Pies, £1.89 These are generously filled but the pastry isn’t rich enough and the filling needs some brandy. 6/10 Morrisons M Signature 6 All Butter Deep Filled Mince Pies, £1.74 These have deliciously buttery and crumbly pastry and are well-filled, but let down by an overly sweet filling and could do with more brandy. 6/10 Tesco Finest 6 Mince Pies, £2 The pastry is short and buttery, though a little thick, and there’s a good amount of fruity, spicy filling, but they need more sugar on top. 7/10 M&S 6 Christmas Star Mince Pies, £2.50 Deep-filled, rich and buttery, these little pies have a generous amount of sweet and fruity filling set in buttery pastry and look fantastic. 8/10 Heston from Waitrose 6 Spiced Shortcrust Mince Pies, £3.50 The pastry is dark and spicy and the mincemeat, which contains apple purée and lemon curd, is sweet and fruity. Sprinkle over the tangerine sugar sachet for an even more festive flavour. 8/10 Aldi Specially Selected 6 All Butter Almond Mince Tarts, £1.99 These are slightly smaller but they make up for that in taste. With frangipani, flaked almonds and a dusting of sugar, they’re delicious. 9/10 Sainsbury’s Taste the Difference 4 All Butter Blackcurrant & Cassis Mince Tarts, £2.50 A cross between mince pies and jam tarts, the buttery pastry contains a fruity, floral and tangy filling, making them ideal for those not keen on mincemeat. They also look beautiful. 9/10 Winner The Co-operative Truly Irresistible 6 Luxury All Butter Mince Pies, £2 The deliciously soft, melt-in-the mouth pastry, big, juicy fruit and zesty filling deliver possibly the perfect mince pie – with just enough sugar topping to add crunch without being sickly. 10/10

PH The Co-operative Truly Irresistible 6 Luxury All Butter Mince Pies, £2

Advertisement

Smoked salmon Lidl Laschinger Norwegian Smoked Salmon, 200g, £2.65 This is exceptional value for a great product that will work as well as an ingredient on canapés. The generous slices are perfectly smoked, too. 9/10 Co-op Truly Irresistible Beech and Oak Scottish Smoked Salmon, 100g, £4.99 There are only two big slices, but they are mouthwatering with a nice smoky flavour. 8/10 Tesco Finest Wild Alaskan Smoked Salmon, 100g, £4 This oak and beech smoked salmon only has a gently smoky edge, but it has a luxurious, melt-in-the-mouth texture. 8/10 Sainsbury’s Taste the Difference Whisky Smoked Salmon, 120g, £4.50 The whisky gives a nice earthy taste to these meaty slices. They would work well with scrambled eggs or simply served with a lemon wedge. 8/10 Aldi Specially Selected Scottish Dry Cured Honey & Mara Seaweed Smoked Salmon Slices, 100g, £2.49 The sweetness of the honey is lovely, but the seaweed flakes on the edges make the salmon taste a little too salty. 7/10 Morrisons Festive Christmas Tree Smoked Salmon, 100g, £3 Despite being smoked over pine for festive flavour, this doesn’t come through in the tasting. 6/10 Waitrose Christmas Spice Scottish Smoked Salmon, 100g, £4.99 These meaty slices have a nice deep-pink colour with a dark edge, but the cinnamon, allspice and cloves don’t work well with salmon. 6/10 M&S Beetroot & Orange Smoked Salmon, 200g, £9 These look good but the overpowering orange and lack of beetroot taste are a disappointment. 5/10 Winner: Asda Extra Special Maple Smoked Salmon, 120g, £2.80 The sea salt, demerara sugar and maple syrup give these thick salmon slices a gorgeously rich flavour with just the right amount of sweetness and saltiness that perfectly complements the flavour of the fish. 10/10 Cranberry sauce Tesco Cranberry Sauce, 200g, 75p This is fruity with a healthy scattering of seeds, but it’s a little too watery and could do with another sharper flavour to cut through the sweetness – it’s basically jam. 6/10 Lidl Deluxe Cranberry Sauce with Ruby Port, 200g, 99p This is a dark, medium-cut set sauce with a good balance between sweet and sour thanks to a dash of port. It’s basic but is great value. 7/10 M&S Cranberry & Port Sauce, 400g, £3 This is a glossy, runny sauce with the port adding a tartness and richness. It could do with a few more whole cranberries, but when you do get one it’s fresh and sweet. 7/10 Heston from Waitrose Cranberry & Pomegranate Sauce, 200g, £2.49 This is a fresh, zingy sauce with whole cranberries and pomegranate seeds, but these do get stuck in your teeth. It’s not one for traditionalists, but then again it is by Heston Blumenthal. 7/10 Asda Extra Special Cranberry Sauce with Ruby Port, 230g, £1.47 A runny sauce with big chunks of cranberries, this is fairly sharp and tangy with a richness from the port coming through. It pours well and would go well with all types of Christmas meat. 7/10 Co-op Loved By Us Cranberry Sauce, 190g, £1.59 With just two ingredients and a higher percentage of cranberries than a lot of these offerings, this is a tasty accompaniment to Christmas dinner. 7/10 Sainsbury’s Taste the Difference Wild Cranberry Sauce, 220g, £1.80 This is a rich and treacle-like sauce that’s so thick a spoon stands upright in it. The lingonberries give it a slighter smoother flavour than traditional cranberry sauces, and overall it’s a really delicious accompaniment. 8/10 Winner Aldi Specially Selected Cranberry Sauce, 300g, £1.49 This is a deliciously thick, chunky sauce containing big, tangy and juicy whole cranberries that burst in the mouth. It’s sweet but with enough zing to not be jam-like. The other flavours of port and cinnamon complement the fruit wonderfully, making it a fine accompaniment to Christmas meat. 9/10

PH Treat your family to the perfect pud this year

Christmas puddings Lidl Snowy Lodge Cherry & Pecan Topped Christmas Pudding, 907g, £9.99 With cherries, pecans and orange decoration, this looks good. But the mixture is sweet and sticky, with the candied fruit making it sickly. 7/10 Aldi Specially Selected Golden Topped Christmas Pudding, 907g, £8.99 This glistening pud is generously filled with rich, dark fruits and nuts steeped in orange liqueur, brandy and port. But there is more fruit than pudding, so it’s tricky to serve. 7/10 Co-op Truly Irresistible Richly Fruited Christmas Pudding, 454g, £3 There are no fancy flavours or additions here, but it’s full of fruit, nuts and brandy. It has been matured for 6 months, so the flavours aren’t as strong as some here, but it’s a good traditional pudding. 7/10 Tesco Finest 12 Month Matured Christmas Pudding, 907g, £10 It’s nothing special to look at but, with cider, cognac, sherry and port, it packs a flavour punch. The texture is fudgy without being too dense, and is nicely punctuated with whole almonds and cherries. 8/10 Asda Extra Special Melting Fig and Brandy Christmas Pudding, 907g, £7 This is soft, crumbly and bursting with juicy sultanas, figs and candied peel. It also has a sauce that oozes out when cut, keeping the pud moist, although a little too sweet. 8/10 Morrisons M Signature Cherry Crowned Christmas Pudding, 454g, £4 Cherries are definitely what you get here – perhaps too many. But the sweet, fruity taste and nutty crunch make for a well-balanced pud with a nice gooey consistency. 8/10 Sainsbury’s Taste the Difference Salted Maple, Date, Cranberry & Chestnut Pudding, 600g, £8 This is a delicious compromise for Christmas pudding lovers and haters. The sponge is scattered with date, cranberry and chestnut pieces and topped with caramel sauce. 9/10 M&S Marc de Champagne Christmas Pudding, 1.057kg, £14 It’s a real showstopper of a pudding, coated in gold dust and with an indulgent cherry and champagne sauce. But away from all the theatrics, it’s deliciously fruity, boozy and moist. 9/10 Winner Waitrose Christmas Signature Spice Fruited Sponge Pudding, 900g, £10 If you find the usual Christmas puddings too heavy and rich, this is a fantastic alternative. It smells of exotic, spiced marmalade and, on tasting, is smooth in texture with a focus on the gorgeous flavours of cardamom, cinnamon and ginger liqueur, with hints of lemon peel and vine fruits. It’s a perfect pudding for Christmas – or any time of year. 10/10 Brandy butter Aldi Cowbelle Brandy Butter, 200g, £1.25 This is soft, creamy and fluffy, but there’s too much sugar and not enough brandy, so it tastes more like icing than brandy butter. 6/10 Asda French Brandy Butter, 200g, £2 This has a good yellow colour and spreads or spoons easily, but the brandy is too sharp, heady and overpowering, and the sugar is grainy. It’s one for serious brandy fans. 6/10 Sainsbury’s Brandy Butter, 200g, £2.20 A lovely yellow colour and smoothly churned, this is made from British butter, icing sugar and French brandy. It’s a good mix of sweet and boozy, and the packaging is classy. 7/10 Tesco Brandy Butter, 200g, £2.25 This one’s smooth and creamy, with a good kick from French brandy. It offers good value, too, so you could try it on some other warm desserts this winter. 7/10 Co-op Loved By Us Brandy Butter, 200g, £1.85 This is a stiff butter but it melts quickly when spooned on top of a hot pudding. Containing cognac, French brandy and a 4.2% alcohol content, it’s an impressively boozy number – ideal for those who like a kick. 7/10 M&S Brandy Butter, 200g, £2.80 This has a gorgeous caramel colour and is super smooth, while the rich butter and warm Courvoisier VS cognac work perfectly together. It’s delicious stuff. 8/10 Winner Morrisons M Signature Indulgent Brandy Butter with Courvoisier, 200g, £2.50 Butter from Jersey cows gives this a dark golden colour and a rich, creamy taste, and the perfect amount of Courvoisier VS cognac cuts through the sweetness. It’s smooth, not gritty, and melts in the mouth. Try to avoid eating by the spoonful! 9/10

Advertisement

S MAG Create the perfect cheeseboard

Cheese boards Aldi Specially Selected Truly Luxurious Cheese Selection, £4.49 Lovely mature Cheddar, tasty Brie and creamy Bleu d’Auvergne make this great value for a basic cheeseboard, but you might want to swerve the Red Leicester and Stilton with blueberries. 5/10 Lidl Deluxe Cheese Board Selection, £5.29 Don’t let the budget price tag dissuade you as this is quite impressive. The Camembert and Stilton are particularly creamy, but it’s the Wensleydale with cranberries that’s the real cracker. 7/10 Sainsbury’s Taste the Difference Cheese Selection Board, £15 This is an attractive-looking wooden cheeseboard with the Cheddar being a real stand-out, but the others err a little too much on the mild side. 7/10 Asda Extra Special Tigerwood Cheeseboard, £8 With Brie, Stilton, Cheddar and Red Leicester all covered, this is very much a basics board, but it does the simple things well and in generous portions. The Cornish Brie is pleasantly buttery and the Stilton is just sweet enough but the rich, nutty Red Leicester is the star. 7/10 Tesco Classic Cheese Selection, £6.50 A great selection of cheeses to keep in the fridge for small after-dinner snacks. The Edam and Taw Valley Cheddar are mild and safe options, the Brie is very creamy, and the Wensleydale with cranberries isn’t overly sweet, but the highlight here is the crumbly and creamy Stilton. 8/10 Waitrose Christmas Slate Board & Cheese Selection, £10 This scores top marks for presentation, with its four varieties arranged on a smart slate board. Comprising of a mature Bleu D’Auvergne, a Taw Valley mature Cheddar, a festive Wensleydale and cranberry, and a mild and creamy Brie, it’s a great all-rounder. 8/10 M&S Cheese Selection with Slate Board, £25 This would impress any guest as it comes with its own slate. The Camembert is a little too strong for our liking but the smoked Red Leicester and vintage farmhouse Cheddar are really moreish. Our particular favourite was the Blacksticks Blue, a melt-in-the-mouth example of Lancashire’s finest cheese. 9/10 Winner Co-op Truly Irresistible Luxury Cheese Selection, £6 This irresistible, value-for-money selection is full of variety, from a sweet Manchego and tangy yet creamy Gorgonzola to a mature Gouda and tasty Cheddar. All are delicious, and it even comes with a brochure recommending complementary drinks. 10/10 Stuffing Lidl Deluxe Wild Sage and Red Onion Stuffing Mix, 79p This is mushy and lacking in flavour. 5/10 Asda Extra Special 12 Festive British Pork Stuffing Balls, £2.78 OK, but tastes very processed. 6/10 Morrisons M Signature 12 Pork Stuffing Plum Puddings, £2.97 These are elegant but too sweet and don’t cook very evenly. 6/10 Aldi Specially Selected Pork, Cranberry and Apple Stuffing, £1.99 The texture is good but it needs more herbs and spices. 7/10 Tesco Finest 6 Venison Stuffing Portions, £3 These are perfect for fans of rich, strong flavours. 7/10 M&S British Pork, Chestnut, Bacon & Thyme Stuffing, £4 A tasty slab of stuffing with a nice texture. 7/10 Waitrose Brussels Sprout & Bacon Stuffing Wraps, £3.99 The bacon and sprouts deliciously complement the pork sausage meat. 8/10 Co-op Truly Irresistible 6 Fruit & Cointreau Stuffing Parcels, £3.29 These are rich, indulgent and look great on the plate. 8/10 Winner Sainsbury’s Taste the Difference British Pork, Roast Onion & Sage Stuffing, £2.50 This buttery, meaty portion has a blend of onions, herbs and spices that is mouthwateringly tasty. It cooks evenly and slices easily for serving, too. 9/10

PH M&S Ice Shard Cake, 1.7kg, £25",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
16641,"Laura Plummer was found with 290 Tramadol tablets in her suitcase

Laura Plummer, 33, from Hull, was arrested after she was found with 290 Tramadol tablets in her suitcase.

The painkiller is legal in Britain but banned in Egypt.

Laura’s family, who have described her as “naive”, said she was taking the tablets for her Egyptian partner, Omar Caboo, who suffers from severe back pain.

Shop worker Laura’s mother Roberta Sinclair travelled to Egypt for the Christmas Day hearing.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
305024,"Premier League milestones are being surpassed all the time, and today's game saw the first defender in history reach 50 assists in the top flight.

Just two defenders still playing have made the top 10 in the all-time list, though they occupy both No.1 and No.2 in the list.

Chelsea have enjoyed plenty of attacking defenders along while a surprising, current Manchester United star also makes the list.

CLICK THROUGH THE GALLERY TO REVEAL THE PREMIER LEAGUE DEFENDERS WITH THE MOST ASSISTS.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
323763,"Ivanka and her husband Jared Kushner welcomed their third child, named Theodore, into the world last night. The 34-year-old confirmed the news on social media, writing: ""Jared and I feel incredibly blessed to announce the arrival of Theodore James Kushner."" The businesswoman added: ""Jared, Arabella, Joseph and I are so excited to welcome this sweet little boy in to our family!""

Advertisement

Mr Trump has frequently made mention of his daughter's pregnancy while campaigning for the Republican nomination. But the outspoken billionaire, who yesterday claimed Britain is at threat from Islamic State terror attacks, has not yet made any public statements on Theodore's birth. Ivanka is the second of three children Mr Trump had with ex-wife Ivana.

IG The businesswoman told her Instagram followers she was 'so excited'

Despite her father's controversial statements on Islam and immigration, Ivanka is supporter of his campaign to win the White House. She told Town and Country magazine in December: ""Well, I'm his daughter. In a political capacity, I don't [disagree with him]. It's his campaign. ""I don't feel that's my role. But I would challenge him as a child. That's what children do. [My daughter] Arabella challenges me every day.""

Advertisement

GETTY Ivanka with outspoken father Donald and husband Jared Kushner",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
261436,"The road washed away by floods that have killed four people with up to 80 unaccounted for

The unnamed man’s vehicle was one of three sent plummeting into an icy river when a bridge on Highway 287 was washed away by a 30ft wall of water.

Occupants of the other cars got out and swam to safety but emergency crews were astonished to find the trapped driver still alive when his was winched up.

Agonisingly, it even slipped back into the water briefly when a winch line snapped but firefighters swiftly hauled him out.

A brigade spokesman said the man was taken to hospital suffering from shock and minor cuts and bruises, adding: “It’s an absolute miracle an air bubble formed and he was able to survive.”

At least four people have been killed, with reports of between 20 and 80 people still unaccounted for, following floods of ­“biblical proportions” in the US state.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
39036,"Sources claim Jon Venables, killer of toddler James Bulger, has been granted parole

Venables was sent back to prison in 2010 after he admitted downloading and distributing images of child pornography.



Denise Fergus, mother to two-year-old James who was killed by Venables and Robert Thompson in 1993, has attended a parole hearing for Venables earlier this year.



Mrs Fergus and James's father Ralph Bulger had pushed for Venables to remain in prison, but sources claim the decision has gone against the victim's parents.



Speaking on her Twitter page, Mrs Fergus said: ""Just don't believe what I've got 2 go through. AGAIN.""



She later added: ""Venables is getting released.""



James Bulger (left) was killed by Venables and Robert Thompson (right) in 1993

Venables is getting released Denise Fergus, the mother of James Bulger, on Twitter

A Parole Board spokesman said they could not comment on individual cases but they did reveal a decision had been made.



They said: ""We've had confirmation that all parties have been told and we can confirm that it was a release decision. He will be released.""



Venables will be freed the year of the 20th anniversary of James's murder.



The two-year-old was abducted from a Liverpool shopping centre before the ten-year-olds proceeded to torture and kill the toddler.



The child killers were jailed for life but released on licence with new identities in 2001.

Denise Fergus spoke of Jon Venables being granted parole on Twitter

Robin Makin, solicitor for Mr Bulger, said: ""Ralph Bulger and the paternal family of James Bulger are disappointed and dismayed to have been advised that the Parole Board have decide to release Jon Venables back into society.



""In 2011 the Parole Board determined that it was 'not safe' for Jon Venables to be released. It is not known what has changed. No reasons for the decision have been given.



""For Ralph and his family the living nightmare continues and is exacerbated by the problems now created by the reckless decision to free Jon Venables without any publicly disclosed safeguards.



""Jon Venables is a sex offender who has murdered once and made it clear when posing as the mother of a child that an 'ultimate thrill' for him was the sexual abuse of a child.



""The authorities have already experimented with Jon Venables living a lie and it did not work.""



Mr Makin said it was not known if authorities would seek to give Venables another new identity, but if they did at the expense of the taxpayer then it would be an ""unprecedented and unjustifiable risk"".

",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
285213,Click through the gallery for the best snaps of Olivier Giroud's scorpion kick goal for Arsenal against Crystal Palace [REUTERS],express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
23425,"While the judges chose to save the former X Factor star from being eliminated, she has admitted her nerves ""got the better of her"" and she had a feeling she might be in the bottom two. However, as she prepares to perform the Charleston on Saturday night as Mary Poppins for musical week, It Takes Two host Zoe Ball made a shocking revelation that hinted Alexandra will make it to the finale. ""Statistic time though, this is good,"" the presenter told Alexandra and her professional partner Gorka Marquez. ""If you watch this show a lot, you may have heard the phrase, the Rumba is a notoriously difficult dance a few thousand times.

BBC Strictly Come Dancing: Alexandra Burke said she was very nervous about performing the Rumba

BBC Strictly Come Dancing: Zoe Ball dropped a shock final revelation

""Well, there are some very well regarded celebs who found themselves in the bottom two with this dreaded dance."" Zoe then went on to reveal Julian Clarey, Denise Van Outen, Abbey Clancy, Simon Webbe and Mark Wright all found themselves close to elimination after performing the Rumba. However, each star was saved and went on to perform in the final, as she commented: ""They were all finalists in the end, so hopefully you can take some good stuff from that."" It came after Gorka defended Alexandra's performance on Saturday night, remarking: ""It's a very slow dance so maybe the audience from the TV or even the celebs they don't get… for the celebs it's difficult because it's a very slow dance.

BBC Strictly Come Dancing: Zoe revealed former finalists had been in the bottom two after the Rumba

Strictly's Alexandra Burke in pictures Thu, January 18, 2018 Strictly Come Dancing star Alexandra Burke in pictures. Play slideshow PA 1 of 72 Strictly's Alexandra Burke in pictures

BBC Strictly Come Dancing: Gorka defended Alexandra's performance on Saturday night",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
3099,"Star Wars Celebration finally delivered what everybody was waiting for. The Last Jedi teaser trailer was packed with new footage and first looks at everyone from Luke, Leia, Rey, Finn, Poe and Kylo Ren, but sadly no sight of the new characters played by Benicio del Toro and Laura Dern. One of the most eagerly awaited scenes showed Luke in a dark cave talking to a mysterious presence. Yoda also made his hugely-awaited Star Wars return.

DISNEY Star Wars 8 Yoda returns and speaks to Luke

Explosive first stills of Star Wars: The Last Jedi Fri, April 14, 2017 Play slideshow LUCASFILM 1 of 15 See the first images from the trailer of Star Wars: The Last Jedi

The return of the legendary character has been shrouded in mystery but there were reports of his puppet being seen on set. Frank Oz, who voices Yoda, has given very evasive answers when asked about his involvement in Episode VIII. He said: ""I have to say I’ve been asked not to talk about it. I love Yoda. I would be happy to talk to you about it at the time they let me.” Well that time is now as Yoda finally returns as a Force ghost in The Last Jedi trailer with a mysterious message. WE are also expectingto see Hayden Christensen's Anakin back as a ghost, but no announcement has been made yet at Celebration.

DISNEY Are these Jedi books in Yoda's cave?

DISNEY Is tsih Luke's gloved hand on the Jedi symbol?

A cryptic scene in the new trailer shows a shelf of ancient books in a tree-like cave. This seems to be Yoda's home on Dagobah and we are looking at powerful texts which will hold the clues that Luke is seeking to the origins of the Jedi and how to defeat Snoke. We also saw an ancient book opened and a gloved hand touch the Jedi symbol. We all know that Luke usually wears gloves to cover his mechanic arm. A purposefully mysterious whisper can be heard in the background. It is the voice of Yoda and follows a similar brief audio of Alec Guiness's Obi-Wan as we see Kylo Ren's destroyed helmet. Fans have been in a frenzy trying to decipher what the iconic Jedi master is saying and it looks like this is a new line, not someting lifted from one of the old movies.

DISNEY Yoda sees a Force ghost approach in floating lights

Fans seem to agree that Yoda is talking about the Force and says: ""(It) surrounds us, binds us."" But is he talking to Luke or to Rey? We have already leaked reports that Rey will be visited by a Force ghost, which many now believe will be Yoda. A description of a scenes was leaked last month after advance footage was shown to Disney shareholders.

15 Biggest Star Wars Fan Theories you need to read right now Fri, February 3, 2017 Play slideshow LUCASFILM 1 of 15 1. The Last Jedi is actually Snoke",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
173687,"Ministers from across the EU’s 28 member states, including the UK, agreed to give the impoverished Balkan nation “candidate status”, preparing the way for negotiations for eventual membership.

The decision at a meeting in Luxembourg yesterday angered Tory backbenchers, who fear allowing Albania to join the EU will give freedom-of-movement rights to around three ­million citizens in the former communist state.

But Downing Street officials insisted it could take “decades” for the negotiations to be concluded.

EU leaders including David Cameron are due to rubber-stamp the decision at a summit in Brussels on Friday.

Tory MP Nigel Mills, who campaigned against relaxation of visa controls with Romania and Bulgaria at the end of last year, said: “It is hard to imagine that Albania is anywhere close to the level of economic or social development, or has the democratic and justice systems in place that you would normally associate with a member of the EU.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
29852,"Hazard netted twice in a 3-1 Chelsea win over Newcastle and his display more than impressed Shearer. The former England striker said: ""He was unplayable at times - he was just magnificent. ""Newcastle couldn't get near him with his running with the ball or his running off the ball. ""He was so intelligent, his link-up play with Alvaro Morata was so good.

""His game had everything with it. He was running the show.""



Shearer then paused before delivering more adulation for the Belgian wizard.



He added: ""It was just magnificent. When you get tight to him he can turn you, he just has everything to his game.



""He destroyed Newcastle but he will destroy a few more as the season goes on.""",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
374933,"Costa could be back in an Atletico shirt as soon as this summer

The Spanish striker completed a £32million move from the Spanish club to Chelsea in 2014 and scored 21 goals to power his side to the Premier League title. Costa has been unsettled at Chelsea after a drastic dip in form and a touchline spat with former boss Jose Mourinho. The 27-year-old has just eight goals in all competitions so far this year and despite Mourinho's departure, a Stamford Bridge exit has been mooted.

Diego Costa had a telling off at half time in the tunnel Should the Chelsea man have been sent off against Watford? Push or shove from Costa? Costa's got his eye on referee Mike Dean Handbags boys

Advertisement

At Atletico Costa won La Liga, reached a Champions League final and scored 64 goals in 135 appearances. And now president Enrique Cerezo has fanned the flames of rumours suggesting the striker will return to Spain this summer. ""We have a great relationship with our past players,” Cerezo told Spanish radio station Cope.

“Diego is a great player, but a Chelsea player. ""We will try to do our best and see what Chelsea say, it does not depend on us. “We always try to bring the best players and Diego is one of them.”

Advertisement",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
139653,"PH James Gilbert 1923 - 2016

“I can never remember the punchlines,” he used to complain. However, his contribution to television’s golden era while he was in charge of light entertainment at the BBC speaks for itself. Cecil James Gilbert was born in Edinburgh to parents Thomas and Mabel and briefly attended Edinburgh University before changing his mind to serve as a pilot with the RAF during the Second World War. On leaving the RAF he joined Rada, with the idea of becoming a film director but when a job offer came up working as an assistant stage manager at Glasgow’s Citizens Theatre he jumped at the chance. It was here that he met actor Stanley Baxter who would become a lifelong friend.

And two years after joining the BBC in 1957 Gilbert produced Baxter in Britain’s first television sketch show, the Bafta-winning On The Bright Side. Various programmes followed before Gilbert produced The Frost Report in 1966 and together with the show’s host David Frost brought Ronnie Corbett and Ronnie Barker’s talents together. But they weren’t the only comedy geniuses whose careers were launched thanks to The Frost Report. It also introduced John Cleese, Michael Palin and Terry Jones to television and writers on the show such as Bill Oddie and Tim Brooke-Taylor later found fame as two-thirds of The Goodies. The Frost Report, which only ran for two series, was the start of Gilbert’s comedy hit run. In 1971, after luring the Ronnies back from ITV, he also produced their hugely successful show The Two Ronnies which ran for 15 years on the BBC and commanded audiences of 15 million viewers.

His next sitcom winner was in 1973 when he produced the first run of Whatever Happened To The Likely Lads? which won a Bafta for best comedy the following year. He was also responsible for commissioning Porridge, Last Of The Summer Wine, The Good Life, The Fall And Rise Of Reginald Perrin and Fawlty Towers – the latter was despite the fact BBC script editor Ian Main told Gilbert: “This is full of clichéd situations, stereotypical characters and I can’t see it being anything other than a disaster.”

PH James Gilbert with some of the stars of his shows

Gilbert overruled him and in September 1975 Basil Fawlty made his debut on BBC Two. Two years later the Scotsman was made head of light entertainment for the BBC, where he remained until 1982.

GETTY James Gilbert brought Ronnie Corbett and Ronnie Barker’s talents together

After later acknowledging that it was, “too much a desk job, too many meetings” he moved to Thames Television where he worked with Benny Hill and continued to help create hits such as Fresh Fields.

Only Fools and Horses best one-liners Wed, April 20, 2016 All the best one-liners from Only Fools and Horses Play slideshow BBC 1 of 12 Del boy on legging it: ""There's no point in running away. Running away only wears out your shoes""

Surprisingly, given Gilbert’s ability for knowing what was comedy gold, the one sitcom he refused was Only Fools And Horses. The show’s writer John Sullivan had pitched the idea about a wheeler-dealer market trader to Gilbert a few years earlier but Gilbert refused flat and it was left to head of comedy John Howard Davies to rescue it.

GETTY Manuel, the clumsy waiter in Fawlty Towers",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
268075,"GETTY A young couple have been arrested on suspicion of planning a terrorist attack in France

The couple appeared in front a counter-terror judge, who accused the two youngsters of “collaborating with a terrorist group”, and ordered the pair to be held in pre-trial detention. Police officers found the couple had been communicating with 29-year-old Rachid Kassim – an ISIS recruiter and the terror group’s chief propagandist – via the encrypted messaging app Telegram and plotting attacks.

Anti-terror police are said to have been watching the couple for some time, but, according to police source for AFP, decided to finally arrest the two youths after finding out that they were planning to launch an “imminent” attack on the orders of Mr Kassim. Police officers arrested the unemployed duo last week in Noisy-le-Sec, a drab suburb north-east of Paris.

GETTY They are thought to have been in contact with ISIS recruiter Rachid Kassim

The 17-year-old girl, who is expecting a child with her 21-year-old boyfriend, told police officers she would “never” have carried out a terrorist attack whilst pregnant. She is said to have converted to Islam two years ago, aged 15, and claims she was “forced” to do so by her boyfriend, also a Muslim convert.

GETTY The pair are suspected of planning an 'imminent' attack on the orders of Mr Kassim

Mr Kassim has been using Telegram’s ‘secret’ chat rooms to remotely plan a string of attacks in France from his home in ISIS-held territory. But, although the vast majority of his plots have been successfully thwarted, the propagandist is said to have masterminded the Normandy church attack in July, during which an 86-year-old priest was brutally slaughtered by two jihadists.

GETTY The arrest took place in Noisy-le-Sec last week",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
73414,"The panellist and her sisters became one of the biggest girl groups of the seventies in The Nolans, and appeared on the star's massively popular series The Cliff Richard Show. However, the pair appeared to have very different recollections of the event. ""I introduced your family on my TV show, didn't I?"" grinned the 76-year-old. ""But you weren't there, were you?"" ""Yes I was!"" Coleen hit back. ""You came on and you were this nine-year-old little brat,"" the Summer Holiday singer quipped. And as the girls scrambled to find a clip of the incident, he advised: ""Look up YouTube brat!""

ITV Sir Cliff Richard teased 'brat' Coleen Nolan on Loose Women

ITV Sir Cliff Richard poked fun at Coleen during today's Sir Cliff Richard special

You came on and you were this nine-year-old little brat Sir Cliff Richard, Loose Women

Later, the ITV talk show aired footage of Coleen's first meeting with the pop superstar, which showed the former girl band member being nudged by her elder sister when she seemed reluctant to sing. Today's Cliff-packed edition of the programme saw the national treasure open up about his recent torment, after his house was raided amid historical allegations of sexual abuse. The charges have since been dropped and Sir Cliff is finally back on top with a new album, aptly titled Just… Fabulous Rock 'n' Roll, which looks set to burst into the top five of the Official Albums Chart this Friday.

ITV Coleen appeared on The Cliff Richard Show as a child

Coleen Nolan's biggest confessions Fri, September 30, 2016 Loose Women panelist Coleen Nolan is known for her candid confessions. Here are some of her best remarks. Play slideshow 1 of 11",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
75390,"The Blogs (not pictured) were allegedly called 'dirty jews' by their attackers

Police are investigating the brutal assault of Diana Blog and her husband of 56 years Shmuel in Amsterdam last month.

The harrowing attack has left Shmuel, 87, blind and with a broken thigh bone while his 86-year-old wife has been left with ""extreme pains"".

Two male attackers dressed in black knocked loudly on the couple's door, claiming to be police officers.

But when an unassuming Shmiel opened the door the depraved brutes reportedly charged in with guns pointed at the pair.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
213338,"Mr Clapper, director of National Intelligence, had already expressed dismay that the sleaze-filled document – not produced by US agencies – had been published.

But the maverick Republican, who will be sworn in as President next Friday, tweeted: “James Clapper called me yesterday to denounce the false and fictitious report that was illegally circulated.”

Donald Trump – who has strenuously denied all the claims – added: “Made up, phony facts. Too bad!”",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
42420,"Remember the big fall out between Jose Mourinho and Arsene Wenger at the start of October?

Well, fear not, it's over and the pair have shaken hands.

And Mourinho is back in business. Transfer business.

He wants Marco Reus, and has told the club to start talks with Borussia Dortmund to get his man.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
317065,"Georgia May Foote has broken her silence on Giovanni Pernice's pairing with Laura Whitmore

The 25-year-old actress - who recently split with the professional dancer - has described the TV presenter as a ""beautiful person"" amid claims she was insecure about the Irish beauty partnering up with her former flame. Shutting down the claims on Twitter last night, the former Coronation Street star wrote: ""Good luck to all the @bbcstrictly 2016 cast and crew on their launch show tonight! Sending all my love! Im sure its going to be incredible."" She then added: ""And I would just like to wish @thewhitmore and @pernicegiovann1 good luck. Please do not believe the crap you read! She's a beautiful person"".

Advertisement

BBC The actress has blasted jealousy rumours and described Laura as a 'beautiful person'

WENN Georgia May Foote and boyfriend Giovanni called time on their relationship last month

Her comments comes after reports suggested that the brunette believed show-makers were to keen to spark a romance between her good friend Laura and her ex. Georgia - who was pictured enjoying a girls' night out with Laura, Ashley Roberts and Caroline Flack earlier this week - announced that she was splitting from boyfriend Giovanni just weeks before Strictly returned to screens last night. ""Georgia knows just how intimately couples have to dance and is terrified that Giovanni might hook up with Laura,"" a source told The Sun.

Advertisement

TWITTER The former soap star addressed the rumours on Twitter

INSTAGRAM Georgia and Laura were pictured enjoying a girls' night out together earlier this week

INSTAGRAM Georgia appeared to send a thinly-veiled message to her ex on Friday

Georgia May Foote looks sensational in green dress for London Fashion Week Georgia May attends a London Fashion Week party Georgia May Foote wore a colourful number for the Very fashion week party Georgia May Foote turned heads at the BAFTA Awards Georgia May Foote smoulders at the BAFTA's Georgia May Foote keeps in casual in an off the shoulder jumper and knee high black boots Georgia May Foote attends the Lorraine's High Street Fashion Awards Georgia May Foote looks radiant in an off the shoulder dress Georgia May Foote Georgia May Foote arriving Georgia May Foote (L) and Giovanni Pernice perform durign the Strictly Come Dancing Live Tour rehearsals Georgia May Foote daydreams in the dressing room Georgia May Foote performs during the Strictly Come Dancing Live Tour Georgia May Foote Georgia May Foote looks beautiful in Instagram selfies Georgia May Foote shows off her amazing figure on Instagram Georgia May Foote looks beautiful in Instagram selfies Georgia Looks beautiful in latest instagram snaps Georgia May Foote shows off her amazing figure on Instagram Actress and model Georgia May Foote Strictly Come Dancing and Coronation Street star Georgia May Foote has recreated a series of iconic cultural phone moments from the past 70 years, including Renée Zellweger in Bridget Jones Strictly Come Dancing and Coronation Street star Georgia May Foote has recreated a series of iconic cultural phone moments from the past 70 years, including Marilyn Monroe in How to Marry a Millionaire Strictly Come Dancing and Coronation Street star Georgia May Foote has recreated a series of iconic cultural phone moments from the past 70 years, including Donna Reed in It’s A Wonderful Life Strictly Come Dancing and Coronation Street star Georgia May Foote has recreated a series of iconic cultural phone moments from the past 70 years, including Drew Barrymore in Scream Strictly Come Dancing and Coronation Street star Georgia May Foote has recreated a series of iconic cultural phone moments from the past 70 years, including Jerry Hall on the front cover of Vogue magazine",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
120091,"PH Boston police sergeant Tommy Saunders, played by Mark Wahlberg

PATRIOTS DAY (Cert 15; 130mins) Director Peter Berg pulls out all the stops to create a thriller that places the viewer right at the heart of the chaos and high emotions of the day in April 2013 when three people were killed by two homemade terrorist bombs. In a film that salutes the spirit of the city, Berg is especially good at setting the scene of what started out as a perfectly normal day, making it feel completely grounded in reality. News reports and mobile phone footage are woven into the story as people head for a baseball game or get set for the marathon. We even see brothers Tamerlan (Themo Melikidze) and Dzhokhar (Alex Wolff) Tsarnaev as they prepare to detonate their bombs. Alex Wolff is suitably chilling as Dzhokhar, a man so committed to his cause that he seems divorced from the call of common humanity. We all know what happened next but it still shocks when you see it depicted so vividly on screen, Berg spares us none of the bloodshed or carnage. The one fi ctional element of Patriots Day is true blue Boston police sergeant Tommy Saunders, played by Mark Wahlberg.

Tommy, who never existed, is a very typical Wahlberg character: a no-nonsense, tough-as-nails cop. Although Tommy is a hot-headed character with a previous violation against him, he feels like an overly idealised version of all the brave Boston cops who worked at the marathon and became determined to track down the perpetrators. That makes him a jarring presence in a film otherwise anchored in reality especially since FBI Special Agent Richard DesLauriers (Kevin Bacon), Commissioner Ed Davis (John Goodman) and sergeant Jeffrey Pugliese (JK Simmons) are all based on real Boston fi gures and played by some of the screen’s most reliable character actors. The second half of Patriots Day is a throbbing, fast-moving manhunt with Tommy popping up at all the right moments to offer advice, ideas and bulldoze his way through all the red tape and due process that could impede the investigation. As the net tightens around the terrorist brothers the film builds real edge-of-the-seat tension. It may see the world in black and white, it may tug at the heartstrings a little enthusiastically at times but at its best Patriots Day is a taut, pulse-racing thriller that tries to take something positive from the darkest of times.

PH George Best may have been the finest footballer in the world

A Cure For Wellness (Cert 18; 146mins) The prospect of a pampering stay at a Swiss sanatorium seems a whole lot less attractive after A Cure For Wellness, a florid gothic yarn pitched somewhere between The Shining, Shutter Island and a Vincent Price spine-tingler. It looks opulent but the epic running time and slender storyline make for uneasy bedfellows. Dane DeHaan stars as Lockhart, a rising star on Wall Street dispatched to Switzerland to discover the fate of a company member who left for a spa retreat and never returned. Lockhart has heard plenty of suggestions that nobody in their right mind would want to step over the door. What evil lies within its walls? Is sinister Dr Volmer (Jason Isaacs) to be trusted? Our intrepid, rather colourless hero sets out to investigate but a car crash leaves him a patient in the sanatorium. Could the ethereal, otherworldly Hannah (Mia Goth) be the key to the mystery? There are bags of atmosphere and style in A Cure For Wellness but not much of a story. VERDICT: 2/5

PH Bitter Harvest is a man’s Dr Zhivago set during Stalin’s campaign of genocide against the Ukraine

Sweet Dreams (Cert 12A; 131mins) Childhood trauma leaves scars that never fade in Sweet Dreams, a sentimental but sometimes poignant drama from veteran Italian director Marco Bellocchio. Valerio Mastandrea stars as Massimo, a successful journalist whose career has run the gamut from front line war correspondent in Sarajevo to agony aunt. The loss of his mother when he was just nine years old has haunted his adult life and he has never been able to love anyone else. Moving between Massimo’s lonely life in 1990s Turin and golden memories of his early childhood in the 1960s, he makes a belated attempt to confront the truth of what happened all those years ago and it leads him to a heart-rending discovery. Sweet Dreams boasts some engaging supporting performances from Emmanuelle Devos as a friend’s loving mother and Bérénice Bejo as a sympathetic doctor. VERDICT: 3/5

Films Set in 2017 Tue, January 3, 2017 It's the year 2017 both in Hollywood and now, in reality. Play slideshow Heyday Films 1 of 6 Harry Potter and the Deathly Hallows – Part 2 (2011): The infamous epilogue scene is set 19 years later to 2017

Bitter Harvest (Cert 15; 103mins) It goes without saying that the peasants are revolting in Bitter Harvest, a poor man’s Dr Zhivago set during Stalin’s campaign of genocide against the Ukraine during the 1930s. Artistic Yuri (Max Irons) has decided the beautiful Natalka (Samantha Banks) is the love of his life. Their idyllic rural life ends when the Bolsheviks march in to steal church icons, force peasants off the land and act like pantomime villains. The years of suffering and oppression that follow are just a backdrop to the question of whether the cruelly separated lovers will ever be reunited. Simplistic, sloppy and mostly unconvincing. VERDICT: 2/5",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
338500,"For the first time a quick brain scan can identify adults with the debilitating condition with over 90 per cent accuracy, say researchers, who hope the method will lead to the screening for autism in children in future.

In a study funded by the Medical Research Council and carried out by scientists at the Institute of Psychiatry, King’s College London, scientists used an MRI scanner to take pictures of the brain’s grey matter.

A separate imaging technique was then used to reconstruct these scans into 3D images that a computer algorithm assessed for structure, shape and thickness.

These intricate measurements were able to reveal Autism Spectrum Disorder at its root. Having developed this process, the computer was then able to pinpoint biological markers quickly to assess whether or not a person had ASD. Until now diagnosis has relied on personal accounts from an affected person’s friends and family.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
100076,"Although born in Birmingham, the 19-year-old has played for the Republic through his Irish grandparents and has yet to make a decision on who to represent at full international level. Grealish excelled in the FA Cup semi-final against Liverpool and now former Tottenham boss Sherwood will repeat his advice to one of his former players.

""I had the same situation with Nabil Bentaleb, who could have played for France but decided to pick Algeria,"" he said. ""I did have a chat with him and he asked me what to do. I just said, 'you've got to go with your heart. Do you think you're French or Algerian?'

GETTY Jack Grealish has to decide whether to play for England or the Republic of Ireland

I just said, 'you've got to go with your heart. Do you think you're French or Algerian? Tim Sherwood",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
106318,"GETTY A man has been jailed for manipulating a teenage girl in his care into having sex with him

A court heard the 58-year-old man, who cannot be named to protect the girl's identity, treated her as a ""sex slave"" by plying her with cannabis. He had sex with the then 16-year-old girl while his sleeping wife was sedated on medication in the same bed.

The abuse continued on multiple occasions in their Leicester home, as well as during trips to Bradgate Park, Leicestershire, and other rural places. After her second child was born, and also taken away from her, she asked the defendant to leave her alone. When he refused, in desperation she jumped from a second floor window and suffered broken bones.

The man admitted regularly supplying her with cannabis and three specimen counts of having sex with a child family member, aged between 16 and 18. He was jailed for six years and eight months at Leicester Crown Court. Sentencing him, Judge Simon Hammond said: ""This is about as bad a case of sex with a child family member as you can get.

""She was forbidden fruit and he used her for his own sexual gratification. ""It was a wicked breach of trust by a man who was, in effect, a foster father. ""He groomed her and manipulated her by giving her cannabis and took advantage of her vulnerability.

""She says it's ruined her childhood and destroyed her future, affected her education, career and prospects. ""The legacy of this sort of sexual abuse is devastating. ""She didn't leave because she didn't want to be homeless - she just wanted to be loved. ""There was a disparity in age, the pregnancies were a result of unprotected sex and he put emotional pressure on her.

Karim Benzema appears in court to face charges in Valbuena sex tape case Thu, November 5, 2015 Karim Benzema has appeared in court to face charges in a sex tape blackmail plot involving French international Mathieu Valbuena Play slideshow AFP/Getty Images 1 of 11 Karim Benzema is accused of attempting to extort money from fellow French international Mathieu Valbuena

""The pre-sentence report says he has no insight into his offending and has displayed no remorse. ""He doesn't seem to think he's done anything wrong."" He was made the subject of an indefinite sexual harm prevention order and will have to enrol on a sex offender register for life.

The victim, now in her mid-20s, sat behind a screen to hear the prosecution outline the case against her abuser. Reading out an emotional victim impact statement, the woman said: ""Children should be brought into the world as a result of love not abuse. ""He made me think I couldn't survive on my own. ""I feel contaminated as if I'm damaged goods. At the time I was extremely vulnerable.

""He was supposed to care for me and help me with my problems, not make them worse. ""I felt completely groomed. He made me completely depend on him as if I had no escape. ""I feel a real sense of anger about what happened as if he destroyed my future and took my teenage years away. ""I should have looked back with positivity, not disgust.

GETTY The man treated the girl as a 'sex slave' by plying her with cannabis

""In many years to come I'm going to have to explain to my children what happened and why I lost the care of them. ""I hope they won't resent me and understand the situation I was in."" David Outterside, prosecuting, said: ""The victim moved into the defendant's house with the blessing of social services under a fostering agreement.""

The court heard it was a voluntary adult supervision agreement and he was paid £45 a week to care for her from 2005 and she called him 'Dad'. Mr Outterside said: ""She felt finally safe; she wanted her own family and thought she'd finally found it. It was her dream come true. ""On her 16th birthday, he set about spoiling her, buying CDs, make-up and taking her out in his car and she felt special.""

Several months later when his wife was sedated with drugs prescribed for a medical condition, he gave the victim cannabis and had unprotected sex ""with his wife asleep next to him"". Mr Outterside said: ""She felt she couldn't tell anyone and feared being homeless as she had nowhere else to go. She conceived a child that night."" The next day he apologised, but after a few months the sexual activity continued.

Mr Outterside said: ""She felt scared of losing the defendant because he was the first person to show her love."" The man warned her if she told anyone he would be locked up and manipulated her by saying: ""Without me you'd be nothing and you'll end up killing yourself."" She became a ""housewife"" figure in the family and pretended the pregnancy was the result of a one-night stand. But the evil man would secretly touch her intimately while other family members watched television.

He once showed her a rope-noose he made in the garage, suggesting he would kill himself, to persuade her to perform a sex act upon him. Mr Outterside added: ""He made her feel, in her own words, like a sex slave.""

The defendant and his wife split up and the inappropriate relationship continued until after the girl was 18 and she had a second child - but was unhappy, dependent on him and trapped. Thomas Stanway, defending, said: ""He did care for the complainant. ""He accepts by his pleas that any sexual relationship was inappropriate. He was at a low ebb himself.

GETTY Detective Constable Kate Cheney said the victim has shown 'immense' courage coming forward",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
163717,"Traffic is set to peak at 28 per cent above typical levels at 5pm on Thursday as motorists embark on the bank holiday getaway as soon as the working week is over, according to transport information supplier Inrix. It said the worst affected roads will be major motorways, with some journeys taking as much as three times longer than normal. Drivers between Junctions 9 and 21 on the M25 should expect delays of up to 90 minutes, extending a typical 40-minute journey to more than two hours.

GETTY/REUTERS Traffic is set to peak at 28 per cent above typical levels after 5pm on Thursday

We expect significant delays over the Easter period due to a combination of factors, Graham Cookson

Motorists heading in both directions on the M6 and southbound on the M5 towards the West Country should also prepare for hold-ups of almost an hour, according to the report. Inrix said the worst times to travel will be: • Thursday between 4pm and 6pm • Friday between 10am and 2pm • Monday between 12pm and 5pm

GETTY Motorists heading on the M6 and southbound M5 should prepare for hold-ups

Easter Sunday is expected to be the quietest day on the roads with 25 per cent fewer vehicles compared with an average Sunday. A number of rail services will be disrupted as Network Rail carries out more than 200 engineering projects. Trains to London, Manchester, Bath, Edinburgh and Glasgow are among those affected.

Traffic chaos in Dover Sun, July 24, 2016 Holiday makers face horrendous 20 hour queues at the port of Dover in Kent as France steps up its security checks following the Nice terror attack. Play slideshow PA 1 of 6 Cross-Channel ferry French security checks because of heightened security following the Nice terror attacks

GETTY Trains to London, Manchester, Bath, Edinburgh and Glasgow are affected

Network Rail said it is carrying out the work over the four-day weekend as fewer passengers use the railways on bank holidays. Airports are also expecting a rush of holidaymakers jetting off overseas. Some 868,000 people are due to travel through Heathrow Airport between Good Friday and Easter Monday, including an extra 200,000 families compared with a typical Friday to Monday period. Inrix head of research Graham Cookson said: “With UK drivers spending an average of 30 hours in congestion last year, motorists are no stranger to sitting in traffic.

“We expect significant delays over the Easter period due to a combination of factors, including the regular post-work peak, the start of the school break, people travelling on holiday, railway engineering works and Tube closures. “Our advice to drivers is to consider alternative routes or avoid peak times altogether.“ Highways England said it has lifted more than 300 miles of roadworks ahead of the Easter getaway, meaning almost 98% of motorways and major A roads will be fully open.

GETTY Almost 98% of motorways and major A roads will be fully open",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
161573,"High blood pressure is a potentially-deadly condition that affects 31 per cent of men and 26 per cent of women in the UK.

Having elevated cholesterol levels raises your risk - but altering your diet to include oat milk could help.

Made from whole oats, it is a plant-based, dairy-free alternative to cow’s milk.

However, as well as being suitable for those with particular dietary intolerances or preferences, it could help lower cholesterol levels and therefore ward off high blood pressure.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
269639,"However, no such scene will appear in the new BBC serial - with Heida Reed, who plays the female character, revealing that she and Aidan Turner were involved in the decision to significantly alter it. ""Actually, it did change, as we had conversations,"" she admitted. ""It was a collaborative decision. ""Initially, it was a bit more intense. But we felt it wasn't right.""

WENN • BBC Heida Reed plays Elizabeth in Poldark

BBC Elizabeth was raped by Poldark in the original novel

BBC Aidan Turner plays the titular character

Initially, it was a bit more intense. But we felt it wasn't right Heida Reed

She added to the Daily Mail: ""Aidan and I were both consulted when they were discussing how to interpret that scene, because it's a very delicate one. We had big conversations about it and we rehearsed it a lot."" In the 1953 book, Ross Poldark breaks into Elizabeth's home, grabs her and kisses her. When she asks him not to treat her ""like a s**t"", he bites back: ""It's time you were so treated"", and pushes her onto a bed. Now, fans will instead see a consensual encounter between the two, with a source explaining: ""The new series reflects that [scene] in a way that keeps Ross Poldark as the romantic hero fans want.""

BBC Poldark returned to BBC One last week

First Look: Cast of 'Poldark' film Season 3 Tue, September 6, 2016 Actress Heida Reed who plays Elizabeth Poldark and Jack Farthing who plays George Warleggan pictured on set filming the hit show ""Poldark"" in Cornwall, England Play slideshow FameFlynet.uk.com 1 of 11 Actress Heida Reed who plays Elizabeth Poldark and Jack Farthing who plays George Warleggan pictured filming a scene from the hit show",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
191443,"Check him out: OK Go's new video is full of eye-popping optical illusions[ YOUTUBE]

Ok Go might not be the most famous names in pop, but you will almost certainly remember their iconic Grammy-winning video for 2006's Here It Goes Again. You know, the one where they effortlessly dance from treadmill to treadmill.

It has already notched up more than 20 million views and no doubt caused countless gym-related accidents as people tried to copy the nifty treadmill moves.

Speaking from experience, it really is harder than it looks.

KEEP SCROLLING FOR OK GO'S NEW VIDEO FOR THE WRITING'S ON THE WALL",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
81995,"GETTY Fat people who are fit still face a high risk of heart disease or cancer

Theories that obese people who kept fit could still lead a long life were myths, the Swedish survey reported. A study followed more than 1.3million young men into middle age. It found that fit obese people were 30 per cent more likely to die prematurely.

GETTY A study found that fit obese people were 30 per cent more likely to die prematurely

GETTY The research disproved theories that obese people who kept fit could still lead a long life

They were compared with normal-sized counterparts who did little exercise.

Unfit normal-weight individuals had a 30 per cent lower risk of death from any cause than fit obese individuals Professor Peter Nordstrom

Scientists say the findings, published in the International Journal of Epidemiology, show that weight is by far the most important factor for healthy teenagers. Professor Peter Nordstrom, of Umea university, said the findings challenged the modern notion that obese people can live longer by being fit.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
332732,"GETTY Van Aanholt was replaced at the last minute by Jason Denayer after a heart scare

QPR team news Midfielder Yeni Ngbakoto missed the 2-1 defeat to Huddersfield at the weekend to attend his father’s funeral but could return. Loanee Pawel Wszolek and striker Idrissa Sylla are both expected to come into the team. Sunderland team news Patrick van Aanholt starts despite being dropped in bizarre circumstances at the weekend. The left-back was initially named in the starting line-up at White Hart Lane only to be told he had been removed just minutes before kick-off. Sunderland Team: Pickford, Denayer, van Aanholt, Djilobodji, O'Shea (c), McNair, Kirchhoff, Ndong, Watmore, Gooch, Asoro EVERYTHING YOU NEED TO KNOW ABOUT THE EFL CUP THIRD ROUND

Premier League's highest wages bills Sun, July 24, 2016 Express Sport brings you the Premier League's highest wage bills for 2015/16, as reported by totalsportek.com and addmustard. Which side tops the charts? Play slideshow Getty Images 1 of 21 Bournemouth: £25m – Juan Iturbe takes home £55,000-a-week ahead of goalkeeper Artur Boruc who pockets £32,000

The 26-year-old appeared angry at the decision although Sunderland later revealed it was because they had just received the results of an irregular heart scan on Van Aanholt. Adnan Januzaj however will not be involved after being sent off against Tottenham. Key statistics QPR are on a three-game winning streak against Sunderland in all competitions and have conceded just one goal in the process. But they needed penalties to see off Swindon and edged past Rochdale 2-1 to reach the third round.

Finalists two years ago, Sunderland have fallen at this stage in two consecutive seasons. But the Black Cats have not been beaten in the League Cup by team from a lower division in four years. Last meeting The sides clashed at the Stadium of Light in a relegation six-pointer in February 2015. Leroy Fer and Bobby Zamora scored for QPR as they ended a run of 11 consecutive top-flight away defeats.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
143661,"CONCEIT: Bamber, Mitchell and Hyde all play Henry at the same time

It is the story of dahlia-growing ex-bank manager Henry Pulling who meets his outrageous aunt Augusta at his mother's funeral and then follows her across Europe and South America in the company of smugglers, spooks and Nazi fugitives. Maggie Smith played Augusta in the film but Giles Havergal's 1989 stage adaptation took things to an even camper level by giving all the parts to four men, all dressed as Henry and taking turns to play him while bouncing in and out of the other roles. It is an original conceit but the novelty soon wears off in Christopher Luscombe's revival, which feels like a paler imitation of the madcap West End comedy The 39 Steps.

Jug-eared David Bamber, with the biggest share of Henry's role, provides strong support and has great fun in his deliberate miscasting as various nubile, simpering blondes.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
337249,"Commons Speaker Mr Bercow ticked off the Labour MP for Walthamstow for her long-winded question to Brexit Secretary David Davis on the cost of talks with the European Union. Ms Creasy said the situation was a “mess” and there was a lack of joined-up thinking. She said: “How much is all of this going to cost us? Because it’s certainly something that Government departments don’t seem able to answer. I have been asking them. “In fact, some of them think they’re not paying anything at all and others think everybody else is paying.

PARLIAMENT TV John Bercow said Stella Creasy should stop trying to ""present a thesis"" with her question on Brexit

It is not necessary to treat question time as the occasion for the presentation of a thesis John Bercow

“The Department for Business says it’s received extra cash to pay for the impact of the Brexit negotiations. “Culture says it doesn’t know how much any of this is going to cost. DCLG says it’s expecting the Treasury to pick up the tab and the MoD says it’s not spending anything because they expect there to be a deal, so no funding is required. “It’s a bit of a mess, so can the Secretary of State commit to publishing, by department, by year, how much money is being put aside for the cost of the negotiations.” Mr Bercow interjected and said the Labour MP’s background as an academic doctor did not need to influence her questions in the House.

Brexit negotiations: UK’s key policy positions Wed, September 13, 2017 Here is a summary of the UK’s main proposals for Brexit Play slideshow Getty Images 1 of 8

He said: “Order! I know that the Honourable Lady is an academic doctor but it is not necessary to treat question time as the occasion for the presentation of a thesis.” Mr Davis has warned Britain’s Brexit deal will “probably favour” the EU in a shock admission as he vowed to “intensify” talks with Brussels next week. Addressing the House of Lords European Select Committee, he admitted the negotiations would go Brussels’ way when it came to the divorce bill and other issues. The Brexit Secretary has spent months locked in negotiations with Michel Barnier’s team over the UK’s settlement with Brussels.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
126842,"Louis Walsh, who is to stand down from The X Factor after the next series, said he'd love to appear on Strictly - and he is endorsed by head judge Len Goodman.



""I don't know if it's a rumour or if he's being spiteful to Simon Cowell but it would be interesting if he was on it,"" says Len, 69. ""I'll watch and see. Let's hope he is. It would be good fun.""



If Louis has two left feet, so much the better Len says: ""It's a bizarre thing but we all remember the Ann Widdecombes, the John Sergeants and Russell Grants. Quite often we remember them more than we remember the ones who win.""",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
174408,"The pound jumed ahead of a Brexit speech from Theresa May

Sterling leapt against the euro to 1.12, and against the US dollar to to 1.318, after the Prime Minister's address to Parliament.

Mrs May said the UK has set out how it can operate as an independent trading nation after Brexit.

However, the pound gave back some gains on Tuesday after Britain's trade deficit jumped.

Fears the Prime Minister could be ousted and replaced by the Conservatives plagued the pound last week.

Britain's currency suffered heavy losses against both the euro and the dollar amid rumours Boris Johnson or another Tory could soon replace Mrs May after her party conference speech.

The risk of fresh political turmoil amid Brexit talks pushed traders to sell off the pound.

If the economy appears to be suffering amid political chaos, sterling could see further hits.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
56371,"GETTY Mobile phones can be so expensive that getting insurance can be cost effective

While you probably do not need to cover a cheap handset that you only use for calls and texts, it is a different matter for pricey smartphones. Many will have taken out insurance at the point of purchase, and wondered whether they were getting a good deal. Others will have resisted the hard sell, only to fear they are taking a potentially expensive risk. There is also massive uncertainty over whether your phone is covered by your home contents insurance, and whether that extends outside the home. So have you made the right call?

MOBILE MISERY Handsets can cost nearly £800, but are hugely vulnerable to loss, theft, technical problems or accidental damage. While 93 per cent of Britons now own a mobile, according to financial information business Defaqto, many have no insurance, and even those who are paying for cover only have limited protection. There are 151 mobile phone insurance policies from phone companies, specialist insurers or included in packaged bank accounts, but cover levels vary greatly.

GETTY Handsets can cost nearly £800, but are hugely vulnerable to loss, thef tand technical problem

The vast majority, 97 per cent, pay for accidental damage, while 86 per cent cover breakdown as standard and 80 per cent cover theft. However, over a third refuse to pay for lost phones, or insure against misuse of calls or data by someone who steals or finds your phone. Check what yours offers.

If you are prone to losing or breaking things, cover is a good idea Hannah Maundrell

SMALL PRINT Before signing up to a specialist policy, check what cover you already have through your household contents insurance. Defaqto’s research shows that 95 per cent of the 428 contents policies on the market cover theft from home as standard, but give little cover for other risks. Less than 15 per cent pay for accidental damage at home as standard, and even fewer will protect your mobile from loss, theft or accidental damage outside the home. However, the vast majority will let you buy this as an add-on.

GETTY If you have a habit of losing or breaking phones insurance may be a good idea

Be warned, home insurance policies rarely include cover for handset breakdown, or unauthorised calls. Brian Brown, head of insight at Defaqto, says there are large discrepancies in cover offered by both mobile phone and home contents insurers: “Some consumers may be spending money on a policy that will not help when they need it.” HOME COVER Check whether your policy will give you a brand-new replacement or only a reconditioned handset if you lose your phone, while some limit cover to £350 or less. Brown says: “Check this covers the value of all the handsets you have at any time.”

How to get cheap home insurance Tue, March 28, 2017 How to get the best deal on your home insurance. Play slideshow Getty Images 1 of 11 How to get cheap home insurance

Defaqto offers a free rating service on its website at Defaqto.com/stars, scoring a host of financial products, including mobile insurance, on their benefits and features. Hannah Maundrell, editor-in-chief of comparison site Money.co.uk, says mobile phone insurance is one of those things you tell yourself you do not need, until you do: “If you are prone to losing or breaking things, cover is a good idea.” If tied into a contract, you will have to keep paying monthly even if you have lost or damaged your phone. She adds: “Could you find £800 for a new smartphone?”

GETTY The vast majority of insurance, 97 per cent, pay for accidental damage",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
195200,"Donald Trump has once again hit out at the NFL over their protest

Donald Trump has publicly criticised American football players in recent months over the decision of some to take a knee during the national anthem before matches.

Colin Kaepernick started the act in 2016 to try and highlight racial injustice and police brutality.

Some NFL owners reportedly believe players could soon be kept in locker rooms during the anthem as a result.

And Trump has responded to the speculation on Twitter.

“The NFL is now thinking about a new idea - keeping teams in the Locker Room during the National Anthem next season,” he said.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
165596,"GETTY SPRAY AWAY: Protecting the skin is vital

MOST of us think we’re savvy about suncare but according to new research there is still much confusion when it comes to protecting our skin from damaging rays. In fact 40 per cent of us believe sunscreen is only necessary when on holiday. Another common misunderstanding is that you get sunburn only when it’s hot. The heat isn’t what burns, it’s the UVA and UVB rays in sunlight that can damage the skin even when it’s cloudy. Sun damage builds up over time and the results, which can include everything from leathery skin and pigmentation marks to skin cancer, can take years to show. In the UK about 13,300 people are diagnosed with malignant melanoma and 250,000 with non-malignant melanoma each year. The sun, sunbeds and sunlamps are responsible for 90 per cent of cases. Yet skin cancer remains preventable by decreasing exposure to UV rays, protecting the skin with an SPF30+ and by checking for any changes in moles. To mark this week’s annual British Association of Dermatologists’ Sun Awareness Week we’ve rounded up the top sunscreens for 2015 plus the best treatments for sun damage.

TOP TREATMENTS Problem: MINOR DAMAGE Pelleve is ideal for the face and hands and tackles fi ne lines and sagging skin with radio frequency energy to tighten and firm. A gel is applied to the skin and a hand-held device is used to heat the area, tightening the skin and stimulating collagen production. Results can be seen immediately and then continue over three to six months. A course of three treatments, two weeks apart, is recommended. From £150 per treatment. Problem: Deep wrinkles Laser resurfacing will deal with more severe sun damage on the face, hands and chest and is good at evening out skin tone. The treatment will be tailored to how serious the damage is so recovery time can vary but you should expect red, dry or swollen skin for up to a week. From £595 per treatment.

JACOBS STOCK PHOTOGRAPHY Sun protection is key from a young age

Problem: DECOLLETAGE The skin on the decolletage is very delicate and particularly prone to photo-ageing. Years of sun damage combined with the natural thinning of the skin over time can lead to wrinkles and unsightly pigmentation marks. Sculptra injections will smooth and plump skin while tackling hyperpigmentation. You will need about four treatments at £250 per session and results should last two to three years. Problem: Age spots Photodynamic therapy (PDT), an established procedure for treating non-melanoma skin cancer, can also rejuvenate age spots and areas of pigmentation. Microdermabrasion is used to remove dead skin cells and prepare the skin. Then a light-sensitising cream is applied and left for three hours. A light is shone on the treated area, targeting and destroying damaged cells, which are replaced with healthy cells. You may have redness in the area for up to a week. One treatment costs £1,500 and the results are permanent. ? For more details on treatments call 020 7436 4441 ? For advice about cosmetic surgery consult your GP. For more of Lesley’s tips see lesleyreynolds.com Don’t forget the most important thing you can do to protect your skin is to wear an SPF30 all the time. These are our top picks. BEST FOR: INFRARED PROTECTION Ladival Sun Protection Spray SPF30, £20 (boots.com) When it comes to sun protection the first thing we usually think about is UVA/UVB rays. However a new study shows we should also be protecting ourselves against infrared rays, those who have a suppressed immune system, have undergone chemotherapy or have a history of non-melanoma skin cancer. It protects against UVA and UVB rays. BEST FOR: BARGAIN HUNTERS Wilko Moisturising Sun Lotion SPF50, £2 (wilko.com) This great value cream protects against UVA and UVB rays, is water-resistant and has many of the same ingredients used by more expensive brands.

SOUTHERN STOCK Protecting all parts of your body is important",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
211549,"A total of 12 people were killed and 48 injured, with 18 in a critical condition, after the large lorry ploughed about 50metres into the world famous market in Breitscheidplatz, central Berlin. Police have said it was a terror attack and have arrested a 23-year-old Pakistani migrant who arrived in Germany in February to claim asylum. Mrs Merkel called for Germans to not let the terrorists win as she said Christmas Markets are an important part of the country's culture. She said it would be ""repugnant"" if the attacker turned out to be an asylum seeker who Germans had welcomed with open arms.

Making an official statement at 11am (10am GMT), Mrs Merkel, said: “This is a very difficult day, as millions of people in Germany, I’m shocked and very saddened by what happened last night at the Breitscheidplatz in Berlin. “12 people that were amongst us yesterday, that were looking forward to Christmas and were looking forward to the Christmas season, are no longer with us. “It’s a terrible deed which we cannot understand.

Sky News Angela Merkel said it would be repugnant if the attack was carried out by a migrant

“It took their lives. Many people are fighting for their lives and health and in these hours I first and foremost think of these people, the dead, the injured and their families. “All of us in the whole of the country are with you in deep sadness. “We all hope for you and pray for you that you will find solace and comfort, that you will gain your health and continue to live after these terrible events.

Reuters German police placed concrete security blocks outside the market this morning",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
232347,"Show sources have claimed the 37-year-old was furious following remarks that his Bollywood themed routine did not ""have enough"" Salsa in it. Kicking off backstage following the comments, Will apparently raged to a member of the production team saying: “I don’t need this s**t.” The heated confrontation between the long-serving judge and the Pop Idol winner came after he danced to Jai Ho with 34-year-old professional dancer Karen Clifton. Strictly’s Len ruffled Will's feathers when he said: ""Now you can boo if you want, but I only tell the truth everyone. For me, not enough salsa.

BBC Len Goodman and Will Young clashed on the show

""I loved the dance, it was entertaining, I enjoyed it, I thought your dancing was great. But, it's a salsa and I wanted more of the salsa. I got about six or eight bars in the middle."" Will interjected, replying: ""There are 24 counts of eight with salsa in there in the routine,"" before Len quipped: ""Very nice of you to say that to me Will, but I must say, most of them I didn't recognise. It's probably my fault."" Sarcastically replying, Will then said: ""You're the expert,"" before Len commented: ""My other little advice is turn up, keep up and shut up. It's only a joke, it's only a joke Will."" Sources also claimed the former contestant had infuriated partner Karen by failing to give “100 per cent” in training sessions.

BBC Len Goodman told Will Young to 'shut up'

BBC Tess Daly and Karen Clifton were surprised by the remarks

BBC Ore Oduba gained the first ten of the series last night

Will Young quits Strictly Come Dancing Fri, October 14, 2016 Will Young sensationally quit Strictly Come Dancing yesterday due to 'personal reasons' but he's since insisted that he's 'absolutely dandy'. Play slideshow 1 of 16",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
26689,"GETTY Jesse Lingard reckons Man Utd would be top of the table in any other season.

United are second in the table with 13 wins from a possible 18, but they still sit 11 points behind leaders City. Pep Guardiola’s side look on track to beat all Premier League records this campaign and have already set a new win-streak with 15 victories in a row. Most pundits have already given City the title for dominating and ruthless style of play. But Lingard still thinks United have a chance to overthrow their cross-city rivals - despite losing the Manchester derby 2-1 last week.

Jesse Lingard Milly Rock celebration for Manchester United Sun, December 3, 2017 Click to reveal the best snaps of Jesse Lingard's Milly Rock celebration Play slideshow Man Utd via Getty Images 1 of 10 Click for the best snaps of Jesse Lingard's Milly Rock celebration

GETTY Lingard is enjoying playing alongside Romelu Lukaku this season.

I think any other season we would be top with the points we have. Jesse Lingard speaking about Man Utd.

""If we keep winning games that's the most important thing,"" Lingard said. ""With the squad we have got, we have to always believe in each game. Some games we will play badly and win and sometimes we will play well and lose. ""I think any other season we would be top with the points we have, so as long as we keep winning we will see where we are."" Lingard has started this season in a more central role behind Romelu Lukaku.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
316576,"Ashley Madison has 37 million users across the globe, including some 1.2 million British customers

Cheating spouses have rushed to delete their profiles on adulterous social network AshleyMadison.com, which sells itself with the tagline 'Life Is Short. Have An Affair'. It emerged yesterday that Ashley Madison, an online dating service for people seeking extramarital affairs, has been hacked by an organisation called The Impact Team. The hackers are demanding AshleyMadison.com and its sister website be shutdown. If their demands are not met, the cybercriminals have threatened to leak the websites' 37 million users' most intimate details including names, ages, addresses, credit card information, nude pictures and sexual fantasies. The stolen database could expose the identities of millions of adulterers across the globe.

Advertisement

The Impact Team claim they targeted Ashley Madison because the website's £15 Full Delete feature, which promises to completely erase any information associated with a user's profile, does not delete credit card information. Avid Life Media, the Canadian firm that owns AshleyMadison, has disputed this allegation. And now a member of the hacking community has revealed that The Impact Team could be planning something much sinister with the stolen data. Rather than the motivation listed in their online statement, which paints the cybercriminals in a positive light, an anonymous hacker has claimed the group is using the news coverage as publicity to then sell the data to the highest bidder. The insider, who is reportedly well connected within the hacking community, told Sky News that The Impact Team are ""just bluffing"" about leaking the data. ""They claim that they are going to give all the information out, especially credit card details and all the other 'links' and the 'hashes',"" the anonymous hacker told Sky. ""I don’t think they're going to release them. ""They have a better chance of selling on to someone else or to a 'Blackcat Market' on the 'Deep Web'. They’ll profit from this in a big way, especially with the size of this database.""

IG The anonymous hacker claims The Impact Team are weekly publicity to sell the credit card information

Advertisement

He believes the threat to expose the stolen data is a publicity stunt to get buyers interested in the huge database of credit card details that will reportedly soon go on sale online in batches of between 100 to 1 million users. In a statement, Ashley Madison parent company Avid Life Media said: ""We were recently made aware of an attempt by an unauthorised party to gain access to our systems. ""We immediately launched a thorough investigation utilising leading forensics experts and other security professionals to determine the origin, nature, and scope of this incident. ""We apologise for this unprovoked and criminal intrusion into our customers' information. ""The current business world has proven to be one in which no company's online assets are safe from cyber-vandalism, with Avid Life Media being only the latest among many companies to have been attacked, despite investing in the latest privacy and security technologies.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
194259,"The Environment Secretary pledged to “maintain and enhance” environmental standards under a “green Brexit”.

Early next year he will launch a public consultation on setting up a statutory watchdog to replace the European Commission as “green overseer”.

Mr Gove accepted that the EU has helped to improve the environment through directives that protect habitats and endangered species.

But he said the EU’s common fisheries and agricultural policies have “damaged” the environment.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
321356,"But chief executive Ross McEwan warned it could only restart payouts once it had put recent scandals and litigation behind it. Taxpayer-backed RBS cheered investors with an unscheduled trading update showing losses from bad debts were £800million lower than previously reported.

It said its capital resolution arm, which holds problem assets, would release £500million of impairment provisions, while its Ulster Bank arm would release £300million following an improvement in the Irish property market. McEwan said the bank, which is facing investigations into alleged currency market rigging and its treatment of small business customers, was braced for further litigation costs.

Advertisement

He added: “I look forward to getting to a point in the next 18 months or so where the past conduct issues are substantially behind us. “We need to get ourselves through these before we see a real path to paying a sustainable dividend.” RBS shares rose 6 3/4p to 368 1/4p.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
332637,"Ed Sheeran is taking over the world, very politely, of course.



The flame-haired superstar posted a sweet message to his fans as he debuted his new Youtube channel today.



""Hi, Ed here. This is the brand new channel for my first ever record label…hopefully my last ever record label, depending on how it goes,"" he rambles.



He asks his fans to subscribe to the channel and hopes that they will like everything that he posts, but he also welcomes any negative comments before going off on a whole mild-mannered tangent about internet trolls. Let's hope he gets his focus back in time to hit the stage with Adam Lambert at this wekeend's Fusion Festival in Birmingham. WATCH ED'S VIDEO MESSAGE NEXT

Advertisement

As always it's clear that fans don't just love his music, they love his ""AWKWARDLY DORKY"" appeal. (They also seem to love writing things in upper case.)



""I love how he just drifts off of the topic in the end xD That is sooo Ed, that's why we love him, because he always speaks before he thinks xD it is just too cute when he doesn't know what he is talking about anymore!"" writes Leni Watson.



Then again, we struggle to imagine who could possibly ever want to troll anything that lovely Ed does.



Besides that, his fans are a little (or a lot) scarily protective of their beloved star.



Witness the upper cased fury of fan Rajan Subedi that two people had dared to hit the 'Dislike' button.



""I WILL FREAKIN DESTROY THE ONE WHO DISLIKED THIS VIDEO I SWEAR TO GOD !!!! ITS UR LAST CHANCE TAKE IT BACK"" wrote Rajan.



Blimey.

PH Ed Sheeran signs the first act, Jamie Lawson, to his new label

Advertisement",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
209806,"Forensics search for evidence at the scene in Athens

The attack comes days before President Barack Obama is due to visit the Greek capital.

The Greek government has condemned the attack and described it as an act of terrorism.

The policeman who has been wounded was on duty outside the French Embassy when he was attacked by the unknown assailants.

No one has claimed responsibility for the attack on the building.

A police official has said: “It was probably a hand grenade.”",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
363500,"Mourinho hit out a coaches that refused to adopt counter-attacking tactics of the kind he has employed with great success in leading Chelsea to the title this season. And he says that talk of a new generation of coaches who focus exclusively on free-flowing attacking football or dominating possession is misplaced. Ferguson retired from football two years ago but Mourinho claims his winning mentality means that he would have remained successful at Old Trafford.

Advertisement

He told The Sunday Times: ""When people talk about a new generation of coaches — what is that new generation? ""The generation will always be the ones that win. And the ones that win occasionally or never win will always be something else. ""And Sir Alex, if he wanted, was today coaching Manchester United, he would still be one of the best managers in the game. There is no new generation.

Advertisement",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
257158,"Ed Miliband would be more suited to a job as a stand-up comedian than in politics [REX]

Here’s some good news for him. If he doesn’t make it into Downing Street next year there’s another career for which he is proving very well suited. On Monday night he spoke to a large audience and had me in stitches. Isn’t that what stand-up comedians do?

Admittedly there weren’t any jokes. And he wasn’t trying to be funny. But if he can make me laugh at a speech about public service reform then he has clearly got what it takes for a career in stand-up comedy, assuming the current job doesn’t last beyond 2015.

They say that timing is everything in comedy. Ed Miliband’s is perfect. At the very moment when his Labour Party is cementing its position as an economic laughing stock Mr Miliband made the claim in his speech on Monday that as prime minister he would model himself on Baroness Thatcher. Baroness Thatcher! The woman who rescued Britain from economic disaster.

The Labour leader said that he, like she, was a “conviction politician”. “To be a successful government you need a defining mission,” he went on.

Excuse me, Mr Miliband but it takes more than a determination to push through your ideas to make for a successful government, let alone to stand comparison with the greatest peacetime PM of the modern era.

For one thing those ideas have to be worth pushing through. And – let’s be polite here – your defining mission is about as far from Baroness Thatcher’s as it’s possible to imagine.

When Margaret Thatcher took power in 1979 she was faced with a country in the grip of the union barons, inflation out of control, the economy almost on its death bed and a pervasive sense of doom and decay that meant even the most optimistic among us thought that we were as a nation effectively finished.

By the time she left office in 1990 our economy was a model for the rest of Europe, the City was a world leader and privatisations turned decaying monoliths into efficient and competitive companies.

The 1970s doom mongering had been replaced with a fizz and buzz that few had thought remotely possible when she took office. And all of that was achieved despite the visceral hatred of the Labour Party. That’s a defining mission. That’s conviction.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
87734,"GETTY Michael Carrick has made six appearances for Manchester United this season

Carrick, 34, suffered the strain during England's warm-up before their 6-0 demolition of San Marino on Saturday. The United midfielder sat out the game and yesterday manager Roy Hodgson revealed the injury was not serious.

However, it is bad enough for Carrick to miss England's clash with Switzerland at Wembley tonight and it is not known if he will be fit in time to face Liverpool at Old Trafford on Saturday (5.30pm). ""We don't believe it's that serious. It's quite strange. It came out of nowhere almost,"" Hodgson said.

""It was at the start of a warm-up in San Marino. He felt something very, very small, very, very slight. ""He had a preliminary type of scan with our doctors and they decided there's something there. ""It's up to Manchester United to look at it much more closely. We don't believe it's a long-term injury. ""But of course more than enough to keep him out of the game which both he and I are disappointed by.""",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
87775,"Steve Wozniak made the demands after it was revealed the company makes £5.9million every HOUR but only paid Britain £11.8million in corporation tax in 2015.



It avoided higher payments by setting up complex company arrangements through Ireland and Luxembourg.



It meant it took Apple just two hours to make enough last year to pay the tax bill.



Mr Wozniak, who founded Apple with the late Steve Jobs and Ronald Wayne in 1976, said: ""I don't like the idea that Apple might be unfair - not paying taxes the way I do as a person.



""I do a lot of work, I do a lot of travel and I pay over 50 per cent of anything I make in taxes and I believe that's part of life and you should do it.""

When asked if Apple should pay that amount, he replied: ""Every company in the world should.""",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
294637,"The Xbox Scorpio will mixed reality games along with the Xbox One

The Xbox Scorpio has been confirmed as an elite console that will also boast an elite price. Microsoft have not been shying away from the fact that its next console will be an expensive commodity.

Being touted as the most powerful console ever created, it’s hard to expect anything other than a top price point for the console which is set to arrive later in 2017.

Early specs have revealed that the Xbox Scorpio will boast 6 teraflops of GPU, and will aim to deliver 4K gaming and support virtual reality.

And in a new update, Microsoft have also confirmed that the Xbox Scorpio is set to have access to an exclusive group of games, along with the Xbox One.

The tech giant recently announced their new mixed reality gaming program, which will be powered by the Acer developer edition headset.

Developers who recently attended Microsoft’s Mixed Reality session at GDC were given access and a unit to help them start building new “experiences”.

They also confirmed that game developers interested in building content for Windows Mixed Reality can sign up for ID@Xbox.

But Microsoft aren’t just aiming for mixed reality content on the Windows 10 platform, they also confirmed: “Windows Mixed Reality experiences will light up on other devices over time, beyond desktop and Microsoft HoloLens.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
144883,"WENN • CEN Robbie Williams got a little confused as to what country he was in last night

The British hitmaker was appearing at a sell-out gig in Belgrade, the capital of Serbia, when he is said to have almost caused a diplomatic incident. The 41-year-old boomed: ""Good evening Zagreb"" - the capital of Croatia - as soon as he walked out on stage. Robbie's blunder was particularly embarrassing as the capital he thought he was in, was recently engaged in a bitter civil war with Serbia, and there are still tensions between the countries. The 33,000 fans who attended the gig were reportedly taken aback by his mistake, but he quickly won them over after launching into some of his biggest hits.

CEN The singer was in Serbia but thought he was in Croatia

Robbie may be feeling a bit weary because he has already appeared in Spain, France, Lithuania, Latvia, Russia, Belarus, Poland, Slovakia, Austria and Tel Aviv. And he's also been shooting a commercial in Germany. The star did manage to redeem himself at the end of his set, asking his hysterical fans: ""Serbia, am I your son?"", it has been stated. And if there were any lingering doubts, he also got them back on side by singing a good night song via video link to his baby son, Charlton Valentine.

CEN The British star however managed to win back the crowd

WENN Robbie sang to his baby son via video during the sell out show",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
174658,"Xbox and Playstation consoles are sparking a rise in sleeping problems among children [ALAMY / PIC POSED BY MODEL]

Xbox and Playstation consoles along with Apple iPhones have sparked the sharp rise, according to doctors at Alder Hey children's hospital in Liverpool.



Experts say traditional remedies like having a bath before bedtime or being read a story in bed can cure the sleeping problems.



But they also said that long working hours among parents mean that often does not happen.



Dr Richard Appleton, consultant paediatric neurologist at the hospital, said: ""There are sleep problems where families put their children to bed at appropriate times but they are playing the Playstation or Xbox and are hyped-up, or they've had a fizzy drink so they are caffeinated.""



In the study children were given sleep diaries to look at what habits they got into before bedtime.

An expert said that good parenting can stop children getting into bad ""sleep hygiene"" [ALAMY / PIC POSED BY MODEL]

There are sleep problems where families put their children to bed at appropriate times but they are playing the Playstation or Xbox and are hyped-up Dr Richard Appleton",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
20484,"The royal couple’s first official engagement became a worldwide sensation after bold Alison, 42, was caught yelling “Harry” and “Megs” in a bid to have a few words with the lovers.

However, the video sparked outrage after some thought the Big Brother contestant’s style of interviewing was “disrespectful”, especially considering Prince Harry was forced to swerve the microphone.

In an unusual twist, it seems that Alison’s quirks could have bagged This Morning an exclusive chat with the happy couple.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
225563,"Budgies yawn to show empathy with other members of their flock

Like their human owners, the tiny Australian cage birds are also adept at making yawning contagious.

Scientists have discovered that when a budgie yawns it makes other birds yawn, too.

This unusual behaviour is well known in primates, dogs and rats, but, for the first time, a non-mammal species has been recorded spreading the yearn to yawn.

Rather than being an instinctive reaction, a budgerigar yawn appears to be the way birds show empathy with other members of their flock.

Working from field observations of wild budgerigars, bio-psychologists from State University, New York, were conducted laboratory tests on the popular birds to discover the mystery of their yawning behaviour.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
335562,"Supermarket worker Carl Wheatley, 31, left little Alexa-Marie Quinn’s body black with 66 bruises and knocked out her front teeth. His relentless attacks over ten days stemmed from his frustration at his failure to get custody of his three year old son, the court heard. Judge Andrew Bright QC told him: ""The beatings began around ten days before she died and you kept her indoors and out of sight, so others didn't see the injuries you had caused. The judge said Wheatley's ""final and fatal"" attack on his daughter could only be described as ""relentless and sadistic and to a horrifying degree."" He added: “You were entrusted with her sole care by social workers. It’s difficult to imagine a greater breach of trust.”

SWNS Wheatley joked with prison officers just before the verdict was read out

Advertisement

Wheatley had hoped to secure a two bedroomed house and more benefits if he could get custody of his children, the court heard. Alexa-Marie, described as a happy girl who loved to sing and dance, was in the care of loving foster parents in Bedfordshire after being taken from her mother several years before. But, in 2013, Wheatley - who suffers from ADHD and anxiety - was able to convince social workers he was fit and able to look after his little daughter. In January 2014, Alexa-Marie went to live with Wheatley at his home in Queen Bee Court, Hatfield and was murdered two months later. The killer was sentenced to life imprisonment with a minimum of 21 years behind bars. Council officials have announced an independent review of all the agencies that failed to prevent Alexa-Marie’s murder. Jenny Coles, Director of Children’s Services at Hertfordshire County Council, said the inquiry would be carried out by the Hertfordshire Safeguarding Children Board (HSCB). She said: “We are keen to see its results and will welcome any recommendations about any improvements to our services and in our work with vulnerable children and their families.""

SWNS Alexa-Marie Quinn had only been in her father's custody for two months when she was beaten to death

Advertisement",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
151171,"GETTY Renato Sanches earned a big money move to Bayern Munich in the summer

The likes of Lionel Messi, Wayne Rooney and Paul Pogba have won the coveted trophy at the start of their careers. Sanches was up against Manchester United's Rashford and Bayern Munich team-mate Kingsley Coman. A group of journalists from 30 newspapers across Europe voted for the best player in 2016 under the age of 21.

GETTY Marcus Rashford has enjoyed a breakthrough year at Manchester United

GETTY Raheem Sterling won the award in 2014 during his time at Liverpool

Sanches burst onto the scene at Benfica with his electrifying pace and fearless attitude, earning him a £27.5million to German giants Munich. And the winger helped Portugal win the European Championships this summer for the first time in their history breaking numerous records in the process due to being just 19. Rashford meanwhile only made his United debut in February this year with four goals in his opening two games.

GETTY Anthony Martial won the award last year in his debut season at Man United

Premier League players nominated for the UEFA Golden Boy award Thu, September 29, 2016 Click through the gallery for the list of Premier League young guns nominated for the UEFA Golden Boy award Play slideshow GETTY 1 of 11 Click through the gallery for the list of Premier League young guns nominated for the UEFA Golden Boy award",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
324420,"Terry Smith risked his life to save people from the fireball

Brave Terry Smith, 50, was just metres away from the explosion as a pilot nosedived into a busy road during a popular airshow yesterday. After making sure his eight-year-old daughter was safe, Smith pulled people from stranded cars as flames engulfed the A27 in Shoreham, West Sussex. He compared the scene to a ""horror movie"", saying: ""The fireball was just immense – it was searing heat I could feel burning my skin. I can't believe I escaped with my life.""

Advertisement

Mr Smith, who has been attending the airshow for several years, said the shock after the crash was ""instant"". He added: ""It was like seeing images of the 9/11 terrorist attack, all the flames shooting out the building. ""There wasn't a trail of fire behind it. The fireball didn't go with it, it was ahead of the wreckage. I was just stunned afterwards.""

GETTY Pilot Andy Hill was miraculously pulled from the crash alive

The pilot, named locally as Andy Hill, was miraculously pulled from the crash alive. But seven people died on the dual carriageway and a further 14 were injured, South East Ambulance Service announced. And police last night warned more bodies may be recovered from the A27, which will be closed for several days. Reliving the moment of impact, Mr Smith told the Mirror: ""Two cars collided in front of me. I looked round to make sure my daughter was OK. ""There was a couple next to us and we went over to look if this couple were OK. We pulled them from the car – it was terrifying.""

Advertisement

The Hawker Hunter jet bursts into flames as it crashed on the A27 in Shoreham The damaged remains of part of the wing of the Hawker Hunter fighter jet A crane lifts a section of the Hawker Hunter jet The damaged remains of the fuselage of a Hawker Hunter fighter jet A giant crane is used to remove wreckage of the plane on the A27 Shoreham Airshow crash: A minute's silence is held on the Old Tollbridge near the A27 at Shoreham in West Sussex, close to the scene of the Shoreham air disaster. Shoreham Airshow crash: A minute's silence is held on the Old Tollbridge near the A27 at Shoreham in West Sussex, close to the scene of the Shoreham air disaster. Part of the A27 which has been closed off after a Hawker Hunter jet crashed on the road killing 11 people Emergency services and crash investigation officers work at the site where a Hawker Hunter fighter jet crashed The crash site on the A27 has been closed off so emergency services and crash investigators can continue their recovery operation Emergency services and crash investigation officers work at the site where a Hawker Hunter fighter jet crashed onto the A27 road at Shoreham near Brighton Victim - Maurice Abrahams, 76, from Brighton Personal Trainer Matt Jones, 24, is named as one of the victims who died in the Shoreham air crash Matthew Grimstone and Jacob Schilt circled in a team picture at Worthing United FC Worthing FC goalkeeper Matthew Grimstone has been named as one of the victims who died in the Shoreham air crash Worthing FC Midfielder Jacob Schilt has been named as one of the victims who died in the Shoreham air crash Former RAF pilot Andy Hill is fighting for his life after being pulled from the wreckage of the Hawker Hunter jet plane crash The Hawker Hunter jet pilot can be seen flying across the airfield moments before it crashed on the A27 Search and Rescue teams attends the scene on the A27 as seven people have died after a plane crashed into cars on the major road during an aerial display at the Shoreham Airshow in West Sussex Roads are closed in Shoreham after a Hawker Hunter jet crashed on the A27 An explosion at the Shoreham air show as a 1950s Hawker Hunter jet crashes on the A27 The remains of a car can be seen in the aftermath of the Hawker Hunter jet crash on the A27 in Shoreham Spectators look in horror as the Hawker Hunter jet crash lands on the A27 in Shoreham A Hawker Hunter jet erupts into a fireball on the A27 in Shoreham, West Sussex. Police and members of the emergency serv Flames and thick black smoke rise high on the A27 after a Hunter plane crashed The Hawker Hunter jet is seen flying across the airfield moments before it crashed on the A27 A Hawker Hunter jet has crashed at the Shoreham air show in West Sussex. A Hawker Hunter jet has crashed at the Shoreham air show in West Sussex Plumes of smoke as an air show plane crashes on the A27 in Shoreham Emergency services and crash investigation officers work at the site where a Hawker Hunter fighter jet crashed The Hawker Hunter jet performing stunts seconds before it crashed The Hawker Hunter jet is seen flying across the airfield moments before it crashed on the A27 The Hawker Hunter jet is seen flying across the airfield moments before it crashed on the A27 The Hawker Hunter jet is seen plummeting twoards the ground as it crashed on the A27 A Coast Guard helicopter searches for the crashed Hawker Hunter jet in Shoreham A Hawker Hunter jet has crashed at the Shoreham air show in West Sussex. The jet is seen flying across the airfield moments before the crash, 22 August 2015. Thick black smoke fills the sky as a Hawker Hunter jet crash lands in Shoreham A Coast Guard helicopter searches for the Hawker Hunter jet in Shoreham The Hawker Hunter plane nose diving moments before it crashed Smoke covers the A27 in Shoreham after a plane crashes Spectators watch in horror as a Hawker Hunter plane crashes at Shoreham air show The Hawker Hunter jet is seen flying across the airfield moments before it crashed on the A27",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
321805,"Derek Martin will make his final appearance as Charlie Slater this week

The long-serving character, who was a regular mainstay from 2000 to 2011 and has since popped up in rare guest appearances, will return to Albert Square on Monday night but won't survive the week. June Whitfield's Sister Ruth kick-starts an explosive chain of events when she reveals to Kat (Jessie Wallace) that she has a secret son - to whom she gave birth at the same time as Zoe (Michelle Ryan).

Advertisement

It transpires that Mo (Laila Morse) knew she had twins all alongs, and a huge row between the pair results in Charlie suffering a huge heart attack. In his final breaths, he asks Kat for her forgiveness - but there is devastation when he passes away.

BBC Charlie collapses as tensions rise between Mo and Kat

BBC Can Kat and Charlie make up while there's still time?

Advertisement

The shock development paves the way for the return of Belinda Peacock (nee Slater), who will now be played by Carli Norris, taking over from Leanne Lakey. It is not thought that Lynne (Elaine Lordan), Little Mo (Kacey Ainsworth) or Zoe will be back. Charlie's death and the news of the secret son will lead Kat and Alfie (Shane Ritchie) abroad to Ireland, where they will have their own six-part special.

BBC Kat sits with her dad in his final moments

BBC Charlie also meets Stacey's new baby

BBC Stacey (Lacey Turner) joined the show as an extension to the Slater family

The couple had been absent from Walford for the second half of 2015, after each taking some time away from the soap. EastEnders continues on Monday at 8pm on BBC One.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
365721,"The striker, whose goal in the dying minutes of this match put spring and belief back into the Foxes after their last gasp defeat against Arsenal a fortnight ago, brushed off claims they might collapse under the weight. Conversely, he maintained the experience of handling an even greater burden last season when they were fighting for their top flight lives, could put them in the box seat over the course of the final 11 matches. ""It's a different pressure now than last year because last year was the pressure to stay up and now we are fighting to get into the Champions League or to win the title,"" said Ulloa. ""But I would say there is no pressure on us - the pressure is for the big teams. We are in a better position and we need to keep Leicester there."" While Leicester's players insist that pressure is building somewhere other than the King Power, the release of tension when a winner finally went in on Saturday with two minutes of normal time remaining on the clock could have put a rocket into space.

Express Sport brings you all the best pictures from Round 27 of the Premier League Marcus Rashford was the hero for Manchester United as he bagged two goals in their 3-2 win over Arsenal at Old Trafford Louis van Gaal stole the limelight on the touchline as he demonstrated a dive to the fourth official Tottenham Hotspur came from a goal down to win 2-1 at Swansea City, with Danny Rose grabbing the winner Nacer Chadli celebrates bringing Spurs level, cancelling out Alberto Paloschi's opener Leonardo Ulloa scores the late winner for Leicester Ulloa's goal against Norwich keeps Leicester top Leonardo Ulloa celebrates his goal for the Foxes Shane Long scored the opening goal at St Mary's against Chelsea But Chelsea fought back to win 2-1 Fraser Forster's clean sheet record for Southampton ended in their defeat Craig Gardner, Craig Dawson and Saido Berahino all got on the socresheet as West Bromwich Albion beat Crystal Palace at The Hawthorns Connor Wickham scored twice late on for visitors, but Palace are now winless in 10 games Marko Arnautovic scored twice in Stoke's win over strugglers Aston Villa Marko Arnautovic It was a goalless stalemate as Watford took on Bouremouth Miguel Britos in action with Bournemouth's Max Gradel Michail Antonio scored the only goal of the game at Upton Park And his celebration was one of a kind! Michail Antonio's strike secured three points for West Ham

Advertisement

This was by no means a vintage performance by Ranieri's men after a two-week break with several of their top performers seeming a shade under-cooked: Riyad Mahrez, Wes Morgan, Danny Drinkwater and Jamie Vardy all looking off the pace. For that, Canaries manager Alex Neil deserves some credit, deploying five at the back in an effort to stifle. But it was Ranieri who gained the tactical upper hand and the points for finally unlocking Norwich. Ulloa was the key component in a triple switch as Ranieri tried to stretch the Norwich backline to breaking point. The snap finally came in the 89th minute when Marc Albrighton's cross from the right was met at the far post by the Argentinian forward. Cue delirium. Ranieri, who could be without N'Golo Kante tomorrow against West Brom after the midfielder suffered a slight hamstring strain, acknowledged that there will be further struggles against teams keen to 'park the bus' - of 11 matches, four are against relegation strugglers.

""There will not be any easy matches - every one will be a battle,"" said Ranieri. And while he remains doggedly reluctant to project his hopes beyond the next match he did offer a scrap to those desperate for him to issue a ""we can win it"" rallying cry. ""Let me get past the next four matches and I might say something more,"" he said with a smile. ""I can't tell you much for another month."" By that time Leicester will have battled not only Baggies, but Hornets, Magpies and Eagles - the threats getting suitably more ferocious as they progress. Yet Ranieri is not about to take a backward step. ""It think it could could be an advantage for us that we are playing only in the league [against others engaged on multiple fronts] but we have to continue to take risks. One point is nothing. You can lose but it is only one point less than a draw,"" he said. West Brom arrive tomorrow to test that sense of adventure. ""Every game will be difficult for us,"" said Ulloa. ""Against Norwich it was difficult and against West Brom it will be the same. But we are just thinking about the games. We are not thinking about the pressure."" He and his teammates must be the only people in the country who are not. Leicester (4-4-2): Schmeichel 6; Amartey 6 (Ulloa 78 7), Morgan 6, Huth 6, Fuchs 5; Mahrez 5, Kante 7 (King 70 6), Drinkwater 6, Albrighton 6; Okazaki 5 (Schlupp 70 6), Vardy 5 Goal: Ulloa 89 NEXT UP: West Brom (h), Tom PL. Norwich (5-3-2): Ruddy 5; Pinto 5, Bennett 5, Martin 5, Klose 5, Brady 5; Redmond 6, Howson 5, Tettey 6; Jerome 6, Naismith 5 (Jarvis 82) Booked: Bennett, Naismith NEXT UP: Chelsea (h), Tom PL. Referee: N Swarbrick (Lancs)",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
84289,"The cross-Channel carrier said passenger numbers rose 2 per cent to 5 million in the first six months of the year with revenues 0.5 per cent higher at £456million.

But chief executive Nicolas Petrovic said it had been affected by lower demand in the past three months, blaming Brazil 2014.

He said: “The number of travellers originating in South America, including Brazil, was substantially lower as football fans stayed at home to enjoy the tournament.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
40750,"Shoutouts all day. Road to recovery. Talk to me nice or don't talk to me at all... ?? A video posted by Daniel Sturridge - Dstudge (@danielsturridge) on May 22, 2015 at 8:41am PDT

The Liverpool striker is set to miss the start of next season after going under the knife earlier this month. Brendan Rodgers has expressed cautious optimism that the procedure may have got to the root of Sturridge's persistent injury problems this season.

I'm going to come back stronger than ever so you best be ready. Daniel Sturridge

And the 25-year-old claims he is working hard to return to full fitness a better player. Speaking in a video posted on Instagram that shows Sturridge riding an exercise bike, he said: ""Shout out to all the fans, shout out to everyone showing love back home. ""I'm here on the bike, improving every day.

GETTY Daniel Sturridge will miss the start of next season",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
62257,"British workers would be better off outside the EU, a landmark report shows

Financial experts have found that continuing our tie with Brussels will cost YOU an astonishing £4,000 by 2020. But leaving the European project would boost average earnings by a pocket-busting £18,000 during the same period.

Advertisement

The landmark report, by top financiers New World Wealth (NWW), blows David Cameron's claims that Britons will be better off in the EU out of the water. It shows that instead the Brussels project is holding us back in the form of uncontrolled immigration, suffocating red tape and despotic restrictions on tax and trade reforms.

GETTY The report will cause a headache for David Cameron

GETTY Brexit campaigners said it shows Britain is better off without Brussels

Advertisement

One expert said: ""Brexit will benefit individual wealth creation in the UK."" Economists instead believe that, freed from the EU's chokehold, British businesses would flourish by striking up new business with the English speaking world and the Far East. As a result, if the public votes to leave the 28-nation bloc on June 23, each person is expected to be on average £18,000 better off within four years. It is calculated that earnings would skyrocket, with the average wealth per person in the UK rising from £78,544 to £96,177.

However, staying in the EU would have such a disastrous effect on our homes and businesses that people would actually end up £4,000 poorer than they are now, at £74,810. Those figures are representative of the entire British economy in relation to the country's population and include the value of assets we all own such as the NHS, which is being placed under huge strain by uncontrolled migration from the EU. Today NWW's founder and head of research, Andrew Amolis, said that leaving the EU would mean Britain could control its borders and introduce innovative new policies to kickstart the economy. He argued that being party of the 28-nation bloc is stopping the UK from reducing taxes, whilst reams of red tape are choking our financial services, hi-tech and manufacturing services.

He said: ""High immigration levels bring down average wages due to demand and supply dynamic, which in turn brings down average wealth per person. Uncontrolled immigration can also put pressure on healthcare and social security systems. ""Over the longer term, a Brexit will result in greater ties with former English speaking colonies such as Canada, USA, Australia, India and New Zealand, all of which have much stronger economies than EU countries. ""The UK is the only English speaking country in the region, which is a major advantage when dealing with these countries."" David Cameron and his Project Fear cronies have repeatedly relied on the spurious claim that leaving the EU would cause catastrophic job losses to shore up crumbling support for the federalist project.

The pros and cons of Brexit Pros and cons of Brexit Getty Images One of the biggest advantages of the EU is free trade between member nations Getty The vast majority of small and medium sized firms do not trade with the EU and British farmers would lose billions in EU subsidies Getty Free movement of people across the EU opens up job opportunities for UK workers willing to travel and makes it relatively easy for UK companies to employ workers from other EU countries. The 1.4 million Brits living abroad in the EU could find movement around the continent more difficult if we leave. For example, UK driving licences are currently valid across Europe Getty There are diverging views: pro-Europeans reckon the UK's status as one of the world's biggest financial centres will come under threat if it is no longer a seen as a gateway to the EU. The general view is that inward investment could slow in the lead up to the vote due to the uncertainty of the outcome and its consequences, following the precedent set ahead of the Scottish independence referendum in 2014 Getty Britain may lose some of its military influence – many believe that America would consider Britain to be a less useful ally if it was detached from Europe. We would regain border controls and could prevent people from other EU countries travelling to and living in Britain. The Northern Ireland border would become significant as it is the UK's only land border, but it's unlikely that passport. Getty If we leave it may restore the country’s economic independence Bloomberg via Getty Images If the door shuts to immigration, rents are likely to fall, not so good for landlords Getty Images/EyeEm Holidays could become pricier, sterling has fallen a long way from it’s €1.44 peak Getty Images/Lonely Planet Image Not having to contribute to the EU budget will mean an immediate cost reduction of around €180 per person in the UK, raising the prospect of tax reductions that could benefit businesses Getty Images/Cultura RF Legislation: We wouldn't be bound by the European Parliament, which is considered by many to be undemocratic. This is because its Commission which proposes legislation is not directly elected Getty Images/Flickr RF Crime fighting: The European arrest warrant helps us fight against cross-border crime, allowing the police to bring justice without drawn-out extradition procedures Getty Images/age fotostock RM Getty Images",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
342332,"Shark Ray Alley is in Belize in the Caribbean

Shark Ray Alley isn’t overrun with tourists yet, but it’s becoming very popular with divers and animal lovers. Despite the dangers of shark diving, this odd little area in the Caribbean is attracting a lot of attention. Situated off the coast of Belize’s biggest island - Ambergris Caye - it’s already got a name for itself as a diving hotspot, thanks to Hol Chan Marine Reserve. It’s towards the end of the reserve where you’ll find Shark Ray Alley. As the name might suggest, it’s full of Nurse Sharks and Southern Sting Rays.

Advertisement

Getty People come from all over the world to swim in Shark ray Alley

The spot was something of a manmade accident. Local fishermen had cleaned their boats here for years and the sharks soon realised that it was becoming a brilliant spot for a free dinner. Realising that they could get an easy feed, they started turning up in huge numbers. The visits from the sharks and rays became so regular that the spot was turned into a diving area. Sometimes they’ll even perform for food and swim in circles and as long as they keep getting fed, they’ll keep returning to the area.

Advertisement

Getty Although they sharks and stingrays won't harm humans, they're still wild and can be dangerous

The rays and sharks know when tourists are coming and they head straight to the area as soon as they hear boats arriving, knowing that it's soon going to be dinner time. The sharks here are docile, but they are wild and that means that while they might not want to eat the divers, they will attack if they feel threatened. But this doesn’t deter divers or photographers. The waters of Shark Bay reef are shallow and clear which means they’re perfect even for a cheap underwater camera.

Taken in beautiful Moorea, off the north-west coast of Tahiti, the real-life mermaids swim through the beautiful clear blue lagoon with their fishy friends. Snapped by a photographer Stunning images show mermaid-like models swimming through the ocean with deadly stingrays, taken in Moorea, Tahiti Stunning images show mermaid-like models swimming through the ocean with deadly stingrays, taken in Moorea, Tahiti Stunning images show mermaid-like models swimming through the ocean with deadly stingrays, taken in Moorea, Tahiti Taken in beautiful Moorea, off the north-west coast of Tahiti, the real-life mermaids swim through the beautiful clear blue lagoon with their fishy friends. Snapped by a photographer Taken in beautiful Moorea, off the north-west coast of Tahiti, the real-life mermaids swim through the beautiful clear blue lagoon with their fishy friends. Snapped by a photographer Stunning images show mermaid-like models swimming through the ocean with deadly stingrays, taken in Moorea, Tahiti Stunning images show mermaid-like models swimming through the ocean with deadly stingrays, taken in Moorea, Tahiti Taken in beautiful Moorea, off the north-west coast of Tahiti, the real-life mermaids swim through the beautiful clear blue lagoon Stingrays Stunning images show mermaid-like models swimming through the ocean with deadly stingrays, taken in Moorea, Tahiti

Getty The Great Blue Hole is one of the greatest diving spots in the world",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
52562,"The 31-year-old was keen to leave St James' Park in January, however the club wouldn't let him reneged on his contract.

Although the Magpies are back on track in the Premier League, Coloccini is not going to let a dream switch pass him by.

""You never know what can happen in football,"" he told Argentinian publication Ole.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
297562,"GETTY Alvaro Morata has agreed a deal with Manchester United, it has been claimed

It’s claimed by the Telegraph that Morata has given the green light - in principle - to terms United have offered.



United now have to negotiate a fee with Real Madrid to get the deal done.



Express Sport understand United will make a take-it-or-leave bid of £60m.



That’s after accepting defeat in their pursuit of Everton hitman Romelu Lukaku.



Lukaku was Jose Mourinho's No.1 choice to replace Zlatan Ibrahimovic but he is poised to join Chelsea.



The Telegraph add that Morata has told friends he thinks he will join United and that it'll boost his chances of involved in the 2018 World Cup with Spain in Russia

How Manchester United could look with Alvaro Morata Thu, June 29, 2017 How could Manchester United look if they signed Alvaro Morata? Play slideshow Getty Images 1 of 12 How would Manchester United look if they signed Alvaro Morata?

Morata has admitted he doesn't want to leave the European champions and would prefer to stay and fight for his place.



But he knows he might have no option but to find a new club to keep alive his chances of being involved in the World Cup.



His agent Juanma Lopez said this week: ""He does not want a season like this again. It was a great season, but he wants to play more.



""The player will take a clear and definitive decision in the coming days. I have not yet met with the representatives from Real Madrid.

GETTY Alvaro Morata thinks a move to Man Utd will boost his chances of playing for Spain",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
116020,"Sturridge has struggled for game time with Liverpool this season due to poor form and injuries. But he grabbed his first league goal of the season against Stoke after coming off the bench.

GETTY Jurgen Klopp has heaped praise on Liverpool star Daniel Sturridge

We are losing Sadio Mane during the Africa Cup of Nations, so it is important to have Daniel back Liverpool boss Jurgen Klopp

And Klopp insists Sturridge has a big part to play at Anfield in the coming weeks. ""Sturridge's was goal really important as well,"" Klopp said. ""It is good to see he is back and fit.

Liverpool player ratings against Stoke Tue, December 27, 2016 Express Sport rates how Jurgen Klopp’s men performed against Stoke City Play slideshow Getty Images 1 of 15 Who shone for Liverpool against Stoke City?

GETTY Liverpool star Daniel Sturridge got his first league goal of the season against Stoke",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
40993,"Rodgers has targeted ""multi-dimensional"" signings for Liverpool with a top-class forward on his agenda. And with new Barca coach Luis Enrique expected to overhaul the Nou Camp squad this summer, the Reds feel an ambitious move for Pedro could come off. According to reports, Liverpool have already made a discreet enquiry over the Spanish international's availability.

Pedro would cost in excess on £20million, but his versatility is exactly what Rodgers is looking for.



The Liverpool boss is also keen on Southampton's Adam Lallana but has been told to up his initial £20m bid to £25m.



There are hopes on Merseyside that Lallana could become a Liverpool player before the World Cup if the two clubs can reach an agreement.



Lallana and Pedro both joining the Premier League runners-up is not an unrealistic proposition, with a reported £60m transfer budget at Rodgers' disposal before player sales.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
226530,"The man was due to board a flight bound for Turkey on Tuesday evening when he was stopped by police and held on suspicion of preparing for acts of terrorism. Scotland Yard have confirmed his arrest is not connected to Monday night’s devastating Manchester terror attack, which left 22 people dead.

GETTY The man is believed to have been trying to flee to Turkey in order to travel to Syria

The man has been taken to a south London police station, where he is being detained under the Terrorism Act. Authorities are now searching two residential addresses in north London in connection with the arrest. The news comes just hours after the Prime Minister announced Britain's terror threat level has been increased to critical, meaning another attack could be imminent.

Horrifying acts of terrorism in pictures Wed, June 21, 2017 Some of the most horrifying terrorist attacks of all time from 9/11 to Mumbai, these murderous acts killed several thousands of people and caused millions of pounds of damage to properties worldwide. Play slideshow Getty Images 1 of 31 9/11, September 11th bombings in 2001 is one of the worst and most murderous attack to date. Two hijacked planes were crashed into the Twin Towers of The World Trade Center in New York City, killing 2,800 people

Theresa May made announced the change this evening in Downing Street following an emergency COBRA meeting. She said the increase meant members of the armed forces could replace police officers in certain responsibilities, allowing these officers to put their efforts elsewhere. Mrs May said it was possible a ""wider group of individuals"" could be behind yesterday's attack at the Ariana Grande concert in Manchester Arena.

GETTY FILE IMAGE Stansted Airport serves more than 170 destinations across the world",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
345406,"Two masked raiders wielding a machete and a claw hammer try to smash their way through a security screen as they demand cash.

But these CCTV pictures were actually taken at a quiet post office in Stockport, Greater Manchester in the latest sickening example of how violent Britain has become.

The terrified postmaster and his wife were left badly shaken by the failed robbery, which only ended when the thugs gave up trying to smash the security glass and drove away empty-handed.

The Post Office is offering a substantial reward for information leading to the arrest and conviction of the men, described as white and wearing dark clothing. They escaped in a blue Volkswagen Golf.

Detective Constable Philip Hargreaves, of Stockport CID, said: “The images clearly show the intent of the offenders, who tried to force their way behind the counter.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
243844,"Lord (Mike) Watson got his surprise elevation 10 years after admitting putting lives in danger by deliberately setting fire to a curtain at an Edinburgh hotel at a political awards ceremony.

The then member of the Scottish Parliament, where he had served as tourism and sports minister, pleaded guilty at Edinburgh Sheriff Court to a charge of wilful fire-raising and served half a 16-month jail sentence, as well as being expelled from Labour.

Now he is to be part of the Labour leader's education team.

A Scottish National Party spokesman said: ""This is a bizarre appointment; it reflects how Jeremy Corbyn seems to be scrambling around for people to work with, which in turn is further proof of the deep divisions within the Labour Party.""",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
305079,"Neymar has reportedly told Barcelona he will quit the club if they appoint Juan Carlos Unzue as their new boss.

Unzue is the current assistant and is one of the potential successors to Luis Enrique.

But Neymar is said to have told the club he will leave if he is appointed manager.

Neymar and Unzue fell out on the training ground recently and Mundo Deportivo claim the pair are unable to get over their differences.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
259,"Thrown on the streets like RUBBISH: The pitiful puppy saved by hero driver

Cold, wet and hungry, the six-month old brindle puppy was not only weak and underweight but also suffering from a horrible skin condition when she was heartlessly thrown out of a vehicle.

Luckily, a driver spotted the cardboard box moving as he approached the roundabout and managed to rescue the puppy and take her home for food and warmth.

As animal welfare carers nurse the puppy they have called Esme back to health, RSPCA Cymru has launched an investigation to trace whoever abandoned her on a cold, January night.

The kindhearted driver found the puppy, possibly a Staffordshire terrier cross, inside the box as they were travelling out of Porthmadog towards Criccieth last weekend.

Today RSPCA Cymru released two pictures of Esme to show how pitiful she looked while she was being treated by vets.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
330808,"The assurance, given to an MP this week and published in an official MoD statement, suggested a policy shift after hundreds of veterans reported suffering from dangerous side-effects following their use of the drug, which has been all but banned for use by US Armed Forces. Last night, however, the MoD confirmed it had not altered its position that Lariam, also known as mefloquine, remains the first remedy of choice in sub-Saharan deployments such as Sierra Leone and Kenya, with one spokesman admitting the wording on the statement was ‘misleading’. The news came as a surprise to Johnny Mercer MP who, on Wednesday, attended a top level meeting with a Surgeon General Air Marshall Paul Evans and armed forces minister Penny Mordaunt in which he was assured the position had changed. Speaking last night the Plymouth MP said: ""I was assured at that meeting that this drug was not now the MoD’s frontline defence against malaria anywhere ­I thought this was fantastic. ""I was even minded to recommend to the select committee that the MoD had started to sort this issue out. But now it seems that, by the MoD's own admission, this is not the case. ""Nothing has changed. This is the kind of confusion that makes it so frustrating for victims and their families. I have been contacted by more than 40. Some have been veterans in tears, because they feel their lives have been irrevocably changed after using Lariam.

Advertisement

""Others were widows whose ex-servicemen husbands had committed suicide because of the anxiety and depression caused by Lariam. ""These people could be forgiven for thinking that the MoD just doesn't care. We owe it to sufferers of this drug to look into this issue formally. Those victims include a Major who was deployed in Sierra Leone with the Queen Alexandra's Royal Army Nursing Corps. ""I've been suffering from insomnia, depression and anxiety ever since I was deployed in Sierra Leone in 1998, where I took Lariam. My wife and son saw the behavioural changes within me, and so did I. ""I fly off the handle for no reason, and suffer deep anxiety,"" said the former Major, who did not wish to be named. ""For all these years we've lived with it, putting it down to one of those things. It wasn't until my son heard Johnny Mercer MP on Radio 4 that we put the pieces together and realised that what caused these changes was the Lariam. ""He said concerns with Lariam were an 'open secret' in Sierra Leone. The regimental medical officer told me that she'd been briefed that we were to document any adverse reactions and submit them to the manufacturers.

""One ex-pat who attended one of our cocktail parties had a go at me, because I was a senior nurse, over issuing Lariam to soldiers with live ammunition. ""But Lariam was easier to use than alternatives because you only need to take it once a week, and we trusted the advice we were being given."" Despite strict instructions to officially report any symptoms to the manufacturer, he said two soldiers were turned away by senior officers. ""The view for senior officers was that soldiers moan and whine and they decided their cases were not convincing,” he said. Another victim, a former Royal Navy engineer, told the Sunday Express how Lariam had caused such anxiety that he attempted take his own life three times while still serving. ""Then, one day, I was put on guard duty at HMS Culdrose. I was issued a loaded weapon and I realised I was too scared of what might happen,"" said the 37-year old last night. ""We were never warned of side effects, though after finishing our deployment in Sierra Leone, we were all asked questions by medical officers. I didn't realise the significance of this because I was still feeling fine, then - it was only later, when I suffered a panic attack on the tube, that I knew something inside me had changed."" Last night one of the world's leading experts on the mental health effects of anti-malarial drugs branded the Ministry of Defence disingenuous over its published statement that it was not using the drug as a first resort.

GETTY Mosquito's are the transporter of the deadly malaria disease

Advertisement",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
51969,"GETTY Sterling is up 0.26 percent against the dollar to 1.3398 on Wednesday morning

Pound sterling is up 0.32 percent against the dollar to 1.3406 on Wednesday morning, and 0.32 percent to 1.1316 against the Euro. After British and EU leaders broke the deadlock over the Brexit divorce payment sterling returned to levels last seen in early September with further hopes remain that trade talks will soon be on the table. Over the year-to-date, the pound is up 8.5 per cent and the latest leg of its rebound cuts its decline since the Brexit vote to just under 10 per cent. As reported by the Telegraph, the UK-EU agreement-in-principle has now been reached leaving the EU to relax on their position and potentially open talks on a future free trade pact.

GETTY The payment is thought to be around £44.3

A British government official said they “do not recognise” this account of the talks going on ahead of a visit by Prime Minister Theresa May to Brussels this coming Monday. But the offer, estimated about being around £44.3 billion, represents the bulk of outstanding EU demands that include London paying a share of post-Brexit EU spending on commitments made before Britain leaves in March 2019 as well as funding of EU staff pensions for decades to come. Prime Minister May and Chancellor Hammond have appeared to be on a surer footing of late and last week EU diplomats briefed on progress said the British offer was promising and that, on the financial settlement, the two sides were, “close to a deal”. Iain Duncan Smith broke ranks somewhat and said last night: “I would be very happy if they get to a point where they have agreed and can get on to trade negotiations"". However, possibly in attempt to present the good news themselves (perhaps even as a united front) EU officials close to the negotiations stressed that work was still continuing ahead of May’s talks with European Commission President Jean-Claude Juncker and his chief Brexit negotiator Michel Barnier.

GETTY A British government official said they “do not recognise” the amount quoted

Michel Barnier, the European chief Brexit negotiator has said that he hopes to report to the EU in coming days about an agreement with Britain on the financial terms of its withdrawal from the bloc. Speaking at the Berlin Security Conference, Mr Barnier gave no specific details,on the Brexit “divorce bill”, but said negotiations were continuing. “We are working really, really hard on these subjects,” Barnier said, adding: “I hope that I can report that ... we have been able to negotiate a deal.” Mr Barnier is due to meet with British Prime Minister Theresa May and European Commission President Jean-Claude Juncker on Dec. 4.

GETTY EU chief Brexit negotiator Michel Barnier (right)",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
8153,"The Monaro Voui volcano, located on the northern island of Ambae, has been simmering for weeks and finally erupted on Tuesday, September 26.

Some 7,000 residents – roughly 70 per cent of the population of Ambae – have forced to evacuate over the last few days as the threat of an eruption grew larger.

The Vanuatu Meteorology and Geo-Hazards Department raised the alert level from three to four over the weekend as it warned of “flying rocks and volcanic gas”.

Vanuatu's National Disaster Management Office director, Shadrack Welegtabit, said: “There's ash, fire, stones and lava being thrown out from the mouth of the volcano.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
266706,"Jospeh O'Brien's victory in the Ladbrokes St Leger was very much a family affair [GETTY]

Winning trainer Aidan O’Brien, the father of Joseph, was taking the prize for the fourth time.



“Last year was what it was,” said O’Brien senior. “There’s no point looking back and history is no good to anyone.



“He’s a very solid horse with plenty of class. The Arc de Triomphe is now an option.”



Young O’Brien echoed his father’s profound views.



“I suppose this makes it a little bit sweeter after last year, but there’s nothing I can do about that now and you have to look forward,” said the 20-year-old.



“I don’t see why he shouldn’t go for the Arc. He races quite lazily and even though he’s won over a mile and six and over two at Ascot, he doesn’t need to go that far.



“I’d have no trouble dropping him back to a mile and a half. It’s great to wear the cap for winning the Leger. I hope I can win another one.”

Joseph O'Brien was proud of earning the cap for winning the Leger [GETTY]

I suppose this makes it a little bit sweeter after last year, but there’s nothing I can do about that now and you have to look forward Jospeh O'Brien",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
289167,"Rodgers, saw his Celtic side win the second leg of their qualifier 3-0 at Parkhead with goals from Mikael Lustig, Leigh Griffiths and Patrick Roberts.

Meanwhile, former Celtic midfielder Stiliyan Petrov will not be offered a playing contract at Aston Villa despite attempting to make his comeback.

Bulgarian Petrov has been training with Villa this summer after battling back from leukaemia, following his diagnosis in 2012.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
238646,"Thousands gathered to watch the 33-year-old American make his way from the US to Canada on a wire 150ft above the water. He is the first person to cross in more than a century.

As he neared the Canadian shore, Mr Wallenda, who was wearing a harness, dropped to one knee and pumped his fist while the spectators cheered.

He ran the last 15ft to the finish line, where his wife and three children waited. “I feel like I’m on cloud nine,” he told reporters after his feat, watched by millions live on television.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
306215,"On-loan Tottenham midfielder Tom Carroll, fit-again Marvin Emnes and winger Jefferson Montero are all in contention to start the third-round tie at the Liberty Stadium as Monk prepares to rest a handful of first-team regulars ahead of Saturday's Barclays Premier League trip to Sunderland.

Bafetimbi Gomis will definitely start up front as Wilfried Bony serves a one-match suspension following his red card against Southampton on Saturday.

Everton long-term absentees Bryan Oviedo and Arouna Kone could make their returns to first-team action in Tuesday's Capital One Cup third-round clash with Swansea at the Liberty Stadium.

Wide man Oviedo and forward Kone have both recently featured for the Under-21 side as they step up their rehabilitation from a broken leg and knee problem respectively and manager Roberto Martinez, who is expected to make changes for the tie, has confirmed the former will definitely be in the squad.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
144576,"GETTY • PA Katherine Jenkins stunned in white at Wimbledon today

The 37-year-old opera star looked very loved-up with her husband Andrew Levitas as she arrived at the tennis tournament in the blazing sunshine. Dressed in a lace midi number, Katherine showcased her trim hourglass curves in the summery frock, which featured delicate semi-sheer sleeves and overlay, emphasising her slender waist as it cinched in to showcase her figure. She paired the demure, summery garment with silver strappy stilettos and a chic white handbag for a sophisticated look.

PA Katherine looked summery in the demure white lace number

GETTY The opera star looked very loved up with her husband Andrew Levitas

Wimbledon 2017: Celebs enjoy the tennis Thu, July 13, 2017 Wimbledon 2017: Celebrities enjoy the annual tennis event. Play slideshow PA 1 of 58 Kate Middleton smiles at the Men's Final of Wimbledon 2017

Her actor beau, whom the opera star married in 2014, looked smart in a sharp charcoal suit and fuchsia patterned tie as the couple posed for photographers. Bee Gees legend Barry Gibb, 70, and his wife Linda also looked smitten in the sunshine, as they arrived arm-in-arm. Barry opted for a classic two-piece black suit and cornflower blue tie, while Linda flashed the flesh in a stylish white dress that cut to just above her knees.

GETTY Barry Gibb and his wife Lisa also cosied up at the tennis",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
325116,"The pole was the 29-year-old Briton's seventh of the season and 38th of his career, but he felt he could have done better on a new circuit that snakes around the Sochi Winter Olympic park.

Hamilton will be chasing his fourth win in a row today, and ninth of the season, while Mercedes look set to wrap up the constructors' championship for the first time.

""It doesn't change much for me in the race but it will be a historic moment for us,"" said the 2008 champion, who leads Rosberg by 10 points with four races remaining.

""It's going to be the first time so it's going to be historic for the team, a very special moment.

""It wasn't a perfect lap. I think there was more time in it.""

The British star was full of praise for the new circuit saying: ""The track surface is great, very smooth but it's got a lot of grip.

""The kerbs are done nicely and the surroundings, being around the Olympic Park, is quite an incredible place.""",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
6277,"The star's marriage to third wife, Kimberly Buffington-Quaid, has been on and off for the last few years, but looked to be over for good when they filed for divorce in November (12).

However, the couple subsequently reconciled and was unable to withdraw the divorce petition, so they had to wait until their case went before a judge to end the legal action.

The divorce has now been dismissed, according to TMZ.com.

The couple married in 2004 and is parents to two children.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
260103,"GETTY Bernie Ecclestone had been in talks with Silverstone about the British Grand Prix

The British Racing Drivers’ Club (BRDC), who own Silverstone, warned earlier this month that the expense of holding the race could see them abandon the British Grand Prix after 2019. Express Sport understands they had been in talks with Ecclestone and even consulted the British government over potential funding for the event. However, neither had yielded much progress until the 86-year-old self-title dictator was removed from office last week.

F1 calendar 2017: Every remaining race, location, date confirmed Sun, October 1, 2017 Express Sport brings you the remaining F1 calendar for 2017 Play slideshow AFP/Getty Images 1 of 5 Express Sport brings you the remaining races in the F1 calendar

The new owners of F1 Liberty Media replaced him with former 21st Century Fox executive Chase Carey and shunted Ecclestone sideways into an ‘advisory role’. ""We are excited by the change of management,"" BRDC president Derek Warwick told The Guardian. ""We don't think our sanction fee will change, therefore we have to find a better way of increasing our revenue.

GETTY The British Grand Prix at Silverstone is one of the most iconic events in the sporting calendar

""It was probably the right time for Bernie to step aside. “It's great we now have new opportunities and new energy to take us in a new direction. ""Maybe we can have more pit walks, bigger concerts, more sponsorship, maybe we can name corners.

“There are things we can change which we haven't been able to do under the current contract."" Carey criticised outgoing Ecclestone for failing to make progress in F1 over the last five years. He has appointed former Mercedes and Ferrari pit-wall man Ross Brawn and ex-ESPN executive Sean Bratches, in motor sport and commercial roles respectively, to help him revamp F1.

GETTY Lewis Hamilton could be left without a home British Grand Prix after 2019",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
19193,"The England international features in the foreword of Pochettino's new book, describing the current Tottenham gaffer as the best coach he's ever worked under. And those comments came amid Shaw's difficult spell under Mourinho, which was reinforced by his piecemeal substitute appearance in Tuesday night's win over Swansea. Mourinho was asked about the former Saints star's praise of Pochettino at today's United versus Tottenham pre-match press conference. And he defended Shaw's right to wax lyrical about his old St Mary's manager.

Manchester United vs Tottenham combined XI Fri, October 27, 2017 Express Sport brings you our Manchester United and Tottenham combined XI ahead of their Premier League clash at Old Trafford Play slideshow Getty Images 1 of 12 Who makes our combined Manchester United and Tottenham XI?

Luke Shaw was just honest Manchester United boss Jose Mourinho opens up

Mourinho said: ""Why not? Because of his words. If you want to speak about his words I would be very disappointed if his words were different. ""I am always disappointed when a player, because he has a new manager, the new manager becomes the best and the old manager becomes very bad, and football is full of examples of lack of character. ""Luke Shaw was just honest. The manager that helped him to come to the first, to come to the best moment of his career is a manager that do not forget he likes a lot and that maybe one day he would be reunited again so for me the perfect words that show Luke Shaw character in relation to the people that he happy with.""

GETTY England man Luke Shaw has found chances hard to come by under Jose Mourinho at Manchester United

GETTY Jose Mourinho leads Manchester United against Mauricio Pochettino's Tottenham tomorrow",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
301836,"GETTY Norberto Neto is set to leave Fiorentina this summer

The Reds are understood to be keen on landing Neto - The Viola's much sought-after no. 1 who is set to leave the Serie A club this summer. Last month his agent claimed Fiorentina rejected an advance from Liverpool to sign the 25-year-old, who was part of the Brazil side at the London 2012 Olympic Games.

But it appears they may have their replacement for Simon Mignolet by next Monday, although Juventus are also keenly watching developments in Florence. “I hope things will be resolved this week,” Neto said of his future. “I’ve left everything in the hands of my agent and he’ll make the decision. I hope to define everything this week, or next week at the latest.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
75651,"GETTY/PENN STATE Huge swathes of New York could be submerged by the end of the century, study finds

The city is set to be hit by devastating flooding arising sea levels and powerful storms combined to ravage the city. While in the shorter term parts of the city could be submerged below nearly 20 feet of sea water by the year 2100. The Pennsylvania State University study warned that if greenhouse gas emmissions continue at current rates the world’s coastlines could change dramatically.

Famous areas such as Manhattan, Brooklyn, Queens and the Bronx could be unrecognisable or disappear completely as waters rise. The “500-year-flood” heights study made the calculations based on information dating from preindustrial history. Professor Michael E Mann said to the Daily Mail: “If we cause large sea-level rise, that dominates future risks, but if we could prevent sea-level rise and just have the storm surge to worry about, our projections show little change in coastal risk from today during most years.

Major cities under threat by rising sea levels Mon, November 30, 2015 Sea levels rising due to carbon emissions could threaten major coastal cities across the world. Here's what some of the most iconic cities around the world could look like in decades to come... Play slideshow Climate Central 1 of 14 London, based on 2°C (3.6°F) of warming from carbon pollution

“While those storms that strike New York City might be bigger and stronger, there may be fewer of them as changing storm tracks increasingly steer the storms away from NYC and toward other regions.” The study is based in prediction of how sea levels may rise if we continue releasing huge levels on carbon dioxide into the atmosphere cause temperatures to rise ad Antarctic ice to melt.

GETTY Famous parts of the city including Brooklyn may be under 50 feet of water by 2300

The news comes after NASA revealed during deforestation has been adding to climate change. Dying tropical rainforests are oozing carbon dioxide omissions and contributing massively to an already heating globe.

GETTY Rising sea levels couple with increased storm surges could contribute to the flooding",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
176325,"What is the Catlevania release date? Netflix have announced that the grim animated series will premiere on June 7. The series is listed a s four-part season with each episode running for 30 minutes. A retro-style trailer dropped ahead of the release, harking back to the 80s and the Nintendo Entertainment System. The trailer opens up with a hand inserting a Castlevania game cartridge into the old-school system and booting up Netflix on an old CRTV. It then transports the viewers into a dramatic sequence of violent action-packed fights in Dracula’s castle, before pulling up the Castlevania logo.

What is Castlevania about? Castlevania is a best-selling video game series that follows a clan of vampire hunters, the Belmont clan, on its quest to kill Dracula. The first instalment in the series was released in 1986 and has since spawned multiple titles across various platforms and gaming consoles. Netflix are currently keeping the details of the anime under a tight lid, but have released a few hints about fans might expect. Netflix said in a statement: ""Inspired by the classic video game series, Castlevania is a dark medieval fantasy following the last surviving member of the disgraced Belmont clan, trying to save Eastern Europe from extinction at the hand of Vlad Dracula Tepe himself.

NETFLIX The Castlevania anime is coming to Netflix in June

NETFLIX Castlevania will follow Trevor Belmont on his quest to kill Dracula

The goal is to bring hard hitting anime to the America and be America’s first animated series for adults Adi Shankar, Castlevania producer

""The animated series written by best-selling author and comic-book icon Warren Ellis and executive produced by Warren Ellis, Kevin Kolde, Fred Seibert and Adi Shankar."" Producer Adi Shankar, who previously worked on Dredd, The Grey and Lone Survivor, recently revealed the series would be in the ""vein of Game of Thrones"". Announcing the series in 2015, he said: ""The goal is to bring hard hitting anime to the America and be America’s first animated series for adults.""

NETFLIX The r-rated netflix series follows Castlevania III: The Curse of Dracula

New releases on Netflix Wed, October 4, 2017 Netflix brings us an exciting 2017 with lots of new shows and plenty of films to look forward to. Play slideshow Netflix 1 of 29 Designated Survivor",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
363905,USA fans show their support during the Fourballs on day one of the 40th Ryder Cup at Gleneagles Golf Course. [PA],express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
55706,"Claire - who shared the video of the incident, which took place outside Blessed Edward Jones High School in Rhyl, North Wales, online - said that “she didn’t regret” posting the clip as she fought back tears while speaking to Holly Willoughby, 36, and Phillip Schofield, 55. Claire explained that the teenager - who doesn’t know why the bullying started, but did mention that the pair used to be friends before they had a fallout at the end of the summer holidays - had asked to leave school 10 minutes early on the day the whole thing happened. The youngster recalled: “When we went back to school she was throwing cups at my head and trying to trip me up,” but she added that when she tried to tell her teachers what had been going on, they said they couldn’t do anything about it “because they didn’t see it themselves”.

ITV Claire Walton broke down in tears as she appeared on This Morning

ITV Claire shared the video of the heartbreaking attack online

It breaks my heart, [I don’t know what would have happened] if her friend’s stepdad wasn’t there to jump in at the time Claire Walton

She even said that there were around 30 to 40 children who were simply stood by watching as she was set upon, with Claire adding: “It breaks my heart, [I don’t know what would have happened] if her friend’s stepdad wasn’t there to jump in at the time.” Viewers have been taking to Twitter in their droves to comment on the attack, with one person posting: “I just don't know how I'd have any self control if it was my daughter being attacked…#thismorning.” A second added: “Nothing worse as a parent giving your child up to a place and entrusting others with their saftey and then this happening #ThisMorning.” “Those girls are just jealous of this beautiful girl, the school needs to do something #ThisMorning,” yet another commented. A different social media user wrote: “#ThisMorning brave girl, brave mother! I hate vile little bullies it's not big or clever!! It's absolutely appalling, more punishment needed.”

This Morning: Most emotional moments Mon, August 21, 2017 This Morning has featured many memorable moments on the daytime show, but some of them were truly heart rendering, we take a look at the most emotional and heartbreaking stories. Play slideshow ITV 1 of 13 This Morning's most emotional moments

ITV Claire's daughter Holly spoke out about the horrific attack",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
117585,"Call of Duty WW2 could have a November release date

Call of Duty WW2's release date may have been revealed as part of another major leak.

One Twitter user has posted an image of an alleged promotional poster for Call of Duty: WWII.

If the promotional poster is to be believed, then the Call of Duty WW2 release date has been set for November 3.

With November 3 falling on a Friday, the release date is plausible, especially based on previous Call of Duty games.

Call of Duty: Infinite Warfare launched on Friday, November 4, while Black Ops 3 made its debut on Friday, November 6.

According to the poster, DLC will be released on PS4 30 days before other platforms.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
279622,"GETTY John Terry is back for Chelsea against Walsall

Following on from the Blues second Premier League win of the season on Saturday against Arsenal, Mourinho has recalled John Terry and made eight changes. Terry partners Gary Cahill at centre-back with Branislav Ivanovic continuing at right back and Baba Rahman coming in at left-back.

John Obi Mikel and Ruben Loftus Cheek make up the base of midfield with Loic Remy and Kenedy supporting Radamel Falcao. Striker Diego Costa is suspended following his retrospective ban from his clash with Laurent Koscielny. Thibaut Courtois and Willian were ruled out with injury. Walsall goalkeeper Neil Etheridge started his career at Stamford Bridge in Chelsea's youth set up.

We've arrived at the Banks's Stadium on a cold evening in the Midlands. Team news due in about half-an-hour... #CFC pic.twitter.com/1zGG7R750r — Chelsea FC (@ChelseaFC) September 23, 2015",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
182756,"Decorate your home with a Nordic-inspired selection of traditional decorations and accessories from The White Company. The 2¼m (7½ft) Ultimate Nordmann fir Christmas tree is £450, the decorations cost from £4 and the large sheepskin rug is £395 (020 3758 9222, thewhitecompany.com)

Cox & Cox’s gorgeous Starry collection of festive homeware and decorations includes this soft grey stocking, which costs £35. The cushion is £40, the grey woven throw costs £100 and the rattan wing chair is priced at £250 (0330 333 2123, coxandcox.co.uk)",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
365190,"The France midfielder has committed his future to the Turin giants until 2019.

It was revealed negations between the 21-year-old's representatives and the club had begun this morning.

And Juventus have now confirmed the agreement is complete.

The deal will be a blow for Manchester United, Chelsea and Man City, who saw the youngster as a possible signing for next summer.

The Premier League trio had hoped to attract Pogba back to the Premier League but will have to look elsewhere.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
62707,"The actor stars in the BBC drama as the leader of a much-feared Jewish gang based in Camden Town, London.

He is violent and unpredictable and has previously betrayed Tommy Shelby (played by Cillian Murphy) after they formed a fragile partnership in season two.

When Thomas found out that Alfie had divulged his plans to steal jewellery and a Faberge egg from a Russian family, he hunted down the gang leader.

But, when they finally came face-to-face, he could not bring himself to kill the master manipulator.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
276720,"The 22-year-old is understood to be on Spurs’ radar along with Arsenal, Chelsea, Newcastle, Barcelona and Paris Saint-Germain.

It is understood Pochettino’s side are leading the race to sign the Frenchman due to their links with the club when securing a £12.3million deal to sign Hugo Lloris in 2012.

However, the deal to sign Lloris proved to be a long-drawn out negotiation and president Jean-Michal Aulas, who feels he did not get the best price for Lloris, is desperate not to make the same mistake.

It means the club have yet to open transfer talks over a move, but Spurs are thought to be in pole position.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
36967,"Steve Harper has confirmed he is leaving at the end of the season

The 38-year-old, who is a free agent at the end of the season, is bringing the curtain down on a 20-year association with the Magpies.



Harper is ready for pastures new as he has to play second fiddle to Ducth shot stopper Tim Krul.



However, Harper has announced he will not be hanging up his gloves when the current campaign finishes.



He told the Evening Chronicle: ""It has been a privilege to be a professional at such a fantastic football club.

Alan Pardew will have to say goodbye to Steve Harper

It has been a privilege to be a professional at such a fantastic football club Steve Harper",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
141859,"ITV Connor McIntyre has dropped hints about Phelan's fate

Not only did he make Anna Windass’ (Debbie Rush) life a hell when he turned up in Weatherfield again, but he is causing big trouble for Jason Grimshaw (Ryan Thomas). However, his reign of terror is going to be coming to an end soon, according to soap star Connor. The actor has suggested that the builder has made a fair few enemies in his time and will be facing their wrath soon enough.

ITV Phelan has made many enemies in Weatherfield

“Phelan’s going to get worse and I’m really excited by what’s coming up for him,” the Liverpool-born star teased. He went on to tell Metro: “There are an awful lot of candidates [who might want to give Phelan what he deserves] but often people like this are hoisted by their own petard. They push their luck just that little bit too far.” Connor won the gong for Villain of the Year at this year’s Soap Awards for his portrayal of the treacherous Phelan.

ITV Phelan has been trouble for many on the cobbles

Most recently it revealed that his character may try to con Jason out of his inheritance following the death of his father Tony Stewart (Terrence Maynard). As soon as Phelan finds out about the money, he tries to make himself a key part of the Grimshaw household. Speaking about the upcoming plot, Ryan told Digital Spy: ""Phelan has taken Tony's role - he has become a father figure to Jason and he needs someone like that in his life.

Coronation Street's most dramatic moments Fri, June 2, 2017 Coronation Street's most dramatic moments. Play slideshow ITV 1 of 20 Coronation Street viewers watched in horror as Bethany Platt was sexually exploited by her boyfriend Nathan",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
135210,"Fraudster Brittain enjoyed a lavish lifestyle thanks to the money that he stole[POLICE HANDOUT/GETTY]

Kristian Brittain, who was finance officer at Relate Cymru, used the money to fund his cocaine habit and lavish lifestyle.

He began stealing cash in 2010 to pay his rent.

But over the next five months he became greedy and used it to buy drugs, two cars and to pay for his civil partnership ceremony.

Brittain, 31, of Gorseinon, Swansea, was first hired by the charity on a temporary basis in December 2009 but was given a permanent job three months later.

Swansea Crown Court heard the fraudster had stolen the £221,340 by making duplicate payments into his own bank account.

By the time he had left Relate Cymru for a new job at the Carmarthenshire Heritage and Regeneration Trust, Brittain had made 90 dodgy transactions.

It was only after his replacement at Relate Cymru discovered irregularities in the charity’s accounts that the crime was traced back to him.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
342659,"The 29-year-old model has been keeping her Twitter followers regularly updated with new daughter Liberty Rose's progress over the last few days.

In her latest snap, Abbey showed off the sisterly bond emerging between her two girls.

Posing next to her baby sibling, four-year-old Sophie smiles at the camera in the beautiful black and white shot.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
192053,"The International Trade Secretary also vowed to make the “right decisions for the UK” as he visited Washington to discuss Britain’s future relationship with the US. Speaking on BBC Newsnight, he was questioned over whether a trade agreement between the two nations would lead Britain to lower or change its standards on food.

GETTY•BBC Trade secretary Liam Fox vowed the UK would not 'reduce its standards' on imported food

Dr Fox said: “I can rule out that we will be dropping our standards on consumer protection or environmental protection or on animal welfare. “These are all perfectly reasonable things for people to look at.

Brexit trade talks in pictures: UK Ministers explore potential trade deals Tue, July 25, 2017 Latest pictures as Britain's Ministers started informal trade talks all over the world Play slideshow AFP/Getty Images 1 of 14 British Secretary of State for International Trade Liam Fox delivers remarks on 'The Future of UK Trade Policy' at the American Enterprise Institute

The British model will be the best model for Britain Liam Fox

“In terms of where we will be on specifics: By the time we finish a free trade agreement, which could be two or three years by the time it’s concluded and implemented depending on what happens with our relationship with the EU, it’s too early to say. “But you can say on a general principle that we are not going to be the low-regulation alternative that some people have suggested.”

GETTY Dr Fox has been discussing future trade deals in Washington

The leading Brexiteer also insisted he will seek a “British model” in future regulations, batting away concerns the UK will have to conform to US or EU diktats. He said: “We will make the right decisions for the UK. We will decide for the UK what is best, not what is best for the US, not what is best of the European Union.

“The British model will be the best model for Britain.” Dr Fox was met with a wave of criticism after it emerged Britain may have to import chicken washed in chlorine as part of a future trade deal with Washington.

GETTY Chlorine washed chicken is banned under EU regulations",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
29717,"Mignolet has played every single minute for Liverpool in the Premier League and Champions League play-offs so far this season.

However, Klopp has left him out of the squad for the visit of Arsenal, with Loris Karius replacing him between the sticks.

The reason for dropping the Belgian is not known, but he is not said to be injured or ill.

Carragher cannot understand the decision, especially as he is unlikely to play for Belgium in the upcoming international break.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
189056,"The hugely popular shows are approaching their sell-by date, says the BBC’s former communications director Ed Williams.

“I think there’s a series of very popular formats which over the next five to 10 years will reach the end of their natural lives, such as Strictly Come Dancing, The Apprentice, Dragons’ Den, Top Gear and The One Show,” he added.

Mr Williams makes the claim in a new book, Is The BBC In Crisis? which goes on sale from Saturday.

He blames the BBC’s reputation for paying poorly on the failure to think up new successful formats, claiming bosses have failed to come up with a Saturday night ratings winner for years.

“What I think is particularly challenging for the BBC is how can they make the case to get the best creative people at the BBC coming up with these ideas when, actually, if you’ve got a great idea, why take it to the BBC?” he went on.

Strictly Come Dancing, which started on BBC One in 2004, will be back this autumn.

While no celebrity contestants have yet been confirmed, actress Danniella Westbrook and presenter Mark Wright are hotly tipped to sign up, with fans also clamouring to see former X Factor winner Joe McElderry on the dancefloor.

The last series beat ITV’s The X Factor in the ratings war, and its success has led to the corporation officially dismissing the claims made by its former communications director. “This is Strictly nonsense,” said a BBC spokesman. “Those shows are doing really well.”

A BBC insider added: “Ed is entitled to his opinion, but these claims are very strange. For two series in a row now Strictly has performed brilliantly.

“Yes, lots of these big shows have been around for a while, but simply because they are so popular. It’s not that they are coming to the end of their life and the idea that they would be cut out is unheard of.

“These are the BBC’s very best shows. Perhaps Ed was trying to focus on the fact that fresh TV content is what matters to licence-fee payers and he was going for a consumer angle.”",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
165931,"The summer transfer window may be just a distant memory, but with the season well underway managers have already started their preparations for January...

Manchester United target Mats Hummels could accelerate his departure from Borussia Dortmund after his astonishing attack on the club.

The 26-year-old has been on United's wish list for a while, with Louis van Gaal eyeing a big spree in the coming window.

Reports have recently suggested that United are lining up a £50m bid for the highly rated Dortmund centre half.

And Hummels' future remains uncertain following his astonishing attack after Dortmund lost against Werder Bremen at the weekend in which he said: ""We’ve managed pretty well at home in recent weeks, but not at all away.

""It’s pretty astonishing that we are so pathetic.”

Mohamed Sissoko has put Arsenal on alert following his surprise admission.

The Newcastle powerhouse midfielder has underlined his desire to play in the Champions League.

But more interestingly, the 27-year-old has revealed he was an Arsenal fan growing up.

He said: ""Arsenal were my favourite club when I was young and my idol was Patrick Vieira.

""I have always loved this club and I still love them.""

Gareth Bale has given the green light for Manchester United to pave a shock return to the Premier League for him.

Sunday Express Sport exclusively revealed that the Wales international has been informed of the Red Devils' interest and they are ready to smash their club transfer record to sign him.

United are thought to be lining up a bid in excess of £80m to land the Real Madrid forward, who signed from Spurs in the summer of 2013.

Louis van Gaal is hoping to land Bale in the summer and should they land their targets, it would eclipse their overall outlay of £156m in the last window.

Nabil Fekir has been urged to sign for Arsenal instead of Manchester City.

The 21-year-old has made the Premier League giants sit up and take notice after a series of impressive displays for Lyon this season.

Lyon are thought to be reluctant to let their prize asset leave in January, but could be swayed if they receive offers in the region of £8m.

And Fekir's father believes his son would be better suited to Arsenal instead of the Citizens.

He said: ""If he leaves, it will be for Arsenal. It is the only club that can enable him to progress, with Arsène Wenger.""",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
341297,"A survey of 500 young drivers by the RAC has found that 56% underestimated the average £810 cost of insuring a car for a 25-year-old, expecting to pay £750. Things are even more expensive for 18-20-year-old drivers, who have to pay an average of £972 a year – which is nearly three times as much as the £367 premium for the average UK driver.

GETTY Parents had to bail out half of young drivers in the survey

Advertisement

The research also found that 17% of young motorists budget £750-999 for their annual insurance costs, 15% opted for £1,000-1,500, a further 9% thought that £1,500-2,000 was nearer the mark and 5% expected insurance to set them back more than £2,000. It comes as no surprise, then, that insurance is seen as the biggest barrier to young people owning and running a car, with 62% of respondents saying this was the case, compared to 22% who felt it was buying a car and 12% who cited day-to-day running costs. The high cost of insurance means that for the first year of driving, mum and dad bail out 51% of young drivers, while 43% paid their premium in one go and 44% opt for monthly payments.

Advertisement",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
345488,"15 years have passed and Bridget is still single and battling with her insecurities about loneliness and love, plus she has a bun in the oven to further add to the complications. Director Sharon Maguire has revealed that the the character's trademark neurosis feature in Bridget Jones's Baby, which sees the return of Renee Zellweger and Colin Firth as Bridget and Mark Darcy.

Advertisement

But she has managed to slim down to her ideal weight which, as Bridget Jones fans will know, is kind of a big deal. Speaking to Entertainment Weekly Maguire said: “We all really loved the notion that Bridget, 15 years on, had finally reached her ideal weight … somewhere between a UK size 10 or 12, but still hadn’t solved any of her issues about love and loneliness.”

WENN Renee and Colin Firth, who play Bridget and Mark Darcy, on the set of Bridget Jones's Baby

WENN The actress reprises her role as the neurotic singleton who is now with child

Advertisement

The concept of loneliness is an emotive angle that the director says resonates with the audience. She added: “I think that one of the reasons the first film worked was not just because of the comedy but because people identified with Bridget’s fear of loneliness. ""It’s a universal fear. It’s still a prominent theme in the character’s journey even in the third film, and an integral point of access for the audience to empathise with Bridget.” In the plot, Bridget is the producer of a news broadcaster in the UK, but an unexpected pregnancy throws an spanner in the works - and even worse she doesn't know who the father is.

WENN A Christmassy shot of Bridget in the film, revealing a slight bump

WENN A pregnant Bridget and her former flame Mark look intense as they talk

The contenders are on-again-off-again lover Mark Darcy or newcomer Jack Qwant, played by Patrick Dempsey (Grey's Anatomy). Zellweger also told EW: ""This is part of the new challenge, discovering where Bridget is now in her new life.” Notably absent from the cast list is Hugh Grant, who tried to get into the wanton sex goddess' ginormous underpants in the first film. Bridget Jones's Baby will be released on April 22, 2016.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
124324,"The former Ukip leader said “what you see is what you get” with the backbencher after he was bombarded with listeners’ texts hailing the Leave campaigner. Reading out listeners’ texts and Facebook messages on his LBC show, they repeatedly told the MEP Theresa May should resign. One text read: “Theresa May is the most uninspiring Prime Minister ever, I do so wish she would unselfishly resign and allow Jacob Rees-Mogg to take over the leadership.” Another added: “She’s doing my head in, I’ve had it, I can’t be with the Tories anymore – I want Mogg!”

GETTY•LBC Nigel Farage praised Jacob Rees-Mogg after listeners called for him to be the next PM

Jacob just couldn’t care less, what you see is what you get and it is, I have to say, very very entertaining Nigel Farage

“Jacob Rees-Mogg to take over perhaps, at least he’s interesting to listen to and wants us out of the EU – May is feeble!” a third added. Mr Farage then shared an anecdote about meeting the fellow Brexiteer at a cricket match last week where the MP gave frank reasons for not being at home with his newborn child. He said: “On Friday I had the very good fortune to be sitting in the stands at Lords watching the test match… and who was I chatting to, but Jacob Rees-Mogg, who loves his cricket. “And I think there’s something about Jacob that does appeal to people – his absolute authenticity.

The world of Jacob Rees-Mogg Sun, July 9, 2017 Jacob Rees-Mogg is one of the biggest characters in the Tory party. Known for his RP diction, humorous speeches and staunchly pro-Brexit views, the MP for Northeast Somerset is firmly in the public eye Play slideshow Getty Images 1 of 10 Jacob Rees-Mogg visits the new Bagpuss Pop-up Shop at Whitelys Shopping Centre

GETTY Nigel Farage praised Jacob Rees-Mogg for his ""authenticity""",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
305321,"GETTY Arsenal star Alexis Sanchez is out of action with a hamstring injury

Yesterday, Wenger revealed that the hamstring injury that he picked up against Norwich in November would not quite be ready in time for the third round clash against Sunderland on Saturday. But when pushed to name a likely return date, Wenger felt that even Wednesday’s Premier League clash against Liverpool at Anfield would come too soon and the trip to the Britannia on Saturday to face Stoke is a more likely target. WILL ARSENAL BEAT SUNDERLAND IN THE FA CUP? PLAY OUR FREE PREDICTOR GAME NOW TO WIN A 3D TV AND PS4!

Arsenal's January transfer plans Mon, January 4, 2016 Express Sport takes a look at what could be in Arsenal's transfer plans for the January window Play slideshow Getty Images 1 of 11 The January transfer window in open, but what could in Arsene Wenger’s plans for Arsenal during the winter sales?

“Alexis is a bit short to be in the squad to more but is not far,” Wenger said. “Liverpool will come too soon as well. Maybe for Stoke.” On the plus side, club captain Mikel Arteta will be considered for selection against Sunderland after passing a fitness test earlier this week.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
93882,"Manchester United are said to have been tracking Martins for a number of months. The 21-year-old impressed in Sporting Lisbon’s 1-0 defeat to Borussia Dortmund in the Champions League last night. And Italian outlet CalcioMercato claim the winger has also caught the attention of AC Milan.

GETTY Manchester United are keen on Sporting Lisbon winger Gelson Martins

GETTY Manchester United face competition from AC Milan for Gelson Martins

The report says United and Milan are prepared to go head-to-head to sign the Portugal international. It is said Martins is unlikely to leave Sporting in January, pointing to a summer transfer battle between the two sides. Inter Milan are also said to be contenders for his signature, and could be a threat given their history of business with Sporting.

Manchester United players leave training in high spirits Thu, October 27, 2016 Click through the gallery for the best snaps of the Man United squad leaving training Play slideshow REUTERS/CAVENDISH PRESS 1 of 9 Click through the gallery for the best snaps of the Man United squad leaving training

Martins is a product of the Portuguese club’s academy, which is responsible for stars like Joao Mario, Nani and Cristiano Ronaldo. He has made 14 appearances this season for Jorge Jesus’ side, scoring two goals and providing seven assists. He has two caps for Portugal but was not part of Fernando Santos’ Euro 2016-winning side.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
351202,"Half-year pre-tax earnings fell 5.9 per cent to £199.2million on 1.4 per cent lower revenue of £484.6million.



But it made a pre-tax loss of £63.6million after a £62.1million early repayment charge on its debts.



Personal membership was down 3.9 per cent at 3.7 million and it warned the 58 per cent rise in premium tax due in November will damage the insurance business.



New EU legislation relating to holiday pay could add to its costs.

Shares fell 43¾p to 289½p. ------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------- UK plc stalls as orders fall UK MANUFACTURING output has stalled for the first time in two and a half years as the strong pound and weak overseas demand damaged exports. The CBI’s industrial trends survey showed firms reporting higher and lower output in the three months to September were split equally.

Advertisement

There was a negative 7 per cent balance on order books with a 24 per cent negative balance on export orders.



CBI director of economics Rain Newton-Smith said: “Exports are the missing link in the UK recovery, with the strong pound squeezing manufacturers’ margins.



They will also have an eye on China’s slowdown.” ------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------- VW budgets £4.7bn to fix crisis VOLKSWAGEN shares slammed into reverse again yesterday as the German carmaker said it would set aside 6.5billion (£4.7billion) to deal with a deepening crisis over emissions tests.



VW said it is working “at full speed” to clarify irregularities, first raised by US regulators, concerning software used in diesel engines installed in 11 million vehicles worldwide.



The boss of its US business, Michael Horn, admitted it “totally screwed up” in using it to rig emissions tests.

ZCY The FTSE 250 company showcased key lines at a fashion show at the British Embassy in Beijing

It was ordered to recall nearly half a million cars in America and could be fi ned up to $$18billion.



The share price fell by up to a fifth following Monday’s 17 per cent loss. It said earnings targets will be adjusted accordingly. ------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------- Chinese deal for Supergroup SUPERGROUP has officially launched its Superdry fashion label in China.



The FTSE 250 company showcased key lines at a fashion show at the British Embassy in Beijing.



Its joint venture with retailer Trendy International, which operates 3,000 stores, will run for at least 10 years, with an investment of up to £18million split evenly. Stores will open by the middle of next year in Shanghai and Beijing, with franchises possible.



Chief executive Euan Sutherland said: “Today marks a significant milestone. We are excited at the prospect of entering this market with such an established and experienced partner.”",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
313356,"Windows 10 users have experienced a number of glitches and bigs following the new update

Microsoft began to roll out its first major update to Windows 10 – codenamed Threshold 2 – last week. The Redmond technology firm claims its Threshold 2 update brings a 30 per cent performance boost over Windows 7 machines running on the same hardware. The blockbuster update also includes performance fixes, visual tweaks, new functionality for virtual assistant Cortana and IT-level Windows 10 management tools to your PC. But Threshold 2 has also been dogged by the familiar controversy that has surrounded Microsoft's new operating system since it launched this summer.

Advertisement

Windows 10 users have reported multiple issues with the latest update, including a bug that causes the Threshold 2 update installation process to become stuck at the 44 per cent mark. Multiple users have reported the issue on the official Windows Forum. Microsoft moderator Softie Anannya Podder has since responded to the Windows 10 users, explaining the issues with the installation could be triggered by issues with the SD card.

WINDOWS • MICROSOFT The update adds the ability to give digital assistant Cortana handwritten commands

""We’ve observed that some devices that have an SD bus with an SD card inserted while installing the Windows 10 November update will stop responding at 44%,"" she posted. ""We are currently investigating the issue."" Removing any external media, disks or SD cards before attempting to update your OS appears to solve the issue – at least until Microsoft releases an official patch for Threshold 2. But the glitch could be a headache for any PC owners who use the SD card to expand their available memory, especially since Threshold 2 requires 20GB of free space to install.

Advertisement

Other users have claimed the Windows 10 update deletes installed applications during the update process. Reddit users have flooded online forums to complain about the issue. According to the forum users, Windows 10 will notify you when apps were uninstalled during the Threshold 2 update process. But users should be warned in advance, rather than retrospectively of the uninstalls.

GETTY Microsoft has delayed its own update to users who recently upgraded to Windows 10

Threshold 2 can also reset and download drivers for external components, multiple users have reported. Microsoft is currently withholding the operating system update to a number of users. In an official Windows Update FAQ, the Redmond technology company admits: ""If it’s been less than 31 days since you upgraded to Windows 10, you won’t get the November update right away. ""This will allow you to go back to your previous version of Windows if you choose. ""After the 31 days have passed, your PC will automatically download the November update.”",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
206074,"GETTY It is feared that terrorist could hide among Lampedusa migrants

Tourists drawn to Lampedusa by its pristine beach need only glance at the damaged hulls to appreciate why this island in the Mediterranean between Africa and Sicily meant salvation following treacherous land and sea crossings for more than 150,000 African migrants last year alone. Now recent boasts by Islamic State that it would use unrest in Libya as a springboard to import terror into Europe have turned this tiny Italian island, 70 miles off the coast of Tunisia, from a mass migration hub into one of Europe’s biggest security nightmares. Immigration centres are underfunded by a country still in the grip of a financial crisis, and fingerprinting of migrants is not legally enforceable. Experts last night warned it is only a matter of time until a follower answers the call of the Islamic caliphate – which has already threatened to flood Europe with half a million asylum seekers – by taking advantage of the human tsunami. Sebastiano Sali, of the department of war studies at King’s College London, said: “The biggest threat now is the lone wolf scenario, where a jihadi could use the confusion to pass himself off as an asylum seeker to launch a major incident at one of Europe’s capital cities.” While most of the 2,500 migrants plucked from the sea and landed in Lampedusa last month have been shipped to the mainland those remaining, who spend their days in clusters along the single main street, had harrowing and desperate stories to tell. Farah Mohamad, a 15-year-old who reached Lampedusa 10 days ago, recounted how his family fled Somalia and the threat of Al Qaeda more than eight years ago, reaching Libya via Uganda and Sudan only to find Tripoli just as anarchic as his homeland. A mosque helped fund his $$2000 journey over the Mediterranean. “Libya was very scary,” said the boy.

MARK KEHOE Rotting hulls of boats in the marina tell their own story

“There is no government there. ""No one is in charge. ""Very bad things happened. ""I was arrested by soldiers. ""They wanted $$7,000 to let me go, but my family doesn’t have any money. ""I was there for a month and a half. ""People from the mosque helped me and paid $$2000. ""At first the sea was too rough. I saw pieces of wood floating and I knew these were from other boats that had sunk. “They put me in a plastic boat. ""There were 300 of us and it was very crowded. ""Some were from Syria, Afghanistan, Egypt, and even Palestine but I didn’t know anyone and I don’t speak Arabic so I felt totally alone. ""Some on the boat were very devout and prayed. Some men were travelling alone.

MARK KEHOE Farah Mohamad, 15, is a new arrival from Kenya

""The captain was Libyan and I kept quiet,” he said. After almost two days at sea they were spotted by an Italian coastguard vessel and picked up. Like 60 per cent of all migrants who land in Italy, Farah will make his way further afield. “I have a friend in Norway. ""We keep in touch through Facebook. ""I will try to join him there. ""I would also love to go to the UK. ""The British are very nice.” Others have been less lucky. In 2013 more than 300 died after their boat capsized. That incident caused Italy’s previous government to launch operation Mare Nostrum, a £9million a month search-and-rescue mission that covered 27,000 square miles. Financially unsustainable, it was scrapped and replaced by a smaller EU operation with a 30-mile radius.

MARK KEHOE Island’s deputy mayor Damiano Sferlazzo

Lampedusa’s deputy mayor Damiano Sferlazzo said Italy’s priority remained the saving of lives. But he criticised Italy’s government and the EU for not doing enough to help and said terrorists could easily get through, with a European capital as a target. He said: “Italy recognises our role, but does not help us. ""Rome is still crippled by the economic crisis of 2011. ""We don’t have a proper reception centre here, it’s more an emergency centre, designed to keep them for 48 hours before they’re transferred to the mainland. ""They end up in Italy and, of course, the rest of Europe. “When they started emptying out the Libyan prisons we were warned to expect problems. ""Of course, there could be rogue jihadis, the kind of people that would kill a child without pause. ""Their targets will be Rome or another European capital.” Local residents revealed that migrants often stay for months, rather than days. “They are allowed to come and go as they pleased,” said one B&B owner. “When it’s packed, they sleep outside under the trees.”

There could be rogue jihadis, the kind of people that would kill a child without pause Damiano Sferlazzo, Lampedusa's vice mayor",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
330589,"Coutinho arrived on Merseyside 18 months ago and helped Liverpool qualify for top-level European football last season for the first time since 2009/10.

And the Brazilian, 22, who has established himself as a major figure in Brendan Rodgers youthful squad, insists he is happy to open talks with Reds bosses over an extended deal.

“I’d be happy to analyse a new contract,” he told the Sun on Sunday.

“It is very important for me to play in the Champions League but staying does not rely only on that.

“It relies on other things, like being happy.”",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
316267,"A baying mob yesterday brought a busy motorway to a standstill, openly attacking trucks laden with goods bound for Britain.



The aggressive pack of 2,000 refugees desperate to reach the UK overran police as they flooded roads approaching the port.



In what are becoming alarmingly frequent scenes terrified lorry drivers and petrified tourists feared for their lives as hooded men ran amok.



The Daily Express was able to capture the chilling images after being caught in the gridlock just a mile from the docks.



At one stage a gang of 500 men, some in balaclavas, surrounded an articulated lorry and began violently shaking it.

Tim Clarke Migrants try to hail down the lorries heading for Britain

Advertisement

TIM CLARKE A baying mob brought a busy motorway to a standstill

Tim Clarke Police are struggling to cope with the influx of migrants into Calais

The size and strength of the brazen posse meant police armed with batons and CS gas were helpless to stem the tide.



As sirens and whistles blared the armed and angry refugees forced traffic to stop.



Migrants smashed up road signs and dragged debris into the road to deliberately slow down approaching lorries while other tried to break into the back.



The astonishing outbreak of disorder enabled some to clamber on to the roofs of 44-tonne trucks as their desperation to make it to the UK reached new heights.

Advertisement

TIM CLARKE Hooded men ran amok as migrants tried to board lorries in Calais

TIM CLARKE The pack of 2,000 refugees desperate to reach the UK overran police

Riot police, some with their batons raised, were forced to retreat as numbers quickly swelled.



The fearless mob even taunted uniformed officers from bridges and cheered loudly as others tried to smash their way in to vehicles.



Drivers were hastily told to ignore speed limits and lorries raced to the ferry terminal with their back doors swinging wide open.



A handful of migrants were caught hiding among cargo and were forcibly dragged from the back and pinned to the ground in a rare show of strength by the French CRS.



The chaos is now so bad British lorry drivers are boycotting the port while others have called for the Army to be drafted in to restore order.

TIm Clarke The number of migrants in Calais is becoming a real problem for France

Tim Clarke Migrants in Calais yesterday surround traffic heading for Britain

There are now thought to be at least 4,000 migrants living in the crime-ridden Calais ghetto dubbed the “Jungle” who outnumber police 10 to one.



But as the refugee crisis across Europe spirals out of control experts say that could double in size within weeks.



The clamour to reach Britain is so acute it is disrupting the flow of supplies into the UK.



Truckers say their lives are at risk as migrants run amok riot with machetes, knives and baseball bats while the freight industry says the situation is “simply unsustainable”.



It is feared the migrants’ lawless home on a patch of wasteland close to the ferry terminal will soon swell to epidemic proportions, triggering a humanitarian and public order disaster.

Tim Clarke Migrants in Calais today trying to board lorries

Tim Clarke Police in Calais try to control the growing threat to lorry drivers

Philippe Mignonet, the beleaguered deputy mayor of Calais, said: “The number will grow, no doubt.



“The British government says it is our responsibility when they perfectly know migrants’ destination is not Calais but England.



“We are fed up with that attitude. I more and more have the feeling they do not have the courage to come over to face the reality and talk to us.”



The overstretched Border Force, the last line of defence, is largely helpless to prevent desperate migrants trying to smuggle themselves into the UK with one exasperated official saying “the clandestines are running riot”.

The rise in organised gangs operating elaborate smuggling rackets is leading to more than 100 attempts to cross the Channel every day - double the rate of last year.



Ukip MEP Steven Woolfe, who last week became the first British politician to visit the Jungle camp, said: “I am concerned for British truck drivers who constantly feel their lives are in danger. We could see something far worse in the future unless we get a grip on this crisis now.”



The Home Office said: “The maintenance of law and order on French soil is the responsibility of the French Government.”

Tim Clarke Migrants attempting to board lorries in Calais",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
312902,"WhatsApp could be BANNED in the UK within weeks under David Cameron’s Snoopers’ Charter plans

Enjoy WhatsApp while you still can. Britons could see the hugely popular cross-platform app BANNED under strict new laws on social media and online messaging services. Prime Minister David Cameron is pressing ahead with new legislation that plans to stop people from sending any form of encrypted messages. A number of popular messaging services – including WhatsApp, iMessage and Snapchat – currently scramble communications between their users.

If the controversial new legislation is passed in the coming weeks all three services could be outlawed in the United Kingdom. More than 45,000 Express.co.uk readers have spoken out against Prime Minister Cameron's plans. “In our country, do we want to allow a means of communication between people which we cannot read?” said Prime Minister Cameron earlier this year. ""My answer to that question is: 'No, we must not’.” The news comes weeks after WhatsApp was named one of the worst apps for user privacy.

Advertisement

GETTY David Cameron has spoken out against encrypted messaging services, like WhatsApp

Private online communications will be opened-up by the Government's ""Snooper's Charter"" – or the Investigatory Powers Bill, to give the bill its full title – which requires internet service providers, phone companies and technology firms like Google, Apple, Facebook and WhatsApp keep a record of all of your activity. This troubling database of information, which will include all your Google searches, your Facebook conversations, WhatsApp group messages and SnapChat videos, will be made available to the UK police and Government whenever they require. Home Secretary Theresa May has warned the Investigatory Powers Bill could be passed this Autumn. The recent spate of terrorist attacks – including the shooting of 30 Britons on a beach in Tunisia – has prompted the Conservative Government to act fast. British police currently make a request to access personal metadata – texts, emails, phone calls and internet searches – once every two minutes in the UK, according to data from campign group Big Brother Watch. ""We have always been able, on the authority of the Home Secretary, to sign a warrant and intercept a phone call, a mobile phone call or other media communications,"" Mr Cameron added.

Advertisement

GETTY A slew of popular messaging services could be at risk, thanks to encryption of users' data

“But the question we must ask ourselves is whether, as technology develops, we are content to leave a safe space – a new means of communication – for terrorists to communicate with each other.” The full extent of the powers granted by the Investigatory Powers Bill remain unclear. However, many have slammed the law as a breach of privacy. Executive director of The Open Rights Group Jim Killock said: ""The Government is signalling that it wants to press ahead with increased powers of data collection and retention for the police and GCHQ – spying on everyone, whether suspected of a crime or not.

""This is the return of the ‘Snooper's Charter' even as the ability to collect and retain data gets less and less workable."" Liberty – a group who campaign for civil liberties and human rights in the UK – added: ""We take no issue with the use of intrusive surveillance powers per se – targeted surveillance can play an important part in preventing and detecting serious crime. ""But the current regime just doesn’t provide sufficient safeguards to ensure that such surveillance is conducted lawfully, and in a necessary and proportionate way.""

GETTY Ex-Deputy Prime Minister Nick Clegg blocked the 'Snoopers' Charter' during his time in power

Former Deputy Prime Minister Nick Clegg – who blocked the 'Snoopers' Charter' while he was in power – also joined those speaking out against the Conservatives' bill. He said: ""We have every right to invade the privacy of terrorists and those we think want to do us harm, but we should not equate that with invading the privacy of every single person in the UK. They are not the same thing. ""The so-called Snoopers’ Charter is not targeted. It’s not proportionate. ""It’s not harmless. It would be a new and dramatic shift in the relationship between the state and the individual. ""People who blithely say they are happy for their communications to be open to scrutiny because they have 'nothing to hide' have failed to grasp something fundamental about open democratic societies: We do not make ourselves safer by making ourselves less free.""

Facebook is the number one app. Every second 20,000 people are on Facebook Instagram comes in at number two, with 75 million daily users 34 Billion messages are received on WhatsApp daily The number four app, Google Maps was launched in 2005 Spotify has 60 million users, with 15 million paid subscribers People share 1.3 million pieces of content on Facebook every minute of every day on Facebook There are more than 75 million daily Instagram users People share 1.3 million pieces of content on Facebook every minute of every day Facebook generates $$1.4 million in revenue every hour 4 friends sharing on smart phones. 51% of Instsgram users are male Facebook has nearly 1.4 billion users that are spread all around the world There are more than 75 million daily Instagram users 34 Billion messages are received on WhatsApp daily Every second there are 20,000 people on Facebook. This means in just 18 minutes there are 11 million users on Facebook Google Maps was launched in 2005 and now receives over 1 billion requests every month WhatsApp was purchased by Facebook $$16-19 billion Daniel Ek, CEO and Founder of Spotify. There are over 20 Million songs on Spotify On Instagram 53% of posts have at least one hashtag. 20% have more than 6 hashtags The Street View team have driven more than five million miles to gather images from around the world USA, New York State, New York City, View of Midtown Manhattan at dusk posted on Instagram Spotify has 60 million total users, 15 million paid subscribers 5 million playlists are created or edited daily on Spotify A rain forest surrounding Mount Mabu, in Africa, is nicknamed ""Google Forest"" after its discovery by the mapping service",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
221444,"PA REAL LIFE Lydia was born with a rare condition that saw her head swell to adult size

Lydia Rankin has been fighting for life since before she was even born. Her mother, Ruth, was told that her baby would not survive the birth.

At Ruth’s 20-week-scan, medics detected a very rare brain disorder in her unborn child. But the Greater Manchester resident knew her little girl was a fighter from the moment she felt her strong kicks.

PA REAL LIFE Lydia's condition sees a build up of fluid in the head that makes it expand

GRAPHIC CONTENT: Horrible common diseases Thu, July 21, 2016 WARNING GRAPHIC CONTENT: Take a look at these common conditions in some of their worst forms. If you're squeamish look away now. Play slideshow Getty Images 1 of 16 Cestoda (Tapeworm) a condition where parasites live in your small intestine for years at a time, laying eggs and feasting off host blood and feces

Doctors offered Ruth a termination when she was less than halfway through her pregnancy. But she didn’t hesitate to refuse, and young Lydia is now four years old. Ruth said: “The surgeon has told us she made her own rule book. It has been a rollercoaster. We've been told three times in her life she was going to die but she's a strong ox. “She inspires all of us and her strength keeps us alive. She is our miracle.”

PA REAL LIFE Ruth was told baby Lydia wouldn't live past a few weeks

Lydia’s condition is called Alobar holoprosencephaly, which renders the front lobes of the brain unable to separate during development. The life-limiting condition means she can’t walk or talk, and is still unable to move her arms and legs as signals aren’t transmitted from her brain. She also has hydrocephalus, which is a build up of fluid that makes the head expand. In Lydia’s short life, she has had over 40 operations on her head but mum-of-four Ruth said she is still full of smiles.

PA REAL LIFE Ruth said Lydia is ""full of smiles""",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
347915,"Monaco will not recall Falcao from Chelsea with the Colombia striker struggling with injury

The 29-year-old is on loan from the wealthy Ligue 1 club after former Blues boss Jose Mourinho brought him to Stamford Bridge in the summer. But a thigh injury has kept Falcao out since of action since the end of October.

Alex Oxlade-Chamberlain: Chelsea are reportedly considering a move for the Arsenal man as a potential replacement for Eden Hazard Breel Embolo: Chelsea are said to be lining up a January move to sign the FC Basel man Jamie Vardy: The Leicester man is a goal machine and while the Foxes are keen to keep hold of him, a big money move to Chelsea could be hard to resist Alex Teixeira: The £30m-rated forward has reportedly agreed a deal to join Chelsea and could be Hiddink's first signing Zlatan Ibrahimovic: Has long been linked with a move to the Premier League and is out of contract in the summer Marquinhos: The Brazilian could be the answer to Chelsea's defensive woes Javier Hernandez: 'Chicharito' has finally found his feet in the Bundesliga and Chelsea are glancing an eye in his direction to solve their goalscoring issues John Stones: Everton rejected three bids from Jose Mourinho in the summer and are expected to face more pressure in January Anderson Talisca: Benfica playmaker who Chelsea are lining up to replace Oscar Ruben Neves: Arguably the most impressive 18-year-old in world football, a regular in Porto's side and now a full international Alexandre Lacazette: One of Europe's top marksmen last season for Lyon and remains a target for Chelsea Youri Tielemans: The highly-rated Belgian has a number of potential suitors, Chelsea being one of them Alex Telles: Chelsea supposedly missed out on the Brazilian left-back in the summer but could reignite their interest in January Goncalo Guedes: Another youngster off the Benfica production line and a player Chelsea will face stiff competition to sign Paul Pogba: One of the world's best players already at the age of 22, the Frenchman is top of the shopping list for many of Europe's big teams Kostas Manolas: The Blues showed interest in the summer and may make an attempt to bolster their defensive options in January Matt Miazga: Young New York Red Bulls defender who has attracted the attention of North American scouts Andre Gomes: Cultured midfielder who Valencia tied down to a five-year contract in 2015 Gonzalo Higuain: There are rumours that Chelsea will ditch Diego Costa in favour of Napoli's Argentinian striker Paco Alcacer: 22-year-old Spanish striker who now leads the line for his country with distinction Andriy Yarmolenko: Ukrainian winger who has impressed with his pacey, direct approach for Dynamo Kiev Mauro Icardi: Inter's captain only signed a new contract at the end of last season but is still being watched by Europe's big guns Jese Rodriguez: Injuries and the presence of Cristiano Ronaldo and Gareth Bale have restricted the Spaniard's involvement, and Chelsea may swoop Antoine Griezmann: Only Ronaldo and Lionel Messi have more La Liga goals in the last two seasons, so no wonder Chelsea are keen Cristiano Ronaldo: Chelsea are on alert after the Portuguese magician stated his desire to link up with Mourinho again

Advertisement

He has only managed one goal in 11 appearances for Chelsea and he was recently back at Monaco to undergo tests to assess the extent of his injury. Diego Costa and Loic Remy are above Falcao in the pecking order at Chelsea and Monaco's vice-president, Vadim Vasilyev, confirmed the Colombian faces an extended spell on the sidelines.

Advertisement

He played 29 matches when he was on loan at Manchester United last season but he could only score four goals in a desperately disappointing campaign. ""Falcao is currently injured,"" Vasilyev told Monaco's club website. ""He has six to eight weeks to go like that. ""We have decided not to take him back to Monaco for the moment.""",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
302377,"The outspoken commentator’s guest declared that the voters and campaigners who usually campaign for “democracy” are now the ones trying to “crush it”. In his passionate tirade, the caller, known only as Adam, who usually sides with the left-wing, made an astonishing U-turn to proclaim he was “gobsmacked” by their efforts to campaign against democracy. He told LBC listeners: “One thing that has really given me hope – I voted Leave, but my friends voted Remain. “I’ve had these friends say to me, ‘Adam, we may have voted Remain, but what has really astounded us is how this whole class – mostly on social media – have come out and say we should ignore the vote, we should try and scupper it, we should support MPs who are going to overturn it.’

LBC•GETTY A guest on Katie Hopkins' phone-in declared he was sickened by left-wing attempts to block Brexit

I’m gobsmacked by the people who usually shout about democracy are only too keen to crush it LBC caller, Adam

“What has really given me hope is these people, who voted Remain, have said, ‘Ok, we may have voted Remain but we are absolutely disgusted by this clique that wants to overturn democracy.’ “Now, I consider myself of the left – of a left-wing background – but I’m absolutely gobsmacked by the people who usually shout about liberty and democracy are only too keen to crush it. “The left hate democracy here!” Key political figures throughout the Brexit debate were accused of running the Project Fear campaign, which aimed to panic voters with economic threats.

GETTY David Cameron spearheaded Remain campaign, Project Fear

In a tactic spearheaded by George Osborne and David Cameron, and followed by more liberal politicians like Nick Clegg, it was said a vote to leave the European Union would risk a recession. However, figures from the Office of National Statistics last week showed the economy grew by 0.5 per cent in the third quarter. The prominent Leave campaigner, Nigel Farage, during a scathing assessment of the pair, declared their tactics as “despicable”, and showed his pleasure in them no longer being involved in frontline politics. Speaking on LBC, he said: “[Osborne] doubled the national debt in five years, but pretended to the country he was this fiscally responsible guy.

“But, I think his behaviour during the referendum along with the Treasury and the Bank of England was despicable.” Mr Farage added that he deplored their attempts to “frighten the life out of people” by using “precise figures” bidding to enhance their images as in the know politicians. The ex-Ukip leader then claimed that the EU referendum could have been avoided in its entirety if then Prime Minister Mr Cameron had actually challenged Brussels eurocrats for a better deal.

THE BREXITEERS Sun, January 17, 2016 Brexit: Independent experts have drawn up a list of the most influential people on Brexit Play slideshow 1 of 51",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
65354,"Counting down to the Pokemon Go Equinox event

Pokemon Go fans are counting down to the start of the Equinox event, which brings lots of special in-game bonuses.

And fortunately there’s not long to wait, because the Pokemon Go Equinox event has a 9pm UK start time on September 22.

The event runs all the way until October 2, where it also finishes at 9pm BST in the UK.

The big new Pokemon Go event is Niantic’s way of celebrating the autumn season, which means new adventures.

“With cool autumn nights quickly approaching in the Northern Hemisphere and sunny spring days arriving in the Southern Hemisphere, we thought it would be the perfect time to celebrate the coming equinox with an in-game event. New seasons mean new adventures!” reads a blog post.

But what fans are really looking forward to is the in-game bonuses.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
227618,"ARSENAL TRANSFER NEWS LIVE UPDATES: All the latest from the Emirates… Thursday 3 August Monaco to plot Alexis Sanchez move 23:00: Monaco will reportedly try and use Arsenal’s interest in Thomas Lemar to push for a deal for Alexis Sanchez. Arsenal have been exploring a deal for Thomas Lemar, with Arsene Wenger keen to shore up his midfield options. Meanwhile, Sanchez, who has one year left to run on his present contract, has yet to agree a new deal. Paris Saint-Germain were previously tracking the Chilean before they thrashed out a £198million deal for Neymar. And now according to The Sun, Monaco are weighing up a £45m bid. Arsene Wenger on Alexis Sanchez 22.00: Arsene Wenger has hit back at talk over Alexis Sanchez’s Arsenal future, insisting it would be ‘suicide’ to do so. Manchester City and Paris Saint-Germain are both interested in signing him, with the former prepared to offer him weekly wages close to £400,000. Sanchez returned to training for the Gunners on Tuesday, and looked to be in good spirits, even appearing to kiss the club badge. And Wenger has explained why he doesn’t want to be drawn into the debate over whether Sanchez stays or leaves. “We know we have a duty to inform people, but to talk about some things is not information anymore - it is suicide,"" he said. Lemar transfer boost 19.05: Monaco boss Leonardo Jardim has admitted the club could struggle to keep the likes of Thomas Lemar and Kylian Mbappe. ""All the players who were important last season are important to keep for the club,” Jardim told reporters. ""But it has been shown over the years that it's not always possible to keep the players, and you know how our project works. ""So our goal is to work well with players who will stay here after the transfer window closes.""

GETTY Thomas Lemar could still leave Monaco for Arsenal

Neymar shirts being burnt 18:15: Barcelona fans are burning shirts with Neymar’s name on the back after his £200million move - the latest exchange rate figure - was confirmed.



The club announced today have accepted a payment of 222 million euros from Neymar's legal representatives ""with regards to the unilateral termination of the contract that united both parties"".



And supporters reacted by posting pics of burning Neymar shirts all over Twitter. Cash in on Sanchez 16.45: Arsenal should sell Alexis Sanchez and use the funds to sign Thomas Lemar and a new centre-half, according to Charlie Nicholas. ""If you can sell your best ever player in Thierry Henry, and your second greatest in Patrick Vieira, then I'd rather you sold a player playing silly games over his future,"" Nicholas told Sky Sports. ""Sanchez has asked Arsenal for similar wages to Cristiano Ronaldo but he is not in the same world! ""It's not about what you lose, it's about how you replace it. ""They could sell £100million worth of players, sign Thomas Lemar and finally get a top-class centre-back and be in a stronger position."" Perez on his way 16:00 When asked if Arsene Wenger saw Lucas Perez's future elsewhere, he replied: ""Yes, because we have a congestion of strikers.



""I don't like to lose him because, for me, he's a top-quality striker but we have many strikers. At some stage, too much competition is not competition any more.



""You cannot give the chance to everybody, so if he finds a satisfying solution at least for a short time, he will do it."" Wenger provides contract updates 14:50: Arsene Wenger says there’s nothing to announce"" on any new deals for players including Mesut Ozil, Alex Oxlade-Chamberlain, Jack Wilshere and Kieran Gibbs, who have he final year of their respective contracts. But revealed he expects forward Lucas Perez to leave. When asked if he saw Perez's future elsewhere, Wenger replied: ""Yes, because we have a congestion of strikers. ""I don't like to lose him because, for me, he's a top-quality striker but we have many strikers. At some stage, too much competition is not competition any more. ""You cannot give the chance to everybody, so if he finds a satisfying solution at least for a short time, he will do it.""

TWITTER Arsenal News: Fans label Alexis Sanchez a SNAKE after Arsenal star Theo Walcott posts pic on Twitter

More Wenger on Alexis 14:10: Arsene Wenger continued to discuss Alexis Sanchez during today’s press conference. Asked about how the Chilean was coping mentally, Wenger said: “He's been good n training, he had a good rest. “He needs to work on his fitness but once he's in the game he's sharp. He looks like he's never been away. “He's over the flu yes. I told you that's never a problem for us. The frame of mind is quite easy you focus on the game. “This career passed quickly in your life, you enjoy every single moment.” Sanchez going nowhere - Wenger 13:25: Arsene Wenger has confirmed that Alexis Sanchez will remain with Arsenal next season. The Chile international only returned to pre-season on Tuesday after being handed an extended break following the Confederations Cup. And rumours continue to circulate about his future with rivals Manchester City monitoring his situation. But Wenger reiterated that Sanchez would NOT be sold, and the player would have to accept his decision. He said: ”He is focused. My decision is clear, he will stay. He will accept that."" Theo’s post backfires 12:35: Theo Walcott posted a picture on Twitter of himself holding a snake yesterday - only for it to spectacularly backfire. The Arsenal star looks cagey as he holds the snake’s head with the body draped around his neck. Walcott posted two emojis alongside the picture - one of a snake and the other of a flushed face. But fans reacted by turning the tables and hitting out at his wantaway team-mate Alexis Sanchez. Scores of supporters likened Sanchez to the snake with one writing: “How was Alexis today?” Another added: “Is that Sanchez?” The 28-year-old is reportedly wanted by the likes of Manchester City and Paris St-Germain and has less than one year to run on his current contract with the Gunners. Giroud still on Everton radar 11:45: Everton are ready to take their summer spending to an astonishing £200MILLION. The Mirror say Everton will take their summer outlay towards £200m by wrapping up a deal for Gylfi Sigurdsson and making TWO more signings. Express Sport understands talks between the Toffees and Swansea are continuing with a £50m resolution expected in the next few days. Koeman is also interested in Arsenal hitman Olivier Giroud and Crystal Palace forward Christian Benteke. The Dutchman also wants another defender with Ashley Willians turning 33 and Phil Jagielka hitting 35 this month. Arsenal far from title contenders - Nicholas 10:40: Can Arsenal win the Premier League title? Charlie Nicholas doesn’t think so. The Sky Sports pundit believes Manchester City are the leading contenders, and Arsene Wenger’s side are “some way off.” Asked if Arsenal were capable of stepping up to the plate, Nicholas said: “That's the simple question right now. Forget the Europa League, it's all about the Premier League and taking on the big spenders, led by Manchester City. “I fear there are some way off because of the confusion at the club. Arsene Wenger used the wrong terminology when suggesting they are in an ideal situation with the contracts. “Wenger is caught in a difficult place because he's such a loyal guy and, while I have no issue with him being prudent, he said he would analyse it all at the end of the campaign but he's still not addressed the defensive issues. “I stand by what I said last season, they don't have the best XI, maybe not the best 15, but the squad is among the best around.”

GETTY Arsenal News: Charlie Nicholas doesn't think Arsene Wenger's side can win the title

Sancho heading to London 09:50: Manchester City teenager Jadon Sancho has NOT trained with the club since last week, and has traveled to London to force though a move, reports suggest. The Independent claim Sancho, 17, is being tracked by North London duo Arsenal and Tottenham, and is open to joining either. Sancho wants out of the Etihad as he hopes to find a clearer pathway to first-team football than he has so far been unable to achieve at City. The Manchester Evening News claim Manchester United are also interested in the talented midfielder. Wilshere wants to stay, Arsenal have other ideas 09:00: Jack Wilshere is prepared to stay and fight for his Arsenal future. The England international has entered the final year of his Emirates contract, and has NOT been offered an extension. The Telegraph claim Arsene Wenger is willing to sell the 25-year-old, but Wilshere thinks he can still salvage his career in North London. He’s returned to full training this week following his broken leg, but is unlikely to feature in Arsenal’s early Premier League fixtures. Sevilla in for £13m Perez 08:00: Sevilla have joined the battle to sign Arsenal striker Lucas Perez, according to his agent Rodrigo Fernandez Lovelle. The Spaniard’s representative also revealed that Arsenal value Perez at £13.4million. Two clubs in Spain are already in contact with Arsenal to get the transfer of Perez,"" he said. ""Sevilla want to sign him in addition to Deportivo La Coruna, a German team and Fenerbahce, but Perez has a three-year contract with Arsenal. “Arsenal wants 15 million euros for Lucas Perez the club that wants to close the transfer must convince Arsenal, we have no problem. ""Lucas Perez wants to start a team that can be Sevilla, Fenerbahce or another.""

GETTY Arsenal Transfer News: Sevilla want to sign Lucas Perez

Arsenal in the hunt for Max Meyer 05:30: Arsenal have joined the race to sign Max Meyer, reports claim. The Schalke star has been linked with a move to the Premier League in the past. And according to RevierSport, the Gunners along with Liverpool and Tottenham are showing an interest. When asked about his future recently, Meyer said: “It is not the case that I want to leave come what may. ""As things stand [I will stay], but you can never say for sure when you have one year left on your contract and the transfer window is open for another couple of months."" Arsenal's failed Ousmane Dembele bid 04:00: Borussia Dortmund have rejected an offer from Arsenal for wing wizard Ousmane Dembele, reports have said. Arsenal are attempting to sign a winger with Arsene Wenger determined to add more firepower to his squad for the forthcoming campaign. The Gunners are growing increasingly likely to lose Alexis Sanchez, with the Chile star's contract up next year. Express Sport understands Paris Saint-Germain will launch a £35million bid for him once they have completed the signing of Neymar. Arsenal have spent the summer hunting Monaco winger Thomas Lemar, but Leonardo Jardim's side have so far managed to retain the France international. But Spanish newspaper Mundo Deportivo say they have failed with a bid to sign Dembele. Thomas Lemar latest 02:00: Monaco boss Leonardo Jardim has tried to brush aside talk linking Thomas Lemar with a move away from the club. Thomas Lemar has been heavily linked with a summer move to Arsenal. Monaco are holding out for a fee of £50million for the highly-rated midfielder, who helped them win the Ligue 1 title and reach the semi-finals of the Champions League last term. And Jardim has tried to kill off suggestions of a move for the 21-year-old. “All the players who were important last season are important to keep for the club,” Jardim said. “But it has been showed over the years that it's not always possible to keep the players, and you know how our project works. Wednesday 2 August Emi Martinez leaves on loan 23.45: Arsenal have announced Emi Martinez has joined La Liga side Getafe on loan for the 2017/18 season. Martinez didn't play in the Emirates Cup over the weekend and wasn't spotted in training earlier today. And Arsenal boss Arsene Wenger has decided to send him out on loan to gain more experience abroad. Arsenal said in a statement: ""The 24-year-old made five first team appearances for us last season, keeping three clean sheets. ""He featured twice in the Premier League, impressing and keeping a clean sheet in the 3-0 home win over West Ham United.” Sanchez Barca return 21.15: Barcelona are reportedly looking at Alexis Sanchez as a potential replacement for Neymar. The Brazil international is nearing a record-breaking £200m move to Paris Saint-Germain. And Spanish outlet Don Balon claim the La Liga side could bring Sanchez back to the Nou Camp, three years after he departed the club. Juventus forward Paulo Dybala has also been linked. Ospina's going nowhere 18.45: David Ospina has said he wants to remain at Arsenal this season, despite reports linking him with a move. ""I have a contract here, I'm happy and I'm going to fight to the end,"" he told Spanish newspaper AS Diario. ""I want to continue and win a job. ""That's what I'm working for, I've been working for three years and now I'm waiting for the opportunity.""

GETTY David Ospina has no intention of leaving Arsenal this summer

Wilshere urged to leave 17:30: Former Arsenal forward Paul Mariner believes Jack Wilshere should leave the club. The 25-year-old has been told he can leave the Emirates Stadium and has attracted interest, but Arsenal are demanding a fee in the region of £20million. Mariner told ESPN FC: “Yeah, it is [time for him to leave Arsenal]. “What I didn’t like from Wilshere is he wants to stay in London. “I mean look you go play your football wherever you’re going to play your football. “I just don’t like that from him. I think he’s got to spread his wings. “To be honest as an Englishman and an ex-Arsenal player I’d like to see him just spread his wings totally and go abroad.” New Arsenal contract 15:45: Zech Medley has signed his first professional contract with Arsenal. The 17-year-old defender joined our academy as a scholar last season. Aguero to Arsenal? 15:00: Manchester City are considering offering Sergio Aguero to Arsenal in a bid to convince them to sell Alexis Sanchez. The Gambling Times claim City are prepared to offload Aguero to the Gunners in order to finally sign Sanchez. They say City's hierarchy would prefer to keep hold of the Argentine but fear he could become unhappy with his role in the upcoming campaign. City don't have a problem with selling Aguero to Arsenal as they don't consider them as realistic title contenders. Giroud set to stay 14:05: Olivier Giroud is edging closer to making a decision on his future and it looks to be good news for Arsenal supporters. Following the arrival of Alexandre Lacazette from Lyon last month Giroud's future was thrown into further doubt with him likely to fall down the pecking order. Giroud has previously admitted leaving Arsenal is an option. At one stage it looked like Giroud was set to call time on his spell with the Gunners, but French publication Le10 Sport claim he is now prepared to stay. They say he has been mulling over his future and assessing where he stands in Wenger's plans for the upcoming season with Lacazette in the fold and he is willing to fight for his place.

GETTY Olivier Giroud looks set to stay at Arsenal

Neymar knock-on? 11:58: Neymar’s move to Paris Saint-Germain could have an effect on Arsenal. Express Sport exclusively revealed on Sunday that PSG will make a £35m bid for Alexis Sanchez as soon as they have smashed the world transfer record to sign Neymar. Arsene Wenger will be hoping Neymar fails his medical then! Wenger tells Sanchez no City move 09:40: Arsene Wenger has told Alexis Sanchez that he will not be sold to another Premier League club this summer. Sanchez returned to training yesterday after his holiday and complaints of flu to be told by the Arsenal manager that he will not be allowed to join Manchester City or Chelsea. That is despite the Chile international threatening to run down his contract and leave on a free transfer next summer. But The Times say while Wenger will not sell to a domestical rival he has not completely ruled out flogging Sanchez to a foreign club if Arsenal receive a big offer before the transfer window closes at the end of this month. Arsenal make big offer for Caen star Karamoh 08:00: Arsenal have offered more money than Inter Milan to Caen star Yann Karamoh, according to journalist Gianluca Di Marzio. Arsenal and Tottenham have both been linked with summer swoops for the Caen star, who scored five goals for the Ligue 1 side last season. Manager Arsene Wenger is keen on the 19-year-old to fill the void left by Lucas Perez's impending departure. Perez is said to be in talks with Turkish side Fenerbahce about a move away from north London, just 12 months after he arrived from La Liga side Deportivo La Coruna. As a result, Wenger has turned his attentions to Ivorian Karamoh, who starred for Caen as they finished seventh last season. And Di Marzio says the Gunners have presented an offer with a higher salary than the one Serie A giants Inter have.

How Arsenal could look with Thomas Lemar Thu, August 31, 2017 How could Arsenal look if they signed Monaco star Thomas Lemar? Play slideshow Getty Images 1 of 12 How might the Arsenal starting XI look with Thomas Lemar?

Arsenal players convinced Alexis Sanchez wants out 06:00: Arsenal players think Alexis Sanchez is desperate to quit the Emirates after returning to training on Tuesday, according to stunning reports. Arsenal star Sanchez has been regularly linked with moves to Manchester City, Paris Saint-Germain and Bayern Munich throughout the summer. Express Sport understands PSG are willing to launch a £35million for the Chile international, but only after they have completed a sensational £196m deal for Barcelona winger Neymar. Sanchez returned to training on Tuesday after initially delaying his return due to illness. And the Daily Mail claim the 28-year-old left members of the squad in no doubt that he has made up his mind to call time on his Arsenal career. Real Madrid worried about Vasquez 04:00: Real Madrid are worried Lucas Vasquez could leave, with Arsenal among the clubs keen to sign him. That's according to Diario Gol, who say the winger is on the Gunners' radar. However, manager Zinedine Zidane is desperate to keep him. The report says the Frenchman is concerned that he would struggle to sign a replacement. Alexis Sanchez wants Man City move 03:00: Arsenal star Alexis Sanchez has made a move to Manchester City his No1 priority. The Daily Mail claim he wants a reunion with Pep Guardiola at Manchester City. PSG are also in the mix for his signature. But Sanchez wants a move to the Etihad instead. Perry Groves has his say on Mesut Ozil 02:00: Arsenal star Mesut Ozil isn’t attracting interest from other Premier League clubs, simply because he doesn’t fit their style of play. That is the verdict of former Arsenal star Perry Groves. Groves insists the German’s work rate is a major factor as to why some clubs would be against putting in a bid for him. “I think it comes down to what other clubs are looking for,” Groves told bwin. “Liverpool, City, Chelsea and Spurs probably don't need Ozil as he doesn't suit their style of play. Manchester United signing Lukaku better than Chelsea and Arsenal landing Morata and Lacazette 01:00: Arsenal legend Perry Groves thinks Manchester United signing Romelu Lukaku will prove himself to be a better signing than Chelsea and Arsenal forwards Alvaro Morata and Alexandre Lacazette. ""Lukaku is only 24, he gets better with every season he plays and has proven Premier League experience compared to the other two,"" he told bwin. ""He's playing with better players and will have more goalscoring opportunities. ""The knock against him has been that he can't do it in the big games but to be honest, with no disrespect to Everton, in the big games they had less of the ball and less opportunities for Lukaku. ""Now he's playing for a big club, he'll score in more big games because United will win more big games. If United win the league, £75m is nothing."" Tuesday 1 August Sanchez Instagram boost 22:15: Alexis Sanchez has given Arsenal fans reasons to be cheerful with his latest Instagram post. The Chilean, who still hasn't signed a contract extension with Arsenal, shared a picture of him in training, along with the caption: ""Back to training!"" Sanchez could be in contention to appear in Arsenal's Community Shield clash against Chelsea on Sunday. His potential availability would be a significant boost to Wenger, who remains adamant Sanchez will not leave the club this summer.

INSTAGRAM Arsenal Transfer News: Alexis Sanchez has returned to training

Arsenal set for busy month 22:11: Arsenal are in for a busy end to the transfer window, claims Sky Sports presenter Dharmesh Sheth. Arsenal want to sign Thomas Lemar, having already failed to land his Monaco team-mate Kylian Mbappe. “Now it still could be pretty busy at Arsenal with regard to big name arrivals at the Emirates,” Sheth said on Sky Sports. “We’ve talked about so many players who could potentially be leaving Arsenal but the name Thomas Lemar will not go away. “Arsenal remain interested in the Monaco winger despite Monaco’s insistence the player is not for sale. “Arsenal have had two bids rejected already, the latest being £40m.” Walcott must stay 18:09: Perry Groves says Arsenal should keep Theo Walcott as they don’t possess anyone who can influence the game like him in the last 20 minuets. ""Theo needs to work out what he wants,” Groves told Bwin. “The question is whether he’s going to get first team football. “I would keep him because he's versatile, he can play wide or centrally. “Unless he comes and says he wants to leave, we need to keep him as he offers something in the final 20-30 minutes that very few players can offer, pace and finishing."" Agent: We are in talks with Fenerbahce 16:45: Fenerbahce are leading the charge to sign Arsenal forward Lucas Perez and have been in talks with the Gunners for months, his agent Rodrigo Fernandez Lovelle has claimed. A number of clubs have been linked with the winger, including his former side Deportivo La Coruna and Newcastle United. However, Perez's agent Rodrigo Fernandez Lovelle has denied receiving any offers from the Premier League, insisting Fenerbahce are leading the charge for his signature. “We are in talks with Fenerbahce but Arsene Wenger does not want a loan move,” Lovelle told website TurkishFootball. “Wenger wants €15m [£13.4m] for Lucas. He still has another three-years on his contract so Arsenal hold all the cards. “Fenerbahce, two Spanish teams and a Bundesliga side have made an offer for Lucas. “Fenerbahce are the most serious and we have been in talks for two months.”

GETTY Arsenal are confident of beating Liverpool to the signing of Monaco winger Thomas Lemar

Inter want Gunners target 16:18: Arsenal target Yann Karamoh could join Inter Milan in the next two days. Inter are desperate to sign the winger and Tuttosport claim manager Luciano Spalletti is furious that a deal has not already been done. Arsenal are on the lookout for attacking talent but had an £87m bid for Kylian Mbappe rejected by Monaco. On Sunday it was reported that Karamoh had been targeted, with Caen demanding £9m for their star 19-year-old who is out of contract next summer. Thomas Lemar to Arsenal latest 15:32: Arsenal may have to sell seven of their outcasts before doing a deal for Thomas Lemar. The Sun say a move for the Monaco star has been put on hold because Arsene Wenger hasn’t been able to trim his squad. It’s claimed the seven flops - Jack Wilshere, David Ospina, Kieran Gibbs, Carl Jenkinson, Lucas Perez, Calum Chambers and Mathieu Debuchy - may all need to leave the club in order for Lemar to be signed. Bookies expect Lemar to Arsenal soon 14:55: Thomas Lemar is edging closer to becoming an Arsenal player this summer, according to the bookies. “After weeks of speculation it looks like Arsenal are finally on the verge of signing Monaco starlet Thomas Lemar,” a BetStars spokesperson said. “The Gunners are now the clear odds-on favourites at 8/13 to complete a deal for the talented Frenchman. ""Their nearest market rivals Liverpool are now complete outsiders at 13/2. ""The chance to play Premier League football under the tutelage of Arsene Wenger could prove too good an opportunity to turn down for Lemar. ""We expect to see him in an Arsenal shirt sooner rather than later.”

Arsenal transfers: Which stars are most likely to sign? Wed, November 8, 2017 Which transfers are Arsenal most likely to complete this summer, according to Football Whispers (1 – unlikely, 5 – very likely)? Play slideshow Getty Images 1 of 9 Who are Arsenal most likely to sign this summer, according to Football Whispers?

Arsenal contracts expiring next summer 13:30: While many Arsenal fans are focused on who will be arriving at the Emirates this transfer window, Arsene Wenger should be more concerned about who could leave next summer. It is well-known that Alexis Sanchez and Mesut Ozil are currently stalling over new deals, but they are just two of 10 players with contracts expiring in 2018. The Gunners manager could be faced with a very empty dressing room if he can't tempt these stars to put pen to paper on new deals. Catch up on all the Gunners players who could be out of contract next summer here. Mustafi considered snubbed Arsenal 11:42: Arsenal defender Shkodran Mustafi admits he nearly rejected another move to England after his nightmare two-and-a-half years at Everton. The German international joined the Gunners in a £35million deal last summer. “To be honest at the beginning I thought I was done with England,” Mustafi told Arsenal Player. ""It was really frustrating and probably the worst time I had as a footballer. I didn’t want to go there again. “But then when it came down to making a decision to stay or leave, I thought I would only leave Valencia if I had the opportunity to go to England. “I was thankful that I had another opportunity to make a step forward by coming to Arsenal."" Sanchez lands 11:12: Alexis Sanchez has arrived back in London after his summer break. Sanchez posted a picture on his Instagram account outside a private jet with his two dogs Atom and Humber. The snap with captioned: “Back in London!” Sanchez is due back in training with Arsenal tomorrow and is set for crunch talks with boss Arsene Wenger over his future. Sanchez flies back 09:25: Alexis Sanchez is flying back to London via Paris as he prepares to return to Arsenal training. The Chile international was granted an extended absence following the Confederations Cup and to recover from the flu last week. Ruben Inostroza Povea, who is Sanchez's lawyer, has now uploaded a picture of the pair preparing to leave Santiago airport in Chile on Sunday evening. According to Povea's Instagram picture, the trip included a stopover in Paris, where the forward is thought to have renewed his British work permit. Speculation still surrounds his long-term future, though, with Manchester City, Paris Saint-Germain and Chelsea all keen on the 28-year-old.

GETTY Arsenal boss Arsene Wenger is still looking to offload some of his fringe players",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
356614,"The new Summer update will arrive first for preview members, starting this week, it will then be released to the Xbox app (beta) on Windows 10.

New features will rollout to the Preview audience in waves, not all at once - the Xbox One and the Xbox app will receive the first of two updates that “will help you stay connected with friends on Xbox Live and enjoy even more games across your favorite devices,” according to Microsoft.

Cortana is set to finally arrive on Xbox One; the Xbox and Windows Stores will start to become unified; while the tech giant also plans to start introducing PC games with Game Hubs to Xbox Live.

The feature was expected to be part of the next Xbox One update, a recent leak via a Microsoft video showed the new feature being advertised on the console’s dashboard.

Here are some of the features that are expected to start to rollout to Xbox One Preview this week, and the Xbox app (beta) in the coming weeks:",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
329272,"The 37-year-old singer is reportedly in a relationship with tennis star Grigor Dimitrov and the pair are said to be ""besotted"" with one another. The Bulgarian tennis player is newly single, after splitting from Maria Sharapova in July after two years together.

Advertisement

It is believed Nicole got friendly with the 27-year-old soon after his relationship with Maria ended. ""Nicole is dating Grigor. They’re completely besotted with each other. But they’ve been careful not to be pictured together because they don’t want the pressure of the relationship being in the public eye,"" a source told The Sun.

GETTY The pair are said to be 'besotted' with each other

GETTY Grigor split from Maria Sharapova in July

Advertisement

The source also claimed the former X Factor judge’s ex Lewis Hamilton isn’t happy about their union. They said: ""Lewis knows and is very unhappy. It’s made him realise he isn’t over her. ""He’s been desperately trying to talk to Nicole over the last few weeks."" Grigor, who has also dated Serena Williams in the past, said he was going to focus on tennis following his split with Russian-born beauty Maria in the summer.

Nicole Scherzinger in pictures Nicole Scherzinger attends the ITV Gala Nicole Scherzinger attends the ITV Gala Nicole Scherzinger attends the Pride Of Britain Awards Nicole Scherzinger attends the Pride Of Britain Awards Nicole Scherzinger arrives at Jonathan Ross' annual Halloween party Nicole Scherzinger shared snaps of her incredible outfit on Instagram Nicole Scherzinger put on an eye-popping display as Cleopatra Nicole Scherzinger makes a dramatic entry for Judges' Houses Nicole Scherzinger steals the limelight on the X Factor Nicole Scherzinger makes sure all eyes are on her at Judges' Houses Nicole Scherzinger amped up the sex appeal on her Instagram page Nicole Scherzinger shared a busty selfie in the car Nicole Scherzinger flaunts her sensational figure by the sea Nicole Scherzinger sent her fans into a frenzy as she showed off her incredible figure at sunset Nicole Scherzinger showed off her ample bust in a gorgeous two-piece Nicole Scherzinger set pulses racing on Instagram with these sexy snaps Nicole Scherzinger's cleavage was impossible to miss Nicole Scherzinger was seen posing on board a yacht Nicole Scherzinger thanked everyone for their birthday wishes Nicole Scherzinger shared a stunning sunset snap Nicole Scherzinger shows off her impressive abs in hot pink bikini Nicole Scherzinger stripped down to a racy thong bikini for a sizzling snap Nicole made sure all eyes were on her as she went for a dip in the ocean Nicole Scherzinger showed off her lithe dancer’s figure as she did the splits Nicole Scherzinger flaunted her washboard abs as she soaked up the sun in Greece Nicole Scherzinger looked stunning in the barely there bikini Nicole Scherzinger flashed her bottom in the revealing two-piece Nicole Scherzinger sizzles in busty red hot bikini in Greek holiday snaps Nicole Scherzinger showed off her flexibility as she did the splits for a sexy Instagram snap Nicole Scherzinger flaunted her figure as she posed by the pool Nicole Scherzinger did the splits as she formed a heart shape with her hands Nicole Scherzinger showed off her peachy behind as she danced by the pool Nicole Scherzinger put her incredible bikini body on display Nicole Scherzinger appeared relaxed as she enjoyed a day at the beach Nicole Scherzinger sent temperatures soaring in a sexy snakeskin bikini Nicole Scherzinger stripped topless for one sizzling shot Nicole Scherzinger looked as stunning as ever in the fragrance shoot Nicole Scherzinger put on an eye-popping display on Instagram Nicole Scherzinger struck her best pout to the camera Nicole Scherzinger couldn't resist taking selfies as she soaked up the sun Nicole Scherzinger flashes extreme cleavage in sexy crop top as she exercises in Paris Nicole Scherzinger worked up a sweat in Paris Nicole Scherzinger flaunts her curves in rehearsals for Dancing With The Stars Nicole Scherzinger arrives at the 2017 Billboard Music Awards in Las Vegas Nicole Scherzinger put on a busty display in the nude dress Nicole Scherzinger and Jussie Smollett present an award during the 2017 Billboard Music Awards Nicole Scherzinger's ample assets took centre stage Nicole Scherzinger snaps a selfie on an Hawaiian beach Nicole Scherzinger flaunts her figure in red bikini Nicole Scherzinger flaunts her figure on the beach Nicole Scherzinger looks sensational on holiday Nicole Scherzinger flaunted her figure in skintight leggings for a sexy photoshoot Nicole Scherzinger showed off her flexibility with a jaw-dropping pose Nicole Scherzinger was snapped relaxing in between shots Nicole Scherzinger films her new campaign for Müller yoghurt Nicole Scherzinger flashed a hint of cleavage in a revealing bralette Nicole Scherzinger left little to the imagination at the star-studded Coachella Nicole Scherzinger oozed sex appeal in the sizzling crochet dress Nicole Scherzinger wowed in a black leather pencil skirt and sheer top Nicole Scherzinger appeared to be in high spirits as she almost flashed her niples Nicole Scherzinger and boyfriend Grigor Dimitrov at Craig's in LA Nicole Scherzinger donned a skintight nude jumpsuit for the diner date Nicole Scherzinger at The Weinstein Company's Pre-Oscar Dinner Nicole Scherzinger wowed in the nude sheer dress Nicole Scherzinger poured her curves into the sheer dress Nicole Scherzinger appeared to ditch her knickers on the night Nicole Scherzinger attending the Brit Award Nicole Scherzinger attending the Brit Awards Nicole Scherzinger attending the Brit Awards Nicole Scherzinger's little black dress was almost entirely sheer Nicole Scherzinger went braless at the Republic Records after party Nicole Scherzinger certainly made sure all eyes were on her as she hit al Pre-Grammy party in Beverly Hills wearing a jaw-dropping ensemble Nicole Sherzinger put on a seriously busty display in the sizzling ensemble Nicole Scherzinger snaps a sexy selfie by the sea Nicole Scherzinger wore a black leather outfit leather and sheer skirt in London Nicole Scherzinger celebrates Matt Terry's win on the X Factor Nicole Scherzinger risked a wardrobe malfunction in this plunging boob-baring leather ensemble Nicole Scherzinger turned heads in this busty number Nicole Scherzinger flashes bare bottom as she puts on leggy display in very daring dress Nicole Scherzinger put on a seriously leggy display as she hit the The Global Gift Gala Nicole Scherzinger certainly made sure all eyes were on her in a daring green dress Nicole Scherzinger puts on a very busty display in bondage-style leather mini dress Nicole Scherzinger flashed a glimpse of her cleavage in the racy leather number Nicole Scherzinger styled her purple tinted hair in two buns on top of her head Nicole Scherzinger flaunts plenty of side boob as she sizzles in thigh-high split dress She flaunted her toned pins in the revealing floor-length gown Nicole posed up a storm for The X Factor promo in the stunning number Nicole Scherzinger poses in a skimpy bikini while hard at work on the X Factor Nicole Scherzinger arrives by jet ski The pop star showed off her sensational figure by the sea in Nice Nicole is dating Bulgarian tennis ace Grigor Dimitrov, 25, after splitting from Lewis Hamilton With her long hair styled in tousled waves, Nicole looked stunning in her colourful crochet two-piece She covered her lower half with a white crochet skirt and accessorised her confident look with round sunglasses, red lipstick and matching nails Nicole Scherzinger shows off her sun-kissed boy as she relaxes on a yacht in Croatia Nicole Scherzinger enjoys a yoga session at sunset on a boat Nicole Scherzinger poses on a yacht in red swimsuit and hat Nicole Scherzinger shows off her toned abs in red swimsuit and jewellery Nicole Scherzinger poses in her bikini for an Instagram snap Nicole Scherzinger flaunts her incredible abs on family holiday

""Our paths split,"" he said. ""We experienced wonderful moments together. I wish her much happiness and success in life and in tennis. ""Now I'm concentrated entirely on the game and I'm sure the results will soon be seen. This is the summer of new beginning of me."" Meanwhile, Nicole recently hit headlines when it was reported she had partied with her ex-boyfriend Lewis in London. However, her spokesperson told Express.co.uk: ""It was a coincidence they were both at the same club. Nicole is not back with Lewis."" Express.co.uk have contacted Nicole and Grigor’s representatives for comment.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
43031,"Kenton has summited Everest a record 11 times[PH]

Having summited Everest 11 times, you might think that world famous mountaineer Kenton Cool had sated his appetite for adventure. But the 41 year old is set to take on an even greater feat as he prepares to climb the three biggest mountains in the world in just three months. The challenge, named the Himalayan Trilogy, has never been attempted before and is sure to push the Gloucestershire adventurer to his limits. He will begin the gruelling challenge in May next year by climbing Everest, which is 8,848m high, before moving on to Kanchenjunga, 8,586m and then finishing with K2, nicknamed the killer summit, at 8,611m. And despite his expertise in mountaineering, Kenton admits that he still get nervous before every big trip. ""I don’t know if it is nerves, or fear but I definitely feel apprehensive before I take on a challenge,"" he said. ""It’s good to have a healthy respect for the mountains. All these mountains are so high and the top isn't known as the death zone for nothing. ""If you don’t go into these things with respect, and a little fear of the mountains then they have the ability to extinguish life very quickly."" SCROLL DOWN FOR VIDEO OF KENTON'S ADVENTURES

Kenton took an Olympic gold medal to the summit of Everest [PH]

There’s a very long list of people who have died in the mountains including very close friends Kenton Cool

And this is something he knows all to well, having lost many close friends to the mountains. ""Unfortunately, there’s never longer than six months that I don’t get a call or an email to say that somebody has passed away, or has been seriously injured in the mountains,"" he said. ""There’s a very long list, including very close friends. My then best friend died in the European Alps, so it's not just the big mountains that can be dangerous."" Kenton, who discovered his love of climbing as a boy scout, has also suffered serious injuries himself. In 1996 he fell from a rock face and shattered both heel bones. It took a year of surgery and therapy before he was able to regain his climbing form.

The adventurer says the comradeship on the mountains is one of the best things about the experience [PH]

But Kenton, who says adventure is in his blood, doesn't let all this put him off taking on bigger and bigger challenges. ""I reflect sometimes and feel afraid and I certainly miss my friends,"" he said. ""But that’s not a reason not to venture into the mountains. ""I often say that you’ve got to stand on the edge to stare death in the eyes, and only then do you really appreciate what it feels like to be alive."" In May 2012, Kenton also took on three of the world’s highest peaks - Everest, Lhotse, and Nuptse - in just three days, which was another world first.

Kenton says the solitude and simplicity is what draws him back to the mountains [PH]

But after completing the epic challenge known as the Everest Triple Crown, he was keen to look for something even harder to take on. ""It sounds silly, but we were at the base camp, having a celebratory cup of tea, and I thought, ‘how far can I push myself?'"" he said. ""So I thought if you want to go higher, then your first thought is and highest mountain in the world, now let’s do the second and third. ""It is the biggest challenge I’ve ever faced, not only physically but mentally."" And the mountaineer, who married his wife Jazz Black in 2008 and has two children, Saffron and Willoughby, says being away from them is the most difficult thing. ""Having time apart from family and friends is one of the hardest things,"" he said. ""And of course they get worried, but it’s something that I have always done, it’s in my DNA. ""I’m going to really miss putting Willoughby to bed, and making Saffron breakfast in the morning. It's the little things that you miss while you're away.""

Growing up, Kenton was inspired by stories of ""real adventure"" and epic journeys through foreign lands. And despite the risks he says he will never stop taking on new challenges and pushing himself out of his comfort zone. ""Life’s too short to not do what you want,"" he insists. ""I love the freedom that mountains give you, I love the simplicity. ""In the mountains all the day-to-day worries and stresses melt away and all you have to worry about it eating, breathing and staying alive.""

The 41-year-old is currently training to climb the three biggest peaks in the world [PH]",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
365556,"GETTY The Europa League is generally undervalued by Premier League clubs

English clubs' faltering form in the Europe in recent years has seen a drop in their UEFA coefficient. Spain lead the table, which measures results over a five year period, with Germany in second and England in the third.

Premier League title contenders XI Tue, February 16, 2016 Express Sport brings you our Premier League title contenders combined XI Play slideshow Getty Images 1 of 13 Who makes our title contenders combined XI?

But the Premier League is coming under increasing threat from Serie A for one of the positions which guarantees three clubs qualify for the group stages automatically while the fourth goes through a play-off tie. According to the Guardian, the Premier League's shareholders had a meeting where the idea of giving some of the £8.3bn TV deal could go to successful clubs. This follows reports suggesting the Premier League and Football Association were considering scrapping weekend FA Cup games and replays and the two-legged League Cup semi-finals.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
117083,"Mane was shown a straight red card after accidentally catching Ederson in the face with a high boot during Liverpool’s 5-0 defeat to Manchester City on Saturday.

Ederson had raced out of his area to head clear a high bouncing ball when he was knocked to the ground.

He was carried off on a stretcher after receiving treatment on the field for around eight minutes.

Mane faces a three-man ban but The Times journalist Paul Joyce claims Liverpool have appealed to have it reduce to one or two games.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
260713,"The five-time world heavyweight champion entered the house to huge cheers last week (03Jan14), but he quickly fell out of favour with the public and his fellow housemates after he suggested homosexuality could be ""fixed"" by a doctor.

The former fighter was being asked about his views on openly gay stars in sports by fellow housemate Luisa Zissman when he replied, ""But that ain't normal (sic).""

His comments prompted Zissman to add, ""That's just the way some people are born"", to which he hit back, ""It don't make no difference (sic). If you're born and your legs were turned this way, what do you do? You go to a doctor and get it fixed back right (sic).""

Holyfield was reprimanded for his controversial response by Big Brother bosses, and he was the first celebrity to be booted from the show on Friday (10Jan14) after scoring the fewest votes from the public.

Speaking after his eviction, he told host Emma Willis, ""Of course I thought I would be loved here. I got a few votes, but not enough.""

Lee Ryan, comic Jim Davidson, rapper Dappy and singer Linda Nolan are among the contestants still competing in Celebrity Big Brother.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
226557,"The 52-year-old was heard telling the Conservative politician, 50, at the end of their chat: “Jeremy Hunt, we’d love to continue but we’ve just noticed in the wings we have two of the greatest footballers in the history of our country. “Geoff Hurst and Gordon Banks. World Cup winners, the greatest goalkeeper we have ever produced and the greatest goal scorer at any World Cup ever produced. So it’s a choice of talking to them - and no disrespect Jeremy Hunt – or you.” Laughter was heard erupting from the Good Morning Britain crew in the studio as Hunt said: “I can’t compete, I’m out of here.” The ITV broadcaster finished off the segment by saying: “So this interview is terminated!”

Hunt was on the programme to talk to Morgan and co-host Susanna Reid about the Government’s policy on health as the Labour Party announced they would be giving pay rises to NHS doctors and nurses and remove the pay cap if the party wins the general election in June. However, Good Morning Britain host Morgan did not hold back as he took Hunt to task over the MPs’ pay rise asking why politicians could give themselves an increased salary over NHS staff. Well, ministers have actually given ourselves a pay cut, that’s the only pay we have control over,” Hunt said, adding that he did not have control on the general pay rise.""

ITV Piers Morgan terminated his interview with Jeremy Hunt

ITV Jeremy Hunt found his Good Morning Britain interview getting terminated

I can’t compete, I’m out of here Jeremy Hunt

He accused MPs of “guzzling pay rises left, right and centre” but Hunt responded by telling him that while he had accepted his inflated MP salary, he had taken a cut as a minister. The MP for South West Surrey continued: “That’s what all MPs have done because we recognise that we have to set an example. But look, if you want to get more money into the NHS, if you want to pay nurses more - and we all want to do that - there is only one thing that matters in this election and that is getting a good outcome for the Brexit negotiations. “Because if we get a bad outcome, it will be terrible for the British economy. We won’t be able to lock in our recovery, there will be less money for the NHS - all of our public services - and the choice is very straightforward: who is going to get that good outcome for those negotiations? Is it a strong Theresa May or is it Jeremy Corbyn propped up by rag tag of other political parties?”

ITV Susanna Reid grills Jeremy Hunt on Good Morning Britain

GMB: Piers Morgan & Susanna Reid take on politicians Tue, January 24, 2017 Good Morning Britain hosts Piers Morgan and Susanna Reid talk politics with Theresa May, Nigel Farage, Donald Trump and more. Play slideshow Getty 1 of 14 Good Morning Britain talks politics with Theresa May, Donald Trump, Nigel Farage, & more

ITV Susanna Reid grills Jeremy Hunt on Good Morning Britain",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
176049,"Randy Shropshire Miley being Miley

And James Franco’s Bar Mitzvah was no exception. With a trademark lack of clothing and that infamous tongue wagging the 22-year-old rebellious popstrel twerked her way through a rendition of Lulu’s hit Shout at Hilarity for Charity’s Annual Variety Show: James Franco’s Bar Mitzvah.

The show was to benefit the Alzheimer’s Association and presented by Funny Or Die and go90 at the Hollywood Palladium in Los Angeles. Chaos, naturally, ensued as 37-year-old actor James was placed atop a throne and carried around on the shoulders of the crowd.

WireImage No plans to run for government

WHILE the likes of Ronald Reagan and Arnold Schwarzenegger have made the transition from Tinseltown to the world of politics one Hollywood heavyweight who won’t be following suit is George Clooney. Despite his name regularly cropping up on lists of potential future presidential candidates the 54-year-old insists it won’t ever happen. “I’ve been asked that for almost 20 years now and the answer is just no,” said George, at a press conference for his upcoming political film Our Brand Is Crisis. “Who would ever want to live like that? I’m friends with a lot of those guys and I just think it’s hell.’’

George and Amal Clooney in pictures Tue, September 5, 2017 George and Amal Clooney's relationship in pictures. Play slideshow Getty•Flynet 1 of 130 George and Amal Clooney in pictures

Yet, he does admit that he is full of admiration for those who do earn their living running the US. “I commend people who go into public service because it’s such a horrible way to get elected, it’s such a horrible time while you’re in office. “People will argue over things they believed in six or eight years ago because it’s not their guy saying it.’’ And while George only seemed to fan the flames over his potential political transition by marrying human rights lawyer Amal Alamuddin last year, he insists that she is the more likely candidate: “I get to wear the trousers and she gets to be the smart one. That’s a fair deal, that’s a fair trade. Often times I feel like an idiot talking to my own wife. It’s never good.”

Wireimage Jenny from the block: J-Lo struggles to control her 'potty mouth'

SHE’S perhaps less Jenny From The Block and more Jenny parental block these days with J-LO admitting she’s had to tone down her language in front of her children. “I have a bit of a potty mouth,” says the 46-yearold, who had twins MAX and EMME with ex-husband MARC ANTHONY in 2008. “Since my kids have been born I’ve tried to be better. I can’t swear in the house now. But sometimes The Bronx comes out. ” Meanwhile the star who is on tour ahead of starting a Las Vegas residency next year says it was going through the pain of her divorce to Marc, which was only finalised last year despite them having split in 2011, that prompted her to take to the road. “I went on tour to have something else to focus on. These songs, which are the story of my life, helped me gain my strength back. “Divorcing with kids is one of the hardest things you can go through. It’s the loss of a dream. “To pick myself, to fi nd my voice and to dance again is what this is about.” Deep.

WireImage He's not the messiah, he's a very naughty boy",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
15169,"The scorching Middle Eastern country, and much of the transcontinental region, is in the midst of a drought with some studies suggesting a water shortage could last for the next 25 years.

The UAE, which is among the top 10 water-scarce countries in the world, hopes to help ease the stress of a drinking water shortage by towing an iceberg from the freezing Antarctica in order to create more drinking water.

The National Advisor Bureau Limited’s (NABL) managing Director Abdullah Mohammad Sulaiman Al Shehi says an average iceberg contains ""more than 20 billion gallons of water” which would be enough for one million people over five years.

Up to four-fifths of an iceberg’s mass is underwater, and due to their vast density, they would theoretically not melt in the boiling climate of the Middle Eastern coastal line.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
32353,"Manchester United were interested in signing Kante from Leicester City last summer. However, the France international opted to move to Chelsea for £30million instead. United then splashed out £89million to sign Paul Pogba from Juventus, with manager Jose Mourinho a known admirer.

Premier League spending during the January transfer window Wed, February 1, 2017 How much did Premier League clubs spend during the January transfer window? Play slideshow Getty Images•Southampton 1 of 21 How much did Premier League clubs spend during the January transfer window?

GETTY Manchester United pulled out of the race to sign N'Golo Kante

GETTY Louis van Gaal wanted to bring N'Golo Kante to Manchester United

And Squawka claim United's decision to axe Van Gaal and replace him with Mourinho ended their hopes of signing Kante. The Dutchman was keen to sign Kante after watching the midfielder shine for Leicester last season.

GETTY N'Golo Kante has helped Chelsea establish themselves as the best team in the country this season",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
366292,"AP Cesc Fabregas captained Spain on his 100th international appearance last night

Manchester United stopper De Gea is vying for regular starts in the Spain squad with Porto number one Iker Casillas. De Gea, 24, pulled off a string of fine saves in Spain's 1-0 Euro 2016 qualifying victory over Ukraine last night.

20 players who nearly moved to the Premier League Sun, September 20, 2015 Express Sport has rounded up 20 players who have nearly joined Manchester United, Chelsea, Arsenal, Liverpool or Manchester City. Play slideshow AFP/Getty Images 1 of 20 Ronaldo: Former United boss Sir Alex Ferguson admitted in his recent autobiography that he wanted to sign the Brazil striker 1994 but they couldn't get a work permit. He joined PSV Eindhoven instead

It was his second Spain appearance since he tried to force through a transfer from United to Real Madrid in the summer, with Casillas having already been sold to Porto to make room for De Gea. And Chelsea midfielder Fabregas, who captained Spain on his 100th international cap, said De Gea and fellow players Isco (23) and Thiago Alcantara (24) are the new spine of the squad. “These are the opportunities the coach has (to blood Isco and Thiago),"" Fabregas said. ""We played very well in the first half.

REUTERS David De Gea (right) kept a clean sheet in Ukraine

REUTERS Fabregas missed a penalty but Spain held on for the win

GETTY Spain finished top of their Euro 2016 qualification group

“They are young, they want to play, they want to please and we know the talent they have. ""A very promising future awaits the national team. “(De Gea) is the future goalkeeper of the national team. ""The feeling in the team is that Ukraine’s chances were isolated, from corners or dead balls.""",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
308130,"Should Eden Hazard have been booked for simulation against West Brom?

Hazard went down just outside the box after a challenge from Baggies defender Allan Nyom.

Nyom appeared to make light contact with Hazard’s boot but the Chelsea man went down very easily as he appealed for a foul – which was waved away by referee Michael Oliver.

But should the Chelsea ace have been booked for simulation?

Click through the gallery above and decide for yourself!",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
260136,"Richie Ramsay has set his sights on booking a second appearance at The Masters

Ramsay’s tie for second in the Dubai Duty Free Irish Open was his first top-10 finish of the year and most impressive result since claiming the third of his European Tour titles in the Hassan Trophy in March 2015.

A closing 65 also gave Ramsay the biggest payday of his career (£466,000), secured a place in next week’s Open at Royal Birkdale, and lifted him from 341st in the world rankings to 170th.

And the 34-year-old from Aberdeen is now focused on climbing into the world’s top 50 to book a second appearance in the Masters, having qualified in 2007 courtesy of his victory in the previous year’s US Amateur.

“The top 50 is like the Holy Grail in golf,” Ramsay, who reached a high of 52nd in 2012, said ahead of this week’s Aberdeen Asset Management Scottish Open.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
281729,"Chelsea midfielder Ramires is reportedly close to agreeing a surprise £25million transfer to Chinese Super League side Jiangsu Suning. Mail Online claim Brazilian Ramires, 28, is expected to sign for the club this week. The midfielder cost Chelsea £18m when he joined the Stamford Bridge club back in 2010. He boasts 37 goals in 242 appearances for the Blues and has started just three games since early November. He would be managed by former Chelsea ace Dan Petrescu at Jiangsu.

Chelsea's worst Premier League XI Fri, January 22, 2016 Express Sport takes a look at the worst players to have pulled on a Chelsea shirt in the Premier League Play slideshow GETTY 1 of 12 Who makes it into Chelsea's worst Premier League XI?

Mesut Ozil reportedly has a first refusal clause in his contract that could see him one day sold back to Real Madrid. Ozil, 27, has been one of Arsenal's top performers this season as the club seek a first Premier League title since 2004. The Germany international signed for the north London club back in the summer of 2013 for £42.5m. And Football Leaks claim the Bernabeu side would have a 48-hour window to sign Ozil if Arsenal were to accept a deal from another club for their ace. It has also been revealed that Madrid would be entitled to 33 per cent of any profit made over £38m if Arsenal sold the ace to another Spanish club.

GETTY Ozil (left) is unlikely to leave, with Ramirez (top right) and Balotelli set to quit their clubs

Mario Balotelli will not be returning to Liverpool for long as West Brom emerge as suitors of the Italy international, according to reports. Balotelli, 25, has made just six appearances on loan at AC Milan this season and is not expected to remain at the San Siro. Liverpool manager Jurgen Klopp already appears unwilling to utilise his talents at Anfield.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
224766,"The Government-backed Pension Protection Fund (PPF), which looks after the benefits of members of insolvent employer-sponsored schemes, is the biggest creditor of BHS and it wants administrators Duff & Phelps and FRP Advisory to begin liquidating the firm to cut costs and speed up investigations into the retailer’s former directors.

Until it's known how much Green will put into the scheme, they cannot wind up BHS

Sources say that until the administrators know the outcome of their talks and how much Green is prepared to put into the scheme, they cannot wind up BHS as they do not know how much the PPF is actually owed or how any recoveries should be divided up.

As it stands, it is understood that unsecured creditors like the PPF will get back less than 2p for every pound they are owed by BHS.

Pensions experts say that the longer the talks go on, the harder it becomes to plug the deficit, which it is believed has ballooned from £571million in March to more than £700million, because of low interest rates and bond yields inflating its liabilities.",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
34922,Henrikh Mkhitaryan's shirt has been spotted on sale on Manchester United's website... [Borussia Dortmund/Getty Images],express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
159804,"The US President said he would “fix things” on the global stage as the Iranians mocked him for being “inexperienced”. A senior adviser to Iran’s Supreme Leader Ayatollah Ali Khamenei said Mr Trump’s sabre-rattling was “useless” and that it would continue its missile tests.

GETTY Mr Trump clashed with Mr Turnbull during their first phone call

The phone call with Mr Turnbull threatened to sour relations with one of America’s closest allies

During a tumultuous 24 hours, Mr Trump clashed with Mr Turnbull during their first phone call. He also threatened to send US troops into Mexico and got into a public row with Arnold Schwarzenegger, who took over from Mr Trump as the host of reality TV show Celebrity Apprentice. The phone call with Mr Turnbull threatened to sour relations with one of America’s closest allies.

GETTY The Iranians mocked Mr Trump for being “inexperienced”

First 100 days of President Trump Mon, June 12, 2017 President Donald Trump is making a significant impact on global politics during his first term. Play slideshow REUTERS 1 of 23 President Donald Trump arrives at Newark International airport",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
105898,"HO • GETTY An SNP local election candidate failed to declare his ownership of a Highland hotel

Nicola Sturgeon was today forced to back Frank Ross, the party's group leader in Edinburgh, as he was branded a ""liability"" by opponents. But Tories lodged a formal complaint with watchdog the Standards Commission for Scotland, which has the power to suspend councillors. Mr Ross is currently the depute leader of Edinburgh City Council and is standing for re-election in Corstorphine-Murrayfield.

He initially told the Herald newspaper he could not remember if he had informed officials that he bought the 11-bedroom property last October. But later stated he would be submitting fresh paperwork on the Silverfjord Hotel in Kingussie - with the local authority confirming it had now been received. Councillors are required to declare their financial interests under a strict code of conduct.

GETTY The Scottish First Minister was forced to back Frank Ross

Frank Ross is turning into a complete liability for the SNP Labour MP Ian Murray

With the SNP on course to become the city's largest party on May 4, Mr Ross is poised to become council leader. Public records show Mr Ross and his family set up Silverfjord Kingussie Ltd in February 2015. Mr Ross, his wife and their son and daughter were the company's directors, with Mr Ross owning 82 per cent of the shares and the others owning six per cent each.

Sturgeon's top moments Fri, December 9, 2016 Scotland's First Minister Nicola Sturgeon in pictures. Play slideshow Getty Images 1 of 33 Nicola Sturgeon visits Glaxo Smith Kline.

The company later acquired the hotel with finance from RBS. The revelations come just weeks after Mr Ross was criticised for suggested pro-Union parties called themselves ""Scottish"" only as a branding exercise to win votes. Labour MP Ian Murray said: ""Frank Ross is turning into a complete liability for the SNP. ""The SNP needs to deal with this fast, and Nicola Sturgeon needs to outline what steps she is going to take to discipline Frank Ross, or if he can stay as the SNP's candidate to lead Edinburgh City Council.""",express.co.uk,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201085,"Since the beginning of his administration, we’ve seen President Trump’s efforts attacked and slowed by liberals.

While he’s promised to make America great again, democrats have vowed to stop him at all costs. Already he’s done much to set the U.S. on the right track. Yet there is so much more to be done.

And all the democrats can do is impede progress and make America less safe.

It’s all because they are still bitter over the election. Their loyalties are to their party and its toxic ideas. They do not care about the success of the United States. They certainly don’t care about the safety and well-being of American citizens.

Such was the case when numerous liberal officials–including judges–worked to stop Trump’s travel ban on terrorist-linked nations.

While he worked to keep terrorists out of our country, liberals defied him. It made our country much less safe.

Now one of those liberals has just dropped a bombshell of truth.

From The Right Scoop:

Sally Yates admitted today in an exchange with Senator Cornyn that the Office of Legal Counsel reviewed Trump’s immigration EO and found it to be completely legal. Yet she had the audacity to overrule the Office of Legal Counsel and deem it unconstitutional.

Watch Sally Yates below do her best Robin Wright impression. In the end, however, she twists and writhes when it becomes clear that unless she lied to America’s face, she had to own up to sabotaging Trump.

She did what a few of the federal courts did that overruled it. She looked outside the language and detail of the actual order itself to Trump’s campaign statements in 2016 to deem it unconstitutional, which is only something a liberal hack would do.

The liberal world was shocked when President Trump fired Yates. Yet she openly defied the president, her boss.

Now months later she is forced to admit the executive order he signed was legal. She only defied it–like the judges–because of party politics.

It had nothing to do with the legality of the order, but her feelings towards the new president.

My friends, that’s not how a country is run. A strong, stable country is run by laws, with people who obey their leaders under the law. If liberals can do whatever they want, based on their politics, then what kind of country are we living in?

None at all.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198591,"The Benghazi Commission chairman, who backed Marco Rubio, is not going to hitch his wagon to the dying #NeverTrump movement now that Trump is certainly going to be the Republican candidate in November.

“As Congressman Gowdy stated months ago, he will support the Republican nominee for President,” Gowdy spokeswoman Amanda Gonzalez said in a statement Friday.

“He strongly supported Senator Marco Rubio until Rubio suspended his campaign. Now that Mr. Trump is the Republican nominee, Congressman Gowdy will support him,” Gonzalez added.

Breitbart News reported on Gowdy’s efforts stumping for Rubio in Iowa before the caucus. Gowdy’s experience leading the Benghazi Commission could help Republican efforts this year to paint Clinton as a corrupt foreign policy insider, though the actual Commission did little to damage Clinton.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199456,"THE HUFFINGTON POST PUBLISHED A HATE FILLED RANT EARLIER THIS WEEK ATTACKING HARD-WORKING AMERICANS. THIS TIME, THE HUFFINGTON POST WANTS YOU ALL DEAD. The rant targets all Trump supporters, and the author wants to drop a nuclear bomb on them all. Beware Trump supporters, you have been marked for death by anti-Trump",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198882,"Video purchasd by TMZ shows Malia Obama and a female friend dancing bacchanalianly as the Killers, a rock band from Las Vegas, performed.

As reported by the U.K.’s Daily Mail:

Malia’s friend throws herself to the ground while Obama’s daughter jokingly pretends to play the drums, matching her moves with the music.

She then helps her friend up before they turn to watch the rest of the show, but the party was far from over.

The night didn’t end well for 19 year-old Malia.

She had to be carted away by security.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200100,"*Warning! This post contains content too disturbing for some. CNN’s most far left political commentator, Sally Kohn, has stooped to a new low even for her. She tweeted a photo of a 5-year-old Syrian boy injured in air strikes that has touched the hearts of people across the globe, regardless of political affiliation. It was so soul wrenching that Russia has even offered a cease-fire. But it didn’t cause CNN’s resident lefty loon to halt her assault on finding anything and everything to use against GOP presidential nominee Donald Trump.

This is who @HillaryClinton wants America to help — and who @realDonaldTrump wants to keep out. pic.twitter.com/VuDeRUPhib — Sally Kohn (@sallykohn) August 19, 2016

Yes, according to Kohn, Clinton, who is a noted war hawk, wants to help the young Syrian more than Trump, who espouses a noninterventionalist foreign policy. Not to mention the fact that Clinton and President Obama are the two people most responsible for the situation in Syria.

@sallykohn Barack Obama is president right now. Any thoughts about what he is doing? — Colonel Assault Mom (@laurakfillault) August 19, 2016

@sallykohn What did @HillaryClinton do as Secretary of State? She enriched herself. She had her chance to help but refused. @realDonaldTrump — (((Ryu Hayabusa))) (@CFLancop) August 19, 2016

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
146385,"Under oath, Facebook’s top lawyer, Colin Stretch told the Senate Intelligence Committee, the total amount volume of Russian ads were approximate .004% of Facebook’s newsfeed.

That means that the entire storyline that the media has been running to say that Russia used Facebook to get Trump elected is totally false.

Facebook's VP: -Russian Facebook ads comprised only .004% of total content.

-90% of the ads didn’t even target either candidate. pic.twitter.com/UlmBSW2TCC — Ryan Saavedra 🇺🇸 (@RealSaavedra) November 1, 2017

This needs to get out. The media keeps on saying that fake news won Trump the election. That’s a total lie. Trump won because Hillary was the worst candidate to ever run for the office.

We need to stop the Russia crap right now. Share this if you think that we need to kill off the Russia investigation. It is a complete fabrication",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199378,"Hillary Clinton is currently desperately trying to court minority voters, which is why it came as bad news to her this week when a video surfaced that almost ensures she will lose every single Black Lives Matter vote.

According to Conservative Tribune, the video shows a black man trying to have a conversation with Hillary about violence in the black community, but she makes it clear that she doesn’t want to hear it. When the man said that white violence will always be the main problem in our country, Hillary interrupted him and said, “if that is your position, then I will only talk to white people.”

She then moved into his personal space and waved her hands around emphatically. The man tried to tell her that she was misunderstanding him and that he just wants to change hearts. Hillary responded to this by once again interrupting the man and saying that she doesn’t believe in changing hearts, but instead in changing laws and the allocation of resources.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
202222,"The war of words between President Trump and London Mayor Sadiq Khan has finally gotten personal. After trading barbs on Twitter since Saturday’s London terror attack, Khan went on Channel 4 News to suggest President Trump’s planned visit to Britain be cancelled.

When asked if the visit should be called off completely, Khan said Britain should not be “rolling out the red carpet to the president of the USA in the circumstances where his policies go against everything we stand for.”

But this isn’t the first time Khan has gone out of his way to work against America’s leader, making a similar request to block President Trump’s visit to Britain last February.

“I think one of the things, when you have a special relationship it is no different from when you have got a close mate. You stand with them in times of adversity but you call them out when they are wrong,” he said. “And there are many things about which Donald Trump is wrong.”

Mayor Khan is clearly missing the hypocrisy in his words, especially after being held to a higher standard by President Trump. Our Commander-In-Chief simply wants an end to global terror and doesn’t believe all of our allies are carrying their fair share. If Khan and his counterparts feel it is their right to cut down President Trump at every turn, why is American criticism all of sudden unfair. We ALL have to work together to end worldwide terrorism and the United States has continued to be at the forefront of that mission.

I think Mayor Khan would be smart to welcome our President’s arrival and subsequent help. After the horrible attacks on Saturday, it seems Britain could use all the help it can get. Khan needs to let go of petty grievances and focus on the real problem, the death of his citizens.

sources: cnn.com",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
202015,"Democrats riot in Washington DC in resistance to President Donald Trump on Inauguration Day. (Andrew Marcus)

The Democrats are once again leading the country towards Civil War.

With the latest outright lies promoted by the media and Democrat politicians, the violence at nearly every Trump rally and interruptions at all Trump rallies, the left is leading America to a very dangerous place.

Journalist Daniel Greenfield at Frontpagemag.com penned another great post laying out the direction the liberal Democrats are taking the country.

A civil war has begun. This civil war is very different than the last one. There are no cannons or cavalry charges. The left doesn’t want to secede. It wants to rule. Political conflicts become civil wars when one side refuses to accept the existing authority. The left has rejected all forms of authority that it doesn’t control. The left has rejected the outcome of the last two presidential elections won by Republicans. It has rejected the judicial authority of the Supreme Court when it decisions don’t accord with its agenda. It rejects the legislative authority of Congress when it is not dominated by the left. It rejected the Constitution so long ago that it hardly bears mentioning. It was for total unilateral executive authority under Obama. And now it’s for states unilaterally deciding what laws they will follow. (As long as that involves defying immigration laws under Trump, not following them under Obama.) It was for the sacrosanct authority of the Senate when it held the majority. Then it decried the Senate as an outmoded institution when the Republicans took it over. It was for Obama defying the orders of Federal judges, no matter how well grounded in existing law, and it is for Federal judges overriding any order by Trump on any grounds whatsoever. It was for Obama penalizing whistleblowers, but now undermining the government from within has become “patriotic”. There is no form of legal authority that the left accepts as a permanent institution. It only utilizes forms of authority selectively when it controls them. But when government officials refuse the orders of the duly elected government because their allegiance is to an ideology whose agenda is in conflict with the President and Congress, that’s not activism, protest, politics or civil disobedience; it’s treason. After losing Congress, the left consolidated its authority in the White House. After losing the White House, the left shifted its center of authority to Federal judges and unelected government officials. Each defeat led the radicalized Democrats to relocate from more democratic to less democratic institutions. This isn’t just hypocrisy. That’s a common political sin. Hypocrites maneuver within the system. The left has no allegiance to the system. It accepts no laws other than those dictated by its ideology.

The treasonous left has also become the violent left. The GWP has noted numerous isolated violent attacks on conservatives by the left. (query violent and see the many violent acts from the left). Conservatives have been bloodied and knocked unconscious by violent left wing anarchists in Berkley, San Jose and across the county.

The mainstream media (MSM) adds gas to the flames of the liberal politicians and Democrats in a constant stream of hate and lies for our President and our country. Large institutions are now factories of hate and fake news.

Conservatives need to be ready and courageous because the President and our country are under an all out assault by the left.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200251,"At what is scheduled to be the last of his “Thank You” rallies for the year in Mobile, AL on Saturday, President-elect Donald Trump addressed the recent comments of First Lady Michelle Obama in which she said, “(N)ow, we’re feeling what not having hope feels like.”

The President-elect told the crowd of rallygoers in Mobile that he disagreed with the First Lady’s assessment of people feeling as though that they don’t have hope. “Michelle Obama said yesterday that there’s no hope,” Trump said. “But I assume she was talking about the past, not the future — ’cause I’m telling you, we have tremendous hope, and tremendous promise.”

Trump actually went on to praise the First Lady, and say that he felt that her comment was interpreted differently than what she’d intended.

“I actually think she made that statement not meaning it the way it came out, I really do,” Trump said. “Because I met with President Obama and Michelle Obama in the White House, my wife was there — she could not have been nicer. I honestly believe she meant that statement in a different way than it came out.”

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199943,"With the November election fast approaching, Donald Trump is not the only person who stands in the way of Hillary Clinton’s bid for the presidency.

There’s also the founder of WikiLeaks, Julian Assange, who continues to release damaging info on the Democratic nominee which she would much rather keep hidden.

In fact, it certainly appears at though Hillary is willing to kill to keep her skeletons in the closet…

From BEFOREITSNEWS:",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199538,"How come every time a top Obama admin finally has to answer difficult questions they find a way to weasel out of it? Susan Rice had already been set to testify tomorrow, but perhaps she needs more time to make up more lies to tell. Why did they let her off the",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
202124,"For some bizarre reason, liberals seem staunchly opposed to recognizing the true threat that migrants pose to our country. They argue that being cautious is un-American, but all we have to do to see what is at stake is look to other Western countries. Fortunately,

President Donald Trump is not afraid to call things like they are.

According to Breitbart, Trump has just outlined a new “extreme vetting” system that would require new immigrants from Muslim- dominated countries to pledge that they have no desire to enact Sharia Law in the United States.

“In the Cold War, we had an ideological screening test,” Trump said of the measure. “The time is overdue to develop a new screening test for the threats we face today. I call it extreme, extreme vetting. Our country has enough problems. We don’t need more. And these are problems like we’ve never seen before.”

Toward our country or its principles—or who believe that Sharia law should supplant American law,” he added.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201382,"Thomas More. Free speech is knocking on Death’s door in the West.

In Europe, it has long gone the way of the dinosaur, but the United States has been able to hold the line in their stead.

However, the Left is doing everything it can to push for restrictions on First Amendment rights, laying the groundwork by first making those who speak freely pay a huge price socially.

Many topics are already de facto illegal, as the consequences inflicted on a person by society are as bad as some legal punishments.

Soon, they’ll start implementing European style laws, which make certain trains of thought and speech literally illegal. It’s inevitable, as their beliefs cannot “win” otherwise, because their beliefs don’t stand a chance in an open marketplace of ideas.

If you think this is fear-mongering, just check out the countless stories of people’s lives left in ruin because they dared to take a stand against things like not agreeing with the tranny agenda.

Then take a look at what’s going on in places like New Jersey, where one city is suppressing the topic of Islam altogether.

As reported at the Conservative Tribune, a court in Bernards Township, New Jersey has issued a gag order on residents, banning them from bringing up the topic of Muslims or Islam at an upcoming public hearing.

The best part about this is that the next hearing will determine whether the community will allow a mosque to be constructed or not.

So preemptively, a court order has made proper discussion of the issue impossible, since residents are banned from talking about Muslims and Islam at public renters.

The controversy is focused on a settlement order from a district court, which appears to blatantly violate free speech protections.

“No commentary regarding Islam or Muslims will be permitted,” states a legally binding court order about the mosque hearing.

In response to the controversial order, the Thomas More Law Center has filed a lawsuit on behalf of Christopher and Loretta Quick, who live just 200 feet away from the proposed mosque site.

“TMLC’s lawsuit alleges that Bernards Township’s settlement agreement constitutes a prior restraint on speech based on content, as well as, a violation of the (First Amendment) Establishment Clause because it prefers Islam over other religions,” the law center explained.

The lawsuit claims that preventing local citizens from voicing their concerns about the “Islamic” nature of the mosque is not only unfair, but also unconstitutional.

“The Quicks reside within 200 feet of the proposed mosque construction in a zoned residential area.

Yet, the settlement agreement prohibits them from describing the many unique features of Islamic worship,” the Thomas More Law Center stated.

Additionally, the lawsuit argues that the Islamic Society of Basking Ridge, or “ISBR,” is permitted to make any sort of comments about Jews or Christians without restriction, but the government is actively suppressing free speech in the other direction.

“While claiming that the Township had a religious animus against Muslims, ISBR hid from the public view its animus toward Christians and Jews, by not only hiding anti-Christian and anti-Semitic verses published on its website, but also hiding its significant ties to ISNA [Islamic Society of North America],” attorney Richard Thompson explained in a news release.

Instead of standing up to defend its citizens against ISBR’s hate-filled anti-Semitic and anti-Christian bias, the Township colluded with ISBR’s ‘Civilization Jihad’ by capitulating to payment of millions of dollars to ISBR, allowing the construction of the new mosque and Islamic center in violation of zoning codes, and now even suppressing speech concerning Islam or Muslims at a public meeting,” Thompson continued.

The Left’s love affair with Islam never ceases to amaze.

I guess leftists are all masochists at heart, yearning to be dominated by Muslims. If that’s the case, the least they could do is catch a flight to the Middle East, rather than forcing all this misery on us.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199559,"The left is in total freak out mode over Trump’s new executive order on refugees. But another president did something similar in 2011 and they said nothing because it was a president they liked. As you may know, nothing is ever Obama’s fault.

The Federalist reported this in 2015:

The Obama Administration Stopped Processing Iraq Refugee Requests For 6 Months In 2011

Although the Obama administration currently refuses to temporarily pause its Syrian refugee resettlement program in the United States, the State Department in 2011 stopped processing Iraq refugee requests for six months after the Federal Bureau of Investigation uncovered evidence that several dozen terrorists from Iraq had infiltrated the United States via the refugee program…

President Barack Obama has thus far refused bipartisan calls to pause his administration’s Syrian refugee program, which many believe is likely to be exploited by terrorists seeking entry into the United States. The president has not explained how his administration can guarantee that no terrorists will be able to slip into the country by pretending to be refugees, as the Iraqi terrorists captured in Kentucky did in 2009.

Sean Davis wrote the article excerpted above and asked where the media was when Obama did this.

He got a response from a writer at the Washington Post which will blow your mind.

Look at this:",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
146365,"Laura Ingraham brought the house down at the Republican National Convention on Wednesday night with a message that shows how sick millions of conservatives are of the mainstream media solely supporting Clinton and Donald Trump.

Ingraham pointed at the press box and yelled to them, “Do your job!”

While this line brought the house down, it was only one of many brilliant lines from Ingraham’s speech.

WATCH:",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201065,"Former FBI Director James Comey tries to suggest that President Donald Trump actually wanted to affect his opinion regarding the FBI probe into Michael Flynn, but, of course, Comey waited to disclose this only after he was fired. However, the question remains whether he will contradict his comments in his testimony.

The mainstream media’s latest sage in the downward spiral they’ve undertaken is that Comey is anticipated to say that he believes Trump was intentionally trying to influence their investigation into Michael Flynn and his alleged collusion with Russian officials during the presidential elections, said one report on Friday.

James Comey was under oath when he sad that no one tried to influence his investigation and that he would’ve immediately said so if anyone attempted to do this.

According to CNN, a source has revealed that Comey was under the impression that Trump deliberately wanted to meddle in the Bureau’s investigation into the alleged Russian interference on the 2016 presidential elections, but whether there had been an obstruction of justice committed still remains an unanswered question.

James Comey is set to testify before the Senate intelligence committee after Memorial Day, stated the panel leaders on Friday.

“You have to have intent in order to obstruct justice in the criminal sense,” the source revealed further saying that the “intent is hard to prove.”

The essential question at this anticipated hearing will be whether or not James Comey is sure if he wants to contend that Trump purposefully wanted to dissuade from investigating his former National Security adviser, Michael Flynn.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199035,"It’s been 50 years since John F. Kennedy was assassinated, and there’s still more questions than answers surrounding the ordeal.

As many are aware, the “official narrative” has been that Lee Harvey Oswald was a lone gunman who took out JFK on his own. Ever since his murder, that’s what we’ve been told by politicians, pundits, and federal law enforcement officials alike, however, that narrative has been completely ripped to shreds with the release of 3,000 never before seen documents about the killing.

The bombshell revelation will be enough to shake patriots to their core as they realize there was a much larger conspiracy to murder the deceased President than one man going off the rails.

True Pundit reported:

This is not pretty.

But it is likely President Donald Trump understands what Kennedy comprehended, which now appears to have led to his murder:

The out-of-control shadow government in this country threatens the fabric and the future of the United States.

The paragraph reads:

POTITO said the “Surgeon General’s report” on the assassination stated the first bullet entered the President’s throat below the adams apple clearly showing that two persons were involved with the first shot being fired from the bridge across the park way in front of the car. To further substantiate this, POTITO said there was a bullet hole in the wind shield of the President’s car.

This is truly shocking, and obviously not the same narrative we’ve been fed for decades, and that J. Edgar Hoover proclaimed must be defended to the world by any means necessary.

NBC reported:

“There is nothing further on the Oswald case except that he is dead.” FBI Director J. Edgar Hoover dictated that line in a memo he issued on Nov. 24, 1963, the day Jack Ruby killed Lee Harvey Oswald as the gunman was being transported to the Dallas County Jail after the assassination of President John F. Kennedy. … Referring to Nicholas Katzenbach, the deputy attorney general at the time, Hoover dictated: “The thing I am concerned about, and so is Mr. Katzenbach, is having something issued so we can convince the public that Oswald is the real assassin.” It’s not clear from the memo whether Hoover thought there might have been a conspiracy but didn’t want it to be known or whether he sincerely believed Oswald acted alone and hoped to head off public fear and confusion. Hoover also indicated that his concern may have been influenced, in part, by diplomacy, dictating that there could be serious international complications if the public thought Oswald might have been part of a larger plot.

The multiple shooter theory was also reinforced in 2012, when Douglas P. Horne of LewRockwell.com explained in detail what happened to the original windshield in the President’s limo – Ford Motor Company was forced by the government to make a new one and destroy the one with the alleged bullet hole – and how there’s significant video evidence showing the original windshield with a bullet hole in it as it sat outside the hospital Kennedy was rushed to after being shot.

Horne wrote, in part:

In 2009, I believed I had discovered new evidence in the JFK assassination never reported by anyone else: convincing photography of the through-and-through bullet hole in the windshield of the JFK limousine that had been reported by six credible witnesses. I revisited that evidence today, and am more convinced than ever that the bullet hole in the limousine windshield is what I am looking at in those images. But the readers of this piece don’t have to take my word for it — you can examine the images yourself, and make up your own minds. The evidence is contained in one of the banned, suppressed episodes of Nigel Turner’s The Men Who Killed Kennedy — episode 7 in the series, called “The Smoking Guns,” which was aired in 2003, and then removed from circulation by The History Channel in response to intense political pressure by former LBJ aides Jack Valenti and Bill Moyers. I’ll tell you about the stunning evidence I have found in that episode at the end of this article, but first we need to set the stage by reviewing the eyewitness testimony about the damage to the windshield observed the day of JFK’s assassination, on Friday, November 22nd, 1963; as well as three days later, on Monday, November 25th, 1963. Keep Reading…

Take from all of this what you will; however, with the release of the latest files on JFK, it seems more apparent than ever that Oswald wasn’t a sole actor.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201904,"BRITAIN first, a British conservative party has released a video that shows what’s happening in the streets of Sydney, Australia. Muslims are protesting daily, attacking police officers, imposing sharing law etc. Some experts believe that everything has changed since the Australian government banned guns and allowed massive immigration from Islamic nations. Does it",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201860,"In a shocking parallel to 1929, the Shadow Government is planning to try and take down President Trump and our country in one swift motion. How could we possibly allow a takeover to happen?A recent announcement from the chair of the Federal Reserve shows that they are planning on increasing",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199094,"Actress and comedienne Roseanne Barr is one of a handful of conservative celebrities who have been absolutely killing it on Twitter lately as they defend President Trump.

This past week, Barr took whiney liberals, especially her Hollywood colleagues, to task over their calls for widespread “resistance” to Trump.

In a damning 4-word tweet, Barr reminded them:

“trump IS the resistance”

trump IS the resistance — Roseanne Barr (@therealroseanne) February 16, 2017

What liberals seem to have forgotten is that Trump isn’t a politician. He’s the public’s antidote to decades of Washington cronyism.

As Barr noted, he IS the resistance to four more years of the same political games under Hillary Clinton.

And the resistance won!

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
146286,"After seven years of Michelle Obama being in the White House, it’s easy to forget that we once had a first lady who was both classy and elegant. However, that’s exactly what we had in Laura Bush.

Former First Lady Laura Bush proved this once again recently when she visited a children’s hospital to read to the children there. Q Political reported that this was done as part of her Laura Bush Literacy Program, which aims to teach children all over the country how to read.

Thanks to Laura, there is a free reading event held at the George Bush Childhood Home on the third Thursday of every month.

While Michelle has spent her time in the White House shoving gross foods down children’s throats, Laura spent her time promoting literacy in an initiative that has taught millions of children to read.

WATCH HERE :

Now THAT’S the kind of legacy a true first lady leaves behind!",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200543,"Is there anything funnier than Hillary trying to convince people she represents everyday Americans?

The woman hasn’t driven a car since 1996.

It doesn’t get more out of touch than her.

For example, check out this list of demands she had when she was running around raking in millions of dollars from giving boring speeches.

From The Daily Caller:

This “include[s] a chartered roundtrip private air transportation (e.g., a Gulfstream 450 or larger jet), which must be paid in advance of the event. The host will also need to pay for roundtrip business class airfare to and from the event city for two (2) advance staffers who will arrive in the city of the engagement up to three (3) business days prior to the event,” the document reads.

“The host is responsible for hotel accommodations at a hotel identified by Speaker’s staff. Accommodations should include a presidential suite for the Speaker and up to three (3) adjoining or contiguous single rooms for her travel aides and up to two (2) additional single rooms for the advance staff. The host is responsible for all ground transportation for the Speaker, her travel aides and the advance staff while they are in the city of the engagement, as well as all phone charges/cell phones and meals during their stay.”

Not exactly a cheap date.

Talk about high maintenance.

Just imagine the things that taxpayers will be on the hook for if she makes it to the White House…",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201496,"The race to become Donald Trump’s energy secretary has now narrowed to three people — Ray Washburne, Joe Manchin and Rick Perry. The Daily Caller has learned that Trump is expected to make a decision on the subject Monday afternoon and plans to announce the pick Tuesday. Washburne — a Dallas-based investor who owns pipeline, refinery maintenance, and well-drilling companies — has emerged as a Trump favorite for the job, a transition insider told The Daily Caller.

Energy infrastructure will be a big push for Trump, the source explained, and Washburne has the experience to handle it. Washburne is said to be a favorite of Steve Bannon, a top Trump advisor. He’s had meetings on the subject with Trump, Bannon, Donald Trump, Jr., and Jared Kushner — Trump’s son-in-law. Washburne has also privately met with Ivanka Trump about the role.

Meanwhile, incoming White House chief of staff Reince Priebus is pushing for Trump to appoint Sen. Joe Manchin as energy secretary. Priebus is hoping the Republican Party can capture the Democratic senator’s seat in West Virginia. That would happen by either convincing the state’s Democratic governor to appoint a Republican to finish the two years left in Manchin’s term, or by winning the seat outright in 2018. Although Trump won 67.9 percent of the state’s vote, it’s not clear what leverage Priebus would have to convince Gov. Earl Ray Tomblin to appoint a Republican.

Manchin is scheduled to meet with Trump at 10 a.m. on Monday morning. Some reports Sunday suggested that Perry is an energy frontrunner, but Trump officials are tempted to hire him instead to run the Department of Veterans Affairs. The Texas governor met with Trump several weeks ago, and he told the transition team that he wanted to run the Defense Department “or nothing.” That request was “dismissed out of hand,” the Trump source told TheDC. That’s when the team first offered Perry the chance to lead the VA. Perry turned it down.

Now Perry, who told Trump Saturday that he wants the energy secretary job, is scheduled to meet with the president-elect on Monday afternoon. The team is once again expected to offer Perry the VA gig, TheDC has learned. Perry, the source says, is the one guy who lacks a proponent within the campaign. And he’s reportedly considered a “confirmation nightmare” by some Trump insiders who point to his role on the board of Energy Transfer Partners. The company’s pipeline is at the center of a highly publicized dispute with Native Americans in North Dakota, who say that the project would cut through burial grounds. Both Perry and Washburne were spotted with Trump yesterday at the Army-Navy Game in Baltimore.

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201194,"Liberals have called Donald Trump crazy for proposing a strong wall to protect our southern border. It’s ironic, then, that they feel confident that a wall will protect the White House.

According to reports, the federal government just approved a new higher wall to keep fence jumpers off the grounds.

The Commission of Fine Arts approved the changes to the fence after a presentation by the Secret Service and the National Park Service. On Thursday, they said yes to a new 11-foot-7-inch fence surrounding the White House grounds. Today, the fence stands until 7 feet tall.

The new fence also “incorporates anti-climb and intrusion detection technology, while respecting the historical significance and visitor experience at the White House and President’s Park,” a joint statement from the two major groups read.

Over the past few years, there have been numerous incidents of people scaling the fence and climbing the barrier. In 2014, one intruder named Omar Gonzalez managed to make it all the way into the East Room before he was apprehended.

Somewhere on the campaign trail, Donald Trump is smiling. It seems that his logic has been proven right by liberals once more.

What do you think? Do you support Trump and his wall?",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198600,"You think Californians got an extremely raw deal when they elected Jerry Brown governor, or did they receive exactly what they deserved? Let’s take a look.. The guy signed a bill raising the minimum wage to $$15 hourly for the low-skilled, later admitting it makes no sense economically. More recently, the progressive nutjob decided that felons should be able to vote in November. Now, Brown has signed a bill that will jail reporters who film undercover footage at the baby killing capitol, Planned Parenthood.

From Life News: California Governor Jerry Brown has signed an oppressive, Planned Parenthood-backed bill to stop whistleblowers and journalists from conducting undercover investigations of any “health care providers.” The Center for Medical Progress’s undercover video project did a lot of damage to Planned Parenthood when it revealed the abortion giant’s baby body parts operation. Through the California bill, Planned Parenthood is trying to stop anyone from trying to expose its horrendous practices ever again. The legislation makes it a crime for anyone to record undercover footage of “health care providers,” including abortion facilities. An original version of the bill also would have punished third parties, including journalists and lawyers, who do nothing more than report or distribute the footage, the Courthouse News Service reports. Violations include stiff fines and jail time, according to the report.

California Assembly Bill 1671 is almost assuredly going to become the subject of a lawsuit not only from pro-life groups who wish to expose the abortion industry but other political groups, the media and defenders of free speech who want to engage in similar undercover journalism. After Governor Brown signed the bill, David Daleiden emailed LifeNews: “The Center for Medical Progress never recorded “confidential” communications, so California’s existing recording law and the new distribution provision are simply inapplicable to our work. However, it is clear that Planned Parenthood does not want to be held accountable to the public whose taxpayer money it gladly takes by the hundreds of millions, and will even attack freedom of speech and the freedom of the press in order to maintain its own arbitrary levels of secrecy.”

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198911,"No, Donald J. Trump is not crazy. He’s “crazy like a fox” according to world renowned psychiatrist Keith Ablow. Donald Trump may do things differently than anyone has ever done things, but it’s not just “off the cuff” as it may look. Trump has a genius mind, and everything he does is by design. Many times the CLM (Crooked Liberal Media) may think they are getting the best of President Trump, but in reality, they are doing exactly what he anticipated. How else do you think a presidential candidate could spend 1/2 as much as his opponent and win?

“WE’VE GOT A GENIUS IN THE OVAL OFFICE, AND IF WE THINK HE’S GOING TO SUBSCRIBE ENTIRELY TO PROTOCOL AND BE FLAWLESS AND POLISHED, THINK AGAIN!”

DR. KEITH ABLOW

If you agree with Dr. Ablow please SHARE this. The liberal media is doing everything they can to bring our new president down. It’s our job to get the TRUTH out on social media.

SHARE SHARE SHARE! Show President Trump we care!!! Thank you and God Bless!",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
202200,"Last weekend, the Women’s March raised controversy over the messages that it’s speakers delivered. The audience heard everything from Michael Moore saying that they were all there to end “the Trump carnage” to Madonna expressing her desires to “blow up the White House.” The Women’s March also featured Donna Hylton, a",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
202215,The Republican National Committee officially filed an attorney complaint Monday requesting a formal review of longtime Clinton aide and attorney Cheryl Mills. The request sent to the District of Columbia Court of Appeals’ Office of Disciplinary Counsel requested a review of Mills’ connection to former Secretary of State Hillary Clinton’s private,americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198113,"Besides Donald Trump, Mike Pence has quickly distinguished himself on the campaign trail and shown he is worthy of every degree of respect. Pence is a man who understands the electorate, and he just took the Clinton campaign to task in a strongly worded response to her nonsense.

In a statement that didn’t mince words, Pence characterized Clinton’s comments regarding Trump supporters as literally the worst he had ever heard from a candidate seeking national office.

Mike Pence: Hillary's comment is the worst statement I have ever heard by a candidate running for national office pic.twitter.com/IXw3CKJrU5 — FOX & Friends (@foxandfriends) September 13, 2016

Just to put things into perspective, there have been major gaffes in past presidential campaigns. A little history is in order, considering Pence just said Clinton’s comments were […]

READ MORE ON NEXT PAGE >>>",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198741,"Hillary Clinton has branded herself to liberal voters as someone who has always been sensitive to minorities and those in need, but a former mistress of her husband’s has just revealed that this isn’t the case at all.

In her tell-all book about the Clintons, former Bill Clinton mistress Dolly Kyle claims that Hillary was overheard calling mentally challenged children “f*****g ree-tards” and caught on record blurting out the terms “stupid k**e” and “f***ing Jew b*****d.” Her husband also referred to Reverend Jesse Jackson as a “G**damned n****r.”

According to Daily Mail, Kyle has also reminded Americans that Bill was sued numerous times by blacks and Hispanics for violations of the 1965 Voting Rights Act.

Hillary’s comments about disabled children were made during a traditional Easter egg hunt on the grounds of the governor’s mansion during Bill’s tenure in the Arkansas state house. The children were having trouble finding the eggs, and Hillary quickly lost her patience.

“The frustrated Me-First Lady demanded, ‘When are they going to get those f*****g ree-tards out of here?’” Kyle wrote .

Hillary Clinton is desperately trying to court the minority vote, and these allegations could cost her this demographic in the election. Since the race between her and Donald Trump is closer than ever, this might be enough to get the Republican in the White House.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201686,"Paul Ryan has always been an open-borders globalist in the pockets of corporations who bring in cheap foreign workers. Ryan told CNN last year that he favors an ENDLESS supply of cheap foreign workers. He said reducing foreign visas is not “in the agenda,” and he blocked funding for The wall.

Today, Trump flew to Wisconsin and got the ULTIMATE revenge!

PRESIDENT TRUMP SPECIFICALLY CHOSE PAUL RYAN’S DISTRICT TO SIGN THE EXECUTIVE ORDER ENDING PAUL RYAN’S BELOVED H-1B FOREIGN WORKER SYSTEM AS WE KNOW IT!

Paul Ryan didn’t even show up and it was in his own district!! He claims it was because of a scheduling conflict, but why wouldn’t he plan on being in his District when the President comes?? Trump just showed who is in charge once again and it’s not the GLOBALISTS like Paul Ryan! SHARE if you stand with President Trump against Ryan and the establishment!

This was Paul Ryan just last year saying reducing foreign visas IS NOT on the agenda!

Contrast that with what President Trump said today. From Breitbart:

“NO LONGER ARE WE GOING TO ALLOW FOREIGN COUNTRIES TO CHEAT OUR PRODUCERS AND OUR WORKERS OUT OF FEDERAL CONTRACTS,” HE SAID.

HE ALSO CALLED FOR H-1B VISA REFORM, ASSERTING THAT THE CURRENT LOTTERY SYSTEM WAS “WRONG,” AND SHOULD BE FOCUSED ON ONLY ALLOWING IN IMMIGRANTS WITH THE “MOST SKILLED AND HIGHEST PAID APPLICANTS.”

“NO ONE CAN COMPETE WITH AMERICAN WORKERS WHEN THEY ARE GIVEN A FAIR AND LEVEL PLAYING FIELD, WHICH HAS NOT HAPPENED FOR DECADES,” HE SAID.

President Trump can’t work with a Speaker of the House who disagrees so adamantly on this issue. It’s time for Trump to say the two famous words…You’re Fired!",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199122,"PARIS — Belgian officials have arrested a key suspect from last year’s Paris attacks, a senior official said Friday, and investigators also explored possible links to the deadly bombings in Brussels last month.

The suspect, Mohamed Abrini, was the subject of a massive manhunt since November’s rampage in Paris, which killed 130 people in a plot that was believed to be linked to the Islamic State.

A senior Belgian intelligence official, speaking on the condition of anonymity before an official announcement, said Abrini was among several people arrested.

READ ALSO: Hillary’s e-mail REVELATION: France and US killed Qaddafi

Belgian officials had announced arrests in the March 22 attacks in Brussels but gave no immediate details.

VIDEO ON NEXT PAGE >>>",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199774,"This is a non-stop occurrence.

Despicable crime and death thrust upon law-abiding Americans by illegal scum.

And people wonder why Donald Trump’s message resonates with Americans?

Breitbart is reporting:

According to Breitbart News: The victim’s mother told police she observed her daughter “walking funny,” according to an arrest affidavit obtained by the San Antonio Express News. The young girl told her mother that Carlos Esparza had hurt her.

The arrest affidavit details the multiple assaults the man allegedly carried out on his victim. The girl’s mother had put her to bed, but the girl and her siblings went downstairs to watch television. The affidavit states that Esparza was laying on the couch under a blanket. He is reported to have picked up the girl and placed her on his lap. After he removed their clothes, he sexually assaulted her in several ways, according to the affidavit. He told the girl to keep his actions secret.

He reportedly has a criminal history that includes aggravated assault with a deadly weapon and arrests for narcotics violations.

#BuildThatWall",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200035,"Nany Pelosi spends her free time visiting illegals who are breaking the law by being in this country. I guess there are no homeless American vets she could spend time with…..

During her trip to the Sacred Heart Church in downtown McAllen, Pelosi was flat-out ignored by the illegals when she spoke to them in English. Que?

Nice to see the people breaking the law to enter the country are not even interested in assimilation.

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201202,"The shadow government, or “deep state” as it’s known is comprised of unelected government bureaucrats, corporations, contractors, paper-pushers, and button-pushers.These are the people who are actually calling the shots behind the scenes and they covertly operate within D.C.The “deep state” is on a mission to destroy President Trump.They successfully took down General Flynn, but they’re not stopping there. According to the Wall Street Journal, intelligence sources say important information is being kept from President Trump.

WSJ says US intelligence says it is intentionally concealing information from US president @realDonaldTrump https://t.co/1tYJNENLAR pic.twitter.com/u8hzVDZI2q — WikiLeaks (@wikileaks) February 16, 2017

From Wall St. Journal: U.S. intelligence officials have withheld sensitive intelligence from President Donald Trump because they are concerned it could be leaked or compromised, according to current and former officials familiar with the matter. The officials’ decision to keep information from Mr. Trump underscores the deep mistrust that has developed between the intelligence community and the president over his team’s contacts with the Russian government, as well as the enmity he has shown toward U.S. spy agencies.

On Wednesday, Mr. Trump accused the agencies of leaking information to undermine him. In some of these cases of withheld information, officials have decided not to show Mr. Trump the sources and methods that the intelligence agencies use to collect information, the current and former officials said. Those sources and methods could include, for instance, the means that an agency uses to spy on a foreign government. A White House official said: “There is nothing that leads us to believe that this is an accurate account of what is actually happening.” A spokesman for the Office of Director of National Intelligence said: “Any suggestion that the U.S. intelligence community is withholding information and not providing the best possible intelligence to the president and his national security team is not true.”Intelligence officials have in the past not told a president or members of Congress about the ins and outs of how they ply their trade. At times, they have decided that secrecy is essential for protecting a source, and that all a president needs to know is what that source revealed and what the intelligence community thinks is important about it.

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198260,"Former Massachusetts Gov. Mitt Romney announced he won’t be voting for Donald Trump if he’s the Republican presidential nominee. But he could be open to the Libertarian ticket, Fox Business Network’s Trish Regan reported. “I don’t want to see trickle down racism,” the 2012 GOP presidential nominee told CNN earlier. “Presidents have",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200462,"Will President-elect Donald Trump follow through on his promise to build a wall on our southern border with Mexico?Well, what we know right now is that it’s not a top priority within his first 100 days.Makes sense, I guess.There are hundreds of issues he’ll have to deal with on day",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200576,"Republican White House rivals Ted Cruz and John Kasich have announced a deal to stay out of each other’s way in some upcoming state primaries in hopes of blocking front runner Donald Trump from winning the party’s presidential nomination.

In a statement, Mr Cruz’s campaign said he would focus on Indiana and give Mr Kasich a clearer shot in Oregon and New Mexico — states where the Ohio Governor expects to do well.

Mr Kasich, in turn, agreed to shift resources west and away from Indiana.

The Indiana primary is on May 3, Oregon’s is May 17 and New Mexico’s on June 7.

Donald Trump has won the most state nominating contests, but he has a tough path to earn the 1,237 delegates needed to secure the nomination. The Cruz and Kasich campaigns believe their agreement to cede states where the other candidate appears strong could help limit Mr Trump’s ability to win more delegates.

Some Republican strategists who oppose Mr Trump have been calling for such a deal for weeks. The question for both Mr Cruz and Mr Kasich is whether their agreement is too late.

If no candidate has enough support by the first vote at the Republican National Convention in July, many delegates will be allowed to switch sides on subsequent ballots.

Mr Cruz’s campaign manager, Jeff Roe, said Mr Trump — who has offended some women, Hispanics and other groups with controversial statements — would lose a general election contest against the eventual Democratic nominee in the November 8 election.

“Our goal is to have an open convention in Cleveland, where we are confident a candidate capable of uniting the party and winning in November will emerge as the nominee,” Mr Kasich’s chief strategist John Weaver said in a statement.

Mr Trump has frequently complained that the Republican Party’s nominating process is “rigged” against him, because establishment party members oppose him. Party officials argue that the delegate selection rules have been known for some time.

Lyin' Ted and Kasich are mathematically dead and totally desperate. Their donors & special interest groups are not happy with them. Sad! — Donald J. Trump (@realDonaldTrump) April 25, 2016

RELATED: Prince Wrote a Song About Donald Trump [Video]",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199727,"President Obama’s Attorney General Loretta Lynch — a veritable member or the Clinton mafia — has shown her true colors once again by siding with the lawless rioters in Charlotte, NC and against law enforcement. After the terrorist attacks over the weekend in New York and New Jersey, Obama implored the public not to jump to conclusions. Apparently, this courtesy is extended by his administration to radical Islamists but not to American law enforcement.

Lynch told the primarily black protesters — who have brutally and specifically attacked white people, looted businesses, and behaved like animals in the streets — “We hear your voices and we feel your pain.”

AG Lynch to protesters: ""We hear your voices and we feel your pain."" pic.twitter.com/G9zBRZnopJ — Fox News (@FoxNews) September 22, 2016

She doesn’t feel the pain of law enforcement who have been maligned and injured during the protests, white people who have been brutalized, blacks and others that have been caught in the crossfire, or the businesses that have been ravaged. No, the Attorney General of the United States of America has sided with anarchy. That’s a scary image. Young Conservatives reported that the ….

KEEP READING ON NEXT PAGE>>>",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199794,"A Democratic National Committee (DNC) official who worked on exposing recent election fraud during the Democratic primaries was found murdered this week.

Seth Conrad Rich was the Voter Expansion Data Director at the DNC and had been working on exposing the recent cases of election fraud and voter suppression during the recent primaries around the country.

Heatst.com reports:

As with the tragic murder of Molly Macauley in an affluent neighbor of nearby Baltimore in recent days, social media is abounding with political conspiracy theories and racially charged comments about Rich’s murder — even though very little is known about his killing and nothing about his killers.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201184,"Hitler led what is considered the largest atrocity against a “people” in modern times. And that is the person to which today’s liberals compare our president, Donald J. Trump.Marion Ingeborg Andrews, who lived under Hitler in Germany, shared her perspective, “Trump is not like Hitler. Just because a leader wants order doesn’t mean they’re like a dictator.” (via IJR)

Comparing any person to Hitler is such a pitiful argument that it usually ends the conversation right then and there.It also indicates the person making the comparison just doesn’t understand the devastation Hitler caused.Andrews knows it first-hand. She was born in Dusseldorf, Germany. She spent her formative years hiding in air raid shelters and cleaning up the rubble from bombed buildings around her neighborhood.She ate maple leaves and grass, just out of desperation. Most of the people she knew as a child, died. Millions more, across the globe, also lost their lives to the horror Hitler brought upon our planet.

In complete contrast, Donald Trump is for our Constitutional rights and would never threaten them. He has Jewish grandchildren, and he does not want to target any group. He instead wants to enforce our existing laws, and beef up our response to those who threaten the lives and livelihood of Americans.Donald Trump is not looking for war, unlike Barack Obama, I might add. Comparing Trump to Hitler is like saying a Ford Escort reminds me of Sunday brunch. The two things are just not even in the same ball park.In fact, Andrews went on to sat that what does remind her of Nazi Germany are our university campuses, where professors are teaching lies to our youth. That’s what concerns her most. Oddly enough, some of the recruiting documents we have seen from liberal organizations specifically discuss approaching children in middle schools. Does THAT not remind people of the Hitler Youth Groups?

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
146288,"Few basement dwellers, many discouraged Bernie Sanders supporters, are with Hillary Clinton, but the elite flock to line up behind her, as demonstrated again this weekend in Paris.

Barbara Bush, the 34-year old daughter of George W. Bush (pictured above), partied with Huma Abedin and the elite at a Clinton fundraiser on Saturday. She is the granddaughter of former Republican president George H. W. Bush, the Bush clan patriarch who will vote for Clinton according to Kathleen Hartington Kennedy Townsend, the former Maryland lieutenant governor and daughter of the late Robert F. Kennedy.

Photos of Bush and other patrons, resplendent in the latest haute couture, were posted to Instagram.

Bush’s attendance, Bush Senior’s nod, and a march of neocons and Republicans across the supposed partisan divide to the Clinton camp demonstrate there is little difference beyond rhetoric and tie color between the establishment political parties.

Remarkably, Laura Bush, Barbara’s mother, said earlier this year at an event on foreign policy and women leaders, she wants “our next president—whoever he or she might be—to be somebody who is interested in […]

READ MORE ON NEXT PAGE >>>",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201771,"Hillary Clinton and Loretta Lynch are like two peas in a pod. Both are long time leeches of taxpayer dollars, and both criminals, who don’t care about ANY of us.

There was a deal struck between Lynch and Bill Clinton at the infamous airport tarmac meeting. Not long after this meeting, Lynch approached Comey about covering for Clinton. Hillary suggested that she wanted to keep Lynch on as Attorney General had she won the presidency. THE FBI knew something was shady, according to American Lookout.

During former FBI Director James Comey’s testimony, there was little question as to whether or not there was a scheme in place to win the election for Hillary Clinton. Comey spoke at length about an encounter he had with Lynch right after her meeting with Bill Clinton at the airport, where they talked about “their grandchildren and golf.”

According to CNN, Lynch got close to Comey, and asked that he stop calling the investigation into Clinton an “investigation,” and instead refer to it as a “matter.” It seemed like an odd request to make, especially considering that we were just going into the 2016 election.

Luckily, their plan fell apart, and Donald Trump was elected as our president. No matter how hard the left tried, Clinton’s election continued to fall further from their grasp. The American people have spoken time and again.

Based off Comey’s testimony, Bill and Loretta were talking about more than just their grandkids on the airliner. Money was obviously being exchanged, and deals were being made. Call it a hunch, but we bet Lynch owes a great deal of money now for failed promises.

Comey put everyone on the spot, and now they’re being forced to answer for their erratic behavior and destruction of our constitution. There needs to be a full-on investigation into every single one of these people.

Why was Hillary SO sure she would win the election that she selected an AG months prior? Why leave the job to criminal Lynch? Obviously, there was more going on than we knew the last election cycle.

It’s almost like Hillary and company are part of a high school clique. Clinton wanted to get into office, get her friends cushy jobs working for the government, and relax — off our tax dollars — for at least four years. TRY AGAIN HILLARY — YOU FAILED!

Amazingly enough, all this information coming to the forefront has not left the Democrats running and hiding. They should get a head start, though. When the hammer of justice comes cracking down, they WILL be forced to pay for their complete disregard of every single patriot in this country. Being the president is not about personal gain, it’s about representing a nation. We ALL know that Hillary would have failed us miserably. Good Riddance!",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198922,"Don’t believe all the heart-wrenching footage of refugees you see on TV.

The reality is, the many people flooding Europe for handouts aren’t innocent mothers and children. The toxic Socialist policies of the U.K. and other nations have opened the door to leeches. These “children” have flooded the system, abusing these nations’ handout programs.

That is what one journalist from England, Lynn Barber, found out the hard way.

From Mad World News:

Daily Mail reports that Barber was initially ecstatic to rehome Mohammed, who claimed to be a persecuted Sundanese political refugee. The Muslim migrant told Barber that he was granted asylum status after sneaking into the UK through people-smugglers and, after being detained by Italian authorities, freely traveled to Britain as a refugee. Soon, however, the truth surfaced.

Barber explained that Mohammed became belligerent and aggressive, trashed her home, began smuggling drugs into his room, ran up her internet bill downloading excessive amounts of pornography, and continuously abused the taxpayer-funded medical and welfare benefits he was so generously given. Mohammed informed Barber that although she owned the house, he was going to “treat her like his mother,” which entailed her acting as his personal chef, maid, and dry-cleaner…

Then came the kicker. When Mohammed discovered that Barber was going to publish a memoir about her ordeal to “show readers you don’t have to be a saint to take in a refugee — you just have to have a spare room,” he flew into a rage and mocked her stupidity by confessing that he’s not a real refugee but a welfare leech who comes from a wealthy family.

Imagine my surprise (spoiler: I’m not). Time and again we are learning about these kinds of abuses in Europe and around the world. While there are people suffering from the war in Syria, hundreds if not thousands of “refugees” are abusing the system. So-called children turn out to be grown men, who go on to harass, harm, and sometimes even kill the families that welcome them into their homes.

This man admits he only came to Europe to abuse their benefits. Because if he stayed in his homeland, you know, he’d actually have to work for his food.

Yet because of the political correctness and stupidity of England and the rest of Europe, leeches like Mohammed are destroying their societies.

But will the people of Europe—and their leaders—stand up to this kind of insanity? Not likely.

Sadly, she gained no wisdom from the experience that will do her any service, ultimately affirming that she’s hoping to take in yet another refugee in the future. In fact, Barber seems to think that vowing to only rehome “much more deserving” migrants will prevent this and worse from happening again.

Like most liberals, Barber built up this fantasy in her mind of taking in a poor, destitute family of sweet, innocent people. People who would worship this wise, liberal woman for her generosity. Even when faced with the reality that such people do not exist, she clings to this obsession.

The UN Refugee Agency reports at the time of this article’s publishing that only 6.5 percent of migrant arrivals are Syrian. A whopping 72.5 percent are men, although this figure doesn’t take into account the recent report from Sweden which confirmed that age testing proves 75 percent of child refugees are also adults.

It’s like an entire Continent of people are marching off a cliff into oblivion. They willingly expose themselves to death and destruction, just to virtue signal their righteousness.

At least we can learn from their idiocy.

Source: Mad World News",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198662,"FBI Director James Comey just took it upon himself to rip up the constitution and turn America into a police state. He delivered a speech on cyber security Boston College and what he said will SHOCK YOU TO YOUR CORE. (see the clip below below)

Comey claimed that Trump doesn’t DESERVE privacy. The DEEP STATE wants to control everything! No wonder he wiretapped Trump tower!

He said the GOVERNMENT OWNS YOUR THOUGHTS AND MEMORIES, and then tried to justify it by saying our founding fathers “stuck a deal,” and this is what we get. WATCH FOR YOURSELF THEN SHARE ON FACEBOOK!

It’s terrifying that a person with these opinions is in charge of the FBI. SHARE on Facebook because the media won’t cover this!

This comes on the heels of Wikileaks’ release of “Vault 7” which showed that the CIA can hack any electronic device, even TVs, to spy on whoever they want. And apparently the FBI has NO problem with this.

Incase Obama and his gang of TYRANTS forgot, the 4th amendment of the Constitution guarantees the right to be free from unreasonable searches and seizures, and is often argued as protecting our right to privacy!

Apparently our government is trying strip us of our rights, one by one.

WE CANNOT STAND FOR THIS!

HELP US PROTECT OUR RIGHT TO PRIVACY BY SHARING THIS ALL OVER FACEBOOK!",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200780,"With the thought that Obama’s minions are going to do everything that they can to make sure the election is rigged in Hillary’s favor, one has to wonder; what if the rigging doesn’t hold? What if, despite all their treachery Donald Trump gets fairly elected against an opponent that is pulling out every possible cheat in the book?America is already living in Obama’s banana republic wherein he dictates from on high.

But if Trump defeats Hillary despite all the Democrat fraud they can throw at him then Obama says he is prepared to do anything to retain his power to keep Trump from unraveling his transformation. The man who violates the Constitution on a daily basis says Donald Trump is not fit to be president and that he will not tolerate a Trump presidency. Trump, he says, will not adhere to the political norms like McCain and McCain , i.e. he will not be an obsequious Republican.

The most corrupt politician ever to hold the office of president and his leftist minions say that Trump is “insane” and psychologically unstable because he gets into conflicts with Democrat operatives. GOP fools who fall for Democrat propaganda and attempt to mollify them with political correctness are lambasted by Obama for their support of Trump.

The real definition of insanity is…

KEEP READING ON NEXT PAGE>>>",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199324,"This video explores Trump vs. Hillary Crowds.

The result is a total blowout! Nearly nobody wants to see Hillary….other than her liberal mainstream media shills.

Watch the video:",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200403,"Hillary has been dogged by scandal after scandal her entire time in politics, but perhaps none has weighed her down more than the issue of her possibly illegal and unsecured email server while Secretary of State.

For months there has been speculation and worry that her private “homebrew” server was open to being compromised and hacked. Clinton and her camp have strongly dismissed these allegations, and no one has come forward to claim they have hacked the server.

Until now.

Via FoxNews:

The infamous Romanian hacker known as “Guccifer,” speaking exclusively with Fox News, claimed he easily – and repeatedly – breached former Secretary of State Hillary Clinton’s personal email server in early 2013.

“For me, it was easy … easy for me, for everybody,” Marcel Lehel Lazar, who goes by the moniker “Guccifer,” told Fox News from a Virginia jail where he is being held.

VIDEO ON NEXT PAGE >>>",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
146402,"While the entire nation is focused on President Trump’s former campaign chairman, Paul Manafort, the Commander-in-Chief hasn’t broken stride and rightfully so. He’s been quietly and diligently working at one massive mission he’s secretly been on outside the public eye and now an exceptionally key person is in custody. It’s fair to say that from here, things are about to get really bad for certain people who have already been under a heaping dose of scrutiny. Now, their secrets are second from coming out in interrogation as long-awaited justice is finally within reach.

There have been some massive scandals in our country over the last couple of years, none of which have Trump at the center of them despite what liberals would love to say. Among the most devastating have left a number of people dead and had we not elected someone like Trump as president, they may have been forgotten.

Hillary Clinton has been tied to a lot of sudden and suspicious deaths stemming from what people knew and were insistent on exposing about her. She abides by the philosophy that “dead men don’t talk,” which have spared her a lot of criminal charges….until now. There are those out there with blood on their hands who have done Hillary’s dirty work and now one of the most important people who had a key role in her biggest scandal is now in custody.

CBS News reports:

U.S. officials say special operations forces have captured a key militant in the 2012 Benghazi attack on a U.S. consulate that left four Americans dead, CBS News national security correspondent David Martin confirms.

A U.S. official identified the suspect as Mustafa al-Imam, Martin reports.

The commandos captured the man in Libya just before midnight local time on Sunday and are transporting him back to the U.S., officials told The Associated Press. The suspect is in the custody of the Department of Justice and is expected to arrive within the next two days on a military plane, according to one of the officials.

The officials said the mission was approved by President Donald Trump and done in coordination with Libya’s internationally recognized government. The officials, who weren’t authorized to speak publicly to the matter and demanded anonymity, would not say where exactly he was captured.

The Sept. 2012 assault killed Ambassador Chris Stevens, U.S. State Department computer expert Sean Smith and CIA contractors Glen Doherty and Tyrone Woods.

Had it not been for Trump in office, the victims of Benghazi would have had no chance justice since Hillary would have swept the attack under the rug to protect herself and cover her actions that led to this punishing attack.

“Stevens and Smith died in the burning diplomatic outpost despite efforts to rescue them. Woods and Doherty died nearly eight hours later in a mortar attack on a nearby CIA complex,”CBS added. This is another step toward the damning answers that Hillary has been trying to hide from as another of the terroristic killers was caught on the president’s watch who has made this investigation a priority.

“Earlier this month, another man accused in the attack, Abu Khattala, went on trial in federal court in Washington. Khattala has pleaded not guilty to the 18 charges against him, including the murder of an internationally protected person, providing material support to terrorists and destroying U.S. property while causing death, CBS News explained. “The attack was the fodder of multiple congressional investigations to determine what went wrong and whether the Obama administration misled the public on the details of the bloody assault.”

“Initial accounts provided by administration officials, notably former U.S. Ambassador to the United Nations Susan Rice, said the attack had grown out of a protest against an anti-Muslim internet film. Later, the administration said it was a planned terrorist attack.”

“A two-year investigation by a House Benghazi committee focused heavily on Clinton’s role and whether security at the compounds and the response to the attack was sufficient. It was the Benghazi probe that revealed Clinton used a private email server for government work, prompting an FBI investigation that proved to be an albatross in her presidential campaign.”

This comes at the start of a new week for Hillary who had a particularly rough weekend when her crimes stacking up against her, particularly after she was suspected in the death of another victim in the ever-increasing body count covered in her fingerprints

Information hounds have their paws deep in the dirt as they dig up ghosts of Hillary Clinton’s past and search for any and all evidence linking her to the death of a prominent figure in American history. Truth seekers look for evidence that could lead to her to indictment and incarceration, but those who seek are coming up with mixed results. The hottest trending controversial conspiracy slithers back into relevancy in the wake of JFK’s classified files being released, even though numerous items were redacted. This theory plots Hillary Clinton against JFK Jr. and suggests that she’s directly, or indirectly, responsible for the plane crash that left JFK Jr. and two others dead, thus paving the way for Clinton to win an easy seat in the Senate and further her career.

Look back to 1999 when numerous New York residents fancied JFK Jr. the front-runner in the Senate election taking place in the year 2000. A young charismatic man like his father, JFK Jr. would’ve had an easy victory over Hillary Clinton if he had run for Senate in 2000, but any possibility of him entering into the election was halted mid-air with the crash of the aircraft he was in. A midnight flight and an unfortunate demise of a budding personality who could’ve carried on the legacy of his father had it not been for that harrowing flight that ended it all. Many sources say JFK Jr. was not 100% set on running for Senate, but if he did, it would’ve been an overwhelming victory.

Sources like Your News Wire point to Hillary Clinton as the reason JFK Jr’s plane exploded and crashed. The website suggests that Hillary had no intention of returning to Arkansas and her only goal was to win a seat in the New York Senate, no matter what it took. The source allows readers to believe, without truly saying so, that Hillary Clinton was responsible for the murder of JFK Jr. Based on the details of the event, in which it’s believed that JFK Jr. was flying the plane in the night time and he had called the radio tower for something, then randomly exploded, one has to wonder what caused the explosion. The website then discusses the possible events that suggest the Clinton’s covered this up very quickly by preparing a Navy funeral service, even though JFK Jr. did not serve in the Navy. This all happened after a search located JFK Jr. and his passenger’s bodies in the water.

Whether that death is proven to be connected to the Clintons or not, there’s no denying the part that Hillary played in Benghazi. Now, one of the terrorists doing the killing just might provide clues, but at least will be held accountable in a way that Barack Obama or Hillary Clinton would have never done.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200108,"George Soros has been in the spotlight for financing the riots and protests around the countries, even bussing in rioters to certain places and now it appears that he is ready to commit even more money to the chaos he’s started. Soros only wants to cause upset around the country because",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201661,"Kara Dansky, the board chair for the Women’s Liberation Front, criticized former President Obama’s transgender bathroom laws on Tuesday’s broadcast of “Tucker Carlson Tonight.” The self-described “radical feminist” explained to The Daily Caller founder that the “interpretation of sex to mean gender identity… redefines women and girls to mean essentially anyone",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200237,"While other Democrats are dancing around trying to pretend the wiretapping did not happen, when more and more evidence points to the fact that it likely DID, Howard Dean is just flat out admitting it occurred. His admission includes the concept that Trump’s phone was “set up” in an attempt to",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
202032,"Actor George Clooney has hit out at presidential hopeful Donald Trump, declaring he will never make it to the White House.

Speaking from the Cannes Film Festival, where he is promoting his latest film Money Minute, Clooney made his disdain for the Republican candidate clear.

“There’s not going to be a President Donald Trump,” Clooney said to cheers from the crowd.

“That’s not going to happen”.

Clooney said Trump’s campaign would fail because it was centred on scaring the American people.

“It’s not going to happen because fear is not going to be something that drives our country,” he said.

“We’re not going to be scared of Muslims, or immigrants or women.”

He went on to point the finger at the media, claiming Trump caused the media to focus too much on ratings and not enough on journalism.

“Trump is actually a result in many ways of the fact that much of the news programs didn’t follow up and ask tough questions, that’s the truth,” he said.

“It’s really easy because your numbers go up.

“The ratings go up because they can show an empty podium saying ‘Donald Trump is about to speak’ as opposed to taking those 30 seconds and saying ‘let’s talk about refugees’.”

Clooney is a long-time supporter of Hillary Clinton.

In April he and his wife Amal Clooney held a fundraiser at their home for the Democrat, where he raised what he described to NBC as an “obscene amount of money” for her campaign.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200823,"The Judicial Watch group have announced plans to sue the U.S. Division of Homeland Security, after they repeatedly refused FOIA requests made on March 24, 2017, where the watch dog group legally requested all Secret Service records relating to Obama’s post-administration vacations he continues to take on taxpayer expense

Hat tip / Judicial Watch:

Judicial Watch announced that it obtained records from the Secret Service and the Air Force in response to Freedom of Information Act (FOIA) requests that show Obama family travel cost taxpayers a grand total of $$99,714,527.82.

You think because he’s is out of the White House, they’re done globe-trotting the world pissing on America? Wrong again commie-breath. How about a lavish vacation in Italy, where their private jet (escorted by six fighter jets, a 13-car motorcade) and a $$15,000 a night villa?

But Obama and his American-hating former First Lady may have had their entire opulent vacation completely ruined by this piece of news: You won’t be seeing this on MSNBC, by the way, so keep reading..

Throughout his two terms in office, Obama and Michelle lived high on the hog thanks to the American tax payers, as they jet set around on our dime with their luxurious excursions whenever their black little hearts had half an inkling. Obama exploited his presidential position by utilizing Air Force one as his personal taxi service to fly all over the world, while racking up a colossal amount of money to the tune of almost 1 BILLION DOLLARS that the American tax payers had to foot the bill for. But now that Obama and his snotty wife are out of office, their narcissism and contempt for the American people are now coming back to bite them in the ass in a massive way.

The new Obama White House era travel records show:

The March 2014 trip to Key Largo during Spring Break – where the First Family stayed at the exclusive Ocean Reef Club – cost the Secret Service $$247,827.50: $$182,120.33 for hotels and $$65,707.17 in travel expenses. The total cost of that trip with previously released $$885,683 in flight costs from the Air Force is $$1,133,510.50.

Other documents show that Michelle Obama’s February 2015 Aspen vacation cost the Secret Service a total of $$64,807.41: $$47,109.28 for hotels, $$3,559.43 in rental cars and $$14,138.70 in other travel expenses. The total cost of the trip with $$57,068.80 in flight costs from previously released Air Force records is $$121,876.21.

Judicial Watch released documents from the Air Force concerning the 2016-2017 Obama family Christmas trip to Honolulu showing 17.9 hours flying at $$142,380 per hour, bringing the total flight cost to $$2,548,602.

You might want to read this twice. The Obamas bled us for $$1 BILLION for all their many lavish vacations, and bad-mouthing you wherever they go!

Conservative Fighters reports that The lawsuit was filed in the U.S. District Court for the District of Columbia (Judicial Watch v. U.S. Dept. of Homeland Security (No. 1: 17-cv-00928).

All records of former President Barack Obama’s movements, schedule, activities, and / or meeting for January 21, 2017 through March 21, 2017. Such records include, but are not limited to, U.S. Secret Service schedules and activity reports.

Although Obama is no longer in office, he continues to receive Secret Service protection at taxpayer expense. In January, the Obama family traveled to Palm Springs, CA. The former president also spent a few weeks in French Polynesia.

Can you imagine this couple jet-setting around the world while lecturing us on wealth, the evils of Capitalism, climate change and income inequality?

The American people will turn this economy around – but it’s going to take a while thanks to these two – good riddance…",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199205,"…corner and will definitely be at the debate.” Clinton’s affair with Flowers isn’t rumored; it’s real. The president actually testified under oath in 1998 to the fact he had a sexual affair with her. Meanwhile, Trump’s campaign came out with a statement denying anyone in their camp had formally invited Flowers to the debate.

Indiana Gov. Mike Pence, Trump’s vice presidential pick, did damage control, telling the press his running mate’s tweet was simply an attempt to mock Clinton for “trying to distract attention” from the debate, the Hill reported. “Hillary Clinton apparently thinks this is an episode of ‘Shark Tank,’” Pence said, in reference to Cuban’s reality business show during an interview on Fox News. “But this is America. It’s serious business.” Debate commissioners sent out a stern warning to both presidential campaigns, saying those who try to distract from the business at hand during Monday’s event would be dealt with harshly.

“We’re going to frown upon – I will tell you this right now – whether or not a Republican or Democrat or anyone else attempts by use of the tickets in placing people in a front-row or not. to try to impact the debate,” said debate commission co-chairman Frank Fahrenkopf, the Hill reported.

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199441,"Haha, Hollywood elite is going nuts! They are actually going on strike in protest for Trump?! Oh my god, these folks are totally nuts! They are using their power and fame to go against American people and Trump! A rumor has begun circulating that certain left-leaning figures in Hollywood plan to ask",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
146344,"A high-ranking political appointee of President Barack Obama’s at the Department of Commerce violated federal rules when he wasted thousands of taxpayer dollars on swanky hotels, limos and plush office decor, according to a new Commerce Department Office of Inspector General (IG) report.

The Obama appointee wasn’t named by the IG but was identified by the Washington Post as former Undersecretary for International Trade Stefan Selig. He regularly spent tax dollars on lavish trips at home and abroad, used his assistant to conduct his personal business and spent “questionable” amounts renovating his office.

The IG was prompted to investigate Selig’s conduct when it received a confidential tip in 2015. He was appointed in November 2013.

The 45-page IG report — unlike the usual sanitized IG reports — depicts Selig as a man who was not satisfied until he had the perfect cocktail, luxurious office suite and most comfortable hotel — all on the taxpayers’ dime. Other Commerce Department staff members followed suit, expensing costly transportation and other luxuries, according to the IG.

The excessive travel expenditures continued because of “an erroneous belief on the part of key staff members organizing and approving the political appointee’s travel arrangements that political appointee was entitled to […]

READ MORE ON NEXT PAGE >>>",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198626,"Bernie Sanders today shrugged off the result of yesterday’s New York primary, telling supporters that he still has a path to clinching the nomination. The Hill reports:

“Our plan is to win the pledged delegates in this primary,” the Vermont senator said in an email to his supporters. “Next week five states vote, and there are A LOT of delegates up for grabs. I am going to keep fighting for every vote, for every delegate, because each is a statement of support for the values we share.”

Sanders followed up with a fundraising pitch, asking supporters to chip in $$2.70. Also included was a message he had sent out to supporters when he launched his campaign in April of last year.

Sanders currently trails Clinton in pledged delegates, 1,428 to 1,151. The count increases to 1930 to 1,189 when including unbound superdelegates. The former secretary of State needs just 435 more delegates to secure the nomination before the Democratic National Convention in Philadelphia at the end of July.

In the short time since its Empire State win Tuesday night, the Clinton campaign has been trumpeting the message that Sanders now has no shot at becoming the nominee.

“I don’t see a clear path for them at this point. The numbers are pretty daunting,” Clinton campaign manager Robby Mook said in an interview with Yahoo on Wednesday.

Part of the reason why the Sanders campaign believes it’s still viable is his team says many of Clinton’s unbound superdelegates are getting ready to jump ship and throw their support behind the Vermont senator. Mook shot down that claim on Wednesday, saying it’s unrealistic.

RELATEDSanders Accuses Hillary Clinton Of Violating Campaign Finance Laws",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200738,"Though Obama will soon be out of office, he won’t be letting his power slide anytime soon.

President Obama is making a mad rush of appointments to ensure his people will be in key roles even after he is out office. The challenge for Trump is these appointees will be making decisions without his knowledge and by the time the information gets to President Trump, it could be too late to do anything about it. A perfect example of this is Homeland Security.

Jeh Johnson, Homeland Security Secretary, has designated the electoral systems “critical infrastructure.” (via Associated Press)

This means that the states will have less control of their own election systems, giving Obama appointed federal government officials more power to mandate what security measures they deem appropriate.

The justification for this move is, of course, the Russian hacking false narrative.

This action does not require the approval of the president.

Not only is this an unacceptable infringement on the state’s jurisdiction over their own election, but it is simply a power-grab from the remaining Obama appointees, to further the outgoing president’s ideology.

In his Friday statement on the matter, Johnson said, “Given the vital role elections play in this country, it is clear that certain systems and assets of election infrastructure meet the definition of critical infrastructure, in fact and in law.”

Then came a small allusion to the Russian hacking false narrative, which is apparently the only justification Johnson believes he needs, “Particularly in these times, this designation is simply the right and obvious thing to do.”

Georgia Secretary of State Brian P. Kemp thinks this will actually make our election systems more vulnerable. He is a a member of the U.S. Election Infrastructure Cybersecurity Working Group, and had this to say on the matter, “a federal overreach into a sphere constitutionally reserved for the states.”

Kemp took his criticism directly to Jeh Johnson, telling the Homeland Security Secretary that this move “smacks of partisan politics.” Indeed, I have to agree. Nothing rings Liberal ideology like stepping on the Constitution to take over a vital function of government that is supposed to be under the states’ control– and for good reason.

No doubt Jeh Johnson is acting under orders from Obama. Sadly, Trump is going to have to fight back many Obama appointees in the next four years. Many of them will be able to make decisions without his permission, perhaps even secretly. We need to keep our eyes open for this sort of nonsense!",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201514,"President Obama is a big fan of rappers like Jay-Z, Chance the Rapper, and Drake.But since agreeing to speak to the Wall Street financial company Cantor Fitzgerald, perhaps he should be bopping to The Notorious B.I.G., especially Biggy’s hit song, “Mo Money Mo Problems.”This speech and others like it have garnered him rare criticism from Democrats, even from allies Elizabeth Warren, who said she was “troubled” by it, and Bernie Sanders, who said “I think it is unfortunate that President Obama is doing this.”Perhaps the most damning thing are his own words about Wall Street used against him.

As the video illustrates, Obama chastised Wall Street and said he didn’t run to enrich Wall Street bankers.

As Weasel Zippers points out, when asked just before he left office, he specifically said, “I’m not going to Wall Street.”

Despite his promises, as Weasel Zippers points out, the second thing he’s doing after reentering public life is going to Wall Street to give a $$400,000 speech to Cantor Fitzgerald.

Ruth Marcus, columnist for the Washington Post, adds in a piece titled “Is $$60 million really not enough for the Obamas?” – What is really revolting about all this unseemly money-grubbing isn’t who’s writing the checks, it’s the unnecessary vacuuming of endless sums.Obama… is done with electoral politics, at least the kind that have him on the ballot. His office said a portion of his income will go to charity. But is this rapaciousness really the image he wants to cultivate — for himself or for fellow Democrats? Having left his party in such terrible condition, does he really have to offer opponents ammunition to attack him as hypocritical?

But Obama isn’t letting the criticisms stop him and he intends to do more of the same.

According to Newsweek: He raked in $$400,000–the equivalent to his annual presidential salary–for a 90-minute interview Thursday in midtown Manhattan, where he spoke with a presidential historian on things like income inequality and civic engagement. He’s set to earn another $$400,000 for a 60-minute speech during a conference hosted by the investment firm Cantor Fitzgerald. And he doesn’t plan on slowing down any time soon: Harry Walker Agency, which represents the former president and his wife along the speaking circuit, is scheduling new appointments for the Obamas every single week.

And Obama defends the speeches as being on topics ‘he feels passionately about’ – meaning they further the progressive Agenda.

According to Fox Business: Obama spokesman Eric Schultz said in a statement that the Democratic former president accepted the invitation to speak because health care is “an issue of great importance to him.” He added that Obama implemented financial reforms even after taking money from Wall Street as a candidate in 2008. Obama will be true to his values and record “regardless of venue or sponsor” for his speeches, Schultz said.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201991,"Obamacare has been a total disaster. Exchanges collapsing, premiums skyrocketing, policies cancelled. Remember when President Obama lied to us about 92 million times and said that if we liked our plan we could keep it?That was fun… Over the past year, we have seen major health insurance companies give up on the massive",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200185,"Allen West, the always articulate voice of common sense and reason, shares his thoughts and feelings

on the Black Lives Matter-inspired terrorist attack in Dallas that ended the lives of 5 police officers and wounded countless others.

WATCH:

Let us know what you think about this..",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
146384,"White House chief of staff John Kelly just struck fear in the heart of Hillary and Bill Clinton and America is cheering.

Look, the rampant corruption that is the Hillary Clinton needs to end. She can’t get away with everything while sitting back with that horrendous smirk on her face.

She thinks she is so untouchable that she does not believe she will be held accountable for the shady Russian nuke deal or the even shadier Russia dossier scandal.

Enough is enough and finally we have someone willing to step forward and say it.

And because who the man is this is serious.

General John Kelly is a man with unimpeachable credentials and a seat of power.

So get ready Hillary because what he just said will most probably happen and happen soon.

In an interview on Fox News’s new shot “The Ingraham Angle,” Kelly said it is time to appoint a special counsel to get to the bottom of Hillary’s many crimes.

Specifically the Russian nuke deal and the funding of the dodgy dossier.

He spoke eloquently about Americans “right to know what the U.S. government is doing on any given day.

And then he called for an independent and special investigation into Clinton saying that “an objective” investigator is necessary to look into accusations” against Clinton and the Democrats.

Correct.

“One of the strengths I have in looking at issues in my job, I think probably as a layman looking at this kind of thing, we need to find someone who’s very, very objective, who can get to the bottom of these accusations. I think it’s important. Again, the American people have an absolute right to know these things,” Kelly added.

Yes we do and while the wheels of justice may move slowly, with guys like Kelly at the helm at least they are finally moving. Share if you agree.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200674,"NEW YORK CITY, New York — Donald J. Trump, the Republican nominee for president, has sided with the sovereignty of the American people against international elites yet again by coming out in public opposition to President Barack Obama’s internet giveaway to a United Nations globalist body. Stephen Miller, Donald Trump’s chief",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
146348,"Nikki Haley just embarrassed Barack Obama for the cruel thing he did to the Cuban people.

Look, annoying the Cuban population in South Florida spelled doom for the Dems and Hillary so he probably thought he was doing the right thing.

It is just that, as with most things Obama, it backfired. What is it that they say about the road to hell being paved with good intentions?

That will be the liberal’s epitaph – just another cliché proven correct.

Nikki Haley took the extraordinary step of apologizing to a whole nation for Obama’s shoddy treatment.

According to the Washington Examiner Haley, speaking of the cowardly abstention on a critical UN vote that would have helped the Cuban people said:

“When the United States abstained on this resolution last year, its decision was explained by saying, ‘We recognize that the future of the island lies in the hands of the Cuban people. There is a casual cruelty to that remark for which I am profoundly sorry. Regrettably, as of today, the future of Cuba is not in your hands. It remains in the hands of your dictators.”

Correct. It was another missed opportunity for Obama. Another cruel blow to a desperate people.

One that will have lasting consequences for a people who just want to be free.

Marco Rubio echoed Nikki’s comments saying,

“Despite the Obama administration’s unilateral concessions to the Castro regime, I remain hopeful that the Trump administration’s new policy toward Cuba will empower the Cuban people, and bring them closer to freedom and democracy. Ambassador Haley’s vote today is one more step in that direction.”",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199219,"In another move to whitewash history, President Barack Obama has officially expunged two words from four decade-old pieces of federal law, which use the terms “oriental” and “negro.”

President Obama signed a bill that removed uses of the words “oriental,” “negro,” and other terms for minorities that are considered offensive from federal law.

The bill was spearheaded by Democrat Congresswoman Grace Meng of New York and joined by 76 members of Congress, including 51 from the Congressional Asian Pacific American Caucus, NBC News reported.

Part of the law Obama signed reads:

Section 211(f)(1) of the Department of Energy Organization Act (42 U.S.C. 7141(f)(1)) is amended by striking “a Negro, Puerto Rican, American Indian, Eskimo, Oriental, or Aleut or is a Spanish-speaking individual of Spanish descent” and inserting “Asian American, Native Hawaiian, a Pacific Islander, African-American, Hispanic, Puerto Rican, Native American, or an Alaska Native”.

In addition, the Local Public Works Capital Development and Investment Act of 1976 also received a language update.

But who uses these words anyway, and why does it matter now? These words were commonly used once, and are clearly part of American history. They aren’t used today, so why stir up racial tension for no reason?

With the Islamic State (ISIS) growing in power and serious economic problems in America, why is Obama focused on racially outdated language in laws which are four decades old? This is the insanity of political correctness, and it’s hardly what a real leader would focus on.

What do you think about Obama removing these two words? Please leave us a comment (below) and tell us.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198400,"No, President Trump did not defend any whites supremacists, KKK, or Neo-nazis and he was as not lying when he said two different sides were in Charlottesville to do battle. Here is some proof.

The Crooked Liberal Media was quick distort and misrepresent what President Trump said at Monday’s news conference. Now the Anti-Trump, Establishment scumbags, John McCain, Mitt Romney, Lindsey Graham and John Kasich have all jumped on Antifa bandwagon. It is time for some serious swamp drainage!

Here is proof that the cowardly left wing thugs, known as Antifa, were in Charlottesville.

Conservative Firing Line reports:

A video posted to Twitter on Tuesday appears to show an elderly man being beaten by a group of thugs aligned with the radical anti-democracy group Antifa. The tweet, posted by

Beverly Hills Antifa, reads: “Make sure this video of Antifa beating an old man never hits the news.”

A post at Red Wire News says the video was shot during the Charlottesville riot last weekend. Although the video seems to have been taken during that event, we were unable to independently verify that assertion.

What caught our attention was Antifa’s admission that they engaged in this violent assault on an older man and their silly concern that it might reach the media.

Make sure this video of Antifa beating an old man never hits the news. pic.twitter.com/8w4EcZJCD6 — Beverly Hills Antifa (@BevHillsAntifa) August 16, 2017

If you support President Trump, please SHARE this now! The Crooked Liberal Media is manufacturing F*KE NEWS and it’s up to us to stop them.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
202113,"Obama, Hillary and their minions continue to refuse to use the word “radical Islam” even after Orlando massacre. They are actually blaming Christians and the NRA for the mass shooting by a Islamic terrorist. Yeah, blaming Christians even though the Islamic terrorist said that he was killing in the name of Islam",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201275,"Rep. Debbie Wasserman Schultz’s (D., Fla.) primary challenger has filed a complaint with the Federal Election Committee claiming that the former Democratic National Committee chair wrongfully used DNC resources to target his campaign. Tim Canova, a law professor and Bernie Sanders supporter, claimed his campaign lawyers found evidence in the recent Wikileaks that Schultz violated FEC rules.

“It’s very clear that Wasserman Schultz was using the DNC resources to monitor my campaign and to strategize on how to crush the campaign,” Canova said Monday night during an interview with MSNBC, according to Free Beacon. “That’s a violation of federal law.” This came a week after Schultz announced she was resigning as committee chair amid fallout from the email leak suggesting the DNC favored Hillary Clinton over Bernie Sanders during the Democratic primary. Canova said his recent discovery was just the “tip of the iceberg” of Schultz’s mismanagement of the campaign.

“A lot of folks are unhappy with her, and this is what I mean, that she’ll be a drag on the ticket at this point,” he said. A poll released by Canova’s campaign on Sunday had him trailing Schultz by 8 points. What do you think about this?",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200169,"Army Sgt. Bowe Bergdahl was held for five years by the Taliban after he allegedly deserted his post. Two years after the Obama administration foolishly gave up five Taliban prisoners to get him back, Bergdahl has asked for something else — a pardon, according to Fox News, who obtained the information from two senior U.S. officials.

Fox News reported:According to a well-placed source, Bergdahl thanked the president for rescuing him in May 2014 in a controversial exchange for five Taliban prisoners from Gitmo, in addition to asking for a pardon in the letter. The Secretary of the Army was copied on the letter to the president, but the pardon was not formally requested through the military chain of command.

A Justice Department official confirms that it received a pardon petition from Bergdahl. Pentagon and White House officials would not immediately respond for comment. Bergdahl’s pardon letter was sent to the president via the Department of Justice, officials said. There was no immediate comment from DOJ. Reached by phone, Eugene R. Fidell, the attorney representing Sgt. Bergdahl, would not comment on the letter. Last month, Sgt. Bergdahl’s court-martial trial was delayed for a second time and will now begin May 15 at Fort Bragg, NC. Bergdahl faces charges of desertion and misbehavior before the enemy and could face up to life in prison. The Army general who investigated Bergdahl’s disappearance from a remote outpost in eastern Afghanistan on June 30, 2009 recommended that Bergdahl not receive jail time.

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200287,"On various Sunday morning shows, Democratic presidential candidate Bernie Sanders continued to question his rival, Hillary Clinton’s decision making. Clinton and Republican presidential candidate John Kasich also had some choice words for their.

Watch the VIDEO:

RELATED: Breaking: Hillary Clinton Just Gave Democrats HORRIBLE NEWS!",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
202110,"According to breaking reports, Texas has just announced that they will be suing any private organizations that take in Syrian Refugees. The Federal Government has a way of bullying private organizations to push their agenda state governments are not falling in line. One letter to the International Rescue Committee stated that “Failure",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200282,"If Clinton and Lynch just talked about grandkids then why is this such a top secret transcript? This is troubling because it portends to what we’ve known all along…Bill Clinton was meeting with Lynch to fight Hillary’s battle. They won’t reveal it because it would implicate so many people in government…Are we right? A citizen researcher from Florida is attempting to have the recording of the infamous Bill Clinton/Loretta Lynch tarmac tape released to the public, but apparently, the National Security Agency claims they won’t release it due to “national security.”

The man researching and seeking to have the tape released is Florida orthodontist Larry Kawa. You may remember him because of Judicial Watch’s filing of a lawsuit on his behalf to obtain a week’s worth of Hillary Clinton’s emails regarding Benghazi. It’s being reported now that the NSA has declared the recording of the conversation that took place between Bill Clinton and Loretta Lynch in Phoenix, Arizona on June 27, 2016. Judicial Watch filed a Freedom of Information Act request in March of this year to obtain the following:

Any and all records and/or transcripts of a meeting held between Attorney General Loretta lynch and former President Bill Clinton on June 28, 2016. Any and all records of communication sent to or from officials in the Office of the Attorney General regarding the meeting held between Attorney General Loretta Lynch and former President Bill Clinton on June 28, 2016. Any and all records of communication sent to or from officials in the Office of the Deputy Attorney General regarding the meeting held between Attorney General Loretta Lynch and former President Bill Clinton on June 28, 2016.

Any and all references to the meeting held between Attorney General Loretta Lynch and former President Bill Clinton contained in day planners, calendars and schedules in the Office of the

Attorney General.

This brings us to Kawa. In an article at Big League Politics, Patrick Howley writes:

The National Security Agency (NSA) blocked the release of a purported tape of Bill Clinton and former Attorney General Loretta Lynch’s private airplane talk with a rare legal justification used to protect top national security secrets. The NSA’s block of the release of this information — citing one of President Obama’s executive orders — undercuts Hillary Clinton’s claim that her husband and Lynch had a “purely social” conversation about grandkids and golf on June 27, 2016, two weeks before Lynch dropped the Department of Justice investigation into Hillary Clinton’s email scandal.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198765,"President Trump authorized the use of the MOAB (Mother of All Bombs) against ISIS in Afghanistan. This was in response to the killing of a Special Forces soldier over the weekend in this ISIS stronghold.

After the bombing, it was revealed that the bomb was developed YEARS ago but Obama REFUSED to authorize it’s use. President Trump was asked today if he personally gave authorization, and this was his response: (Video Below)

“WHAT I DO IS I AUTHORIZE MY MILITARY. WE HAVE THE GREATEST MILITARY IN THE WORLD AND THEY’VE DONE A JOB AS USUAL. WE HAVE GIVEN THEM TOTAL AUTHORIZATION”

While Obama was going around apologizing for America, President Trump is EMPOWERING our military to get the job done. Trump prefers these quick strikes to destroy the enemy, rather than long drawn out wars that accomplish nothing. WATCH Trump’s comments then SHARE on Facebook so we can make this go viral!

Trump on Dropping 'MOAB' in Afghanistan: 'Don't Know' If It Sends Message to N. Korea https://t.co/0Yjj3zNplB pic.twitter.com/xhLHol6vu4 — Fox News (@FoxNews) April 13, 2017

The 21,000 pound bomb is the most powerful non-nuclear bomb in the world and “Bombing the hell” out of ISIS is yet another campaign promise fulfilled by Trump. Here is a test video of the “MOAB”! SHARE this on Facebook so we can make it go viral!",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
146268,"According to Politico, Liz is building up quite the “merchandising empire” that suggests she has 2020 on her mind.

Have you found yourself wanting an Elizabeth Warren action figure?

Inside the Elizabeth Warren merchandising empire: Action figures. Temporary tattoos. Coloring books: https://t.co/u7K8aDHj64 pic.twitter.com/oHOFeerKrY — POLITICO (@politico) August 13, 2017

From Twitchy:

Warren’s swag game, from both her campaign as well as supporters, is like few others in politics:

It’s impossible to know the true size of the Warren merchandising-industrial complex. The bulk of it exists beyond the Democratic senator’s control on sites like online marketplace Etsy. And her campaign, which hosts its own online store, declined to disclose the exact amount of money it raises from merchandise sales.

But it’s safe to say no other senator has anything like it.

Warren’s campaign store has expanded beyond traditional political fare such as buttons, bumper stickers, tote bags and T-shirts to offer a line of products that capitalize on the “Nevertheless, she persisted” meme spawned by Senate Majority Leader Mitch McConnell’s much-publicized admonishment of Warren on the Senate floor earlier this year.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201248,"We are constantly told, over and over again, that we need to let in Syrian refugees because these people are oppressed and just want safety and freedom. While it’s true some of them might be thinking that way, it seems a large portion of individuals who come into our great nation",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199174,"WikiLeaks founder Julian Assange has not been in the news much recently, but the online provocateur is roaring back in the forefront this week with an announcement that will bedevil the Hillary Clinton campaign anew. Assange said he is set to release another large batch of emails Hillary sent from her illegal, secret server while she was Obama’s Secretary of State.

The announcement comes as the presumptive nominee for the Democrat Party presidential candidate essentially clinched the delegates needed to become the nominee even as she continues to fend off suspicions over whether or not the FBI will recommend she be indicted for breaking the nation’s security laws with her private, hackable email accounts.

According to The Guardian, Assange made his comments on the British political TV show “Peston on Sunday” saying, “We have upcoming leaks in relation to Hillary Clinton … We have emails pending publication, that is correct.”

Assange’s WikiLeaks already has a searchable data base of over 30,000 Clinton emails encompassing over 50,000 pages of documents sent from June 30, 2010, to August of 2014. The trove of information can be seen at WikiLeaks’ Hillary Clinton Email Archive.

When asked if he thought the U.S. Department of Justice would indict Hillary for breaking U.S. national security laws, Assange said that Obama would never allow it. Speaking of U.S. Attorney General Loretta Lynch, Assange said, “he’s not going to indict Hillary Clinton, that’s not possible. It’s not going to happen. But the FBI can push for concessions from a Clinton government.”

Assange, no fan of Hillary, also insisted she is a warmonger saying, “she has a long history of being a liberal war hawk.”

The WikiLeaks chief also slammed Internet giant Google for being “intensely aligned” with Clinton’s campaign.

Indeed, Assange’s comments come on the heels of charges that Google cooks its algorithms in order to hide the many decades of scandals connected to the Clintons when Google users search her name.

Recently Danny Sullivan of the website Search Engine Land realized that there is no automatic search parameter recommendation in the Google Search bar for “Crooked Hillary.” In contrast,”Lying Ted” comes up in the search bar as soon as users start typing the word “lying.”

Search Engine Land even discovered that searches for “Lying Ted” and “Crooked Hilary,” both terms used on the campaign trail by GOP front-runner Donald Trump, have been searched a similar number of times, yet the Hillary search still doesn’t afford users an automatic recommendation.

This led many to charge that Google is trying to make sure Hillary’s lies and criminal charges are harder for users to find.

This also led Robert Epstein, a psychologist at the American Institute for Behavioral Research and Technology, to say Google could help throw the presidential election to Hillary.

“We estimate, based on win margins in national elections around the world that Google could determine the outcome of upwards of 25 percent of all national elections,” Epstein said in a new study of Google’s search algorithm as reported in Wired magazine.

In addition, this issue was explored by SourceFed host/writer Matt Lieberman who produced a devastating video on the topic entitled “Did Google Manipulate Search for Hillary?”",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200111,"After primary wins on Tuesday night in several states, Republican presidential nominee Donald Trump announced that he will give a speech next week regarding the corruption and the scandals that surround the Clintons. That speech alone should be one that could last for weeks, but I’m sure it will be condensed",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
146310,"We would like to think that our law enforcement agencies, especially the FBI, are led and staffed by those of impeccable integrity. And we believe that, in spite of the inevitable bad apples, that this is generally true. Given the power they wield, we best hope that it’s true. It’s especially",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201413,"One of the biggest scandals to come out of 2016 was the infamous June meeting between Attorney General Loretta Lynch and Bill Clinton on the tarmac of the Phoenix Airport.

At the time, the Justice Department’s investigation into Hillary Clinton was still ongoing, but just days later, FBI Director James Comey closed the investigation into the Democratic presidential candidate.

Of course, this led to mass outrage over the Obama administration interfering on Hillary’s behalf to have the investigation closed as she was running for president.

Lynch tried to pass her secretive meeting with Bill Clinton off as nothing more than two grandparents getting together to swap stories about their grandchildren, but we now know it was much more than that.

Evidence exsists that tarmac meet between Lynch & Bill Clinton was more than about grandkids She should be disbarred https://t.co/Itqc56JAhZ — David A. Clarke, Jr. (@SheriffClarke) December 28, 2016

According to National Review, the Obama administration had to intervene in the investigation into Hillary because Obama himself was also guilty – a fact they were unwilling to let the public get ahold of. Hillary and Obama had both exchanged classified information over her private server. If she went down, Obama would have to go down, too.

WATCH BELOW:

There was so much evidence against Hillary that it seems ludicrous she isn’t in prison right now, and Americans were rightfully outraged when she was not charged with a crime. However, the explanation behind why her email scandal shook out the way it did is pretty simple: Hillary was never brought to justice because President Obama would have been exposed.

Though we now know exactly why Hillary wasn’t prosecuted, it doesn’t make the pill any easier to swallow. The man presiding over what is supposedly “the most transparent administration in history” let a criminal walk free in order to cover his own tracks. How’s that for corruption?

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198212,"HERE ARE TWO VIDEOS OF THE INCIDENT—-

HILLARY FAINTS GETTING INTO VAN AT GROUND ZERO……

SHE DROPPED LIKE A ROCK!

HAD TO BE LIFTED INTO VAN!!!

HER KNEES COMPLETELY BUCKLED—

SHE COMPLETELY DROPPED!

LOST A SHOE UNDER THE VAN!

WATCH THE VIDEO !!!

Hillary Clinton 9/11 NYC pic.twitter.com/q9YnsjTxss — Zdenek Gazda (@zgazda66) September 11, 2016

HERE’S VIDEO FROM A DIFFERENT ANGLE—

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199292,"Those who work in public office carry much responsibility on their shoulders. As leaders of a country, they are often held to a high standard. If they appear to be abusing their positions for financial gain, the results can be devastating. That’s just what one leader is facing right now. But",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201163,"Liberal supporters of Hillary Clinton are freaking out about the possibility of a Trumpmaggedon nuclear war on the heels of the missile strikes against airfield targets in Syria.

But before pointing fingers, the liberal morons should know that their precious Hillary called for the United States to “take out” Syrian government-controlled airfields just hours before President Trump launched air strikes against Bashar Assad’s regime.

That’s right! She said she would do the same damn thing! LMAO!

The Independent has more:

Speaking to the New York Times columnist Nicholas Kristof, Mrs Clinton said she believed the US had been wrong not to have previously launched such an offensive.

She said: “Assad had an air force, and that air force is the cause of most of the civilian deaths, as we have seen over the years and as we saw again in the last few days.”

“And I really believe that we should have and still should take out his airfields and prevent him from being able to use them to bomb innocent people and drop Sarin gas on them.”

Asked by Mr Kristof if she felt not acting more decisively on Syria had been her gravest foreign policy mistake, Mrs Clinton said she had been aware the conflict could become “one-sided” in the first stages of the Syrian conflict.

She said: “When I was secretary of state I teamed up with Dave Petraeus, then director of the CIA, Leon Panetta, then secretary of defence, to present a plan for us to move more aggressively to support protesters to provide some back up in what I thought could turn out to be a very one-sided battle.”

“This was before Isis really came to public awareness with their plan for a caliphate and their setting up of headquarters in Raqqa.”

“I believed then, and I’ve said this repeatedly, I believe we should have done more at that point.”

So, let’s not pretend that Donald Trump did anything Hillary Clinton wouldn’t have done.

If Trump’s Syrian strikes lead to further tension between the United States and Russia, or even widespread military conflict, it has nothing to do with a Republican or Democrat being in office.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198583,"Marine Le Pen, the current front-runner for new Prime Minister of France, turned down a meeting with a Muslim religious leader from Lebanon because she refused to wear a head scarf. Le Pen, a Trump-Esq candidate, said, “You can pass on my respects to the grand mufti, but I will not",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201586,"…a long history of legal drama. Once known as the “Kingpin” of Nigerian corruption, Chagoury’s name was once added to a federal terrorist no-fly list back in 2010. After spending several months and thousands in legal fees, Chagoury convinced the U.S. to issue him a written apology, granting him a waiver to fly freely to the U.S. again. The U.S. government did not however provide an explanation for Chagoury’s being added to the list in the first place.

The billionaires name also appeared in email exchanges from when Hillary Clinton was Secretary of State. In one email exchange, Clinton Foundation senior official Doug Band emailed Clinton’s closest aid Huma Abedin and aid Cheryl Mills requesting help connecting Chagoury with the State Department’s “substance person” on Lebanon affairs. Abedin later promised to contact the “substance person” about the request.

“This is very important,” Band replied, noting the urgency of the request. Chagoury has donated $$1 to $$5 million to the Clinton Foundation. His company also pledged $$1 billion to the Clinton Global Initiative in 2009, the same year the Clinton Global Initiative awarded the Chagoury Group its annual prize for “sustainable development.”

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198403,"Our nation has been taunted for months now by the idea that we didn’t get a fair election. Even those of us who voted for the winning candidate are unnerved at the idea that our sacred election process could be compromised. So far all of the blame has been pointed at the guy who won, President Trump. After all he gained from the results of the election, and if he did cheat that would turn his base against him. Since the finger pointing has begun, all the talk of what the punishment should be, if he were implicated in a scandal, has grown by the day. It might be time to get the left to put those possible punishments in writing though because it turns out that there may have been someone in cahoots with a foreign government, but it might not have been the winner.

TREASON? Video surfaces of Hillary admitting she was in contact with foreign leaders interfering in our election! pic.twitter.com/EHHTyC0sEU — Newt-Trump Fan Club (@NewtTrump) July 19, 2017

Obviously, she’s trying to make a point here; she wanted everyone to believe that the world hated Donald Trump. She just didn’t bank on that making us want to elect him even more. Hillary was so absorbed in her own extreme left agenda that she didn’t realize that we didn’t want someone who was going to play nice with international leaders, we wanted someone who would stand up to them. So apparently you can get on the phone with leaders of other countries who don’t want your opponent to win, and still lose. The incredible thing is trying to pin the election tampering on the other guy though. You’ve gotta give the woman props for courage that she could still chase this down after announcing on live TV that she did the same thing she’s accusing President Trump of doing. They say the best place to hide something is right out in the open, and I guess that’s worked out well for Hillary.

(H/T: Red State Watcher)",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201854,"Toward the tail end of his interview on Meet the Press this Sunday, actor and Hillary Clinton fundraiser George Clooney briefly described his one and only meeting with Republican presidential frontrunner Donald Trump.

Clooney told Chuck Todd that he was sitting down when he met Trump, but that the weirdly and famously size-obsessed Trump subsequently “went on Larry King and told everybody I was short”

WATCH THE VIDEO:

READ ALSO:Donald Trump’s Worst Nightmare From His Past Just Came Back To Haunt Him",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198923,"The politically-motivated witch hunt for President Trump is a direct attack on We the People. We elected Trump to exercise our will.

Former Speaker of the House, Newt Gingrich, warned that the Mueller investigation will only end with someone in prison. “They’re going to get somebody. I don’t think they’re going to get the president, but they’re going to get somebody, and they’re going to get him for something. And they’re probably going to go to jail.” (via Washington Examiner)

Gingrich made the comment while appearing on Sean Hannity’s show Friday night. Gingrich explained that, with so many high-profile lawyers involved, it can only end with a scalp.

Newt Gingrich is a strong supporter of President Trump, and was an early candidate to serve as Trump’s running mate.

Deputy Attorney General Rod Rosenstein appointed Robert Mueller to lead the investigation into Russian interference into the 2016 presidential election.

Attorney General Jeff Sessions was forced to recuse himself from the investigation because of his connection to Donald Trump’s presidential campaign. Rosenstein and Mueller have full control over the probe.

However, since his appointment, Mueller has pursued his investigation aggressively. It’s morphing from a probe into Russian interference into a witch hunt for President Trump.

The scope of the investigation grows every day. Mueller recently hired 13 high-profile attorneys to investigate matters related to President Trump. Mueller plans to hire even more.

“This is like watching an old-fashioned Western movie,” said Gingrich, describing the investigation. “This is an Indian hunting party. They’re out looking for a couple scouts, and they’re not going to go home until they get some.” Mueller’s hunting party would be embarrassed if they don’t land a major arrest.

Mueller’s investigation got off to a rocky start. Multiple illegal leaks have already taken place, indicating that Mueller either cannot control his investigation — or does not want to. Critics have also questioned Mueller’s friendship with former FBI Director, James Comey.

This investigative witch hunt was exactly what James Comey had in mind when he leaked classified memos to the press, alleging obstruction of justice. Comey wanted a special prosecutor, and was pleased when his old friend, Mueller, was appointed.

Gingrich has referred to Mueller as the spear of the deep state — a man obsessed with dismantling the Trump presidency from inside. He cannot be allowed to continue.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198919,"Why has the mainstream media not been reporting on former President Obama’s whereabouts recently?

Because he’s working with them directly — every single morning.

In his war room two miles from the White House, Barack Obama is assisting the mainstream media daily by providing them with new narratives to promote, political strategist Dick Morris reports.

“Obama has set up a secret operation in a war room just about two miles from the White House where Michelle has her offices and so do many of the former aides to Obama,” said Morris.

“They meet there and they have a twice daily conference call….8:30 and 9:45 every morning and they develop talking points for the media for the day to how to sabotage and how to undermine Trump,” he added.

PJW reports:

Former Health and Human Services head Kathleen Sebelius and Andrew Slavitt, former head of the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services are both working with Obama and were instrumental in sinking Trump’s recent attempt to repeal Obamacare, according to Morris.

“It’s a war room, it’s just like in the middle of a campaign – it’s like the campaign never stopped and all of the key players are on that conference call,” said the political strategist.

Morris’ information confirms reports that originally emerged back in March when it was revealed that Obama was leading the charge to “oust” Donald Trump from the presidency by either forcing his resignation or through his impeachment.

The Daily Mail reported that Obama was being aided in his crusade by ex-senior advisor Valerie Jarrett, who moved into Obama’s nerve center just two miles from the White House to help him build momentum behind the “mounting insurgency” against Trump.

During a separate appearance on a radio show, Morris added that the entire “Russian collusion” narrative was “an attempt at a coup d’etat” by the intelligence community and the media to topple Trump.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
146328,"On Thursday, political pollster and one-time aide to former President Bill Clinton, Dick Morris, revealed Barack Obama, along with a group of aides, have set up a ‘secret war room’ tasked with stopping President Trump and his agenda.

Operating just two miles away from the White House, the war room holds two conference calls daily to hash out media talking points, with a particular focus on health care. Calls are held 8:30 am est and 9:45 am est. Kathleen Sebelius, former Health and Human Services head and Andrew Slavitt, former head of the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services are both active in the secret group.

While Dick Morris’ inside intel is deeply concerning, it isn’t the first time news of Obama plotting against President Trump has come to light. In May, news broke former Obama aide, Valerie Jarrett, moved in with the former first family to plot against the current administration.

Three's company?? Valerie Jarrett reportedly moves in with the Obamas in D.C. pic.twitter.com/xJe93PpgfD — FOX & friends (@foxandfriends) March 2, 2017

Daily Mail reported:

Barack Obama is turning his new home in the posh Kalorama section of the nation’s capital – just two miles away from the White House – into the nerve center of the mounting insurgency against his successor, President Donald J. Trump.Obama’s goal, according to a close family friend, is to oust Trump from the presidency either by forcing his resignation or through his impeachment.

And Obama is being aided in his political crusade by his longtime consigliere, Valerie Jarrett, who has moved into the 8,200-square-foot, $$5.3-million Kaloroma mansion with the former president and Michelle Obama, long time best friends.Jarrett played a vital – if at times low-key – role in the Obama presidency. She lived in the White House, dined with the Obamas, and help shape his domestic and foreign policies.

The former president has set up an office on the West End of the national’s capitol, where he recently hosted an open house for his White House staff – including Joe Biden, Susan Rice, Josh Earnest and Jarrett.But the office, part of his post presidency perks, cannot be used for political purposes. The rent on his home is paid by him personally.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200887,"This is… actually kind of new for Rosie. And it’s not unwelcome.

Remember how Rosie O’Donnell tweeted out a video speculating if Donald and Melania Trump’s ten-year-old son, Barron, was autistic? Even though there isn’t ANY evidence for that? And even if he is, it’s precisely no one’s business except his family’s?

Rosie later doubled-down on the speculation, even writing a bizarre poem about it. Melania even threatened a lawsuit against the people behind the video that Rosie tweeted. It’s kind of been a circus all around.

However, the kerfuffle may be over, at least as Rosie is concerned. She has offered an apology to Melania for tweeting out unfounded speculation about Barron (it’s a screenshot, because Rosie’s set her Twitter account to private)

That’s actually really decent of Rosie to do. Usually when liberals get something like this horribly, horribly wrong, they refuse to admit any kind of wrongdoing and keep attacking.

But Rosie has evidently seen the error of her way and apologized. I have to give her credit for that. As far as I can tell, it looks sincere and heartfelt. Now, if she does something stupid to erase her apology later, then all bets are off. But for now, this little Rosie-Trump seems to be over.

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200733,"While all y’all were busy sleeping in and getting ready for a beautiful Easter Sunday, Mike Pence was hard at work trying to save this country. Today marked day 1 of his 10-day tour of Asia. His first stop is South Korea to show our support despite North Korea’s threats. However, even with so much work ahead of him, Vice President Pence still found time to do something unbelievable…

…HE WENT AND PRAYED AT CHURCH IN SOUTH KOREA!

It was a distinct honor to join US & South Korean service members for fellowship during Easter service in Seoul. Happy Easter! #VPinASIA pic.twitter.com/0yca2Bk0qa — Vice President Pence (@VP) April 16, 2017

See what I mean? This is just more proof that VP Pence is a devout Christian and Patriot no matter what. He is even sacrificing this highest of Holidays to keep our country safe! Oh, and did I even mention the OTHER thing he did this morning? Well, hold onto your seats because Mike Pence went and laid a wreath for the Fallen South Korean soldiers who fought with US Soldiers as well!And like a true gentlemen, Pence brings his beloved wife Karen along with him the whole way. This is true love, folks.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199654,"Crooked Hillary Clinton is freaking out right about now…

From Newsmax:

…

Trump, the presumptive Republican nominee, leads Clinton, the Democratic front-runner, with white voters 55 percent to 31 percent. Among whites without a college degree, Trump leads 61 percent-24 percent, The Hill notes.

Latest News Update

Clinton leads with black voters, who back her 90 percent to 7 percent over Trump, and with Hispanics, who favor her 62 percent to 23 percent.

This poll consisted of 1,021 registered voters, and has a margin of error at plus or minus three percent.

Previous polls showed that former 2016 presidential candidates Ted Cruz and John Kasich beat Clinton head-to-head, while Trump failed.

Seeing as how the only option now for both conservatives and Republicans is Trump, it’s looking like more people are coming around to his brand of politics.

Let’s hope these results stick come November.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199543,"hostage negotiators broke down.

Brown said that while the Dallas community, mayor and other city officials have given his department “all the support we need,” he believes Americans demand too much of local police departments.

“We’re asking cops to do too much in this country. We are. We’re just asking us to do too much,” he said. “Every societal failure, we put it off on the cops to solve. Not enough mental health funding. Let the cop handle it. Not enough drug addiction funding. Let’s give it to the cops.”

“Here in Dallas, we’ve got a loose dog problem,” Brown went on. “Let’s have the cops chase loose dogs. You know, schools fail. Give it to the cops. Seventy percent of the African-American community is being raised by single women. Let’s give it to the cops to solve that, as well. That’s too much to ask. Policing was never meant to solve all of those problems.”

Via TPM

This is what happens when we have a radical in the White House who doesn’t care about the lives of police officers. The White House would rather focus on gun control and deadly shootings that help Democrats politically.

These criminals who advocate for the murder of our police officers deserve to be brought to justice. Cops risk their lives everyday while trying to keep our neighborhoods safe, and it’s time that Black Lives Matter is stopped before more deadly attacks occur. At this point, there is no reason why not to consider BLM a domestic terrorist organization.

What do you think about Dallas Police Chief David Brown receiving death threats? Please leave us a comment (below) and tell us.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199586,"Donald Trump fired off more rounds at unprofessional Supreme Diva Ruth Bader Ginsburg for her inappropriate comments when she stated she’ll leave America when Trump wins the White House.

However, it’s not just Trump who is hitting back, Ginsburg is taking heat from all directions, including the liberal NY Times, who criticised her remarks and ethical legal breach.

Trump took to Twitter to respond to Ginsburg:

If I win the Presidency, we will swamp Justice Ginsburg with real judges and real legal opinions! — Donald J. Trump (@realDonaldTrump) July 13, 2016

MORE…

Even the @NYTimes and @WashingtonPost Editorial Boards condemned Justice Ginsburg for her ethical and legal breach. What was she thinking? — Donald J. Trump (@realDonaldTrump) July 13, 2016",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198614,"The U.S. House of Representatives successfully passed its 2018 budget resolution on Thursday without a single Democratic vote, according to The Hill. Republicans in the Senate will now have the opportunity to pass the tax reform legislation and give President Donald Trump the chance to sign it into law. The legislation passed in",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199020,"The Democratic National Committee has admitted in court that they are no more “democratic” than the Democratic People’s Republic of Korea.

Disgruntled Democrat voters have filed a class-action lawsuit in the U.S. District Court for Southern Florida alleging that the DNC and former chairperson Debbie Wasserman-Schultz favored Hillary Clinton during the presidential nomination process. (via Lifezette)

The class-action suit is hoping to receive relief for almost seven million donors who provided money to Bernie Sanders expecting a fair election process.

“There’s no contractual obligation here,” argued DNC lawyer Bruce Spiva in court. “It’s not a situation where a promise has been made that is an enforceable promise.”

Spiva goes on to explain that registered Democrats should have had no expectation of a fair election process. Further, he claims that there is nothing stopping the Democrats from selecting their nominee in a backroom negotiation without any input from voters.

Spiva’s comments need to be played on repeat leading up to the next presidential election. The Democrats have “no contractual obligation to democracy” should be known as the unofficial slogan of the establishment party. They haven’t been playing by the rules for YEARS — the only difference is, now, they’re admitting it.

It is no wonder that the Democrats nominated such an unlikable person to run for election: she was not chosen by the voters.

The mainstream media has, of course, remained silent as the case proceeds since it is actually newsworthy and has no connection to their ridiculous Trump-Russia narrative. Pathetic.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
146325,"Susan Rice just announced she won’t testify before the Senate on the Russian hacking. Senator Lyndsey Graham said he’s “very disappointed” but said, “we’ll deal with her later.”

She gave a very flimsy excuse for not testifying via her lawyer:

Rice considered the invitation a “diversionary play” to distract attention from the investigation into Russian election interference, including contacts between Trump allies and Russians during the campaign, the source said.

That’s ridiculous! Could it REALLY be that she doesn’t want to testify under oath? Ya think!

According to CNN, Barack Obama’s national security adviser turned down a request from Sen. Lindsey Graham to participate in the hearing. “Senator Whitehouse has informed us by letter (SEE BELOW) that he did not agree to Chairman Graham’s invitation to Ambassador Rice, a significant departure from the bipartisan invitations extended to other witnesses,” Rice’s lawyer Kathryn Ruemmler wrote in a letter to Graham. “Under these circumstances, Ambassador Rice respectfully declines Senator Graham’s invitation to testify.”

Rice was the administration official who made the dozens of requests seeking to unmask the identities of Trump associates, which she said were for national security reasons and not politically motivated Read more: Daily Caller

THE LETTER FROM RICE’S LAWYER:

Dear Chairman Graham and Ranking Member Whitehouse:

I write on behalf of my client, Ambassador Susan E. Rice, in response to Senator Graham’s invitation to Ambassador Rice to testify at a May 8, 2017 hearing before the Senate Committee on the Judiciary, Subcommittee on Crime and Terrorism entitled “Russian Interference in the 2016 United States Election.”

While Ambassador Rice commends the Subcommittee’s efforts to examine this matter of extraordinary national significance, it is extremely rare for the Congress to request the testimony of a former senior advisor to the President given the longstanding and well-recognized separation of powers concerns at issue. Moreover, Chairman Graham’s invitation was extended only after the hearing was noticed, less than two weeks before the hearing was scheduled to occur, and without consultation with Ambassador Rice, a professional courtesy that would customarily be extended to any witness. Notwithstanding the significance of these concerns, Ambassador Rice is prepared to assist Congressional inquiries into Russian election interference because of the important national interests at stake, provided they are conducted in a bipartisan manner, and as appropriate, in classified session.

In this case, however, Senator Whitehouse has informed us by letter that he did not agree to Chairman Graham’s invitation to Ambassador Rice, a significant departure from the bipartisan invitations extended to other witnesses. Under these circumstances, Ambassador Rice respectfully declines Senator Graham’s invitation to testify.

Again, and as Ambassador Rice has stated publicly, she supports and is committed to assisting the bipartisan Congressional inquiries into Russian interference in the 2016 election, given the utmost importance of this matter to our national security.

Please contact me if you have any questions. Sincerely,

Kathryn H. Ruemmler

of LATHAM & WATKINS LLP

SUSAN RICE HAS LIED NUMEROUS TIMES OVER THE YEARS…",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
202206,"The Left is full of vile people that want nothing more than to discredit everyone who does not agree with them. Out of all of the people on the Left, race-baiters are perhaps the worst.

Now we have a way to shut the race-baiters down forever. A new damning piece of evidence has emerged directly from an official government website. There is no disputing this document. What you see here is a flyer that says you should always vote for the Democrats because Republicans support the “negro.” WOW.

Let’s take a step back and think about the kind of nonsense we have had to deal with for the past couple of years. The emerging Black Lives Matter movement is nothing short of domestic terrorism, specifically because of their violent state of mind. This group feels that they are oppressed by “white Republicans” and the only way to solve their problems is through violence.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198388,"The new Hampton University poll is good news for Trump.

As with most recent polls, Trump has either closed the gap with Hillary or taken the lead.

Hillary continues to sink, while the Trump/Pence ticket are surging!",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201592,"Obama’s minions took it upon themselves to warn President-elect Trump of criticizing the administration’s decision to not veto a U.N. resolution.

You can bet that the White House is taking a great deal of heat over their foolish decision to backstab Israel during a United Nations resolution vote.

Before the vote, Trump ordered Obama to VETO the resolution. However, Obama didn’t take kindly to free advice, like a spoiled child, he did the very opposite of what a responsible adult told him to do. Obama abstained from the vote, which enabled the resolution to label Israel’s buildings in the West Bank as “illegal” to succeed.

The White House rejected President-elect Trump’s criticism and warned him that there is only “one president at a time.”

In a briefing on the move Friday, Ben Rhodes, Deputy National Security Adviser, stated:

“On the president-elect, the first thing I’d just say is that there’s one president at a time. President Obama is the President of the United States until Jan. 20th, and we are taking this action, of course, as U.S. policy.”

Trump tweeted his concern about the move at the United Nations that the U.S. did not disavow.

“As to the U.N., things will be different after Jan. 20th,” Trump wrote in a tweet.

Rhodes also mentioned: “I believe that despite what has at times been very strident Israeli government criticism of U.S. policies that President Obama has always made Israel and its security sacrosanct in his approach to these issues.”

While I do agree that Obama has the final decision until Trump takes office, it seems rather petty that he can’t have a simple conversation with Trump about their differences of opinion. Talk about power hungry. Obama is desperate to keep his throne.

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200569,"It looks like the Left doesn’t need the help of anyone to dismantle themselves, they are doing just fine by themselves. There is a reason that liberals are the laughing stock of the political world. The ringleader — um, minority leader Nancy Pelosi — is facing harsh criticism after Democrat Jon",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199285,"Ilhan Omar, Minnesota’s newest Congresswoman was a guest on The Daily Show with Trevor Noah. They laughed together as she was saying, “I’m America’s hope and Trump’s nightmare.” Noah wanted to get attention by using the Somali immigrant, who now sits in Congress, but now he certainly is regretting that move since her secret was revealed.

Ilhan Omar is a Somali immigrant who because of her background was able to become the newest Congresswoman from the heavily Somali state of Minnesota. She’s eloquent and attractive enough to have the liberal falling head over heels with her as the next champion. Trevor Noah didn’t ask anything important when he should have asked her about the allegations of immigration fraud and bigamy.

""I am America's hope, and Trump's nightmare."" @IlhanMN – you make me proud to be a Minnesotan! pic.twitter.com/YTRVT2uGie — Julie Blaha (@julieblaha) July 14, 2017

According to Pamela Gellar, an expert on Islam and Muslim terrorists, “Omar is a 35-year-old mother of three and is America’s first elected Somali representative. She was married in an Islamic ceremony in 2002 at the age of 19, but never officially led a certification in any government office. In 2009 she married a man whom people have accused of being her brother for citizenship purposes (and is still legally married to), and finally reunited with her first ‘husband’ in 2011, who she is still with today.”

Hennepin County records show Omar applied for a marriage license in 2002 but never used it. Seven years later, Omar married Ahmed Nur Said Elmi in Eden Prairie. Elmi could not be reached for comment.

Minnesota courts have no records of Omar and Elmi filing for divorce. Her campaign finally denied that Elmi is her brother. They only said that she and Ahmed Hirsi have three children, and are together and raising a family. The Star Tribune could not find records in Minnesota showing that they got married.

The suspicious thing is the age of her children. She claims that Hirsi is the father of the all three. They have been involved since in 2002, then having three kids with him in seven years, but then she married Elmi in 2009 and apparently she is still legally married to him. Elmi allegedly is her biological brother, who she married so he could come from the U.K. to the U.S.

Former Minnesota Congresswoman Michele Bachmann stated, “Fraud, deceit, lies, corruption, cover-up, bigamy, immigration law violations, law breaking – all appear to be associated with the first Somali American winner of a Democratic primary in Minnesota. The newly discovered documents and witness testimony cry out for an investigation,” according to WND.

Legally she can have babies with who she wants, but the illegal thing is the allegations that Omar was engaged in fraud. August 20, 2008, the Wall Street Journal reported that findings of major fraud forced U.S. State Department to halt all family reunification programs for African refugees because of the Somalis. Ilhan Omar’s campaign paled the card of crying racism, sexism, and xenophobia, so they ultimately had to shut the investigation.

Please share this post on Facebook with your thoughts on this.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200513,"A-list actor George Clooney became the latest star to bash Donald Trump this week when he claimed that the president and White House chief strategist Stephen Bannon are the real “Hollywood elitists.

“When Meryl [Streep] spoke, everyone on that one side said, ‘Well that’s elitist Hollywood speaking.’ Donald Trump has 22 acting credits in television,” Clooney said, referring to Streep’s infamous anti-Trump speech at the Golden Globe Awards last month.The Hill reported that Clooney said Trump, “collects $$120,000 a year from his Screen Actors Guild pension fund. He is a Hollywood elitist.”Clooney, who held large fundraising events for Hillary Clinton, went on to target Bannon.

“Steve Bannon is a failed film writer and director. That’s the truth, that’s what he’s done,” Clooney claimed. “He wrote a Shakespearean rap musical about the L.A. riots that he couldn’t get made. He made a lot of money off of ‘Seinfeld.’ He’s elitist Hollywood, I mean that’s the reality.” Clooney said Streep “had every right to speak up” because “she was an American citizen long before she was an icon.”The actor then targeted the media, saying they did not do their jobs during the election.“We have a demagogue in the White House.

We need the fourth estate, which is journalists, to hold his feet to the fire,” he said. “They didn’t do a very good job during the campaign. And they haven’t done a particularly good job yet. But those things will change.”Unfortunately for Clooney, Twitter users immediately let him know they don’t care what he thinks about politics.

George Clooney: Trump, Bannon 'Hollywood elitists' https://t.co/PlFQZZp6CX

Another Hollywood dingbat out of touch with everyday Americans. — Susan Kittrell (@skitt55) February 21, 2017

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201195,"Well, that didn’t take long.

Yesterday, we told you that Fox News fired Bill O’Reilly and changed their entire primetime lineup. There’s still a little bit of float time between now and when the lineup officially goes into effect. So, “The O’Reilly Factor” still has a few episodes until it’s completely gone.

According to this, however, the network has already made some pretty obvious changes with how they’re packaging the show. Last night, Dana Perino (who was subbing for O’Reilly while he’s on vacation) introduced a newly renamed “The Factor” –

And according to the sourcelink, Dana got to make one mention of Bill’s absence from the network at the end of the show, but that was it –

‘Finally tonight, it is the end of an era here at the Fox News Channel.

‘As we mentioned earlier, Bill O’Reilly is leaving this chair and this network after more than 20 years.

‘Bill has been the undisputed king of cable news and for good reason.

‘He is an incredibly talented broadcaster who raised the bar for interviewers everywhere.

‘He has also held his staff to exacting standards in his quest to put the best possible program on the air and they are great.

‘And you his audience responded in record numbers making The Factor the number one cable news show for more than 16 years. You have also been loyal and we can’t tell you how much that means to everyone on The Factor.

‘In the memo to The Factor staff today, Rupert Murdoch described Bill this way: ‘In fact, his success by any measure is indisputable. We wish him the very best.’

‘I’m Dana Perino, thanks for watching us, I’ll be here again tomorrow, goodnight.’

Soooo, it kind of looks like O’Reilly’s just… gone.

Here’s O’Reilly’s statement on his firing –

Bill O'Reilly statement: ""It is tremendously disheartening that we part ways due to completely unfounded claims"" https://t.co/EM07bl7juA pic.twitter.com/dV69eUX1tp — The Situation Room (@CNNSitRoom) April 19, 2017

Kind of an expected reaction from him. Though it’s kind of weird that they didn’t wait for him come back from vacation before canning him like that.

I don’t know – the whole situation is strange. True, O’Reilly wasn’t my favorite Fox personality, but he had interesting guests and fun segments (I always enjoyed seeing Dennis Miller on his show). But I haven’t had cable TV in my house for several years, so it’s not like I’ve been able to watch Fox News (or any conventional TV channel) on a regular basis for a long time. If I suddenly had TV again and could watch Fox News, I don’t think I’d recognize the network anymore.

To be truthful (and this is probably an unpopular opinion), I don’t miss it all that much. Not just watching Fox News, but watching TV in general. I’ll stick with what I get on Netflix and Hulu and on the internet. It’s much cheaper.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
146273,"President Donald Trump says he is ready to pursue criminal charges against Hillary Clinton over claims she accepted millions of dollars in Russian bribes in exchange for approving the Uranium One deal.

Trump took to Twitter Thursday, slamming the mainstream media for ignoring the bombshell revelations about Clinton.

Thegatewaypundit.com reports: “Uranium deal to Russia, with Clinton help and Obama Administration knowledge, is the biggest story that Fake Media doesn’t want to follow!,” tweeted Trump.

Uranium deal to Russia, with Clinton help and Obama Administration knowledge, is the biggest story that Fake Media doesn't want to follow! — Donald J. Trump (@realDonaldTrump) October 19, 2017

The President followed up quoting Fox & Friends’ report on the scandal, tweeting “Russia sent millions to Clinton Foundation.”

.@foxandfriends ""Russia sent millions to Clinton Foundation"" — Donald J. Trump (@realDonaldTrump) October 19, 2017

Shortly after, Dilbert creator Scott Adams highlighted how President Trump’s tweet already yielded results. Business Insider covered the story following the tweet. Among many reasons, this is why it is imperative President Trump continues to use Twitter.

The Commander-in-Chief is correct — the mainstream media will report on anything else but this scandal.

While millions of Americans are calling for a full scale investigation by Congress, and further reporting from the media concerning the Clinton-Uranium One deal, CNN and CBS News are covering what they think are the most pressing issues of the day — ‘Mike Pence’s adoring gaze at President Trump,’ and the ‘Supreme Court Justice Ruth Bader Ginsburg’s workout plan.’

The mainstream media is dead. Yet, you already knew that.

On Wednesday, CNN’s Jeanne Moos released a video report on how Vice-President Mike Pence ‘adoringly gazes’ at President Trump.

Moos notes Pence nods “on beat,” to when President Trump makes a statement. Pence’s stare has been compared to ‘lovestruck,’ cartoons, reports Moos.

“Nancy Reagan Eyes” is what Pence gives Trump, adds Moos.

CBS reporter Elaine Quijano sat down with Supreme Court Justice Ruth Bader Ginsburg’s trainer to learn the ‘secret’ behind the 84-year-old’s workout.

.@Elaine_Quijano sits down with Supreme Court Justice Ruth Bader Ginsburg's trainer and gets the keys to her workout Thurs. on Red & Blue pic.twitter.com/iyQG08DT5a — CBS News (@CBSNews) October 19, 2017

CBS News reports:

Personal trainer Bryant Johnson hears it all the time: Four more years.

That’s how long fans of his client, 84-year-old Supreme Court justice Ruth Bader Ginsburg, tell him he has to keep her healthy so that a one-term President Donald Trump doesn’t get to name the liberal justice’s replacement on the Supreme Court.

[…]Interest in the workout of the Supreme Court’s oldest justice and in the man behind it has only grown since the election of Trump, who — to be clear — says he’ll occupy the White House for eight years. And it’s resulted in a new workout book written by Johnson, out Wednesday: “The RBG Workout: How She Stays Strong … and You Can Too!”Johnson said he hopes the book will show people: “You’re never too old to do something.”

Ginsburg started working out with Johnson in 1999 after being treated for colorectal cancer. As Ginsburg tells the story, her husband told her she looked “like a survivor of a concentration camp” and needed to do something to rebuild her strength. That’s when another judge referred her to Johnson, the records manager at a federal court in Washington who is also an Army reservist and trainer. Their twice-a-week workouts helped Ginsburg regain her strength after her first bout with cancer and again after she was treated for pancreatic cancer in 2009.

Both CNN and CBS News refused to cover the explosive report by The Hill. “The story was apparently too unimportant to be covered by the “big three” broadcast networks, ABC, CBS, and NBC, as they all refused to spend airtime on it Tuesday,” reports the Daily Caller.

At 10:26 pm est, CNN’s homepage does not show any reports on the scandal. A search with the keywords “FBI” and “bribe” failed to yield the report either.

Prior to the Obama administration approving the very controversial deal in 2010 giving Russia 20% of America’s Uranium, the FBI had evidence that Russian nuclear industry officials were involved in bribery, kickbacks, extortion and money laundering in order to benefit Vladimir Putin, says a report by The Hill.

Who was right in the middle of it all? HILLARY CLINTON.

John Solomon and Alison Spann of The Hill:

Federal agents used a confidential U.S. witness working inside the Russian nuclear industry to gather extensive financial records, make secret recordings and intercept emails as early as 2009 that showed Moscow had compromised an American uranium trucking firm with bribes and kickbacks in violation of the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act, FBI and court documents show.

They also obtained an eyewitness account — backed by documents — indicating Russian nuclear officials had routed millions of dollars to the U.S. designed to benefit former President Bill Clinton’s charitable foundation during the time Secretary of State Hillary Clinton served on a government body that provided a favorable decision to Moscow, sources told The Hill.

The Department of Justice decided to continue investigating this for four years without Congress or the public knowing, according to The Hill’s reporting.

Hillary Clinton was Secretary of State at the same time the State Department and government agencies on the Committee on Foreign Investments UNANIMOUSLY approved the partial sale of Canadian mining company Uranium One to the Russian nuclear company Rosatom, ultimately giving Russia 20% of U.S. Uranium.

That same company, Uranium One, owned uranium concessions in the United States. Because uranium is a strategically important commodity, the Russians would need approval from the Obama administration, including Hillary’s State Department, before the purchase took place.

The Clintons took the cash from Uranium One officials before the deal was approved by Hillary Clinton’s State Department. The Clintons hid the donations which is a clear violation of the Memorandum of Understanding Hillary Clinton signed with the Obama administration wherein she promised and agreed to publicly disclose all donations during her tenure as Secreatary of State. (Via Breitbart)

The New York Times reported on the crooked deal in 2015.

As the Russians gradually assumed control of Uranium One in three separate transactions from 2009 to 2013, Canadian records show, a flow of cash made its way to the Clinton Foundation. Uranium One’s chairman used his family foundation to make four donations totaling $$2.35 million. Those contributions were not publicly disclosed by the Clintons, despite an agreement Mrs. Clinton had struck with the Obama White House to publicly identify all donors. Other people with ties to the company made donations as well.

As The Gateway Pundit reported Tuesday evening, Senator Chuck Grassley (R-IA), Chairman of the Judiciary Committee, is currently investigating the Uranium One scandal.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199771,"It’s well known that a lot of people gave up on Donald Trump, they started to hate him even he is the most promising future president of the United States of America.

NASHUA, NH – APRIL 18: Donald Trump speaks at the First in the Nation Republican Leadership Summit April 18, 2015 in Nashua, New Hampshire. The Summit brought together local and national Republicans and was attended by all the Republicans candidates as well as those eyeing a run for the nomination.

But, the question is: will you feel safer when Trump becomes President?

Comment bellow for Yes or No.

Sharing is caring, share this pool with your friends and family who support our next president, Donald Trump!

Will you feel safer when Trump becomes President? YES

NO View Results",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
146319,"The newly elected Chairman of Austria, Sebastian Kurz, has stated that George Soros’ “Open Society” group has exactly 28 days to pack up and get out of Austria once and for all. The 31-year-old is currently the youngest world leader ever. He has explained to his colleagues that they cannot wait",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201394,"Leftist billionaire George Soros tried to buy a U.S. Supreme Court ruling favorable to immigration, new records show. The liberal tycoon’s “Open Society Foundation” orchestrated a massive campaign to influence the Justices to vote favorably in a case regarding Barack Obama’s executive orders on amnesty and immigration. In a memo released by",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199974,"When an Indianapolis man, identified only as Phillip, posted a Donald Trump campaign sign in his front yard, he anticipated some backlash. His concerns turned out to be valid as he said it didn’t take long for someone to try to steal his sign. So Phillip decided to take matters into",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201374,"This morning, The Hill revealed the latest Democrat plan to protest President Donald Trump. The headline to its story on our elected official’s most recent ploy is “Democrats plot protest for Trump’s speech to Congress.” Yes, it appears we have now officially entered into the era of “protest mania” in the United States.

As children we used to whine, whimper, cry, throw tantrums, threaten to “hold my breath until I die!!” when things didn’t go our way. But the adults in the room managed us until we became adults ourselves and outgrew the behavior. Now it seems many adults in America are reverting. Its not a good look.

From the protests outside of Trump rallies that began virtually as soon as he won the Republican nomination, to blocking airports last week, to crybabies rioting on the University of California-Berkeley campus, burning and destroying property last night, “Trump protesting” seems to have become a new national pastime for left. And, now, the supposed “adults in the room,” our elected representatives in Washington, have decided to get in on the act too.

While some elected officials did begin their season of protest last month by refusing to attend the presidential inauguration, it now appears more are poised to hop on the protest bandwagon and focus attention on ways they can protest rather than work for their constituents.

According to The Hill:

House Democrats are rallying behind a plan to make President Trump’s first speech to Congress as uncomfortable as possible by inviting guests they say will suffer under new White House policies.

Some liberals are also eyeing another form of protest during the speech: When Trump walks down the center aisle of the House chamber on the way to the dais, they’re hoping no Democrats scramble to get in the picture for the traditional handshake.

“We have to have a higher standard,” Rep. Luis Gutiérrez (D-Ill.) said.

It’s that spirit of protest the Democrats are hoping to sustain as Trump prepares for his speech to Congress.

Sustaining a spirit of protest? Democrats just aren’t learning, or, simply refuse to accept the reality they are living in. They seem bound and determined to keep the hate and obstructionism alive, and are doing so to their own demise. The American people have spoken. We spoke in 2010 and 2012 when we gave — then kept — Republicans in the majority in the House of Representatives. We, again, spoke in 2014 when we gave Republicans the majority in the Senate. We spoke once more in 2016 when we put Donald Trump in the White House and left both houses of Congress in Republican control.

Democrats can’t seem to figure out they aren’t protesting Donald Trump — they’re protesting the will of the American people. They seem to think, although it didn’t work when they were six, holding their collective breaths until they get their way is going to do the trick this time around.

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201672,"In a bombshell revelation, Chelsea’s NY apartment is the LISTED ADDRESS for a senior health care facility called “Metro Home Services.” Is this a crazy coincidence, or is something more sinister at work? This information was first uncovered on Reddit and later distributed by Info Wars reporter Paul Joseph Watson.

This would explain why Hillary’s team did not want to take her to the hospital and instead went to Chelsea’s apartment, which on the surface seemed very odd. NY Post reported today that Campaign officials did not want to take Hillary to the hospital for fear her “real medical issues” would get out.

Chelsea Clinton's NY Apartment Is Listed Address For A Senior Citizen Care Facility, ""Metrocare Home Services Inc."" https://t.co/DwpeZHSlFG — Paul Joseph Watson (@PrisonPlanet) September 12, 2016

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
202112,"On Thursday, President Obama announced sanctions against Russia for their alleged attempts to interfere with the U.S. presidential elections. And, while President-Elect Trump criticized Obama’s actions, Speaker of the House Paul Ryan supported them. “While today’s action by the administration is overdue, it is an appropriate way to end eight years of failed policy with Russia,” Ryan said.

(via Breitbart) Ryan shares in Trump’s criticism of Obama, there’s no mistaking that. “And it serves as a prime example of this administration’s ineffective foreign policy that has left America weaker in the eyes of the world.” But, on this matter, he seems to be standing against the soon-to-be president. In fact, he has taken the issue to the public. “Russia does not share America’s interests.

In fact, it has consistently sought to undermine them, sowing dangerous instability around the world.” Ryan stated. Trump, on the other hand, basically laughed the sanctions off, as did Russian President Vladimir Putin. Neither seems too worried about Obama’s rhetoric and Putin knows Trump won’t keep the sanctions once in office. Obama also expelled 35 Russian intelligence operatives from US soil, an act unprecedented since the days of the Cold War. Putin responded by saying that the American delegation in Russia was welcome to remain there.

In other words, both Trump and Putin are treating Obama’s action with zero respect and a load of mockery. Putin and Trump both seem to be waiting until January 20 to discuss how their relationship will unfold. Both are alpha males, you might say, who are seeking to make their nation great again. Trump seems to be trying to find some common ground with Putin, which is in everyone’s best interests. This is very different from Obama’s approach, which is to hide from scary leaders and make periodic weak threats. Reagan, you’ll recall, made friends with Gorbachev. Make no mistake, Putin and Russia are as dangerous as the day is long. But, they can also be powerful allies. In any case, the first move has to be diplomacy. Ryan should know that. In my opinion, Ryan should not have gone public with his opposing opinion. He should have given Trump the benefit of the doubt, or talked privately with him.

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200352,"Someone from the Obama administration wiretapped phones in the Trump administration, it was obviously for nefarious purposes, and we are about to find out who! Judicial Watch is on it and is about to find out the answer and when they do there will be some serious questions to be asked",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198314,"It was not that long ago that WikiLeaks dropped the Podesta emails that depicted pedophilia in our very own government. Of course, the mainstream media has done its best to sweep this disgusting crime under the rug. However, there are those out there who determined to root out these perverts. President Trump is one of those people, who announced that he would investigate the elite pedophile scandal, and another is Dr. Phil.

Dr. Phil recently interviewed a former sex slave

by the name of “Kendall” and pushed the topic of elite pedophilia into the mainstream. The account that “Kendall” told millions of people was truly horrific, but Dr. Phil paid a price for telling the truth.

One day after this heinous report aired, a Dutch media company pulled the plug on the Dr. Phil show ending their 15-year partnership. The timing of this happening could not be more suspicious considering the topic that was discussed.

Also, what needs to be considered is the Netherlands history with pedophilia. In 2013, a Dutch court ruled that an abhorrent organization that promotes the legalization of sex between adults and children has the right to continue to promote it.

Then the organization’s founder, Marthijn Uitenboogaard, went on record, saying that society is too overprotective of children.

“A child can see a lot of violence on television, on every cartoon, there’s violence, on movies people get killed,” he explains, “But when Janet Jackson’s breast is shown at the Super Bowl people say: ‘Oh children are watching this.’ Nakedness and everything concerning sexuality is a taboo and violence is the norm. And I think that should be the other way around.” He further believes “almost everyone has pedophile feelings in them. Only the percentage is different, some have more than others.”

Besides that commentary, there have been many high ranking politicians in the Dutch government exposed as pedophiles. Also, recent reports show that worldwide child trafficking is on the rise according to recent statistics from (UNODC) United Nations Office on Drugs and Crime.

It is entirely possible that the Dutch television station desired different programming which is why they canceled the show. However, is it also possible that this was retaliation for reporting on rampant pedophilia rings around the world?

Or this could be just another example of how far these sick individuals will go to keep their depraved secret hidden.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200502,"Hillary Clinton has dismissed as “ridiculous” a charge by Bernie Sanders that she is “unqualified” to be president, as tensions rise in the Democratic race.

The Vermont senator stood by his comments, pointing to her Wall Street links and her vote for the war in Iraq.

He said she started the latest war of words by attacking him first.

The two candidates will do battle in a New York showdown in two weeks, a state where both have strong links.

There is much at stake, as the former secretary of state tries to stem the momentum of the self-described democratic socialist, who has a string of wins behind him.

Mr Sanders beat Mrs Clinton in the Wisconsin primary contest on Tuesday, and could pick up more delegates in Wyoming on Saturday before the greater prize of New York is up for grabs.

READ ALSO: Hillary Just Got The WORST News Of Her Campaign!

Analysis

Is it a sign of desperation from a losing campaign or a proportional response to an earlier unfair attack? Whatever the reason, Bernie Sanders’s recent criticisms of Hillary Clinton as “unqualified” for the presidency represent a marked escalation in the war of words between the two candidates.

Mrs Clinton’s supporters are bristling at the remarks, which they consider both sexist and patently untrue, given the former secretary of state’s weighty political biography.

NEXT PAGE >>>",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199803,"The public park surrounding City Hall in New York City has been “occupied” by radical protesters demanding the resignation of NYC Police Commissioner Bill Bratton, an end to “broken windows” policing and a reallocation of the police budget to minority communities.

A Donald Trump supporter went into the public park wearing a “Make America Great Again” hat and was quickly chased and shoved out of the park by a mob of protesters shouting “racist out” and “fascist out” at him.

Police did not intervene.

Watch:",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200776,"I am somewhat surprised that Bernie Sanders was not true to himself and his supporters. They are not happy that he is selling out! — Donald J. Trump (@realDonaldTrump) July 12, 2016

Bernie Sanders, who has lost most of his leverage, has totally sold out to Crooked Hillary Clinton. He will endorse her today – fans angry! — Donald J. Trump (@realDonaldTrump) July 12, 2016

Trump has tried for some time to court Bernie Sanders supporters and to defend him against Hillary, while at the same time saddling him with the moniker “Crazy Bernie.” Sanders and Trump supporters have more in common than many people might think: anger at establishment politics, a Washington that does not answer to the people, and a growing uncertainty about global trade.

He made a final appeal to disillusioned (former) Bernie supporters:

To all the Bernie voters who want to stop bad trade deals & global special interests, we welcome you with open arms. People first. — Donald J. Trump (@realDonaldTrump) July 12, 2016

No matter what happens, many people have lost all respect for Bernie. While a hard-left socialist, he seemed like an earnest, honest person – a man of his convictions. Now he’s just a sellout.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
146354,"This right here is proof of America’s severely fractured immigration system.

Rosa Ortega, who by the way is illegal Mexican alien, entered America and then voted in our ELECTION system…5 times.

You heard that right.

Ortega, who registered to vote in the state of Texas and 5-different cities, successfully “illegally” cast her vote in 5-different polling places.

The fact that she had the nerve to do this in the first place was disgraceful…but it isn’t the worst part. According to sources, her license (which she shouldn’t have in the first place because she is, indeed, illegal) had a “non-citizen” marker box checked off, and yet she was still allowed to vote in all five cities.

Once the case went public those in charge of the state’s elective process all closed ranks behind one another in condemning Ortega who was sentenced to 8-years in prison. (How nice….)

However, her attorney lamented her sentence was “harsh” and when she’s through serving her sentence, she will be deported back to Mexico.

However it makes you wonder how many others got away with the very same thing. The system is incredibly flawed. It’s time to pick up the pieces.

This 25-second video clip on Fox News chronicles an issue that the mainstream media, along with those progressive politicians in Washington attempt to ignore that America is in disrepair at our borders and now perhaps in our voting booths, in that how many other Ortega’s are out there taking advantage of our broken and fractured immigration system?

There were approximately 11.1 million illegal immigrants in the U.S. in 2014, accounting for 3.5% of the nation’s population. Imagine for a moment if just 10% of those illegal aliens fraudulently voted, you’d have just over 1-million illegal ballots cast within a presidential election.

WATCH:

Perhaps the real reason our progressive friends in Congress refuse to acknowledge voter fraud- It is the only thing that benefits them at the voting booth.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200757,"We are learning that a judge in DC has upheld the right of three states to require proof of citizenship to vote. Here’s more. From Federalist Papers: In a tongue-in-cheek ruling that mocked Obamacare, a federal judge said that requiring voters to show identification at the polls is perfectly constitutional. D.C. Circuit Judge Richard",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201678,"There was a time in this country when, if a prominent member of an administration had done what you’re about to see, people would have been angry. A supposed truth-teller laughing at the concept of transparency from his position behind the State Department podium would have sparked outrage. Sadly, those",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200360,"The Supreme Court cannot stop with surprises. I must admit positive surprises. Once again they made an enormous decision with a 5-4 simple majority vote. Officially they administer that migrants who stay in the USA without legal documents will not have the legal right to sue somebody. This is of course in case they think some of their rights have been violated. Finally, the Supreme Court proved to every American citizen that they would never be treated same as us, Americans and that they represent nothing but one illegal person in here.

via Clear Politics

This means that if an immigrant gets arrested, and he happens not to have the legal document, he can not be able to get a federal or a private lawyer, neither will he be able to get a speedy trial in the USA.

Apparently, they all have the exclusive right to get a bus ride to the state they came from, or to apparently seek a legal citizenship like some other immigrants do. This also implies that the sanctuary cities are not authorized to interfere with the job of the federal agencies or stop them from acting inside the cities and gathering the immigrants for deportation.

Hopefully, the day will come when the liberals will come to acknowledge that America, while Donald Trump is President, the federal government will put the US citizens on the top of the priority list.

The President and his administration never said that other people who come in here represent danger. They are not a direct danger and are welcomed here. He is talking about those people who plan to bomb themselves and blow everything in the air around them. They represent danger and they should never step a foot in here. Please try to understand him; he only wants to protect this nation.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201375,"About a month ago, Otto Warmbier was released by North Korea after over a year of imprisonment and returned to his family in Cincinnati, Ohio.Tragically, unbeknownst to his family, Otto was in a coma which many believe was caused by North Korean torture of some kind.

He died shortly after his return. Today, Secretary of State Rex Tillerson made a move that is likely an effort to dissuade Americans from making the trip that ultimately cost Otto his life.

From NBC News:

American citizens will soon be banned from traveling to North Korea after the U.S. State Department announced on Friday it would be issuing a “geographical travel restriction.”

Heather Nauert, a spokeswoman for the State Department, said a Federal Register notice would be published next week and 30 days after the notice is published, the restriction will become active.

“The safety and security of U.S. citizens overseas is one of our highest priorities,” Nauert said. “Due to mounting concerns over the serious risk of arrest and long-term detention under North Korea’s system of law enforcement, the Secretary has authorized a Geographical Travel Restriction on all U.S. citizen nationals’ use of a passport to travel in, through, or to North Korea.”

Probably a good move.

No need to risk another situation like Warmbier’s and clearly North Korea has no problem snatching up any American that heads over there. Our thoughts and prayers continue to be with the Warmbier family.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201972,"Remember when Obama sat in the Oval office with President Elect Trump and promised a smooth transition of power? HAHA…that was a LIE!

Former Top White House officials just revealed that Obama planted MOLES in the White House to sabatoge Trump after he left. They say he told them to leave a “trail of evidence” that can be used against Trump.

“FORMER WHITE HOUSE OFFICIALS ARE COMING FORWARD WITH CLAIMS THEY WERE SPECIFICALLY TOLD BY OBAMA TO LEAVE A ‘CLEAR TRAIL OF EVIDENCE’ FOR ANY FUTURE GOVERNMENT INVESTIGATIONS. AN INTELLIGENCE OFFICIAL ALSO CONFIRMED THAT IN OBAMA’S LAST DAYS IN OFFICE, OBAMA WAS DETERMINED TO KEEP THE RUSSIA ISSUE ALIVE, CIRCULATING THE DATA AS WIDELY AS POSSIBLE.

The “data” these moles are referring to is STOLEN data that can obtained by wiretapping or spying on Trump and his team! This is SICK! Obama MUST be prosecuted. WATCH this then SHARE on Facebook because the mainstream media won’t cover it!

BOOMS! Former White House officials coming forward with claims they were told by Obama to work against incoming Trump Administration#Vault7 pic.twitter.com/TZz612Utw9 — Pamela Moore (@Pamela_Moore13) March 8, 2017

But it gets even WORSE! Hillary’s campaign manager also just confirmed Trump was wiretapped!! They were all in on it!

Hillary's Campaign Manager Robbie Mook Admits Trump Was Wiretapped CONFIRMS #ObamaGate! #Vault7 pic.twitter.com/CQYqD8Wkks — Pamela Moore (@Pamela_Moore13) March 8, 2017

ARE YOU KIDDING ME?!

NEVER, in the HISTORY of the United States, has an outgoing President worked so hard to undermine the legitimacy of his successor.

Obama is a CRIMINAL.

SHARE SHARE SHARE this all over facebook to help us EXPOSE Obama for the CROOK that he is!",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
146266,"Melania Trump is wonderful and holds herself with such dignity and respect. Today, she gave a very heartfelt speech about the opioid epidemic that has been raping our nation.

Look what was right behind her the whole time. At about 2:30 minutes in she turned and did the incredible.

WATCH: Full @FLOTUS speech on battling the opioid epidemic in the United States . pic.twitter.com/6kCWvMCYuQ — Fox News (@FoxNews) October 26, 2017

The first lady then turned around to kiss a recovering addict and tell her that she is praying for her. God bless our first lady. She is so darn wonderful.

*Help us share this if you think that we have a wonderful first lady and are so proud that she represents our country.

Do you think Melania is better than Michelle? Sound off below. Thanks, patriots.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200906,"the Clinton Foundation starting in 2005 and through 2011. On June 29, 2010, Bill Clinton was paid $$500,000 to speak in Russia by an investment bank with ties to Russia’s government that had a buy rating on Uranium One’s stock.

• In January 2013, despite assurances to the contrary, a subsidiary of Rosatom took over 100% of the company and delisted it from the Toronto Stock Exchange.

• Clinton was required to disclose all of her foundation’s contributors before she became secretary of state, but the Clintons did not disclose millions of dollars donated by the chairman of Uranium One while the review of the deal was ongoing.

“Uranium One’s chairman used his family foundation to make four donations totaling $$2.35 million,” The Times reports. “Those contributions were not publicly disclosed by the Clintons, despite an agreement Mrs. Clinton had struck with the Obama White House to publicly identify all donors. Other people with ties to the company made donations as well.”

The Times’ revelations appear to have originated from reporting in“Clinton Cash,” a forthcoming book by conservative author Peter Schweizer, which was provided to the newspaper for advance reporting. The report said The Times “scrutinized his information and built upon it with its own reporting.”",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200860,"Russian planes bombed a secret U.S. base for elite American and British special operators inside Syria in late June in a bid to pressure the Obama administration to sign a cooperation deal with Russia, The Wall Street Journal reports.

Reports indicate 20 British special operators were on the base just 24 hours before the strikes began. American intelligence officials told WSJ the strikes were part of a larger campaign to pressure President Barack Obama to cooperate with Russian President Vladimir Putin inside Syria. Obama agreed to the deal with Putin in early July.

The deal will entail cooperation between Russia and U.S. intelligence agencies and coordinated air strikes on Syrian rebels classified as terrorists — giving Putin and Assad everything they’ve ever wanted from the U.S. in Syria.

Pentagon officials strongly opposed the deal, believing the Obama administration was being duped by […]

READ MORE ON NEXT PAGE >>>",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201603,Obama Used A Fake Birth Certificate So we all know how much of a fraud Barack Obama was. He did just about everything he possibly could to destroy this country. Obama loved to say that he worked for all Americans and that he was going to bring hope back to the,americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
202193,"According to recent reports, the new Muslim mayor of London has just issued a warning to Donald Trump: either he moderates his stance on Muslims, or they will launch more attacks on America. Trump recently praised Sadiq Khan for winning London’s mayoral race—claiming that he would be willing to create an",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200764,"Barack Obama is going to have help in organizing his opposition to President Donald Trump.Live-in help in his home and it’s not Michelle.

From Daily Mail: Barack Obama is turning his new home in the posh Kalorama section of the nation’s capital – just two miles away from the White House – into the nerve center of the mounting insurgency against his successor, President Donald J. Trump.Obama’s goal, according to a close family friend, is to oust Trump from the presidency either by forcing his resignation or through his impeachment. And Obama is being aided in his political crusade by his longtime consigliere, Valerie Jarrett, who has moved into the 8,200-square-foot, $$5.3-million Kaloroma mansion with the former president and Michelle Obama, long time best friends.

How creepy is that? Here’s another tidbit.Not only did Jarrett get Secret Service protection for virtually the whole time she worked with Obama, she also lived in the White House with the Obama family, according to the Daily Mail. So they’re continuing living together.Obama who has officially been vacationing and traveling is about to be more visible.Eric Holder announced on Tuesday that Obama was getting closer to making his political reappearance. ‘It’s coming. He’s coming,’ Holder said speaking to reporters. ‘And he’s ready to roll.’According to the Daily Mail, despite Obama being “weary and burned out” after 8 years in office, Valerie Jarrett encouraged him to oppose Trump to preserve his legacy.Obama actually supported protests over Trump’s travel bam.

In his only public comment against Trump since leaving the presidency, Obama came out in support of the protests opposing President Donald Trump’s executive order to restrict immigration from predominantly Muslim countries.A spokesman said the former president thinks they’re ‘citizens exercising their Constitutional right to assemble, organize and have their voices heard by their elected officials is exactly what we expect to see when American values are at stake.’According to the Daily Mail’s source on Jarrett, ‘Obama trusts her judgment more than any other person on the planet, as does Michelle. Obama doesn’t make a decision without her.’Apparently that even extends to the house the three will share.‘Michelle and Valerie have changed their minds many times over about colors, carpets, wall paper, furnishing and art,’ said the source.According to the source, Michelle and Valerie have big plans for traveling and shopping as well as strategizing over Trump.‘They feel like they have had some great trips while in the White House, but were always working and being herded around,’ said the source. ‘Now they are planning to travel together – home to Chicago, to Paris and Shanghai, and shop to their heart’s content.

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
202220,"President Trump was not bluffing or using talking points when he insisted that we were going to ban Muslims from entering the United States without being properly vetted as well as ending Obama’s disastrous Syrian refugee program.

In doing so, Obama’s top ally in London — Muslim mayor Sadiq Khan — has issued a warning to Donald Trump. Khan indicated that if Trump did not moderate his stance on Muslims, they will launch more attacks against America.

Khan has some serious and troublesome history some of which includes his defense of Islamist extremist Azzam Tamimi, and his platform-sharing with Suliman Gani, a south London imam who has urged female subservience to men, and called for the founding of an Islamic state.

He is nothing more than a Muslim jihadi sympathizer that is trying to tell President Trump how to handle Muslims in America.

Under Obama, ignorant comments like that would have been accepted under our weak leadership.

Under President Trump, we will not allow anyone to dictate what we do and how we do it in the United States. We certainly will not allow Sharia law practicing Muslims to dictate anything.

The only real solution is probably an all out war against Islam. Given that Muslims are progressively becoming a major threat to the entire world, we should wipe them off the Earth for good this time. 1400 years of this criminal cult is too much.

Is Khan a direct threat to the United States given he told Trump more attacks will follow if he does not accept Muslims?",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200263,"George W. Bush refused to comment publicly on Barack Obama’s presidency, and we never heard any criticism come out of his mouth.

With Donald Trump as the president now, would Obama uphold the precedent set by Bush? He said in November that he wouldn’t criticize Trump, unless he felt that the Trump administration was “attacking American values.”

And as if on cue, not one week after leaving office, Obama said he was “heartened” by the anti-travel ban protesters.

While one could argue whether this was open criticism, it gives some insight into what Obama has planned, and it’s downright unnerving. Seems B. Hussein is going right back to his community-organizing roots…with a vengeance.

As the New York Post reported:

He’s doing it through a network of leftist nonprofits led by Organizing for Action. Normally you’d expect an organization set up to support a politician and his agenda to close up shop after that candidate leaves office, but not Obama’s OFA. Rather, it’s gearing up for battle, with a growing war chest and more than 250 offices across the country.

Since Donald Trump’s election, this little-known but well-funded protesting arm has beefed up staff and ramped up recruitment of young liberal activists, declaring on its website, “We’re not backing down.” Determined to salvage Obama’s legacy,”it’s drawing battle lines on immigration, Obamacare, race relations and climate change.

Obama is intimately involved in […]

READ MORE ON NEXT PAGE >>>",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200588,"Sheriff David Clarke wants to know what the cop-hater-in-chief thinks about the Dallas shootings that saw five police officers lose their lives in Dallas last night. Here are his thoughts… As usual, Clarke is right on the money. Obama and Hillary Clinton exploit for their own personal gain. All those who have backed Black",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200870,"One of President Donald Trump’s attorneys went on live television on Sunday to say that the president is not under investigation. This came as a surprise, given Trump’s tweets about a “witch hunt” last week. “Let me be clear here,” Jay Sekulow, a member of the president’s legal team, told NBC",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200719,"Corrupt To The CORE! Comey Not Just Scared of Trump. Hillary and Loretta had him on a Short Leash!

What goes around comes around. It looks like the contrived Trump “Russian collusion” narrative is coming back to bite all the crooked players in their butts. If the special investigation into “Russia” moves forward, it looks like they will uncover more and more dirt on Barack Obama, Hillary Clinton, Loretta Lynch and James Comey. Obama’s administration was corrupt to the core and it all seems to be coming to light. It looks like the Democrats insistence on pressing the phony Russian scandal might have backfired big time.

When former FBI Director James Comey testified before Congress, Comey admitted that he was afraid to be in a room alone with President Trump, was afraid of then Attorney General, Loretta Lynch, and that he felt “cowardly”.

New information has come to light regarding the situation between Comey and Loretta Lynch. In his original public testimony before Congress, Comey revealed that Lynch had instructed him to refer to the ongoing investigation into Hillary Clinton as a “matter” instead of an investigation. Now CIRCA is reporting that Comey had evidence that Loretta Lynch was in cahoots with the Hillary Clinton Presidential campaign and was attempting to block or quash the FBI investigation into Hillary Clinton. This presumably comes from a leak from the closed Congressional session with Comey.

A.G. Lynch made law enforcement decisions for political purposes…gave Hillary Clinton a free pass and protection. Totally illegal! — Donald J. Trump (@realDonaldTrump) June 13, 2017

According to circa:

Comey told lawmakers in the close door session that he raised his concern with the attorney general that she had created a conflict of interest by meeting with Clinton’s husband, the former President Bill Clinton, on an airport tarmac while the investigation was ongoing. During the conversation, Comey told lawmakers he confronted Lynch with a highly sensitive piece of evidence, a communication between two political figures that suggested Lynch had agreed to put the kibosh on any prosecution of Clinton.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200398,"Clinton Foundation Advised World Bank on Contracts That Netted Donors Millions

Foundation’s drug company contributors got majority of funds from tuberculosis program

Drug companies that have donated to Hillary Clinton’s foundation received most of the contract money from an international tuberculosis initiative after the foundation was brought on to manage the initiative’s procurement operation, public records show.

Two of every three dollars spent acquiring anti-tuberculosis drugs through the program, which is administered by the World Bank, have gone to two companies—Swiss health care giant Novartis and Indian drug company Lupin Ltd.—that together have donated up to $$130,000 to the Clinton Foundation.

Clinton and her allies have pointed to the foundation’s international charitable work to deflect allegations of cronyism. However, the millions of dollars in contracts awarded to the two drug companies illustrate how foundation donors profited from laudable causes.

“The Clinton Foundation is providing technical support to the program through the Clinton Health Access Initiative (CHAI), focusing on anti-TB drug procurement, markets, and quality, particularly multi-drug-resistant TB (MDR-TB) drugs,” the World Bank wrote in a 2013 report.

Another section of the report said the Clinton Foundation worked on “anti-TB drug quality and pricing.”

The World Bank collaborated with the Clinton Foundation from “2006 to date,” the report said. The project focused on reducing the incidence of TB in India, where the disease kills hundreds of thousands of people each year.

The project, dubbed the Second National Tuberculosis Control Project (SNTCP), is financed by […]

READ MORE ON NEXT PAGE >>>",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201955,"We are facing a new trend among liberal celebrities… they just love and enjoy attacking our First Family. It’s not suprising that Debra Messing, the “Will & Grace” star directly addressed first daughter Ivanka Trump on Saturday night while being honored at the 2017 GLAAD Media Awards in New York",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200875,"CIUDAD DE MEXICO (AP) — Treasury Minister Luis Videgaray has resigned, a ministry spokeswoman said Wednesday, the week after Donald Trump traveled to Mexico to meet with President Ernesto Pena Nieto.

Treasury ministry spokeswoman Claudia Algorri said that Videgaray presented his resignation to Pena Nieto on Wednesday.

Algorri gave no reason for the resignation, but it comes in the wake of Pena Nieto’s widely criticized meeting with the Republican presidential candidate in the Mexican capital last week.

The president’s office announced earlier Wednesday that Pena Nieto would have a message later in the day about a change in his government.

Pena Nieto has faced a truckload of criticism after Trump’s visit, with many Mexicans complaining that the president was poorly advised by the people around him.

The Mexican president and Trump later offered different accounts of what transpired during their meetings.

Trump has pledged to build a wall along the two countries’ border — and make Mexico pay for it.

The wall proposal has been criticized widely and fiercely in Mexico.

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201691,"The Obamas stand to make nearly $$45 million from lucrative book deals after leaving the White House, the New York Times estimated Monday.

Literary agents and major publishers guessed that Barack and Michelle Obama could make $$20 to $$45 million from book deals after January — more than enough to finance the couple’s post-presidency life and their $$22,000 monthly rent for a swanky mansion in the North West neighborhood of D.C.

“His is going to be easily the most valuable presidential memoir ever,” Raphael Sagalyn — from the ICM/Sagalyn Literary Agency — said. “And I think Michelle Obama has the opportunity to sell the most valuable first lady memoir in history.”

Sagalyn estimated that Obama could make $$30 million with a two or three book contract.

“You’re going to sell a lot of books when you first publish Obama’s memoir, but you could also sell a lot to your children’s children,” David Black, a New York literary agent, also said.

“That doesn’t happen all that often, but because this guy’s a real writer, it has a good chance.”

The White House declined to comment on the president’s potential earnings.

“There will be plenty of time post-presidency to discuss books and book contracts, but for now the focus of the president and first lady is on squeezing every last ounce of progress out of the next five months,” Jen Psaki, the White House communications director, told the Times.

Obama has written four books already.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200501,"CNN is the pinnacle of “fake news”. We have watched them lie and mislead the public for years, and now they have taken it too far. According to Dennis Michael Lynch, Jeffery Toobin, a “senior legal analyst” for CNN, said after Comey’s opening testimony before the Senate, “Comey’s statement establishes obstruction of justice by Trump. Period.” I guess he is going to ignore the part where Comey explicitly said that Trump did NOT obstruct justice — what was that about “alternative facts”?

Toobin formulated his accusation around a section of Comey’s opening that explained Trump asked for “loyalty” from Comey. Comey also stated that Trump “encouraged” him to drop the investigation around Flynn. If you take these points and think about them logically, there are MANY ways they can be viewed that DO NOT show obstruction of justice — regardless of Comey’s clear explanation that they weren’t. Maybe when Trump asked for his loyalty, he was merely asking Comey not to bend to the will of the Left. In this case, Comey ADMITTED that he took Loretta Lynch’s advice and decided to cover up the Hillary scandal, which was absolutely disloyal to Trump and, more importantly, the law.

Trump did not want Comey to lie for him; he just wanted him to be straightforward and work for the American people. Toobin was taking the definition of “loyalty” that the Left — or the Mafia — uses. In other words, lie away all of your problems. Not everyone acts the way that liberals do. Maybe Toobin missed that important memo. Someone needs to let him know that you do not have to lie and mislead people to be loyal to them. The remarks involving the investigation into Flynn can be examined carefully and figured out, too. Trump was asking Comey to let the case with Flynn go because it was unwarranted. There was never any sign that something malicious was happening, so why bother dragging it out?

Left-wing media outlets WANTED to drag the scenario with Flynn around, and Trump wanted it to stop because there was no evidence of any wrong-doing. It isn’t a hard concept to grasp. Instead of taking the words that Comey said and examining them under a unbiased microscope, Toobin took them and put a nice little liberal filter over them. We have heard all of these claims that the Right is coming up with “fake news” and “alternative facts,” but the only groups that have been exposed are on the Left! We NEED a massive overhaul in the mainstream media sphere. It is not a crime to have differing opinions, despite what the Left says, BUT there have to be some standards. The media should not be able to come out, lie, make baseless claims, then accuse other news organizations and our president of being dishonest. It is a big joke, and they should NOT be allowed to continue this behavior. The MSM is doing a tremendous disservice to our country, and the Patriots of this country know it.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200828,"Fox News host Judge Jeanine Pirro is a former county court and district attorney for Westchester County who has had enough of Barack Obama and Hillary Clinton’s nonsense. This week, she spoke out to downplay the possibility of presumptive Democratic presidential nominee Hillary Clinton being indicted for her use of a",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198073,"On Thursday, the State Department has released what appears to be an email exchange between defeated Democrat presidential nominee Hillary Clinton and Huma Abedin, alleging that Clinton’s private email server was used to send classified information.

Political commentators said that the email exchange would be damning and damaging to the former Secretary of State. The Judicial Watch has also released some 323 pages of the Department of State documents. Included in the documents were the previously unreleased email of both Clinton and Abedin. According to Freedom of Information Act (FOIA) exemptions cited in the documents obtained by Judicial Watch, three of the Clinton-Abedin email exchanges contained material “classified to protect national security.”

According to Judicial Watch: “Also included in the newly obtained documents is an additional instance of the State Department doing special favors for a high-dollar Clinton Foundation donor. And the documents include instances of the distribution by State Department officials of Clinton’s government schedule to members of the Clinton Foundation staff.

The documents contain not previously turned over to the State Department, bringing the known total to date of such emails uncovered by Judicial Watch to 238 new Clinton emails (not part of the 55,000 pages of emails that Clinton turned over to the State Department). These records further appear to contradict statements by Clinton that, “as far as she knew,” all of her government emails were turned over to the State Department.”

Apart from this, the documents also include an exchange between Abedin, Clinton personal assistant Lauren Jiloty, and Iris Anaya, the assistant to sugar magnate and Clinton Foundation donor Alfonso Fanjul concerning a request for special access to Clinton. The report added that the emails also include on October 13, 2009 which Anaya emailed Abedin seeking to arrange a meeting between Fanjul, the CEO of Florida Crystals, and Clinton.

“In an October 26, 2009, email exchange, power attorney and Hillary Clinton financial supporter, Charlie Ann Syprett, contacted Doug Band, apparently seeking help in getting around U.S. Office of Foreign Asset Control (OFAC) restrictions on U.S. citizens’ ability to travel to Cuba.

Syprett ostensibly wanted a waiver from the restrictions to enable people from her organization, SYC Charitable Foundation, to travel to Cuba, noting “we are not asking for something out of the ordinary,” the report said.

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201831,"Hungarian President Mihály Orbán gave a very “pro-West” Christmas message that insists the EU needs a YUGE upheaval. Orban also praised Trump’s victory as the start of a new revolt in 2017. From Gateway Pundit: He said: “It is unprecedented that in the heart of Europe, Christians were murdered at Christmas.“It’s clear that,",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
146410,"It looks like Bannon’s time is up. The conservative hero and former head of Breitbart.com has been shown the door.

It looks like that rumor just became a reality:

President Trump has decided to remove adviser Stephen K. Bannon from the White House, the New York Times is reporting.

In recent weeks, the president has openly mused about dismissing his controversial campaign architect.

Jonathan Swan of Axios noted this morning broke the news:

A decision is imminent from White House chief of staff John Kelly on whether Steve Bannon will keep his job, according to administration officials with knowledge of the situation: Bannon, who has run afoul of Trump in the past, is now suspected by the president of leaking about his West Wing colleagues. And Trump resents the publicity Bannon has been getting as mastermind of the campaign.

Many West Wing officials are now asking “when,” not “if,” Bannon goes.

Chief of Staff General John Kelly has been reviewing Bannon’s position.

A recent deluge of media coverage of Bannon — including Bannon’s explosive conversation with the American Prospect — have not escaped either the president’s or Kelly’s attention. One White House source twists the knife: “His departure may seem turbulent in the media, but inside it will be very smooth. He has no projects or responsibilities to hand off.”

This is not an unexpected turn of events. Just this week, Bannon gave an unsanctioned interview to a liberal publication, trashing his White House colleagues.

Bannon has been accused by former White House Communications Director Anthony Scaramucci of leaking information to the press. And now that Attorney General Jeff Sessions is cracking down hard on leaks, Bannon may be in the crossfire.

Bannon is fired. Considering his role in developing Trump’s conservative, populist brand, this firing is perhaps the biggest shakeup yet in the Trump White House.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
146412,"Press Secretary Sarah Huckabee Sanders held an on-camera White House press briefing Wednesday.

Sarah Huckabee is not that kind of a girl who will just stand there and listen to the liberal media constant attacks! No, she did something that made us all proud of her!

During her press briefing as White House press secretary, Sarah Huckabee Sanders got emotional while reading a letter sent to President Donald Trump at The White House press briefing Thursday.

Sanders read a story of a man named Joseph who sent a letter to his son almost 10 years ago while he was serving for the U.S. military in Iraq. Joseph’s son followed his father’s footsteps, also joining the military, and he is currently on his second tour of duty in Afghanistan.

In his letter to his son, Joseph wrote:

Please don’t lose sight of your purpose. You’re the only hope and glimmer of light for the good, innocent, men, women, and children that you are protecting. This may be hard for you to see or understand most of you know people know that most of you are there because you volunteered to be there.

Your actions and dedication are seen by people throughout the world as, without a doubt, the most heroic action of any person which can be made. You and the soldiers standing next to you from all of the other countries are the pride of not only the nations they represent but every individual that yearns to be free.

Stand tall, my son, and be steadfast, for it is you who are the defender of freedom. We owe it to the servicemen and women like the master sergeant who have fought in our name in Afghanistan for 17 years and to the families who have watched them go to secure an honorable and lasting outcome to this conflict.

Joseph told Trump that he had been a police officer for over 30 years. Sanders said Joseph sent the letter he wrote to his son ten years ago in hopes the president would receive and read the letter.

I’m glad to say that he did earlier today,” Sanders said. (video below)",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201058,"Todd Rundgren is best known for his hit “Hello, It’s Me”.

Great song.

However, after you hear what he just said about Trump supporters, you might feel a little different about it.

From Breitbart: Todd Rundgren isn’t bothered that some of his fans might avoid his concerts due to his politics. The 68-year-old musician and record producer conceded as much in an interview with Variety when asked about an incident in which a couple walked out of a concert in Los Angeles due to comments he made about President Donald Trump. “No,” Rundgren said when asked if it bothered him. “If I had the power, I’d say: If you’re a Trump supporter, don’t come to my show, because you won’t have a good time. And also, I don’t understand your frickin’ values. Because I’m not singing about that. If you don’t understand that basic thing, you’re just fooling yourself.”

Gee, what a guy. Apparently, Rundgren doesn’t have time for anyone who disagrees with his politics. That’s pretty typical of liberals these days. Never a good idea to alienate half of your fan base. Not sure why these artists and celebrities keep doing it.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200231,"Just one day after the worst mass shooting in U.S. history at a gay night club in Orlando, Florida, by a radicalized Muslim gunman that claimed the lives of 49 people, a Muslim woman was caught on video making terrorist threats and trashing homosexuals.

The woman was being detained by police at Los Angeles International Airport when video journalist Tony Vera began recording the incident. It’s not clear why she was stopped, but after police searched the woman and went thorough her luggage, she was released.

As she walked by, Vera asked the woman what happened. But instead of explaining why police had stopped her, she instead became very belligerent, singling out “lesbians and gays.”

“F*** America,” she said, raising both middle fingers. “I will make sure we bomb America. You wait and see!”

She continued her rant for several minutes and then proceeded to the ticket counter, where police show up again and appear to arrest her.

Her rant begins at the 7:10-minute mark of the video below:",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200412,"Homeland Security seems to be having a hard time lately.

The Orlando shooter was a contracted worker for the department and they apparently checked him out and came up with no reason not to hire him.

Now we are learning that an employee of the department just got caught plotting an attack against Washington D.C.

Oh, and he had a top-secret security clearance.

From Townhall:

A man who works for Homeland Security was arrested earlier this month after allegedly planning an attack on headquarters in Washington D.C. From ABC News:

Federal prosecutors are investigating whether a Department of Homeland Security employee with top-secret clearance was planning an attack at the agency’s Washington headquarters when he entered the building with a gun, a knife, an infrared camera, pepper spray and handcuffs.

Jonathan Wienke, and analyst in the Office of Intelligence and Analysis, allegedly carried the weapons into the building on the morning of June 9. Court documents filed by the federal government state that investigators have probable cause to believe Wienke “was conspiring with another to commit workplace violence, and more particularly may have been conspiring or planning to commit violence against senior DHS officials in the building.”

In his affidavit for a search warrant, Department of Homeland Security Special Agent Eric Mann listed the potential crimes as attempt and conspiracy to assassinate, kidnap or assault a member of the executive branch of the government, false impersonation of a federal officer and possession of a firearm in a federal facility.

Well that’s nice!

It’s good to see that the DHS really has their act together when it comes to vetting their employees.

But don’t worry, the government can properly vet the thousands of Syrian refugees that Obama wants to let into the country.

It is impossible to ignore the reality that government is just way too big.

It can’t do anything right.

How many more awful things need to happen before people start to get that?",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201897,"Senator Marco Rubio was very impressed today with the questioning of former FBI Director James Comey. Here is what Marco Rubio had to say to James Comey: “With Only One Sentence Marco Rubio Just Took Down James Comey And His Lies About Trump.” Watch what happened next.

MIC DROP for Marco. This was an impressive line of questioning that he held to the former FBI Director James Comey. James Comey has stirred the press to misrepresent the President. This guy is a liability to this nation and Trump was so right to fire him. Watch the full slaughtering below.

This proves that Trump is totally innocent. Do you hear that Democrats? Trump is innocent. He was never under any investigation. With Comey admitting that he leaked to the press through a friend.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200267,"No child should be subjected to what little Barron Trump just had to go through. He saw the photo of Kathy Griffin holding the mock decapitated bloodied head of his father on TV. He thought it was real and panicked and screamed. What child wouldn’t?

If it were me, I’d sue that moonbat into freaking oblivion over that alone. No apology in the world will ever make this right for Barron… or the Trumps in general for that matter. Griffin was semi-fired from CNN this morning over this. She’ll no longer be doing their New Year’s show. But what should really happen is she should be terminated with extreme prejudice and never work again over this stunt.

I don’t consider Griffin’s apology to be sincere. I think she had all of this planned out and that was part of it. She has no morals, ethics or a soul for that matter. Just vile. However, it does win points with ISIS, I’m sure. President Trump did not immediately fire off a response. He did tweet this morning that Griffin should be ashamed of herself and she should be… but she’s not. Barron was in front of the TV watching a show when the news came on and he saw the bloody, beheaded image. He screamed, “Mommy, Mommy!” That just breaks my heart.

From The Daily Wire:

On Wednesday morning, President Trump responded to the “sick” stunt by CNN employee Kathy Griffin in which the comedienne had herself photographed holding up a mock-up of Trump’s severed, bloody head. After Trump’s tweet blasting Griffin’s tasteless stunt, TMZ reported that Trump’s 11-year-old son Barron Trump saw the image on the television and “panicked and screamed.”

Griffin initially doubled down on the over-the-top image of her with Trump’s decapitated head, using the threadbare excuse that it was just “art,” but after her fellow leftists — including some of her colleagues at CNN and the Heiress to the Throne of Clinton — began to turn on her, she issued a contrite apology on Tuesday (video below).

Showing unusual restraint for someone famous for his rapid-fire Twitter reactions, Trump finally responded to the horrific attempt at humor Wednesday morning, writing, “Kathy Griffin should be ashamed of herself. My children, especially my 11 year old son, Barron, are having a hard time with this. Sick!”

Donald Trump Jr. responded to Griffin’s “disgusting” act Tuesday afternoon, citing it as an example of how extreme the Left has become. “Disgusting but not surprising. This is the left today. They consider this acceptable. Imagine a conservative did this to Obama as POTUS?” he wrote. They have pulled other stunts against Trump’s grandchildren as well. The left screamed that the Obama girls should be off limits, but they have not honored that at all with the Trump family.

Originally, Griffin did not apologize, but doubled down claiming it was edgy ‘art’. According to New York Magazine contributing writer Yashar Ali, “She said, unapologetically, that the image of her that’s gone viral is an expression of art. She believes Trump is doing tremendous damage to the country + the world and she wanted the art to reflect the seriousness of his impact. She said they were putting together a Trump mask and that led her to think of Trump’s infamous statement early on in the primary. The ‘blood coming out of her eyes, blood coming out of her ears, blood coming out of her wherever’ statement. She also said she does not condone any violence, that provocative art should remain just that: art. She does not want life to imitate art.” But what she did was incitement to violence and a call to kill the President. And his little boy got to see it up close and personal. It’s unforgivable.

Kathy Griffin should be ashamed of herself. My children, especially my 11 year old son, Barron, are having a hard time with this. Sick! — Donald J. Trump (@realDonaldTrump) May 31, 2017

Disgusting but not surprising. This is the left today. They consider this acceptable. Imagine a conservative did this to Obama as POTUS? https://t.co/QdghcbIjS7 — Donald Trump Jr. (@DonaldJTrumpJr) May 30, 2017

CNN spox on Griffin: ""We found what she did disgusting and offensive. We are pleased to see she has apologized”; NYE special being evaluated pic.twitter.com/eCWbEz5v7G — Oliver Darcy (@oliverdarcy) May 31, 2017

I am sorry. I went too far. I was wrong. pic.twitter.com/LBKvqf9xFB — Kathy Griffin (@kathygriffin) May 30, 2017

On it! @SecretService has a robust protective intelligence division that monitors open source reporting & social media to evaluate threats — U.S. Secret Service (@SecretService) May 30, 2017",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
202138,"Earlier today a shooting took place on the UCLA campus involving a student and a professor. Now, another shooting has just occurred in California. This one involves two police officers being shot. From Weasel Zippers via ABC 7 News: Fremont police are reporting that two cops have been transported with injuries following an officer-involved",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201054,"A stunning Ministry of Foreign Affairs (MoFA) report circulating in the Kremlin today says that Foreign Minister Sergey Lavrov was assured by US Secretary of State John Kerry this past week that should Hillary Clinton be elected as the next American president, the US Congress would begin immediate impeachment proceedings",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201290,"The Hillary Clinton campaign issued a ridiculous response to a bombshell report that linked her top aide, Huma Abedin, to a radical Muslim publication run by her mother. It was reported yesterday by the New York Post that Abedin was assistant editor for the Journal of Muslim Minority Affairs where her mother, Saleha Mahmood Abedin, remains editor-in-chief to this day. Hillary’s Huma Abedin was assistant editor of radical Muslim journal that blamed US for 9/11.

“My understanding is that her name was simply listed on the masthead in that period,” Clinton spokesman Nick Merrill told the New York Post on Sunday evening after the campaign ignored repeated requests to respond. “She did not play a role in editing at the publication.” The news is particularly damaging for a campaign that prides itself as being a champion of women’s and LGBT right as the Journal produced articles that promoted the subjugation of women, said single mothers, working mothers and gay couples with children shouldn’t be considered families and suggested women who dress proactively are partially responsible if they are raped.

But the most damaging article from the publication came in 2002, when Huma Abedin was listed as assistant editor, in which it blamed the United States for causing the terror attacks of 9/11 because of “injustices” it committed in the Muslim world, including sanctions against Saddam Hussein’s regime in Iraq.

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201093,"CNN had a really hard time in 2016.They made the calculated decision to give up on journalistic integrity in favor of stopping Donald Trump.It didn’t work out very well for them.Now, they are stuck with a Donald Trump presidency and zero credibility.You would think they would show some self-awareness and move to the center.Nah.Check out the claim they made about their inauguration day ratings. From Newsbusters:

CNN’s public relations team responded with its own tweet, citing cumulative numbers from Nielsen Media Research. “According to Nielsen cumulative numbers, 34 million people watched CNN’s inauguration day coverage on television. 34 million watched Fox News.” Darcy reported that was retweeted thousands of times and became the basis of several news stories.

The problem? Ad agencies and network executives don’t look much at cumulative numbers (and even so, Fox still beat CNN narrowly in those. It was not a tie.) “It’s a factual statistic, but I literally never used cumulative ratings once when I edited TVNewser,” Brian Flood, a media reporter at TheWrap, told Darcy in an email. “Not once.”When TVNewser and most media websites report are hourly or program numbers. Fox trounced CNN in the midst of the festivities:

Noon to 12:30 PM (oath of office and inaugural address): —CNN: 3.375 million total viewers

Fox News: 11.768 million total viewers

11 AM to 1 PM— CNN: 3.047 million total viewers

Fox News: 10.483 million total viewers

1 to 5 PM— CNN: 2.326 million total viewers

Fox News: 7.901 million total viewers

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200334,"During a rally in Melbourne, Florida, Donald Trump referenced Sweden when discussing the out of control “migrant situation” in Europe.

Immediately, our nations FAKE NEWS jumped into high gear and began slamming President Trump, claiming he “misspoke” about Sweden, because, according to them, everything in Sweden is peachy-keen. However, as usual, Trump was right, and the dishonest liberal media was wrong.

Countless Swedish citizens have come forward with FACTS to back up President Trump’s claims, including this journalist who says, “Trump was right.”

Watch the video:

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199635,"#NeverTrump is falling apart. What once was a strong group of so-called “Republicans” bent on defeating Donald Trump has slowly crumbled as more and more jump on-board the #TrumpTrain. This latest defection has NeverTrump in full on panic mode! Via Breitbart: Rebuilding America Now, a new Super PAC that backs presumptive Republican nominee",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
202045,"Oh, the White House was built by slaves Michelle? You mean US taxpayers… I know, sometimes it’s hard to tell the difference, it confuses us too. There’s just one big problem with her statement, which has also been echoed by her husband: it’s not entirely true. But don’t expect the media",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198492,"Pope Francis made confession that 1 in 50 priests, including top ranking Vatican officials sometimes rape children. Can you imagine how easily he said that his colleagues are pedophiles.

According to the Pontiff, although acts of pedophilia should be seen as a “grave sin,” Catholics should remember that forgiving people of their sins is their duty to God. A recent investigation by an Australian inquiry uncovered evidence that the Pope may be grossly underestimating the real number of priests who abuse children. According to the Australian commission, 1 in 14 priests are likely to be pedophiles.

The commission also discovered evidence of “witness intimidation” against alleged victims.Daily Mail reports: While Pope Francis has carried out sweeping reforms to the Vatican, he has been accused of not doing enough to tackle the child abuse crisis.In his interview, Francis was quoted as saying: ‘The Church is fighting for the eradication of the habit and for education that rehabilitates.‘But this leprosy is also present in our house. Many of my colleagues who are working against it tell me that paedophilia inside the Church is at the level of 2 per cent.’

He said that the figures supplied by Church officials were supposed to reassure him, but added: ‘But I have to say that they do not reassure me by any means.‘On the contrary, I find them deeply concerning. Among the 2 per cent who are paedophiles are even bishops and cardinals.’Last night Vatican spokesman Father Federico Lombardi said the newspaper’s report had ‘captured the spirit’ of the conversation, but denied that Francis had said there are some cardinals who are paedophiles.

In his interview, the Pope acknowledged that paedophilia was common and widespread in the Catholic Church, and reportedly called the requirement for celibacy among priests ‘a problem’ for which he is ‘finding the solution’ – although the Vatican also denied that he said this.Last week Pope Francis issued his strongest words on paedophile priests so far as he held a historic three-hour meeting with six abuse victims, including two from Britain and two from Ireland.

In a mass before the meeting, he begged abuse survivors for forgiveness for the ‘sacrilegious’ crimes committed by ‘the sons and daughters of the Church who have betrayed their mission’.

British abuse victim Peter Saunders, 57, who was molested for more than five years by two priests, a teacher and a member of his family from the age of eight, described the experience as ‘life-changing’.The first cases of abuse at the hands of priests came to light in the US and Canada in the 1980s. In the 1990s, revelations began to emerge of widespread abuse in Ireland, before cases were exposed in more than a dozen countries in the last decade.In 2009, two damning reports into allegations of paedophilia in Ireland revealed the extent of cover-ups spanned decades and involved thousands of victims.

Last week the Pope said the Catholic Church had been guilty of ‘complicity’ in covering up what he called ‘despicable actions’ and ‘grave sins’.He said members of the Catholic Church should ‘weep before the execrable acts of abuse which have left life-long scars’.

H/T: Your News Wire",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
146407,"We all know that it’s time Robert Mueller to go!

According to: truthfeed

This man isn’t an unbiased investigator at all.

He’s a Deep State shill, hell-bent on destroying President Trump by any means necessary.

Mueller is investigating a debunked narrative that President Trump colluded with Russia to “steal” the 2016 election from Hillary Clinton.

It’s literally laughable.

President Trump’s supporters are CRYING OUT for him to fire Mueller.

However, Democrat Senators, like Christopher Coons are threatening to rehire Mueller if President Trump fires him.

From The Hill

Sen. Christopher Coons (D-Del.) issued a stark warning to President Trump on Sunday, saying firing special counsel Robert Mueller would cross a line and spur bipartisan pushback in the Senate.

“I think if the president should fire Robert Mueller abruptly, that would be crossing a big line, and I think you would be seeing strong bipartisan action from the Senate which might include our reinstating him or our hiring him to continue to conduct that investigation on behalf of Congress,” Coons said on “ABC This Week.”

Coon’s comments come after he and Sen. Thom Tillis (R-N.C.) introduced bipartisan legislation dubbed the Special Counsel Integrity Act that would allow Mueller or any special counsel to challenge their hypothetical firing in court.

Sens. Cory Booker (D-N.J.) and Lindsey Graham (R-S.C.) are working on separate legislation that would hinder the president’s ability to fire Mueller.

Trump has repeatedly lashed out at Mueller throughout the investigation into Russian election interference, accusing the special counsel of having conflicts of interest.

The federal probe includes scrutiny of Trump administration officials who met with Russians during the 2016 presidential campaign.

The president told The New York Times that he had done nothing wrong and “a special counsel should never have been appointed in this case.”

Trump’s lawyer Jay Sekulow has publicly suggested the president could fire Mueller if he saw fit.

“The president has authority to take action,” Sekulow told ABC News. “Whether he would do it is ultimately a decision the president makes.”

Do you support Trump in Firing Mueller? #Share your comments below because we want to hear your voice!

Thank you for reading.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201741,"A woman who claims to have been sexually harassed by Fox News’s Eric Bolling has spoken out.

According to her website:

Dr. Caroline is an associate Professor of Politics at Occidental College in Los Angeles and the research director for the Geena Davis Institute for Gender in Media. Her research specializes in media, the presidency, and systems of power (race, class, gender)

She posted the following on her Facebook:",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201098,"CNN’s White House Correspondent, Jim Acosta who is known for his theatrical childish outbursts during press briefings, took things to another level Thursday when he attempted to argue with President Trump’s senior policy advisor, Stephen Miller, over a new Republican-backed bill which reduces legal immigration.

It turns out Acosta’s fellow colleagues at CNN are even fed up with his antics. One of his colleagues accused Acosta of angling to host an opinion show on the network. Acosta was back at it on Friday. The fake news reporter was furious after President Trump would not answer his questions while boarding a military helicopter.

Trump ignores shouted questions on Mueller and grand jury as he departs for Bedminster pic.twitter.com/jB7mcbjmfu — Jim Acosta (@Acosta) August 4, 2017

As /pol/ reported, “Jim Acosta had a temper tantrum because President Trump wasn’t able to hear his dumb questions over the sound of a military helicopter.”",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201246,"Black Lives Matter co-founder Marissa Jeanae Johnson is under fire after making some seriously racist remarks in an interview with Fox News.

According to reports, Johnson commented that white people need to “sacrifice” themselves in order blacks to be equal in society.

“What it’s gonna take to dismantle white supremacy is white folks actually gotta give up something,” she claimed. “You have to actually sacrifice yourself. You have to be willing to give up the things that you currently benefit from.”

This attitude is exactly the type of thinking that escalates racial tensions in this country. This is not a zero-sum game. One person does not have to worsen their lives in order to improve the lives of others.

As if that weren’t bad enough, Johnson then went on to blame America for the Black Lives Matter movement.

“White Americans have created the conditions that require a phrase like ‘Black Lives Matter,’” she told reporters. “Do you know how horrific it is to grow up as a child in a world that so hates you? While you’re literally being gunned down in the street, while you’re being rounded up and mass incarcerated and forced into prison slavery.”

Watch the video below and tell us what you think. Is this attitude absolutely outrageous.

RELATED:Man Uses Women’s Restroom, Snaps Pictures of 10-Year-Old Girl",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198891,"Donald Trump complained that the media Wednesday investigated his wife Melania’s convention speech longer than the FBI spent looking into Hillary Clinton’s emails.

Responding to the allegation that a portion of Mrs. Trump’s speech was plagiarized from Michelle Obama, the Republican nominee tweeted, “Good news is Melania’s speech got more publicity than any in the history of politics especially if you believe that all press is good press!”

Good news is Melania's speech got more publicity than any in the history of politics especially if you believe that all press is good press! — Donald J. Trump (@realDonaldTrump) July 20, 2016

Trump followed up with another tweet arguing, “The media is spending more time doing a forensic analysis of Melania’s speech than the FBI spent on Hillary’s emails.”

The media is spending more time doing a forensic analysis of Melania's speech than the FBI spent on Hillary's emails. — Donald J. Trump (@realDonaldTrump) July 20, 2016

On the Saturday of the Fourth of July weekend, Clinton was interviewed by the FBI for three and a half hours. Then on the following Tuesday, FBI director James Comey announced that there would be “no charges” filed against Clinton.

In a statement from Meredith McIver, an in-house staff writer for the Trump Organization, she acknowledged her “mistake” in including “some of the phrasing in the draft that ultimately became the final speech.”

McIver offered to resign but Trump rejected it noting that “people make innocent mistakes and that we learn and grow from these experiences.”",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199874,"With Obama gone (good riddance!), Democrats are so desperate for leadership, they fawn and drool over any mildly charismatic non-white Democrat who comes their way. One of their latest darlings is Somali Congresswoman, Ilhan Omar, of Minnesota. Omar has some serious skeletons in her closet that are haunting her and the",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201833,"South Korean Media is reporting that North Korea has fired an undisclosed missile. They believe it is a failed test. This is being reported by CNN, FOX, and several other news outlets.

Sky News is reporting that the South Korean Military confirm a failed launch.

All of the reports seem to be coming from this report by the Yonhap News Agency thus far.

The Missile was fired from Sinpo the report claims. Here is more information on Sinpo.

A reporter on the ground in North Korea has not received information from the North Korean Government about the alleged launch yet. However, he has reTweeted the two following Tweets, since the alleged launch.

The missile was fired from near the east coast port of Sinpo. North Korea launched a land-based version of its SLBM there earlier this month — Anna Fifield (@annafifield) April 15, 2017

This was not reported as a Nuclear test. President Trump made clear in previous statements that he would not allow another Nuclear test. It remains to be seen how he might choose to respond to a missile test if the United States responds at all.

All we can do at this point is wait and watch. So much for a quiet Easter Weekend. Between George Soros’ Anarchists in California and Kim Jong Un’s quest for nuclear weapons, this weekend is pretty much shot!

We will update this article as more information is made available.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199948,"If there’s one thing that unites all of the anti-Trump opposition, it’s the fact that they are corrupt. Far-Left New York Mayor, Bill De Blasio, is no different.De Blasio, a Clinton supporter and a critic of Donald Trump’s immigration policies, is now in hot water for using public money to cover his private bills. In total, De Blasio used a blog post on Medium to announce that the city (i.e. THE TAXPAYERS) will be paying approximately $$2 million in his private legal fees, via Politico.

De Blasio is currently being investigated for potentially illegal fundraising activities.While De Blasio has managed to survive most state and federal charges against him, lawyers did find that De Blasio’s fundraising practices “violated the intent and spirit” of the law, via New York Post.Like his friend Hillary Clinton, De Blasio got off thanks to strange legalese.

However, the fact that the mayor is now tapping into public money in order to pay off his own bills is certainly going to ruffle more than a few feathers.Added to this scandal is the fact that as mayor, De Blasio has been an utter disaster for New York.After years of Republican control of the city, De Blasio, a hard-Left Democrat, has noticeably changed the look of New York for the worse. The homeless population, for instance, has increased in size and visibility, via New York Times.

Under De Blasio, New York City went from being the model city in terms of crime control, to once again being a thieves’ paradise.Even the Department of Justice has labeled De Blasio’s approach to crime as “soft,” via The Hill.More infamously, De Blasio, who was an ardent supporter of Communist dictatorships long before becoming the city’s mayor, has become the epitome of anti-police politics.After doing away with the Stop & Frisk law that reduced crime in New York’s black and Hispanic neighborhoods, De Blasio further raised the ire of the NYPD by publicly insinuating that the department is racist.When Black Lives Matter terrorist murdered officers Rafael Ramos and Wenjian Liu, other NYPD officers turned their backs on De Blasio in a show of solidarity against the type of politics that caused the murders in the first place, via Time. De Blasio is just another example of the venal and corrupt Democratic class. These people, all of whom hate President Trump, are not only liars, but they are petty grifters, too.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199644,"Transgender people should be able to use whatever bathroom they want, Donald Trump said Thursday.

“Oh, I had a feeling that question was going to come up, I will tell you. North Carolina did something that was very strong. And they’re paying a big price. There’s a lot of problems,” the Republican presidential candidate said during a town hall event on NBC’s “Today.”

Referring to comments from an unnamed commentator who on Wednesday said North Carolina should “leave it the way it is right now,” Trump said he agreed.

“Leave it the way it is. North Carolina, what they’re going through with all the business that’s leaving, all of the strife — and this is on both sides. Leave it the way it is,” he said, referring to companies that have canceled plans to move or expand businesses in the state as a result of the law, which bans transgender individuals from using a bathroom that does not match their gender at birth.

“There have been very few complaints the way it is. People go. They use the bathroom that they feel is appropriate,” Trump said. “There has been so little trouble. And the problem with what happened in North Carolina is the strife and the economic — I mean, the economic punishment that they’re taking.”

Matt Lauer then asked whether Trump has any transgender people working for his company.

“I really don’t know. I probably do. I really don’t know,” Trump said, answering that he would allow, say, transgender celebrity Caitlyn Jenner to use whatever bathroom she wanted at Trump Tower.

VIDEO ON NEXT PAGE >>>",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
146257,"Over the last eight years, Americans have been forced to question almost every action of our President.

While Barack Obama has been beloved by many Americans and liberal media outlets, he often operated in a way that betrayed their trust and hurt our country. He often moved to defy Congress and our Constitutional process by abusing executive orders (as he’s done to destroy our immigration policies).

He’s talked a big talk about equality and progress, but often put into place measures that favored Muslims and minorities, but purposefully banned white Christians. How is that equal?

Yet in the last few months of his presidency, Obama is taking actions that defy even the most basic logic. It’s clear he is trying to make the incoming presidency of Donald Trump as difficult and fraught with problems as possible.

From Allen B. West:

As reported by Defense News, “The Dwight D. Eisenhower carrier strike group chopped out of the European theater of operations Dec. 26 and headed home to Norfolk after months of operating in the Arabian Gulf and the Mediterranean, where the strike jets of Carrier Air Wing 3 flew hundreds of missions against Islamic State group targets in Syria and Iraq…

But this time, no carrier is in the Eisenhower’s wake. The relief ship, the carrier George H. W. Bush, has yet to leave Norfolk, and it’s unlikely to do so before the Jan. 20 presidential inauguration of Donald Trump, according to a Navy source.

The gap could last as long as two months, sources said, between the time the Eisenhower left the combat theater and the Bush arrives. And that gap comes at a particularly inopportune time. Numerous media reports indicate intelligence organizations and analysts are on the lookout for provocative actions by potential antagonists — in particular Russia, China, North Korea, Iran or ISIS.

Alongside actions against Israel and Russia, Obama is withdrawing our forces from the Middle East. The vacuum can embolden ISIS and other forces to act out against anyone in the region.

In the coming months we might hear about strikes by Iran, Syria, or ISIS terrorists scattered across the region, with the U.S. unable to answer back to protect our people and allies. A fitting problem for Donald Trump to deal with during his first days in office.

If you’re bitter over his win, of course you’d want that to happen.

After eight years in office, what does Obama have to show for himself? There is rapidly increasing terror around the world, racial tensions at home, and a tottering economy (not to mention soaring national debt). And now that his time is almost up, he’s only making things worse.

Quite the legacy to leave behind.

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200894,"George Soros claims he is a god and “the creator of everything,” however the billionaire globalist also warns he is a “self-centred” god who believes “normal rules do not apply” to him.

“I fancied myself as some kind of god …” he wrote. “If truth be known, I carried some rather potent messianic fantasies with me from childhood, which I felt I had to control, otherwise they might get me in trouble.“ When asked by Britain’s Independent newspaper to elaborate on that statement, Soros doubled down: “It is a sort of disease when you consider yourself some kind of god, the creator of everything, but I feel comfortable about it now since I began to live it out.“

Since I began to live it out. Those unfamiliar with Soros would probably dismiss that claim as nothing more the typical blathering of an irrelevant madman. But those who have followed his career and sociopolitical endeavors realize that while he may be mad, he is a mad billionaire, and billionaires tend not to be irrelevant.

Especially not mad billionaires with self-centred agendas who believe that normal rules don’t apply to themselves.

Soros has learnt that with enormous reserves of unethically earnt money at his disposal he has the power to make the once unthinkable acceptable. His work as a self-professed “amoral” financial speculator has left millions in poverty when their national currencies were […]

READ MORE ON NEXT PAGE >>>",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200703,"disrespecting a traditional observance in times of tragedy.

@CBSNews @SpeakerRyan Typical of Democrats to try to get their way by rudeness, shouting, force and, ultimately, violence. — RealFurgas (@RealFurgas) June 14, 2016

@cimarcos Oh, those scamps. They must have worked so hard to prepare this ironically disrespectful chant. They care so much about the gays. — WinSton (@WinStonBoSton85) June 14, 2016

Some Democrats left the House chamber in protest, including Connecticut Rep. Jim Himes, who earlier declared he would no longer participate in moments of silence.

“Silence. Not me. Not anymore. I will no longer stand here absorbing the faux concern, contrived gravity and tepid smugness of a House complicit in the weekly bloodshed,” Himes said in an angry speech in which he referred, not to an “Islamic terrorist” but a “madman with the military-grade rifle.”

Rep. Jim Himes protests Congress's moment of silence in response to #Orlando shooting. https://t.co/TLjnOKkNUshttps://t.co/7dhg8OJoBH — ABC News Politics (@ABCPolitics) June 13, 2016

Rep. Seth Moulton (D-Mass.) joined Himes in walking out of the moment of silence.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198898,"This morning, former Trump campaign Chief Paul Manafort was arrested after turning himself in to the FBI, and just hours after, Tony Podesta made a shocking announcement.

Podesta, brother of former Hillary Clinton campaign chair John Podesta, is a Democrat power lobbyist for the Podesta Group, which worked hand-in-hand with Manafort during numerous shady deals. It’s been widely reported that the Podesta brothers came under the microscope from special counsel Robert Mueller, and Monday morning’s announcement confirms as much while suggesting there’s much more to come from this story.

From POLITICO:

Democratic power lobbyist Tony Podesta, founder of the Podesta Group, is stepping down from the firm that bears his name after coming under investigation by special counsel Robert Mueller.

Podesta announced his decision during a firm-wide meeting Monday morning and is alerting clients of his impending departure.

Podesta is handing over full operational and financial control to longtime firm CEO Kimberley Fritts, according to multiple sources with knowledge of the meeting. Fritts and a senior group of the Podesta team will be launching a new firm in the next one or two days. Sources said the transition has been in the works for the past several months.

For those unaware, the Podesta Group has come under fire in recent months for failing to properly register as foreign agents under the FARA Act. Additionally, we previously reportedthat the Podestas worked with Manafort to be instrumental in facilitating the controversial Uranium One deal, which allowed Russia to control 20 percent of America’s uranium reserves.

Additionally, the Daily Caller reported that the fact finding mission surrounding the Podestas quickly morphed into a criminal inquiry into the brothers regarding their work as lobbyists for both the Russian and Ukrainians.

The sources said Mueller’s investigation into Podesta, the brother of Clinton campaign chairman John Podesta, began as a fact-finding mission about Manafort’s role in the campaign but quickly morphed into a criminal inquiry into whether the firm violated the Foreign Agents Registration Act, known as FARA. People and firms who lobby on behalf of foreign governments must file detailed disclosures about their spending with the Department of Justice. Willful failure to file is a felony and can result in up to five years in prison. Podesta and Manafort filed the requisite forms only after the media began reporting on their dealings with ECMU, according to NBC’s report.

Many have speculated that Manafort’s arrest would be to get him to turn on President Trump and offer Mueller something incriminating. However, in light of the news regarding Podesta, it appears as if just the opposite is true – Manafort is going to be used as a weapon against the Podestas.

Given that’s the case, the only logical conclusion to this ordeal is for everyone involved with the Podestas, including Hillary Clinton’s campaign, to be taken down once and for all.

This is huge news. Stay tuned to see what’s to come.

TOGETHER WE WILL MAKE AMERICA GREAT AGAIN!",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201470,"The media is doing everything in its power to keep Donald J Trump from becoming president. They dedicate hours of coverage to every perceived mistake, slight and misstep, real or imagined.What they don’t do is talk about issues, policies, America or the voters. But that is what Donald Trump has tapped into and it is why he will be president.

This supporter video is getting a ton of traction because it cuts through the media crap and lets viewers hear Donald Trump in his own voice frame this campaign and the challenges facing our nation as Americans see them, not the way the gatekeepers want to spin it!

WATCH:",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198231,"The FBI have announced that they will no longer release evidence related to the Las Vegas massacre, claiming that it is not in the public interest to do so.

In yet another obvious attempt at covering-up the truth about what happened in Vegas, the FBI are now refusing to provide any updates to the media since the official narrative changed two weeks ago.

Thedailysheeple.com reports: The silence from authorities has gotten so obvious that even local mainstream news outlets are sounding the alarm. When you couple this with the documented evidence that points to both the LVMP and the FBI lying directly to the American people you have all the hallmarks of a classic false flat terror operation.

“Fifty-eight people killed. More than 500 injured. And yet, nearly a month after the Las Vegas Strip experienced the worst mass shooting in modern American history, local and federal authorities are refusing to fill in the blanks,” The Las Vegas Review-Journal reported.

“It wasn’t always like this. In the days after Oct. 1, when Stephen Paddock opened fire on the Route 91 Harvest festival crowd from his Mandalay Bay corner suite, Las Vegas police were hosting multiple news conferences a day. Then, once a day. Then, once every few days.”

The above paragraph is striking in that it openly admits that at first authorities were quick to deliver their message, attempting to lock in the official narrative surrounding the worst mass shooting in American history. Only after independent investigators began to tear apart the official narrative did authorities all of a sudden decide they need to be cautious about what they put out, eventually moving to where we are now with literally no new information being released.

The Review-Journal goes on to note that by October 13th (when the alternative media had broken the story wide open) the sheriff had changed his manner completely, going from a seemingly straight forward and stern speaker to now emotional and combative. Keep in mind this was right around the time that outlets like The Daily Sheeple and Intellihub, as well as independent reporters like Laura Loomer, were publishing explosive reports that proved that the sheriff and his FBI handlers were indeed lying to the American people.

By Oct. 13 — the last time the Metropolitan Police Department or the FBI addressed the media or public — something had changed. The sheriff, who had been straightforward and stern, was now emotional and at times combative. Both he and the FBI failed to provide much new information, and at the end of the meeting, they refused to take questions.

Since that day, the only person who has shed more light on the investigation is Mandalay Bay security guard Jesus Campos, who was shot in the leg while approaching the gunman’s room. His platform to share that information? “The Ellen Degeneres Show,” which aired last week. He hasn’t made himself available to the media since.

Amazingly, when the Review-Journal contacted the FBI, they were literally told that releasing information to the public in a timely manner doesn’t matter to the Federal Bureau of Investigation.

FBI cover-up artist Sandra Breault told the paper that, “It doesn’t matter,” when asked why there had been no new updates. “It’s an ongoing investigation, and unless there’s something to report, there will not be a briefing.”

Breault and her bosses apparently think that the American people are so stupid that they would believe that after two weeks and 50,000 hours of overtime there would be no new information to report. This would be laughable if we weren’t talking about covering up what actually happened when 58 people were killed and over 500 injured.

Somehow we are expected to believe that there is no new information when independent journalists on a shoestring budget have been able to reveal over and over again that the official story of one shooter on the 32nd floor of the Mandalay Bay is complete hogwash.

Just yesterday I reported on stunning video that shows at least 17 ambulances loading up victims at The Hooters Hotel and Casino.

So far the FBI hasn’t commented and apparently “It doesn’t matter.”",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198402,"The Clinton Foundation is ‘a vast, criminal conspiracy’ and ‘a slush fund for grifters’ with thousands of honest people who are victims after contributing their hard-earned money to what they believed would be used for philanthropic causes, claims author Jerome Corsi in his book, Partners in Crime: The Clintons’ Scheme to Monetize the White House for Personal Profit, which will be published in August.

Driven by insatiable greed while crying they were near-broke, the couple schemed and Hillary used her position as secretary of state to leverage lucrative deals for the Foundation as well as six-figure speaking fees for Bill Clinton

The scheme engineered through the Foundation has enriched the Clintons by hundreds of millions of dollars as well as adding $$2billion to the Clinton Foundation and raising $$1billion for Hillary’s second run for the presidency. The Washington Post reported that the foundation ‘faced increased scrutiny, particularly for its vigorous fundraising from major corporate interests and its receipt of donations from foreign governments and organization’. Most of those donors were outside the United States.

The foundation also accepted millions from seven foreign governments while Hillary Clinton served as secretary of state’, the Post reported.

Foundation money has subsidized the Clinton family’s global travel lifestyle and Chelsea has taken advantage of it while vacationing at the exclusive Amanyara Resort on Providenciales Island in Turks and Caicos. One of the world’s most expensive destinations, rooms cost $$1500 a night off-season and $$34,000 during their busy season. One night costs more than the average American worker makes in one year, one journalist reported.

Chelsea brought her husband Marc Mezvinsky, a hedge fund manager, into the Clinton Foundation. He quickly learned how to play the Clinton Family Game and sought out Hillary’s help with getting a meeting with the State Department. That was just one of the emails dealing with classified information on Hillary’s private server in her Westchester home.

H/T: Daily Mail",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200972,"Well this doesn’t look very good for the New York Times.

Rosanne Brewer Lane, the lead woman in Sunday’s big NYT piece on how Donald Trump allegedly treats women, was on “Fox & Friends” this morning and accused the paper of spinning her story.

“I did not have a negative experience with Donald Trump”:

The presumptive GOP nominee sparred with the Times all weekend and took somewhat of a victory lap this morning:

Wow, Rosanne Brewer Lane, the most prominently depicted women in the failing @nytimes story yesterday,is on @foxandfriends saying Times lied

— Donald J. Trump (@realDonaldTrump) May 16, 2016

Well, with Ms. Lane’s account from Monday morning, the ball’s back in Barbaro’s court. What say you now?

Full video of her interview here:",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199947,"The editorial board of Jeff Bezos’ blog penned a column attacking the media for its “out of control” coverage of Hillary Clinton’s “minor email scandal.”

According to the Bezos bloggers, the media should stop talking about it because there’s more “important issues” like “China’s aggressive moves in the South China Sea” and “military spending.”

After all, they say, she “admitted [it] was a mistake.”

From Washington Post:

JUDGING BY the amount of time NBC’s Matt Lauer spent pressing Hillary Clinton on her emails during Wednesday’s national security presidential forum, one would think that her homebrew server was one of the most important issues facing the country this election. It is not. There are a thousand other substantive issues — from China’s aggressive moves in the South China Sea to National Security Agency intelligence-gathering to military spending — that would have revealed more about what the candidates know and how they would govern. Instead, these did not even get mentioned in the first of 5½ precious prime-time hours the two candidates will share before Election Day, while emails took up a third of Ms. Clinton’s time.

Trump is winning so hard he literally has […]

READ MORE ON NEXT PAGE >>>",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199102,"The Academy Awards will be taking place on Sunday, and we all know what happens at such an event where the liberal actors are going public. They will have the opportunity to bash Trump again. But today, the First Lady Melania Trump announced something INCREDIBLE to take her husband’s mind away from the bullshit of Hollywood elites.

Melania Trump announced that she will be hosting her first big ball in the White House this Sunday, which is at the very same time the Academy Awards are airing. White House Press Secretary Sean Spicer confirmed this earlier today when he was asked if the President will be watching the Oscars ceremony.

He explained that Trumps will be hosting the Governor’s Ball that night, which is part of the National Governors Association’s winter meeting in Washington.

“Mrs. Trump looks forward to putting on a phenomenal event,” Spicer said. “And the first lady’s put a lot of time into this event that’s going to occur, welcoming our nation’s governors to the capital and I have a feeling that that’s where the president and the first lady are going to be focused on, on Sunday night. “And so we’ll go from there,” according to Mr. Conservative.

Sean Spicer was also asked why he thinks so many celebrities speak out against the President.

“I have no idea, it’s a free country,” he said. “I think Hollywood is known for being rather far to the left in its opinion.”",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201687,"Well, it looks like the ‘T.V. Gremlins’ got to CNN’s live feed again. CNN cuts off woman as she shares her financial struggles as a business owner and cattle rancher with President Trump due to stifling Obamacare costs.

Obamacare victim: “Our rates are 3 times what they were before Obamacare started. We have one provider in our County. We have very little options for what we can and cannot do.

We’re a small business owner. We’re actually not a brick and mortar, we are actually cattle ranchers. We can’t afford our equipment if we are paying these rates year after year after year. Our food source is in jeopardy because of this healthcare law…it’s my basic.”Trump: “I know.”CNN: “Just lost the tape there from the White House. The President had a listening session in the White House…”It looks like CNN needs a better engineer who can fix this problem once and for all. They always seem to lose their live feed when something important being reported. Hmmmm…

VIDEO:

.@CNN, can you do us a favor and just report the news? Footage shows CNN producers quickly cutting feed to Obamacare victim. Stop censoring! pic.twitter.com/s3jXvICvrl — Truth Bombers (@Truth_Bombers) March 13, 2017

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
202242,"Bill Clinton was accused of raping three women, however, he was never charged. The media didn’t report about the rape allegations, but they fully reported about Bill O’Reilly sexual harassment allegations. So, the media proved they have double standards. They chose to report about O’Reilly activities, but they were silent",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201535,"Donald Trump is intensifying his attacks on the federal judge presiding over fraud lawsuits against Trump University. On Friday the presumptive Republican presidential nominee, dismissing criticism from legal experts on the right and left, pressed his case against U.S. District Judge Gonzalo Curiel, saying the Indiana-born judge is biased against him because “he’s a Mexican. We’re building a wall between here and Mexico.”

Trump made the remarks, and others like it, repeatedly, in interviews with CNN and The Wall Street Journal, referring to Judge Curiel variously as “of Mexican heritage” or just “Mexican.” But the message was always the same, that the judge had what Trump called “a conflict” because of his ethnicity.

At a rally in San Diego last week, Trump characterized the judge as “a hater of Donald Trump, a hater. He’s a hater.” And “they ought to look into Judge Curiel.”

In public, Trump has called repeatedly for the judge to recuse himself, but his lawyers in fact have not made any such request.

That is undoubtedly because court precedents are unanimous in holding that race, ethnicity, gender, religion and sexual orientation are not themselves grounds for disqualifying a judge. If they were, legal ethicists observe, the legal system would fall into chaos because no judge would be free from taint. The five Supreme Court justices who are Catholic could not rule on a case in which the Catholic church participated, but neither could the other justices who are not Catholic.

Moreover, while Trump is free to say anything he wants about the judge, the lawyers in the case are bound by the professional rules of conduct and could be sanctioned for making such charges about Curiel without actual evidence of bias.

Legal ethics expert Stephen Gillers… NEXT PAGE",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200273,"Bill Clinton swore all he did was discuss grandkids as he met privately with then AG Loretta Lynch on a small plane on a Phoenix tarmac prior to the election, while Hillary was still under ‘investigation’ by the FBI prior to the election…yeah…right!

New evidence proves Loretta Lynch colluded with the Clintons to keep the Justice Department from investigating Hillary ‘too closely’!

Is this the evidence that will finally hand out some prison clothes and inmate ID numbers?

According to the Times, another document, hacked by the Russians, reveals collusion between the former Attorney General and the Democrats to ensure Hillary Clinton’s victory in the general election.

“Mr. Comey’s defenders regard this as one of the untold stories of the Clinton investigation. It is one they say helps explain his decision-making.”

If a local news reporter in Phoenix had not reported that Loretta Lynch and Bill Clinton had met on that tarmac, she might have succeeded in sheltering Hillary even more effectively than she had.

Breitbart explains:

A New York Times report on Saturday claimed that FBI Director James Comey decided to reveal last year that he was re-opening the investigation into Democratic presidential nominee Hillary Clinton because he suspected Attorney General Loretta Lynch was covering up for her — and because an email found by Russian hackers seemed to support those suspicions.

The Times’ investigative report suggests that a U.S. intelligence agency managed to […]

CONTINUE READING ON NEXT PAGE >>>",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
146377,"…insurrection movement in the future will happen: the Democratic Party is tying all of its hopes and dreams to the Clinton Machine, which has only its own interests at heart and certainly not the general population’s.

If her appointment is just temporary, then the DNC has the chance to begin separating itself from Clinton, who could very well be a one-term president. Her age and health, along with the demands of a job that is well known to suck the life out of its holders, will do a lot to make a second run at president extremely difficult. She will probably not see another challenger of note from her own side, but she will definitely face a well-rested opponent from the Republican Party, one eager to take advantage of every bad thing that can and will happen for the next four years.

But, the DNC has proven itself to not be that smart. It kept Debbie Wasserman-Schultz on well past her prime and let her nearly muck things up for the rest of the party. It has brought back Donna Brazile, who is much more prolific and much more charismatic than DWS ever could hope to be… But Brazile is very much a Clinton person. If the DNC decided to keep Clinton people around long after the Clintons have come and gone, then it cannot hope to expand its hopelessly shallow bench.

Luckily, I don’t much care if they don’t fix themselves. It helps me sleep better at night knowing that my side has much less competition. Gives us a chance to rebuild after our own tremendous mistake.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201311,"Here’s a pretty cool video featuring two young black males showing their support for Republican presidential candidate Donald Trump. They’ve probably received an earful from friends and family members and tolerant social justice warriors both on the streets and online, but they’re sticking to their convictions. WATCH : I like it. ‘How can anyone",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199689,"Ivanka Trump made her first universal trip as first daughter this week when she made a trip to Germany for a Women’s Summit. Tragically, German Chancellor Angela Merkel and her kindred liberal elitists were extraordinarily discourteous to Ivanka amid her time there. Presently, notwithstanding, Ivanka is getting the last chuckle. Apparently, a gathering of liberal German ladies booed and murmured Ivanka while she attempted to answer inquiries concerning her dad.

“I’m very proud of my father’s advocacy,” Ivanka said as the booing began, adding that President Trump is “a tremendous champion of supporting families and enabling them to thrive.” Merkel was sitting appropriate beside Ivanka, yet she attempted to reach her guard and stop the booing. The summit’s arbitrator, be that as it may, chosen to attempt and go in for the slaughter.

“You are first little daughter — German audience is confused — what is your part — to whom would you say you are spoken to? Your dad, the American individuals, or your business,” asked Miriam Meckel, manager of German business magazine Wirtschaftswoche. “Well, certainly not the latter, and I am rather unfamiliar with this role as well, as it is quite new to me,” Ivanka fired back. “It has been a little under 100 days, but it is just been a remarkable, an incredible journey.”We cherish how Ivanka disgraced her female haters, gazing them down in a way that said “aren’t ladies expected to stick together?”",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199469,"First there was Benghazi — and then Email-gate. The two scandals have caused Hillary Clinton’s favorability ratings with American voters to plummet. And despite her best efforts, it’s now Clinton, not Donald Trump, who is perceived as the more “dishonest” and “untrustworthy” candidate.

But Clinton’s reputation could soon be in for another blow. Not only has the State department re-opened its investigation into her unauthorized use of a private server, but a potentially more damaging scandal is looming: Whether Clinton used her position as Secretary of State to build a private fund-raising empire that peddled political influence to foreign governments for private gain – and in the process flouted “public integrity” laws.

Scandal has dogged the Clinton Foundation for years but new questions were raised last year after a flurry of media reports revealed more details about how the foundation’s monies were raised and spent. Among the most damaging revelations contained in those reports:

-Clinton used her official time as Secretary to solicit “charitable” donations for the Clinton Foundation from some of the world’s worst human rights violators including oil-rich powers like Saudi Arabia, Oman, and Qatar with a demonstrated history of gender discrimination, persecution of gays, and crackdowns on civil liberties. These are the very same countries that the State Department, under Clinton’s leadership, has routinely criticized for these abuses. It’s not illegal to send contradictory signals to countries in need of internal reform, but it’s hardly the principled leadership upon which Clinton has built her good name.

-Even worse, and potentially criminal, Clinton may have solicited these donations under the terms of a quid pro quo. That is, donors received foreign aid benefits as a “reward” for their contributions. For example, according to […]

READ MORE ON NEXT PAGE >>>",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200758,"It’s pretty incredible how much money it costs for the president and his family to travel across the world.

The latest example comes from Michelle Obama’s Morocco trip.

From Weasel Zippers via Free Beacon:

First Lady Michelle Obama’s one night stay in Morocco cost taxpayers over $$600,000 in hotel and car rental costs alone.

Mrs. Obama traveled to the North African country with her daughters Sasha and Malia and mother Marian Robinson to promote her education initiative “Let Girls Learn.” She arrived in Morocco wearing a $$1,750 designer dress and ended the night with a “lavish dinner” with Princess Lalla Salma and actress Meryl Streep.

Rooms were booked at three five-star hotels for the 24-hour visit, according to contracts signed off by the State Department.

Two contracts were signed for rooms at the Royal Mansour worth $$50,000 and $$10,073. The five-star hotel has a mother-daughter spa suite, promises its guests “wonder, luxury and unparalleled services,” and offers a “spiritual spa journey.”

The Hotel Sofitel Marrakech Lounge and Spa was also booked for Mrs. Obama’s trip, including contracts worth $$200,000, $$31,968, and $$28,039. The Secret Service also stayed at the Sofitel for $$133,493. A pre-advance visit cost $$4,676.

It’s just pretty difficult for people to look at our national debt skyrocket to $$20 trillion and then see our leaders travelling around the world to places like Morocco and spending this much.

Of course it is important for the Obama family to travel to certain places.

But these optics are just terrible.

Some people aren’t happy with some of the choices Michelle made over there either.

From Free Beacon:

First Lady Michelle Obama touched down in Morocco on Monday wearing an expensive designer dress during a trip highlighting girls’ education.

Obama arrived in Marrakesh wearing the black floral Proenza Schouler wrap dress, available for purchase online for $$1,750, as part of a multi-day trip to promote the “Let Girls Learn” initiative with her daughters Sasha and Malia. The first lady’s trip to Morocco followed a visit to Liberia, one of the poorest countries in the world.

We aren’t asking our leaders to travel around the world dressed in sweatpants but maybe we could find a middle ground?

I know, I know.

That’s sexist. And racist.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200372,"A new report claims that James Comey met with his brother, who is connected to Hillary Clinton, during the investigation into her use illegal use of a private email server.

Big League Politics reported:

James Comey met with his brother Peter Comey at his residence during the Hillary Clinton email investigation, according to an FBI security officer senior enough to receive classified security briefings.

Big League Politics has learned that James Comey’s communications with his brother could disqualify him as a witness in any investigations that he has been involved in, due to conflict of interest.

James’ brother Peter Comey works as Senior Real Estate Director of Operations for the Americas for DLA Piper, the Clinton-connected law firm that does the Clinton Foundation’s taxes. DLA Piper performed the supposedly independent audit of the Clinton Foundation after the scandal first broke last year.

Read the rest of the report here.

The more information that comes out about James Comey the more it is apparent that he is corrupt!

If Cong can do all it wants, legal discourse=futile. I argue that Trump firing Comey/saying he ""hoped"" he'd drop Flynn probe isn't a crime https://t.co/b2KRmNBCIX — Alan Dershowitz (@AlanDersh) June 26, 2017",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199129,"One of soon-to-be FORMER President Barack Hussein Obama’s dubious “achievements” has been his success in vilifying our law enforcement professionals.

Starting with his comment that police “acted stupidly” before knowing the facts of the arrest of black professor Henry Louis Gates in 2009, to his continuous stream of insinuating statements about race and police actions, he’s left little doubt about his true feelings.

He’s done much to stoke the flames of anger against our men and women of the Thin Blue Line, and he’s left a parting shot as one final insult.

On occasion, the lights on the White House are changed to commemorate events. In October 2013 in honor of Breast Cancer Awareness Month, the White House was bathed in pink lights and in rainbow colors in June 2015 to celebrate the Supreme Court ruling that allowed same-sex couples nationwide the right to marry.

Monday was Law Enforcement Appreciation Day and you’d think that might be an opportunity to show support by turning on blue lights.

But, no.

The Daily Caller reports, The White House refused a call by a Republican congressman to light the White House blue Monday for National Law Enforcement Appreciation Day (L.E.A.D.).

“Obama has not agreed to do so, but has displayed lights at the White House for other groups in the past, including the LGBT community,” a spokeswoman from Republican Washington Rep. Dave Reichert’s office told The Daily Caller Sunday night.

President Obama previously refused to light up the White House with blue lights in support of the fallen officers following an ambush on law enforcement in Dallas last July.

Per WFXL, National Law Enforcement Appreciation Day was founded by the National Concerns of Police Survivors (C.O.P.S.) – a group formed by the surviving loved ones of officers killed in the line of duty – after the 2014 police-involved shooting in Ferguson, Missouri and the nationwide backlash by groups like Black Lives Matter.

Well, luckily there’s a new sheriff in town in just a few days and this disrespect will END.

source

[Note: This article was written by Michele Hickford]",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200861,"During the time between when President Donald Trump took office and now, dumb-witted liberals have been opening their mouths, bringing up all of the “good” that Former President Barack Obama did while in office. The Obama Administration has been glorified by the mainstream liberal media, further brainwashing the idiots who already believed them. We’ve heard disgusting remarks about Obama being “the best president” that the U.S. has ever had, hate speech about President Donald Trump, among many other disturbing things. These uneducated statements leave us wondering, what exactly Obama did to improve things for the U.S. while he was in office for eight years.

The big deal about Obama for the Democratic Party was simply the fact that he was black. The only thing liberals cared about was having a president who wasn’t white to steal power from “the white man”. The really scary thing is that there are so many white liberals who don’t seem to understand the racism towards them by the very people that they say that they are trying to help. Between 2008 (when Obama was elected President) and 2017 (when Obama left office) Barack Obama did achieve some major accomplishments, so it’s important that we take note.

For your enjoyment, here are some of Barack Obama’s “accomplishments” while in office. This list was published by America’s Freedom Fighters:

First President to preside over a cut to the credit-rating of the United States.

First President to violate the War Powers Act.

First President to be held in contempt of court for illegally obstructing oil drilling in the Gulf of Mexico.

First President to abrogate bankruptcy law to turn over control of companies to his union supporters.

First President to by-pass Congress and implement the Dream Act through executive fiat.

First President to order a secret amnesty program that stopped the deportation of illegal immigrants across the U.S., including those with criminal convictions.

First President to demand a company hand-over $$20 billion to one of his political appointees.

First President to tell a CEO of a major corporation (Chrysler) to resign.

First President to terminate America’s ability to put a man in space.

First President to cancel the National Day of Prayer and to say that America is no longer a Christian nation.

First President to have a law signed by an auto-pen without being present.

First President to arbitrarily declare an existing law unconstitutional and refuse to enforce it.

First President to threaten insurance companies if they publicly spoke out on the reasons for their rate increases.

First President to tell a major manufacturing company in which state it is allowed to locate a factory.

First President to file lawsuits against the states he swore an oath to protect (AZ, WI, OH, IN).

First President to side with a foreign nation over one of the American 50 states (Mexico vs Arizona).

First President to tell the military men and women that they should pay for their own private insurance because they “volunteered to go to war and knew the consequences.”

Then he was the First President to tell the members of the military that THEY were UNPATRIOTIC for balking at the last suggestion. (Thank God he didn’t get away with THIS one.)

First president to allow Iran to inspect their own facilities.

First president to have blood on his hands from Benghazi to the assassinations of several police officers.

First president to trade 5 terrorist for a traitor

First president to facilitate the Iranians to acquire nuclear weapons.

You’re probably wondering about all of the records that Obama broken while spending his eight years in the White House. Here’s a list of those too (even though they’re not really positive records.

All liberals want us to think is that President Donald Trump is dangerous, which is why the media bashes Trump so much. Trump is doing a great job of keeping our morale up while putting a lot of time and effort into fixing the major problems in America. So, we must thank Obama, for all the time and effort he put into some of the worst achievements in our history of presidencies.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199757,"The corruption pouring out of Hillary’s time as secretary of state continues to come to the surface more and more as we go along in this election cycle, and just when you think it couldn’t get any worse, a new revelation pops up to prove you wrong.

Good Morning America recently dropped a bombshell report about a major donor to the Clinton Foundation and some of the favors this individual received for their financial contributions.

Check this out.

From The Right Scoop:

Good Morning America ran a bombshell report on Hillary Clinton this morning, showing how a major Clinton Foundation and Democrat donor, who had no known national security or intelligence experience, was place on the top-secret State Department International Security Advisory Board.

When ABC News learned of Rajiv Fernando’s 2011 appointment, they sought him out at the 2012 Democratic Convention to ask him…

CONTINUE READING ON NEXT PAGE >>>",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199728,"The Senate has launched an investigation into Obama Era corruption revealing unsettling connections to Progressive billionaire George Soros.

Former President Barack Obama has been caught fleeing the country after the Senate initiated an investigation into political interference in the 2016 Election by former Attorney General Loretta Lynch (via CBS News).

Barack Obama, his wife Michelle, and their two daughters abruptly left the United States for Indonesia– one of the few countries that have yet to sign an extradition treaty with the United States.

Obama spent his early years and received his grade school education at an Islamic school in Indonesia. The former president went by Barry Soetoro after his Indonesian step-father.

The Senate Intelligence Committee has launched an official probe into Obama’s Attorney General, Loretta Lynch. Lynch stands accused of interfering in the investigation of Hillary Clinton’s email server.

The FBI has obtained information from a hacked DNC document of Lynch’s offering assurance to a Democrat operative that she would prevent the investigation “from going too far.”

The New York Times originally broke the story. It was later verified by The Washington Post. They also revealed the email had been sent to Leonard Benardo of the Open Society Foundation.

Alarm bells immediately rang in the heads of Republican senators. The Open Society Foundation was founded and is managed by megalomaniac George Soros.

The Senate has learned that former President Obama was working with the Open Society Foundation while obstructing an FBI investigation. This was for political purposes; to ensure the election of his party’s candidate. The New York Times even covered for Lynch by dismissing the international connection to foreign billionaire George Soros as a Progressive Democrat operative.

Both the Senate and the FBI have asked for a copy of the email reported by The New York Times, yet neither group has received a copy. Lynch has turned down all requests to work willingly with investigators.

Former FBI Director James Comey cited the email to justify his decision to ignore Justice Department protocol and announce the conclusion of the Clinton investigation.

James Comey also testified under oath that he was “confused” by Lynch’s attempts to interfere in the investigation.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
202099,"MSNBC liberal “reporter” Andrea Mitchell had to be physically removed from a press conference covering Secretary of State Rex Tillerson.

Mitchell was so unruly and rude; she would not stop shouting questions.It was yet another unhinged and embarrassing moment for our lying liberal media.

Watch the video:",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
146335,"Information hounds have their paws deep in the dirt as they dig up ghosts of Hillary Clinton’s past and search for any and all evidence linking her to the death of a prominent figure in American history. Truth seekers look for evidence that could lead to her to indictment and incarceration, but those who seek are coming up with mixed results. The hottest trending controversial conspiracy slithers back into relevancy in the wake of JFK’s classified files being released, even though numerous items were redacted. This theory plots Hillary Clinton against JFK Jr. and suggests that she’s directly, or indirectly, responsible for the plane crash that left JFK Jr. and two others dead, thus paving the way for Clinton to win an easy seat in the Senate and further her career.

Look back to 1999 when numerous New York residents fancied JFK Jr. the front-runner in the Senate election taking place in the year 2000. A young charismatic man like his father, JFK Jr. would’ve had an easy victory over Hillary Clinton if he had run for Senate in 2000, but any possibility of him entering into the election was halted mid-air with the crash of the aircraft he was in. A midnight flight and an unfortunate demise of a budding personality who could’ve carried on the legacy of his father had it not been for that harrowing flight that ended it all. Many sources say JFK Jr. was not 100% set on running for Senate, but if he did, it would’ve been an overwhelming victory.

Sources like Your News Wire point to Hillary Clinton as the reason JFK Jr’s plane exploded and crashed. The website suggests that Hillary had no intention of returning to Arkansas and her only goal was to win a seat in the New York Senate, no matter what it took. The source allows readers to believe, without truly saying so, that Hillary Clinton was responsible for the murder of JFK Jr. Based on the details of the event, in which it’s believed that JFK Jr. was flying the plane in the night time and he had called the radio tower for something, then randomly exploded, one has to wonder what caused the explosion. The website then discusses the possible events that suggest the Clinton’s covered this up very quickly by preparing a Navy funeral service, even though JFK Jr. did not serve in the Navy. This all happened after a search located JFK Jr. and his passenger’s bodies in the water.

The source states the following has occurred:

At 9:20 PM, July 16,1999, John Fitzgerald Kennedy Jr. radioed the tower at an airport near Martha’s Vineyard, Massachusetts announcing that he was preparing to land. Seconds later, his plane exploded in mid-air, the explosion witnessed by several people including a local newspaper reporter and an attorney.

Luggage was recovered miles from the crash site, an event that can only be caused by a mid-air explosion.

Five hours after the plane went down, William “Bill” Clinton sent out the equivalent of the Sixth Fleet to find the wreckage, hide it and the bodies from the snoopy media, and though JFK Jr. was never in the Navy, and though the families did not consent,…he ordered the cremation the corpses and threw the ashes into the sea in a hastily arranged Navy funeral.

No photographs were permitted of the recovered bodies.

Kennedy’s emergency locator was removed, the cockpit recorder was disabled, and the flight log was taken (all of which is documented in the official investigation report).

Behind the scenes, a cover story was concocted. The weather, which was perfect, somehow became stormy. JFK Jr. now had a gimpy leg, and Kennedy was “emotional”. Reports by the FAA and FBI, both concluding foul play was involved, were buried, and all inquiries led to dead-ends. In truth, all reports confirm that JFK Jr. was “emotionally stable” and a “highly skilled and careful pilot”.

The Kennedy family was furious, New York was heartbroken….all evidence had been destroyed or burned by executive command. “She killed him, I know she did”, said a Kennedy staffer who asked to remain anonymous.

The Clintons bought their home in New York, formed the Clinton Foundation, and Hillary won her Senate seat.

Even the liberally biased website Salon published an article that provides similar insight into the possibility of Hillary Clinton being involved in the death of JFK Jr., but without any true evidence, there is no way to prosecute anyone. Salon’s article talks about Roger Stone and his desire to publish a book discussing Hillary Clinton and JFK Jr.

It’s important for readers to gather their own information and do their own research. Always keep an open mind to the possibilities that are out there, but always remember that every theory is considered a theory until concrete evidence is brought forward.

Readers must be responsible and search for evidence that turns the theories into truths. Discuss them with friends, hunt for information, and present fact-based argument for the theory you’re looking to prove or disprove.

We must remember that anything unproven requires facts to be proven. Find the facts and you’ll have your answers.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
146269,"Donald Trump has just officially won the great state of Michigan, making him the first to do so since George H. W. Bush in 1988 (that’s almost 30 years—this truly was a historic election).

This election saw the tightest race in Michigan’s electoral history. Donald Trump defeated Hillary Clinton by a total of 10,704 votes. This news comes after all 83 counties within the state finally had official verification from voting clerks’ offices.

The end result is a huge 306 electoral votes for Trump, and a measly 232 for Hillary (the worst the Democratic Party has done in decades).

The Michigan Secretary of State made an official statement regarding the entire process:

“Many people have asked about Michigan’s process for counting ballots and certifying election results. Please be aware that all 1,521 Michigan cities and townships completed ballot counting and reported unofficial results by the morning of Wednesday, Nov. 9.”

It’s clear that Trump’s success in many “Democratically-favored” areas came down to his promises to restore industrial vitality and create massive amounts of jobs.

In the midst of this great victory though, Jill Stein has initiated a full legal recount (with the funding of George Soros). Currently, no one is quite sure what will happen next. All that is certain, is that Trump won the election fair and square. If anything happens to change the outcome now, we will all witness the end of Democracy in the free world.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201585,"Sean Spicer was in full-on game show host mode during Monday’s White House press briefing — or at least that’s how it must have felt to Secretary of the Interior Ryan Zinke, and Harpers Ferry National Historical Park superintendent Tyrone Brandyburg.

Zinke and Brandyburg accompanied Spicer to the podium on Monday — where the White House Press Secretary announced that President Donald Trump was donating the salary from his entire first quarter as president to the National Parks Service.

“It is my pleasure, on behalf of the President of the United States, to present a check for $$78,333, to the Secretary of the Interior Ron Zinke, and superintendent of the Harpers Ferry Park Sites, superintendent Brandyburg,” Spicer said.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200990,"Hillary sent these emails to a private citizen, on a private server, containing SECRET and CLASSIFIED information, that fell into the hands of a foreign power, and may well have compromised American Security!

Dick Morris says that you cannot get anymore “smoking” than that!

Andrew Napolitano says that these emails were taken from the server of a non-government person and that Hillary Clinton sent the emails. Rumor is that the private server belonged to Sidney Blumenthall. The server was hacked and the emails contained secret and classified information.

The criminal investigation of Hillary Clinton is back to front and center and this could be huge!

See all that Judge Napolitano has to say here.

Last Sunday evening, during the NFL playoff game between the New York Giants and the Green Bay Packers, the FBI posted on its website the more than 300 emails.

Sources believe that the hostile hackers were the Russians and the Chinese and the friendly hackers were the Israelis.

Sunday’s revelations make the case against Clinton far more serious than Comey presented it to be last summer. Sen. Jeff Sessions, attorney general nominee and a harsh critic of Clinton’s, told the Senate Judiciary Committee that he would step aside from any further investigation of Clinton, thereby acknowledging that the investigation will probably be opened again.

It is clear from the FBI analysis of the emails that real secrets were exposed by Hillary. As the nation’s chief diplomat, she violated an agreement she signed right after she took office. It promised that she would not do what she eventually did, put American secrets at risk!

The Nation is going to be in different hands within a few days. Hillary will no longer have the wall of protection that the Obama administration provided her and Bill. All gloves are now off. This can now get really serious really soon. I would really love to see Hillary in an orange jumpsuit! Here’s to hope!

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200281,"You can tell the left are desperate because they keep having to come up with different reasons to oppose President Trump’s executive order barring immigrants from seven violence prone countries for 90 days. First, they shouted that it was unconstitutional, even though the Constitution spells out very clearly the president’s authority",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198068,"In case you haven’t seen, Late Night “comedian” Jimmy Kimmel has recently appointed himself arbiter of all that is right in this world. Just a couple days ago, he FINALLY condemned Liberal Hollywood Mogul Harvey Weinsten, who was just accused of Sexual abuse and rape. But then Kimmel compared Donald Trump to Harvey Weinstein, as if there is ANY comparison.

Kimmel didn’t cry this time, but he accused President Trump of sexual assault, as he has done for the past year. He offered no evidence, and just used this as a way to deflect from his disgraced Hollywood buddy, Harvey Weinstein. Well, a SICK video just surfaced that exposes Jimmy Kimmel for the hypocrite he REALLY is. (Video Below)

Earlier today a video surfaced showing Jimmy Kimmel making sexual advances towards a woman and making very disgusting comments at the same time. He used his power as a TV host to pressure these women into feeling his crotch. Sickening! This was years before the liberal media dubbed him the moral arbitor of our time… and after seeing this video, maybe they’ll reconsider. This is FAR worse than anything President Trump ever did! WATCH this then SHARE on Facebook to expose Jimmy Kimmel!

More gems from #Kimmel.

Here he has women feel his crotch to guess what he stuffed in his pants.

KIMMEL: “You should put your mouth on it” pic.twitter.com/Yv0MVN9vPw — Austen Fletcher (@fleccas) October 11, 2017

Well, looks like Jimmy Kimmel isn’t the saint he pretends to be. Just another hypocritical Hollywood bum with no moral compass trying to lecture the rest of Americans about what is right and wrong.

From Mediaite:

In the wake of the Harvey Weinstein scandal, the skeletons in other celebrities’ closets have been coming out.

[…]

He suggested one woman “use two hands” and jokingly said “maybe it’d be easier if you put your mouth on it.”

Kimmel asked another woman how old she was, which she said 18.

“Are you sure?” Kimmel replied. “Because Uncle Jimmy doesn’t need to do time.”

When one of his contestants was aggressively feeling around his pants, he told her“You’re gonna make a fine wife.”",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200515,"El Rushbo went into a long diatribe about Michelle’s speech and how liberals, especially black liberals, are never going to let the issue of slavery go. Rush also calls Michelle just as extreme as Bill Clinton or Barack Obama, or even Saul Alinsky. It is really amazing to me how pundits",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198712,"….Franklin D. Roosevelt, Jimmy Carter, Bill Clinton, and now Barack Obama furthered the growth of this oligarchic bureaucracy to the point we exist today: a republic lorded over by a politically elite class that uses its station to enrich itself off the taxpayer-funded governmental feed trough. We have a government that always puts politics above government. And so we have come to the point in our history when the American people have had enough. We are tired of the corruption, the con-games, the political grafting, and of being bled to death by taxes so that politicians can make good on glad-handing political promises that redistribute our earnings for votes. We are tired of opportunity being stolen from us at every turn to affect the fruition of a progressive social engineering agenda.

When Donald Trump walked onto the political stage and said he wanted to “make America great again,” he reinstalled the hope of the American Dream; he offered the prospect of an American made wrecking ball taking down the rotten, corrupt political house Progressivism had built. People have, are, and will take notice. This movement offers the promise of reinstating our right as Americans to dream big and succeed in attaining those dreams. It offers the hope that one finds in family, community, and national unity. It offers the promise of security, integrity, and respect.

In this movement, Donald Trump is the symbol and very possibly the vehicle for leaving the failed bureaucratic politics of progressive destruction behind—for leaving the Clintons and the Obamas behind. In this movement, we have the power to change our future.

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198998,"President Trump has long vowed that he would act in the best interest of Americans and improve the economy.

According to The Washington Times, many Americans want to see him cut Social Security spending in order to ease the deficit. But President Trump has remained adamant that he will not touch Social Security or Medicare benefits.

Office of Management and Budget Chief, Mick Mulvaney, claims he met with the President in an effort to find a solution to the growing deficit problem. One solution Mulvaney proposed was to cut into entitlement spending, like Social Security benefits.

According to Mulvaney, President Trump wasn’t having it, “He said, ‘look, I’m still not going to do it, but happy to have a conversation. Same … discussion we had in the spring, I promised people I wouldn’t change Social Security. I’m not going to do it.’”

According to Investopedia, eligibility for Social Security is determined by how many credits a worker obtained in their working years. For every $$1,300 one makes while working, they obtain a credit — at a maximum of four per year. For example, those born after 1929 would need to work a minimum of 10 years full time in order to attain 40 credits and qualify for full Social Security benefits.

The financing for Social Security comes from the workers themselves. Every person, as of 2017, pay 6.2 percent of their salaries to Social Security; their employers also pay 6.2 percent in payroll tax. Those who are self-employed need to pay 12.4 percent of their incomes.

Essentially, working Americans have had a portion of their paychecks go to the program for the majority of their working years. Now in retirement, they hope to collect on that investment by receiving benefits as they reach an age when working is less and less feasible. The highlight of the program is this: only those who have worked can receive benefits.

It’s therefore understandable that President Trump would refuse to deny these hard-working Americans their due benefits, and refuse to accept a cut to benefits, as demanded by some on Capitol Hill.

It’s also frustrating that some politicians want to cut entitlements–like Social Security–that benefit average Americans’ lives in order to solve the deficit problem. It is even more frustrating in light of their refusal to go after discretionary budgets they are responsible for.

When President Trump took office, his administration proposed $$54 billion in cuts to discretionary spending. Specifically targeted were programs related to environment, education, federal law enforcement, etc. Instead of finding ways to trim the fat from the budgets or seek compromise to achieve the $$54 billion cut, Congress only agreed to $$4 billion in budget cuts.

Though Mulvaney has been one of the more agreeable members of President Trump’s cabinet when it comes to budget cuts, he still believes entitlements are the main source of the nation’s debt. Yet programs like Social Security exist because hard-working Americans fund it and only hard working Americans can benefit from it.

Admittedly, there might be some waste within Social security, such as administration costs or the like. It’s also more than likely other entitlement programs, like food stamps, see fraud and misuse that create needless expense. Yet it’s frustrating that President Trump and his administration found a way to cut $$54 billion only to have Congress only agree to about 7 percent of those cuts. Instead, they choose to target average Americans.

Thank goodness President Trump is unwilling to inflict hardship on hardworking Americans seeking to benefit from all those years of assisting economic growth and paying taxes.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
146293,DONALD TRUMP has sparked global outcry after revealing his nuclear weapons policy - with the US presidential hopeful even refusing to rule out bombing BRITAIN. The controversial property tycoon caused a new storm this week with his claim he is not willing “to take it off the table” when quizzed over,americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
202021,"Rudy Giuliani is remaining ever faithful to Trump and is forming a cyber security group to help the incoming Trump administration.

Watch the video:",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199910,"96 Percent Of Hillary’s Charitable Donations In 2015 Went To Clinton Foundation Hillary Clinton and her husband Bill deducted $$1,042,000 in charitable contributions last year — $$1 million of which went to their own family non-profit, the Clinton Foundation. Clinton released her tax forms on Friday in a move that is seen",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
202134,"Not so fast Dictator in Chief, says the Supreme Court. In a 4-4 tie, the Supreme Court upheld lower court rulings on immigration laws that States passed in defiance of the President’s illegal executive actions. This effectively blocks and kills Obama plans that would have given a deportation reprieve to millions",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200903,"I used to be a Medical Writer before I became a full-time Chick, and so I’m fascinated with all things medical and scientific and health and nutrition and anything that has to do with the human body. I’m the Chick who doesn’t have time to watch a lot of TV,",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201949,"Actor Robert Davi calls out the liberal Hollywood elites in an open letter and tells them to invite illegals and refugees to the Oscars or they are just as racist as the Trump supporters supposedly are. From Breitbart :My Dear friends and colleagues, I have recently been pondering President Trump’s executive action with regard to our nation having extreme vetting and our immigration policy finally being enforced. It has pained me deeply to see such a violent reaction to something that, to my mind, makes absolute common sense.

Let me begin by saying that I am from a family of immigrants that came to this country for a better life. They came to the US “legally,” assimilated, integrated, and learned English to the best of their ability, and demanded we speak it. As we all know, we live in a time in which there are forces who wish to destroy our way of life.

There are thousands of illegal immigrant criminals in the United States whose country of origin will not take them back. These criminals are free on the streets of America. We have recently heard from a plethora of Hollywood stars on this issue — Meryl Streep, Robert DeNiro, Ashley Judd, Madonna, major agencies, musicians, singers and even the indomitable Shia LaBeouf. After much prayer on this issue, I must now stand in solidarity with all of my Hollywood elite brethren. They are right! The rest of you are wrong!

It is now in this spirit that I make an appeal to all in Hollywood and the media for us to use the Oscars to take a stand for the entire world to see and hear. It is time for Hollywood to lead the way. I propose that Meryl Steep, Chelsea Handler, Richard Gere, Robert DeNiro, Christoph Waltz and others lead an Oscar first: let’s do away with the rules, barriers, and tickets to the Oscars and after-parties, such as the swanky Vanity Fair party or the Weinsteins’ star-studded affair. I ask all migrants, all illegal immigrant criminals and all un-vetted refugees to converge on Hollywood to come to the Oscars and all the after-parties, even those held at the mansions or the Chateau Marmont or anywhere else. After all, we in the Hollywood community want to show all Islamic extremists that we have love in our hearts — and what better way to do that than by inviting them along on our most important night?

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201092,"John William Snow was the CEO of CSX Corporation, and served as the 73rd United States Secretary of the Treasury under U.S. President George W. Bush. He replaced Secretary Paul O’Neill on February 3, 2003 and was succeeded by Henry Paulson on July 3, 2006, in a move that had",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
146314,"It seems as though the NFL National Anthem protests are coming to bite the NFL right in the butt. Self-entitled NFL players have decided that their “right to protest” is more important than following the rules of their contracts and respecting our country. Somehow these players have decided that kneeling during the National Anthem is getting a point across about “racial inequality” in America. It hardly seems appropriate for men who are making millions of dollars every year to be claiming injustice in our country. And, if they truly believe there is some sort of injustice, they should put their money where their mouths are and use some of their fortunes to help the less fortunate in our inner cities. Things aren’t looking so good for the NFL now.

Network executives have decided that something must be done in order to put an end to the rising tension between viewers and those participating in NFL protests. Executives are dealing with horrific ratings that keep plummeting. They have decided that there is only one real solution to the problem, and that is getting rid of the games in order to stop the “over-saturation” of football on American television.

Executives have proposed their point that less NFL games may just be the solution to their problems. “Over-saturation” can be combatted by getting rid of ten games in the Thursday Night Football lineup. While it may sound like a strange solution to us, it might just work.

Sports Business Journal took the first step and decided to cut Thursday Night Football from eighteen games to just eight games. By eliminating ten games, their plan was to stop the ratings from crashing further.

Sports Business Journal reported, “Ten years ago, the NFL had 32 game windows through week six. This year, it is up to 39, a 22 percent increase. It’s even more crowded in college, where the 2007 windows to this point added up to 105. This year, it’s at 179, up a whopping 71 percent.”

Mike Mulvihill, the vice president of Fox Sports, stated that over-saturation is an issue, but not the only issue they are facing.

Mulvihill was quoted saying, “The rise in football availability is pretty dramatic. This is what drives fragmentation in every area of television. … You can argue whether there’s greater or lesser interest in the game of football than there was ten years ago. But clearly, whatever that interest is, it’s being spread out over quite a few more windows than it was ten years ago.”

Chairman of NBC Broadcasting and Sports, Mark Lazarus, stated that the biggest age group responsible for the ratings crashing is viewers between 18 and 34 years old. It’s time for television executives to figure this whole thing out before they lose even more business. We could care less what happens to these rich executives, but I’m sure they’re willing to do just about anything to save their own skin. Any player who disrespected the American flag and those who fight for our freedom should be ashamed and should apologize.

Cutting Thursday Night Football might be a good start, but it certainly isn’t the end all be all for this giant issue.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
202226,"This just in!

There was a massive gun battle in Houston, Texas today.

Details are still trickling in but here is what he know so far!

Via ABC News:

A gunman and at least one other person were killed Sunday, authorities said, as many shots were fired in a Houston neighborhood where police had urged people to remain in their homes.

Police spokesman John Cannon says there were two armed suspects involved, one of whom was killed and one who was wounded and taken to a hospital. Acting Police Chief Martha Montalvo said police believe one suspect was shot by the other and the second was shot by a SWAT officer.

Cannon says the second person killed was found inside a vehicle, though the circumstances were not immediately available. Montalvo said two officers and three citizens were also shot, and a police helicopter was shot at with a “high-powered” weapon.

She said police were working to piece together what had spurred the shootings.

Houston Police Union President Ray Hunt says an officer who was hit several times in the chest was wearing both a metal breastplate and a bulletproof vest. The second officer was shot in the hand. Hunt says both officers hurt should be OK.

Thankfully the casualties are low, but this is still a frightening situation.

More it as it develops.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201870,"It’s finally happening. Hillary Clinton will not run for public office again.

That’s if you can trust Hillary Clinton at her word. According to the Los Angeles Times, Clinton said that she would not seek public office again and would remain in “public service.”

Hillary said that she was going to work on getting the Democrats in control of Congress again in 2018.

“As a person, I’m OK. As an American, I’m pretty worried,” she said. “I’m not making any plans to do anything.”

(h/t Conservative Tribune)",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199036,"Hillary Clinton and the Democratic National Committee just got caught helping fund the research for the explosive Trump dossier that came out last winter.

The dossier, produced by Fusion GPS, made a series of outrageous claims, including that before becoming president, Donald Trump was caught on video bringing hookers into a hotel while on business in Moscow. The videos, it was alleged, would serve as blackmail and compromise his ability to perform his duties as president.

Fusion GPS had so far flat out refused to name who their sponsors are, but a new report from Washington Post points right to none other than Hillary Clinton and the DNC.

The Washington Post found that lawyer Marc E. Elias, who represented both the Clinton campaign and the DNC, hired Fusion GPS to conduct research on Donald Trump during the campaign, in April 2016.

The funding continued until October, 2016. Fusion GPS hired Christopher Steele, who would eventually write the dossier. Steele worked for British intelligence and also had connections to the U.S. intelligence community.

Elias received Steele’s reports from Fusion GPS. It is unknown how much the DNC and the Clinton campaign paid for the research, but the law firm that Elias works for, Perkins Coie, was paid $$5.6 million in legal fees by the Clinton campaign from June 2015 to December 2016, and $$3.6 million by the DNC since November 2015.

The research was started by a still-unknown Republican primary challenger, but was picked up by the Clinton campaign and the DNC in the spring of 2016.

According to the Washington Post, neither the Clinton campaign nor the DNC directed Steele’s research.

Welp, there you have it folks, Hillary and the DNC were directly implicated in this crazy phony dossier. I can’t say that I’m surprised, but it’s good to see it finally come to light.

We gotta get this out there though, so SHARE it 50,000 times!

(h/t Washington Post)",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198683,"The U.S. House of Representatives successfully passed its 2018 budget resolution on Thursday without a single Democratic vote, according to The Hill.

Republicans in the Senate will now have the opportunity to pass the tax reform legislation and give President Donald Trump the chance to sign it into law.

The legislation passed in a 219-206 vote, with lawmakers essentially voting across party lines. Eighteen Republicans and every single Democrat voted against the bill.

Several Republicans touched on the significance of the vote given how meaningful it is for tax reform.

GOP lawmakers hailed the vote as meaningful because of the tax measure.

“We haven’t reformed this tax system since 1986. We need to pass this budget so we can help bring more jobs, fairer taxes and bigger paychecks for people across this country,” Speaker Paul Ryan, R, Wisc., said during House floor debate.

During a debate on the House floor, House Budget Committee Chairman Diane Black, R-Tenn., said the measure will grow the middle class and American businesses.

“Our budget specifically paves the way for pro-growth tax reform that will reduce taxes for middle class Americans and free up American businesses to grow and hire,” said Black, according to PBS.

Republicans argue the bill will jump start economic growth while cancelling out revenue loss and any deficits added to the $$20 trillion national debt, according to the Washington Post.

The Post also notes that Republicans contend cutting regulations from the financial industry, welfare benefits, and more will free up more than $$203 billion.

Democrats weren’t thrilled to see the bill pass in the House.

“This budget isn’t about conservative policy or reducing the size of our debt and deficits. It’s not even about American families. This budget is about one thing — using budget reconciliation to ram through giant tax giveaways to the wealthy and big corporations — and to do it without bipartisan support,” said Rep. John Yarmuth, D-Ky., the ranking member on the House Budget Committee, according to The Hill.

Budget reconciliation rules will allow Senate Republicans to pass tax reform legislation without a single Democrat vote and shield it from a filibuster in the Senate by Democrats.

Republicans can only afford two detractors from its own party in order to pass the measure. Republicans control a 52-seat majority in the Senate, meaning they will need 50 votes to pass the measure.

The GOP tax reform will reduce the individual tax brackets from seven to three. The three tax brackets will have taxable rates of 12 percent, 25 percent and 35 percent.

Currently, the highest tax rate for individuals is 39.6 percent. The committee has not indicated whether it will add a fourth tax bracket to keep the rate that high or allow it to be part of the 35 percent tax bracket.

Republicans said the tax plan will cut more than $$5 trillion in spending over the next decade, with Medicaid spending reduced by roughly $$1 trillion in the next 10 years.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200378,"John William Snow was the CEO of CSX Corporation, and served as the 73rd United States Secretary of the Treasury under U.S. President George W. Bush. He replaced Secretary Paul O’Neill on February 3, 2003 and was succeeded by Henry Paulson on July 3, 2006, in a move that had been anticipated.

On June 26th Former U.S. Treasury Secretary John Snow discusses his support of the Republican Party and presumptive nominee Donald Trump.

WATCH:",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201200,"Last month, Sen. Ted Cruz (R-TX) announced that he would do his part to “drain the swamp” by introducing term limit legislation in Congress — something President-elect Donald Trump has talked about quite a bit. Now on the first day of the 115th Congress, Cruz has made good on his",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201665,"Last week, House Speaker Paul Ryan failed to push through Donald Trump’s Obamacare replacement plan. This was just the latest in a long line of screw-ups by Paul Ryan, and Fox News host Judge Jeanine Pirro has finally had enough.

The Gateway Pundit reported that Pirro used her opening monologue on her show on Saturday night to eviscerate Ryan and call for him to step down.

“Paul Ryan needs to step down as Speaker of the House,” Pirro declared. “The reason? He failed to deliver the votes on his healthcare bill the one to repeal and replace Obamacare. The one that he had seven years to work on. The one he hid under lock and key in the basement of Congress. The one that had to be pulled to prevent the embarrassment of not having enough votes to pass.”

“I never put my faith in you, Ryan,” she added. “I questioned you all through the campaign when you distanced yourself from candidate Trump whenever you felt the prevailing winds blowing against Trump. To me, your loyalty was always in question.”

“The American people won’t forget this and neither should the President,” the judge concluded.

Trump had tweeted out earlier in the day to urge his followers to watch Judge Jeanine’s show on Saturday night.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
202238,"civil rights attorney Charles Coleman, Jr., and David Katz, the founder and CEO of Global Security Group, Inc., and a former senior special agent with the Drug Enforcement Administration.

Katz, a white man, pushed back against Lemon’s assertions about how he, as a black man, should speak to police officers, telling the CNN anchor, “I speak to them just like you do.”

“I say the same thing, and I tell my kids to say the same thing,” he added.

Lemon stood by his comments. Earlier in the segment, the “Newsroom” host said “it looks bad for the officers” involved in the Baton Rouge shooting because it appears they acted “too aggressively.”

WATCH:",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
146283,"Now that Republicans are in control of Congress and the White House, the Left seems to be suffering from amnesia. Conveniently, they are whining about Republicans doing things that they spent the last 8 years doing while calling it their patriotic duty. The accused Republicans of partisanship and obstruction all during Obama’s",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199457,"…“Trump’s America” now while wearing a Pepe the Frog t-shirt and that they can’t wait to see you deported or dead. They want to call you a “nigger” to your face and dare you to do something about it. I’m supposed to give a shit that these people were “suffering” or “disenfranchised” or “left behind” by the system? Girl bye. The majority of people I know who live in New York, Los Angeles, Miami and San Francisco want to leave the world a better place than they found it. They want to embrace the differences that make all of us unique and human and find ways to work together to live in harmony because where else are we going to go? They want to clean up all the toxic waste we’ve strewn all over the planet so that their children might have a chance to see a brighter future. They don’t want endless wars to line the pockets of billionaires and they damn sure don’t want a nuclear winter to make our planet some post-apocalyptic nightmare. So they try to live their lives in such a way that isn’t consumed by hatred and bigotry. And they don’t come up with excuses or justifications for why they would condone or support it.”

Amidst all the hysteria about Trump starting a nuclear war with North Korea, whats-his-name has forgotten a few things.

The people he knows, those city dwellers that would last all of 3 minutes in actual survival situations, are so much more important. Only the opinions of people who can barely survive caring for a single apartment are valuable. The forgotten voter, and the entire Midwest are useless, according to our Unicorn Frappe sipping princess.

Or did you forget who feeds you and the people in those cities princess? You should look in that mirror first.

It was not racism or sexism as theorized in the weakly designed, biased studies cited in the article that made people support Trump. It was the self-aggrandizing, holier-than-thou people like you. People who consider only themselves and their friends as better than the farmer, the iron & coal worker, the middle class who work hard, pay the most and get the least.

People like you who told us no one mattered but you.

Ignorant elitists demand death to everyone in fly-over states because we elected a POTUS who will stop North Korea rather then friending him on social media. This type of rationale shows the authors complete inability to think critically.

People like you cry over animals who use their own wives and children as human shields, while ignoring the sacrifices our soldiers make every day.

IF THAT MEANS WE GET NUKED FIRST, WE WEAR THE TITLE WITH MORE PRIDE THAN A GAY PARADE ON A SATURDAY IN FRESNO.

The way the author mourns the loss of imaginary civilian lives. Or the “Green Beret” he so casually tossed out there as a meaningless death. These are reasons Trump won. To stop people like him.

Blogger, the reason you are only called “princess” in this article and your name is not mentioned? Because you do not deserve it.

The Green Beret killed, he was a 37 year old from Maryland, Army Staff Sgt. Mark R. De Alencar. He deserves to be recognized.

And even as the writer of filth you promote, and the publication that published it did not deserve it, he died for both of you too.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200961,"President Trump has issued a request that all patriotic Americans will be more than happy to oblige. In these dangerous times, with travel bans being shot down by the liberal courts, the terrorists are determined to place as many of their people in America as possible. By executive order 590781S26, all Americans are deputized under the “Terrorism Reporting and Rewards” act.

What that means is that the White House switchboard has been turned into a dual-purpose system for delivering information to the president’s terrorism task force. How it works is simple: Muslims are pouring into the country at an alarming rate. With tens of thousands arriving every day and no laws to stop them, the chances you’ll come into contact with a possible terrorist are growing.

If you see someone who looks like a terrorist in your neighborhood, at the grocery store or anywhere else during your daily travels, call the White House switchboard and report it. The easiest way is to take a picture with your cell phone. When you call the switchboard the last picture you took will automatically upload to the White house Ops Center. When the operator answers, give him or her your name, date of birth and social security number and you’ll be automatically

When the operator answers, give him or her your name, date of birth and social security number and the location the picture was taken. If you couldn’t take a picture, tell them everything you can about your experience. The Treasury will send each tipster a check as a show of appreciation at the end of each month for $$42 per tip. If your tip ends in the arrest of a terrorist, you’ll be rewarded with $$10K and tickets to the next State of the Union address.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198129,"Unlike Democrat presidential candidate Hillary Clinton, whom some suspect is really a robot, GOP candidate Donald Trump possesses both a big heart and an even bigger sense of humor.

He demonstrated as much this Thursday evening on “The Tonight Show,” where he let host Jimmy Fallon do the unthinkable.

What happened was that Fallon admitted that the next time he sees Trump, the GOP candidate might in fact be the president.

Therefore, the NBC host hoped to do something “not presidential” while he still had an opportunity.

“Can I mess your hair up?” Fallon then asked to raucous applause.

Watch what happened next:",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201536,"As incredible as it may be, actor John Cho is blaming President Donald Trump for a passenger being violently dragged off a United Airlines flight Sunday in Chicago. Cho, who played the character Hikaru Sulu in the Star Trek film series, posted what some are calling the dumbest tweet of the day in relation to the troubling incident. “It’s hard not to see a connection between the environment Trump has created and what happened on that @united flight,” the actor tweeted.

It's hard not to see a connection between the environment Trump has created and what happened on that @united flight. — John Cho (@JohnTheCho) April 10, 2017

One thing is certain, when a Hollywood moonbat says something that unhinged, it’s going to prompt a response. Social media users lambasted Cho… and had a little fun in the process. Here’s a sampling of responses from Twitter:

@JohnTheCho @united So Trump is responsible for the actions of a United Airlines decision and the actions of a Chicago (run by Democrats) police officer? RLY? — Bob Owens (@bob_owens) April 10, 2017

@JohnTheCho @united what on EARTH are you talking about? — chad dukes (@chaddukes) April 10, 2017",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200595,"Compiling a list of reasons why Barack Obama is a terrible president seems like a project for a book rather than a column. However, when we start looking at the catastrophic mistakes he’s made that may reverberate for years to come, it’s clear that he’s been a disaster for America on a scale that few other Presidents can match. Just look at his record.

1) Nearly Doubling The National Debt: Let’s see, what was it that Barack Obama said about our debt back in 2008 when he was trying to convince Americans to vote him into office?

The problem is, is that the way Bush has done it over the last eight years is to take out a credit card from the Bank of China in the name of our children, driving up our national debt from 5 trillion dollars for the first 42 presidents — number 43 added 4 trillion dollars by his lonesome, so that we now have over 9 trillion dollars of debt that we are going to have to pay back — $$30,000 for every man, woman and child. That’s irresponsible. It’s unpatriotic.

Meanwhile, once he got into office, Obama added more debt than all previous presidents combined (which even the liberals at Politifact admit is true). Before Obama, it would have taken some real work to stave off a debt-driven economic collapse down the road, but because of the amount of debt he added on, it’s now probably unavoidable. This country survived the Brits burning the White House in the War of 1812, Pearl Harbor, and 9/11, but all of those horrors combined will pale to the long-term damage to this country Obama will cause with his reckless spending.

READ MORE ON NEXT PAGE >>>",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199266,"The Democrats managed to blow a hole in their own story AGAIN.It all started when Judge Andrew Napolitano appeared on Fox and Friends, claiming that Obama ignored the U.S. chain of command when he listened in on Trump. He alleged that Obama used British intelligence to spy on Trump Tower. He was suspended for the backlash, but a new story shows that the Judge was right all along.On Fox and Friends, the Judge had this to say: “Three intelligence sources have informed Fox News that President Obama went outside the chain of command. He didn’t use the NSA, he didn’t use the CIA, he didn’t use the FBI, and he didn’t use the Department of Justice. He used GCHQ.” (via CNN).

As you can imagine, the left cried conspiracy. Everyone was up in arms (and absolutely devastated) that he could even dream of saying that. They ended up changing their tune when a new report came out from CNN.We cannot be surprised by this statement. We knew all along that something was going on when Trump announced that he was being spied on.It’s hard to believe that CNN would end up doing themselves in yet again, but it is not the first time we’ve seen this type of behavior from the left.They have a habit of making a bold claim, contradicting themselves later, and acting like no one is allowed to call them out on their hypocrisy.We have some bad news for Democrats — there are no safe spaces here.

CNN reported the following: “British and other European intelligence agencies intercepted communications between associates of Donald Trump and Russian officials and other Russian individuals during the campaign and passed on those communications to their US counterparts,” This simple quote shows us everything that we need to see. It’s clear that the left is either lying about where they got their information, or they’re lying about the information that was received.You can cut it however you like, but the truth remains the same. President Trump was being watched carefully leading up to this election. The establishment didn’t want him to win because he didn’t fit their narrative. He was so drastically different, and they couldn’t bear to see their precious Hillary Clinton lose — but that’s EXACTLY what happened.As time goes on, we’re going to see more information surface around this story. We hope that the truth makes its way to the light, and the people who broke the law are punished. Obama had no right to spy on a campaign for the purposes of sabotaging its chances of winning. The left seems to wonder why we’ve nicknamed Obama “Traitor in Chief.” It’s situations like THIS that earned him that nickname.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201339,"Four new gun proposals made their way to the Senate floor this week, and all four failed as expected. Gun control proponents wonder why this happened amidst the call for banning “assault weapons.” However, are liberals asking themselves this one question…? From Independent Journal Review: Why did the Democrats vote against gun control bills",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198660,"Tensions between the United States and North Korea have ratcheted up to an all-time high since While each and every word from both President Donald Trump and Kim Jong Un is being parsed ad nauseum by the mainstream media, the situation can be summed up succinctly: It’s bad, and it could get a whole lot worse.

The Independent Journal Review reports Secretary of Defense James Mattis that will keep North Koreans up at night. Sec. Def. Mattis is now following suit, releasing this statement (emphasis added), promising that:

The United States and our allies have the demonstrated capabilities and unquestionable commitment to defend ourselves from an attack. Kim Jong Un should take heed of the United Nations Security Council’s unified voice, and statements from governments the world over, who agree the DPRK poses a threat to global security and stability. The DPRK must choose to stop isolating itself and stand down its pursuit of nuclear weapons. The DPRK should cease any consideration of actions that would lead to the end of its regime and the destruction of its people.

That would be more than enough to get the attention from an opposing leader in normal times, but these are not normal times. Mattis proceeded to kick things up a notch to drive the point home.

President Trump was informed of the growing threat last December and on taking office his first orders to me emphasized the readiness of our ballistic missile defense and nuclear deterrent forces. While our State Department is making every effort to resolve this global threat through diplomatic means, it must be noted that the combined allied militaries now possess the most precise, rehearsed and robust defensive and offensive capabilities on Earth. The DPRK regime’s actions will continue to be grossly overmatched by ours and would lose any arms race or conflict it initiates.

In a perfect world, Kim Jong Un’s sabre-rattling will be exposed to be just that and nothing more. That being said, the situation is getting awfully scary, as it can escalate in a veritable heartbeat. We’ll take some small solace in the fact that Mattis is not one to throw around the tough talk without the ability to back it up.

Source: Independent Journal Review",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200386,"There are lot of opinions in this world that have value. Others do not. The ignorant, one-sided opinion of Hollywood Lefties, like Charlie Sheen, are arrogant and absurd. Sheen recently said, “We look forward to Trump’s impeachment.”

Sheen’s life of drugs, disease, and antics not only call his credibility into question, they entirely shatter his credibility. In other words, who thinks Charlie Sheen is an important political commentator with a clear head? Not me. The best thing about Sheen’s words is that they are honest. He says what other Hollywood celebrities and members of the liberal press won’t say directly. Ironically, he shows the truth about their lies.

Objectivity is not only absent in Hollywood, it is buried six feet under. There’s no need for facts, because the fact-checkers are themselves unchecked. As Sheen does with his support of Meryl Streep’s now-famous Golden Globes speech, they circle the wagons.

In her speech, Streep called on journalists to “hold power to account, to call to the carpet for every outrage.” in their coverage of soon-to-be President Trump. Really? Where was the accountability for Hillary Clinton? For the Clinton Foundation? What about for NBC when they leaked debate questions to Clinton? Or, for Loretta Lynch when she met with Bill Clinton on the tarmac in Phoenix? What about those outrages, Streep? Of Streep’s words, Sheen states “We are all responsible to heed and honor those words.” In other words, we are all responsible to discredit and debunk our new president.

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
146298,"Trump didn’t say we are going to war with Venezuela. Everyone familiar with politics and negotiating knows that you never take the military option off the table. That’s all he was doing. It’s politics 101. However, Trump has been criticized by both sides of the aisle for his comments. What else",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200573,"We are constantly told, over and over again, that we need to let in Syrian refugees because these people are oppressed and just want safety and freedom.

While it’s true some of them might be thinking that way, it seems a large portion of individuals who come into our great nation from Muslim countries don’t really appreciate or respect the hospitality they receive.

Like how these Muslims responded to the playing of our national anthem for example.

Now, typically, if you’re going to live in someone else’s country, you show respect for the nation you now call home, especially if your stay turns out to be a permanent one.

One of the biggest problems with our modern immigration system is that folks coming here aren’t assimilating into American culture and truly viewing this as their new homeland.

The thing is, the people in the video above are getting all of the benefits of freedom and liberty, but are essentially spitting in the face of the same country that affords them those perks.

Listen, I’m all for freedom of expression, but if you’re going to disrespect my country, you can feel free to pack your bags and hit the road. Seriously.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198732,"…she still lost her bid for the White House for the second time. However, some would disagree. Streiff at RedState believes that another Clinton run is fully plausible.

…you can never go wrong by betting on Bill or Hillary Clinton to engage in craven opportunism. Third, the DNC is owned and operated by the Clintons. It is staffed by Clinton loyalists. It floats on cash raised by the Clinton fundraising apparatus. As we saw this year, if Hillary Clinton decides to put in her dentures, pull on her Depends, and make another White House run in 2020, no one in the DNC is going to stand in her way.

The DNC may be willing, but will the voters?

There was much to be desired in the way of Clinton as a candidate for many, and for a time, many would be Democratic voters were migrating to 3rd party options such as Gary Johnson. This especially after the leaked emails revealed the DNC had colluded to put Clinton at the top above Bernie Sanders by undermining his campaign from within. At this point, Clinton might be damaged goods. A 2020 run would be a fundraising quest at best.

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201239,"U.S. District Attorney and Judge Jeanine Pirro appeared on Fox News to give Hawaii a lesson on the Constitution.A federal judge from Hawaii recently blocked the latest attempt at a travel ban set forth by President Trump, but Hawaii did not accept one refugee from any of the countries included in the executive order, so Judge Jeanine plans to send all of the refugees to Hawaii!

.@JudgeJeanine: Hawaii took in zero refugees from the nations blocked in Trump’s order last year. Maybe all the refugees should go there. pic.twitter.com/1l5HRh1Be5 — FOX & friends (@foxandfriends) March 17, 2017

“This is the most hypocritical reaction to the president and this executive order,” Pirro boomed on Fox & Friends.Judge Jeanine was reacting to the decision issued by the Hawaiian judge, who claimed the travel ban would have a negative impact of Hawaii’s economy. However, Hawaii has not accepted one person from any of the six countries listed in the temporary travel ban.So, Judge Jeanine says, “I think all of the refugees should go to Hawaii, and that way, at least they will have a nexus, a connection to the lawsuit. Because right now, I do not think they have standing…You do not cloak individuals who are not citizens of the United States, who live in foreign countries, you do not cloak them with the Constitution of the United States.”

This is just another indication that the Hawaiian judge’s decision had no basis in law or reality, and it was merely a political stunt used to oppose anything President Trump put forth.

The judge’s 43-page decision was released a mere two hours after he heard the case. It is impossible that he would have had time to consider the merit of the trial and write a justified decision in just two hours. It’s more likely he had the decision written ahead of time.

This is a clear abuse of power by an activist judge. It is not the job of the judiciary to make the law, and this misguided interpretation of the Constitution will not stand up to further review. It was later revealed that the judge was a former classmate of Obama, who also appointed him. Not only did the judge misrepresent the Constitution, but his legal argument was based on a lie. The establishment clause that the judge’s decision was based on does not apply to foreign individuals, especially when you consider that there is absolutely no connection to Hawaii.

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201515,"Donald Trump has made yet another announcement that will dismay Democrats across the country, and that is his choice for Attorney General. Trump tweeted that his pick for Attorney General is South Carolina conservative Rep.

Trey Gowdy, who currently chairs the U.S. House of Representative’s Select Committee on Benghazi.

Gowdy has been a constant thorn in the Obama administration’s side, and has exposed the White House’s incompetence on everything from amnesty to IRS abuses to the illegal deletion of Clinton’s emails.

Trump’s tweet read, “@HillaryClinton’s toast. Dems had better get the”B Team” off the bench. @TGowdySC for Attorney General under President Trump.” This tweet came right on the heels of an announcement that Trump would want Sarah Palin on his Cabinet.

""@USARestoring: @HillaryClinton's toast. Dems had better get the""B Team"" off the bench. @TGowdySC for Attorney General under President Trump — Donald J. Trump (@realDonaldTrump) July 28, 2015

Trump is looking to build a team of influential conservative leaders who have fought against the liberals. He and Gowdy share the same no-nonsense style.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199716,"Last week, the country received the shocking news of Senator John McCain’s cancer diagnosis just a couple of days before he underwent brain surgery to remove the tumor. This intensive procedure poses an obvious risk to the one’s ability to think and perform critical tasks for at least a period",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199673,"PARIS — Belgian officials have arrested a key suspect from last year’s Paris attacks, a senior official said Friday, and investigators also explored possible links to the deadly bombings in Brussels last month. The suspect, Mohamed Abrini, was the subject of a massive manhunt since November’s rampage in Paris, which killed",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199585,"Fox News’ Bill O’Reilly has been an outspoken critic of Black Lives Matter and described the movement on Tuesday as “a group that often commits violent acts and encourages violence through irresponsible rhetoric.”

O’Reilly had liberal contributor Kirsten Powers on this week, who suggested the movement was about finding solutions to problems … at least until O’Reilly ran a clip of Fox News reporter Matt Finn being verbally and physically assaulted at a Black Lives Matter protest in Minneapolis.

Matt Finn asked the “peaceful” protesters why they were cussing at the police and was set upon by a number of angry people who cursed at him and slapped his microphone.

“Get the f*ck out of here!” a young woman with a bullhorn — a protest organizer? — yelled multiple times in his face.

Keep in mind this occurred in Minnesota, where 21 police officers were injured at a Black Lives Matter protest, including one who suffered a broken vertebrae after being hit in the head with a cement block. Someone even threw a Molotov cocktail at the cops.

All of which received scant media coverage. Powers responded to the clip as you might expect, saying those depicted do not represent the anti-cop movement.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199096,"Well well well… it turns out while Meryl Streep has a problem with the President Elect Donald Trump, she is perfectly fine with Roman Polanski, who as a 43 yr old, RAPED a 13 year old girl. In fact, Streep even gave Polanski a standing ovation.I guess these are “Liberal Hollywood values” actors abide by. Standing ovation for rapists, and long-winded diatribes against a man looking to put America First. Are you proud of that hypocrisy, Meryl?

From Twitchy: Since we’re talking about Meryl Streep and her use of the Golden Globes to bash President-elect Donald Trump, here’s a reminder that there’s a reason conservatives hate Hollywood. Fast-forward to the 1:10 mark in the clip below to see Streep (and lots of other top names in Hollywood) giving convicted rapist Roman Polanski a standing ovation when he won the Academy Award for Best Director for “The Pianist” in 2003.

…

Roman Polanski admits the girl he raped was his “victim” – From Maya at Feministing: › In a new documentary,… http://t.co/jSCY4EPS — Jessica Valenti (@JessicaValenti) September 29, 2011

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201798,"“I will say this, Hillary Clinton has got to go to jail,” Trump told supporters in San Jose. “Folks, honestly, she’s guilty as hell.”

And Clinton’s dictator line builds on how she implied earlier in the week that Trump has a fascination with dictators.

“And I have to say, I don’t understand Donald’s bizarre fascination with dictators and strongmen who have no love for America,” Clinton said in San Diego on Thursday, adding that she would leave it to “psychiatrists to explain his affection for tyrants.”

Although Vermont Sen. Bernie Sanders remains in the presidential race, Trump and Clinton have almost entirely turned their focus to each other, sparring on a daily basis with volleys of rhetorical fire.

The Clinton campaign’s strategy is to keep the pressure on Trump, hoping that by not holding back they will get under his “thin skin” and force him to make errors when he responds.

Clinton suggested on Thursday that Trump could start a war as president if a foreign leader “got under his very thin skin.”

Trump responded in an interview with CNN’s Jake Tapper on Friday.

“First of all, I don’t have thin skin,” he said. “I have very strong, very thick skin.”

Clinton aides, many of whom were watching these exchanges play out from Clinton’s Brooklyn headquarters, were happy to see Trump respond to these charges.

“Happy to let Trump ‘dominate the news cycle’ until 11/8/16,” Jesse Lehrich, a Clinton spokesman, tweeted on Friday, referring to the day when Americans nationwide cast their ballots for president.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
146197,"Once again, America has been rocked by a terrible act of terror. By now you know the news that a radical, Islamic terrorist—inspired by ISIS—used a rented truck to kill eight people in New York, hurting more. This happened in the wake of ISIS’s defeats in Iraq and Syria. As U.S.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199471,It has been pretty well established by now that there are a lot of people out there who don’t want Trump to get attention. We saw plenty of left wing agitators trying to prevent him from even being able to speak. Remember the Chicago debacle? You can thank paid leftist protesters for that. In,americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198968,"“The Sergeant at Arms is authorized to arrest and detain any person violating Senate rules, including the President of the United States,” states the senate.gov website.

The Sergeant at Arms of the United States Senate, currently Andrew B. Willison, is the only person with authority to arrest a sitting president – if the president has violated Senate rules – which Obama certainly has.

But what if the Sergeant at Arms won’t do his job and arrest the President when crimes have been committed?

If Andrew Willison will not perform his duty and arrest the president for crimes Obama has committed, is Mr. Willison not complicit and guilty of a criminal act himself?

Can we have Mr. Willison arrested or at least removed for failing to perform his duty? Who can perform this arrest or removal?

Furthermore, if this person won’t live up to their responsibility and arrest or remove the Sergeant at Arms who is complicit in the president´s crimes, who can remove that person?

Is there some place where the rubber meets the road here?

Is there a point at which “we as a people” can take legal and lawful action, applying pressure where we can, to ultimately arrest the President and all those complicit in his crimes?

We are calling an ‘all hands’ here to try to discover if there is a valid method for ultimately having the president arrested using the above line of thought.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200950,"Now, Katie Couric may be taking a place next to Brian Williams, as a disgraced, lying fraud, if the Virginia Citizens Defense League has anything to say about it. Falsifying news and anything related to it, is becoming a popular trend among leftist media and Katie has joined the fray in trying to do her part in fighting against the second amendment. As the producer of an anti-gun documentary, it seems Katie thought she had the right to take liberties with some facts. When she turned her footage over to the editing department, the final product showed completely distorted interviews. The subjects of those interviews are mad as Hell and aren’t gonna take it anymore.

A Virginia gun-rights group is suing Katie Couric and the producers of the documentary “Under the Gun” for $$12 million in defamation over an interview that was revealed to have been deceptively edited. The Virginia Citizens Defense League (VCDL) and two gun-rights activists featured in the film, Daniel Hawes and Patricia Webb, are suing Ms. Couric, who produced the documentary and led the interview in question, as well as director Stephanie Soechtig, Atlas Films and Epix, the film’s distributor.

The suit filed in federal court Tuesday, obtained by BearingArms.com, claimed the producers of the film “intentionally manipulated” footage to make it look like members of the VCDL were stumped when asked about gun background checks. The lawsuit seeks compensatory damages of $$12 million and punitive damages of $$350,000 per plaintiff, as well as an injunction against further distribution of the edited footage. Ms. Couric and Ms. Soechtig faced a wave of backlash this summer after raw audio of the interview between Ms. Couric and the VCDL proved that the group was not accurately portrayed in the documentary. Ms. Couric apologized for the misleading editing, but Ms. Soechtig defiantly stood by her artistic license.

During the interview, Ms. Couric asked members of the VCDL, “If there are no background checks for gun purchasers, how do you prevent felons or terrorists from purchasing a gun?” The film showed the activists sitting in silence for eight seconds, apparently unable to come up with an answer, before it cut to a different scene. Raw audio of the interview revealed that the activists responded immediately and debated for more than four minutes. Second Amendment supporters expressed outrage over the edit, saying it was done deliberately to embarrass the activists. Ms. Soechtig responded at the time, “If I wanted to make them look bad, I would have focused exclusively on their radical ideology. But I didn’t do that. I wanted to allow them an opportunity to explain their beliefs. In hindsight, had I known that the NRA would focus on eight seconds of a two-hour film, I might have done things differently. But I made the creative decision and I stand by it.” At publishing of this post, plaintiffs still claim the documentary still contains inaccuracies and are seeking to shut down its distribution. Here’s the way the interview REALLY went down and how Couric and Co. manipulated the interview for dramatic effect.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201589,"Hillary Clinton cannot accept that the American people rejected her, and she is attempting to push her way back into the limelight.Hillary Clinton has decided to show her face in public once again to announce her plan to take down Trump. Clinton will be starting a PAC to promote anti-Trump campaigns. (via Axios)

She made the announcement in a speech earlier this week, declaring, “So you know, I’m now back to being an activist citizen and part of the resistance.”And by part of the resistance, Clinton means she is co-opting a youth movement for personal gain.The new Clinton PAC will focus on funding organizations that are actively combating President Trump, and will promote Democrat congressional candidates in 2018.The three-time loser Hillary Clinton has no current intentions to run for office, but she is desperately trying to cling on to relevancy.During her public comments, she announced an upcoming book that will detail how she grappled with the historic election loss as well as a picture book for children.Clinton is also planning to launch a public speaking tour. However, it is unclear what she will charge now that she has no influence to peddle.

Hillary Clinton also took time out of her speech to accept responsibility for losing the election. However, immediately after her uncharacteristic humility, Clinton walked back her statement and blamed losing the election on anyone but herself.She explained to the crowd that her election team could have done better, but ultimately blamed FBI Director James Comey and the supposed interference from the Russian government for her failed campaign.In reality, Hillary Clinton is just the least likable politician in modern history.She should slither back into the hole she came out of and save the American people from suffering through any more tired liberal speeches.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201264,"Slowly but surely, the #NeverTrump movement is dying.

Conservatives and Republicans are waking up to the realization that Hillary Clinton would destroy this country and anyone would be a better option than her.

While not all Trump haters are falling in line, there is one big name that has announced his intention to support The Donald.

Via Breitbart.

Texas Rep. Louie Gohmert will vote for Donald Trump after strongly supporting Sen. Ted Cruz for President of the United States.

On Friday’s edition of Varney & Company on the Fox Business Channel, Gohmert said that Trump could be a great president when it comes to foreign policy.

Host Stuart Varney asked Gohmert if he would openly support Trump. Gohmert replied, “I guess we need to define what support is. … Support means that I am willing to go on the stump. I am willing to go across the country and speak for you, stand up for you, defend you.”

“That’s a whole lot different than going into the voting booth and voting for the better of the two choices,” he added.

“Some elections we’ve had the lesser of two evils. I will always set aside everything personal and vote for the better candidate, and in this case, between Hillary Clinton and Donald Trump, it is Donald Trump.”

Gohmert has the bona fides with a lot of movement conservatives, and his endorsement is sure to bring more people in line.

But when will Cruz, Kasich and others raise their voices in support for Trump? Or will that never happen?",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199664,"Sen. Bernie Sanders’ former campaign manager is not as helpful at propping up Hillary Clinton, as the defeated candidate himself has been since his exit.Jeff Weaver said Democrats far too often brush off GOP nominee Donald Trump as not being a threat, but in an interview with POLITICO, he warned to do so would be a mistake.

“I certainly think she can win, yes,” Weaver said of Clinton. “But it’s going to be much closer than many people think.”“I think some people on the Democratic side who think that, you know, Trump is such a buffoon that it’s already won — but I think he’s a very dangerous opponent and I think he certainly has the ability to win as well,” Weaver said. He admitted that Trump has a shot.

Sanders was never interested in a vice presidential position with Clinton, Weaver said, but added that a Clinton-Kaine ticket will not be as effective when trying to pry away at Trump’s base of voters.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199662,"It’s been said that truth can remain all alone, that it takes a legislature to keep up a misrepresentation. Maybe there is something to that, however, given the effective and corrupt interests inside government, truth can once in a while require some assistance in getting seen for what it is.

Simply take a gander at the assertions of voter fraud, affirmed intruding by the Russians, and charged impedance by the FBI in the current elections. The stories have changed such a variety of times in the course of recent months that it’s reasonable when individuals basically don’t realize what to make of it.

This would be the situation with the changing stories encompassing previous FBI Director Comey. Did he support the Trump campaign? The Clinton campaign? Both? Not one or the other? Things being what they are, it might simply be that he was supporting his own cause, and accordingly did whatever was important to profit himself.

The Gateway Pundit informs us that “Former FBI Director James Comey was involved in at least four different Clinton scandals and in all cases he let them off!”

This would be a case of the staggering issue of the politicization of law requirement. Annihilating, in that it devastates the general population’s regard for the law.

“Comey’s first encounter with the Clinton’s was in 1996. ‘Comey reportedly dug into .. allegations that the Clintons took part in a fraud connected to a Arkansas real estate venture gone bust. No charges were ever brought against either Clinton. ‘ “

“Comey next was involved with the Clintons when in the early 2000’s when he was … involved at both ends of the case of Marc Rich, a billionaire oil trader indicted for tax fraud and trading with Iran during the hostage crisis, who was later pardoned by president Bill Clinton during his final day in office in 2001. … the investigations concluded there was no wrongdoing on the president’s part, despite public outcry over evidence that Rich’s ex-wife had donated to Hillary Clinton’s Senate campaign. “

“Comey’s third encounter with the Clintons came before the 2016 Presidential election. Hillary Clinton set up a private email server that she used when Secretary of State under the Obama Administration. … Through a series of events Hillary’s email system was discovered and the FBI and Comey got involved. One question that needed to be answered was whether Hillary’s actions with her emails led to gross negligence with national defense information which would be a serious crime according to the Espionage Act of 1913.

“On June 27th Bill Clinton met with US Attorney General Loretta Lynch in her plane in Arizona for a half an hour. Comey never commented on this meeting but within a week Lynch’s Department of Justice dropped the investigation into Hillary’s emails and FBI’s Comey made the announcement. “

And here is number four: “Comey served as general counsel at Lockheed Martin until 2010 when he departed with over $$ 6 million to show for it. That same year Lockheed Martin became a member of the Clinton Global Initiative and ‘won 17 contracts from the U.S. State Department, which was led by then-Secretary of State Hillary Clinton,’ Big League Politics reports. “

“Comey just so happened to have joined the board of the British bank HSBC Holdings in 2013, which just so happens to be a Clinton Foundation partner.”

What is frantically required is one thorough investigation concerning Mr. Comey’s associations and communications with the Clintons coming full circle with his time as FBI Director. On the off chance that this investigation was directed transparently, openly, and forcefully, the bring down of Mr. Comey may at long last be the connection that brings the Clintons down too.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200964,"When the Queen of England has to remind the President of the United States to be respectful at her 90th birthday, you know you’ve lost the respect of foreign leaders. Unfortunately, that is exactly what happened with Obama as our leader.

In 2011, when Obama visited the Queen, he brought with him an entourage of six helicopters—that landed on the 300-year-old Windsor Castle lawn. They left behind burn marks and ruts that were hard to ignore.

Now, the Queen is putting her foot down, claiming that the president could attend her event only if he promised to keep the number of helicopters he brought with him down to three.

The Queen commented that Obama’s usual crew was “over the top,”

This means that Obama would be forced to leave behind a good portion of his security if he wants to attend.

“The president’s officials were told that the queen regarded Windsor Castle as her family home and the most important of all royal residences,” one source told reporters. “They were told that the Queen was particularly sensitive to any potential damage to the castle and grounds.”

“She rarely imposes her will, but when she does people listen—it just took the U.S. Secret Service agents a little time to realize that,” the source continued.

What do you think? Is this an absolute embarrassment to the United States?

RELATED:What Michelle Obama Did Over The Weekend Will Make You SICK",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199911,"Academy Award-winning rapper Eminem (Best Original Song for “Lose Yourself” in 2002) is no stranger to controversy, said Capt. Obvious.In the past, Marshall Mathers has rapped negatively about President Goerge W. Bush (see: Mosh).Now, the Detroit-bred artist has his sights set on President Donald Trump and Counselor to the President, Kellyanne Conway.Classy.Check it…

From Breitbart: Grammy Award-winning rapper Eminem called President Donald Trump a “bitch” and fantasied about sexually assaulting bestselling conservative author Ann Coulter in a song featured on fellow Detroit rapper Big Sean’s new studio album “I Decided.”

“I’m anti, can’t no government handle a commando. Your man don’t want it, Trump’s A BITCH. I’ll make his whole brand go under,” Eminem says of Trump on the song “No Favors.”The 44-year-old rapper-actor also raps about sexually assaulting conservative author and pundit Ann Coulter.“And fuck Ann Coulter with a Klan poster. With a lamp post, door handle, shutter. A damn bolt cutter, a sandal, a can opener, a candle, rubber. Piano, a flannel, sucker, some hand soap, butter. A banjo and manhole cover,” Eminem raps. Warning***Strong Language

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201861,"Have you ever noticed President Obama always refers to the Islamic State as ISIL instead of ISIS?

Rush Limbaugh explains why. This is infuriating.

From Western Journalism:

Limbaugh said the reason isn’t related to blaming George W. Bush for terrorism, but rather to diminish Israel.

“I think there’s a totally different reason for this,” Limbaugh said on his show, referring to views of different pundits about the sudden switch in terms.

ISIS is an acronym for the Islamic State of Iraq and Syria, whereas ISIL stands for the Islamic State in Iraq and the Levant. The Levant includes the entire region, Limbaugh pointed out.

“It would include Israel, which, to these people, Israel is a fraud. Israel doesn’t deserve to be there. That’s all Palestine and that’s what I think is behind the pronunciation, this insistence that it be called ISIL,” the national talk show host said.

Limbaugh noted that the only ones who use the term ISIL include Obama and members of his administration. The media, and everyone else, continues to call the terrorism organization ISIS.

The talk show host said Obama uses the term as a way to support Iran, which benefits from sectarian violence between the Sunnies and the Shi’ites. Continued division among its neighbors gives Iran more control over the region, according to Limbaugh.

Given how much the president dislikes Israel — just look at all of the times he’s insulted Netanyahu for example — I wouldn’t be surprised to find out this theory was true.

It’s tragic to see how much damage Obama has done to the relationship we have with Israel, who happens to be our strongest ally in the Middle East and a crucial partner in the war on terror.

Let’s hope the next president can mend the fences.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199908,"Remember almost a year ago, Obama tried to hide the fact that over $$400 million was paid to Iran for the release of 4 Iranian-American hostages?

At the time, there was one representative who spoke out against Obama and the deal, Rep. Mike Pompeo (R-Kansas). Pompeo in fact wrote a letter to Secretary of State John Kerry, and wanted to know the details of the cash transfer of $$1.7 billion.

Here’s a quick refresher:

Yeah – that’s right! Obama paid LOTS of money to a terrorist nation that funds terrorism! What were the consequences then? NOTHING! What’s changed? Donald Trump was elected President and Rep. Mike Pompeo, a member of the House Intelligence Committee was selected to be the new CIA Director. Things are going to get interesting…don’t you think?

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201154,"The media has been hammering Trump supporters for “violence” at his campaign events. People that have been paying attention know that the vast majority of that violence has stemmed from leftists who have showed up to stir up trouble at his events. In fact, Bernie Sanders supporters have been linked to a",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
202278,"Craig Murray, a British diplomat, has come forward to explain exactly how he took possession of the DNC documents. Murray explains that he flew to the DC area and met up with “disgusted whistleblowers” who handed him the data, which he then turned over to Wikileaks co-founder Julian Assange. Earlier, Murray admitted",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199805,"In a presidential election, monthly campaign finance reports that document how much money a candidate takes in are a generally accepted sign of the health of the horses in the race.

From that perspective, Republican presidential nominee Donald Trump’s campaign is looking much healthier.

Figures released Wednesday show that in July, Trump secured $$80 million in donations to support his candidacy and the Republican Party. Although that does not quite keep up with the $$90 million that Democratic nominee Hillary Clinton reported raising in July, it is a major step up from May, a month in which Trump raised $$3 million.

Trump now lists $$37 million in cash on hand, up for $$17 million at the start of the month. His two joint fundraising committees have another $$37 million in the bank.

“We are extremely proud of our 69% growth in small dollar donations which shows the broad based support of over one million donors across America,” Trump Finance Committee Chairman Steve Mnuchin said in a statement. “Our volunteers and contributors are clearly committed to electing Donald J. Trump as President in November.”

“The results from this month show the enthusiastic movement the campaign has created since we started our online fundraising efforts in June,” the statement added. “The campaign very much appreciates the broad based support, and will work hard to achieve victory in November and Make America Great Again.”

Trump spent about $$6 million of his own money in July, including $$2 million in matched donations. All told, Trump has spent more than $$56 million of his own money on his bid for the White House.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198961,"…the positions they do because of severe ignorance of human nature.

They lack the common sense understanding that when people don’t work and take care of themselves, they don’t feel good about themselves. Yet their ideology says let government take care of everyone they can.

They think that taking guns will solve murder, yet fail to see that California and Chicago tried that and gun crimes went up.

Pelosi and Maddow constantly pursue government removing life’s hurdles, yet fail to see that it only creates a weak society that can’t stand up on it’s own.

They continue to demonize those who call out radical Islam, yet fail to see… that as a lesbian woman, under their culture Maddow would be abused, imprisoned or even killed.

They assume that because Obama became president that most of America agrees with their viewpoint. Had Obama been as honest as Bernie Sanders in 2008, and told the American people what he really wanted to do, he would have never won.

Most of America still stands on the principles that made this nation great. THAT was her miscalculation. You can see that miscalculation in her eyes. Sorry Maddow, you were very wrong!

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
202007,"Anyone who has not been living under a rock the last 2-3 years, and has watched the number of Americans out of work rise to 94 million people without a job, a number that is just below 30% of our total population, knows this country is going over a cliff very soon. In the video below, the Dr. of Common Sense goes off on Obama, as well as the American people for being such fools, and rightfully so.

Of course, there are those among us who believe ignorance is bliss, and don’t want to know about anything because “news is too depressing.” Under normal circumstances, those folks wouldn’t know anything was awry until whatever it is smacks them in the head, and by then it’s normally too late. BUT, these aren’t normal circumstances, and our situation is SO obvious, that just about every American that is still on the right side of the dirt and still breathing, should have absolutely no doubt that this country is not even going to tap the breaks as we go off the cliff into the abyss and the ash bins of history.

It makes ZERO difference who wins the election. Zero. None. John Adams once famously said, “Our Constitution was made only for a moral and religious people. It is wholly inadequate to the government of any other.” At this stage in our nation’s storied history, we are a nation void of anything with even the same letters as the words morals or religion.

Despite the fact Barack Obama was known by several aliases, had used as many as three different social security numbers in his life (NOT ONE coming from the state he was allegedly born in, indicating fraud on at least SOME level), paid MILLIONS of dollars to seal his past tighter than everyone in witness protection program combined, was such close friends with convicted terrorists that he felt comfortable enough to leave his children with them, and when offered…

WATCH THE VIDEO ON NEXT PAGE >>>",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
202020,"Here’s Pena Nieto discussing why he feels Mexico will not pay for Trump’s proposed border wall…

From The Blaze:

Mexican President Enrique Pena Nieto told CNN’s Fareed Zakaria that there is “no way” Mexico will pay for Presumptive Republican nominee Donald Trump’s proposed border wall during an interview Sunday.

Trump has made his pledge to order the construction of a wall on the Southern border – a wall he says Mexico will pay for – a cornerstone of his campaign.

“There is no way to have Mexico pay the — a wall, but any decisions inside United States is a decision of its government,” Pena Nieto said, adding, “There is no way that Mexico can pay [for] a wall like that.”

Pena Nieto said “the security of the United States is linked with the security of its neighboring countries.”

“And this is what we have built,” he continued. “And I’ll say it again, this is what we have been doing with the U.S. government. We have a relationship of coordination, of collaboration and of cooperation in the area of security, precisely in order to have security in Mexico, to have security in the U.S. and… we are journey companions. We are strategic partners working for security in North America.”

Peña Nieto also pushed back at some of the rhetoric Trump has used while discussing Mexico.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199114,"Just three short months into his job overseeing the messaging strategy for the White House, Communications Director Mike Dubke has stepped down. However, the resignation comes at a very questionable time, and even more suspect is the way Dubke went about his decision. Not only will Dubke be leaving amidst rumors of leaking sensitive information, but he’ll be leaving Press Secretary Sean Spicer to carry the proverbial bags.

With that said, it’s probably no surprise that Dubke chose to resign in secret, just a day before President Trump embarked on his first trip overseas. It’s still unclear what effect the departure will have on the reconfiguration of the White House press office, but Counselor to President Trump, Kellyanne Conway told Fox & Friends that Dubke was fortunately never a member of President Trump’s inner circle.

‘I did not know Mike Dubke before he came on as communications director. I did not know him well.” Said Conway.

Now we know why Dubke wasn’t President Trump’s first choice, and his own actions have proven why he’s doing Americans a favor by quitting. If we can’t trust members of our administration to be honest and forthright, they’ll be helping the President drain the swamp with every resignation.

It’s our job as American citizens to continue spreading this valuable and telling information, especially when our President is working so hard for peace. Voters need to know the men and women in charge are not only on the level, but actually committed to doing their jobs. If not, we’ll just have to keep shedding light on these shady choices.

sources: dailymail.co.uk",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199361,"You can freely say that our government is in need of fresh faces. There are representatives that have been serving for years but failed to achieve ANYTHING useful for our country. It seems like President Trump just hit a home run with this one.

Based on a tweet by Jack Posobiec, Laura Ingraham has just been authorized by the Department of Justice for security clearance! The last lines of the tweet state, “They want her on the podium.” We are looking forward to Laura getting this chance to show how big of a patriot she is.

Ingraham has upgraded her reputation and resume over the past couple of years on TV, focusing on her radio show, and being a book author. The Obama Diaries is one of her bestseller classics , where she looked into and systematically decomposed Barack and Michelle Obama exposing everything.

We require someone this sincere on the Justice Department to help us develop our nation even further. At the moment, we are dealing with a bunch of left-wingers who are actively against President Trump and slowing down every single thing we attempt to accomplish. We cannot carry on functioning as a country if this proceeds.The next logical measure is to begin replacing the people responsible for the slowdown.

We need to find other people who can fit the job description and will get the job done. Opposing to what liberals think, people in the real world want to see RESULTS.

Ingraham is a fresh face and mind in this equation. Her, being one of the best additions to our government does not come into question, it must be the best we have seen in years.

Laura is low key, stands true to our American values, and is eager to help us do better as a country. You have to respect, and at least be open to other suggestions and care.

We can not permit the Left to keep on attacking blameless people Trump elects into office only because they do not agree with them politically or ethically. It is not fair and only displays their childlike behavior.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198763,"The Clinton Machine is coming to screeching halt as “27 email chains containing classified information” were found on Anthony Weiner’s laptop.

Expect the Congressional Republicans to grill Hillary Clinton, her aides, and the FBI for more information on the contents of the emails.

Fox News reports:

A FEDERAL COURT ON TUESDAY RELEASED THE SEARCH WARRANT DOCUMENTS FILED BY THE FBI TO ACCESS A LAPTOP USED BY DISGRACED EX-REP. ANTHONY WEINER AND HIS ESTRANGED WIFE, HILLARY CLINTON AIDE HUMA ABEDIN, REVEALING NEW DETAILS ABOUT WHY THE BUREAU REVISITED THE EMAIL CASE JUST DAYS BEFORE THE PRESIDENTIAL ELECTION.

THE FBI’S INVESTIGATION FOUND “27 EMAIL CHAINS CONTAINING CLASSIFIED INFORMATION” ON A LAPTOP THAT “WAS NEVER AUTHORIZED FOR THE STORAGE OR TRANSMISSION OF CLASSIFIED OR NATIONAL DEFENSE INFORMATION,” ACCORDING TO THE APPLICATION FOR THE WARRANT, WHICH WAS PARTIALLY REDACTED.

THE OCTOBER RE-OPENING OF THE CLINTON INVESTIGATION SPRUNG FROM AN UNRELATED CASE INVOLVING WEINER ALLEGEDLY SEXTING WITH AN UNDERAGE GIRL. DURING THE COURSE OF THAT INQUIRY, AGENTS DISCOVERED THE JOINT LAPTOP AND LATER FOUND EMAILS ADDRESSED TO AND SENT FROM CLINTON.

It’s the end of the line for the Clinton crime machine.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198229,"Former Justice Department attorney who helped Loretta Lynch in the collusion between the media and the DOJ to cover up the Clinton/Lynch tarmac meeting, now is working on the committee which is investigating Lynch for her role in influencing the FBI’s investigation.

Is anybody else NOT surprised to hear that the “Swamp Creatures” seem to be covering up for their own, yet again? We’ve seen the federal government going on an absolute witch hunt after President Trump, and as of yesterday, his campaign manager Paul Manafort, but yet Lynch is allowed to skate after numerous crimes? This is just another example of “The Swamp” and shows how badly it needs to be “drained” if we ever want to get law and order in this country…

From Washington Examiner

An attorney in the Justice Department who helped edit press statements about the tarmac meeting between Bill Clinton and Loretta Lynch is now a top attorney for Democrats in the Senate Judiciary Committee, which is currently investigating Lynch over concerns she may have tried to influence the FBI’s investigation into Hillary Clinton. The connection, first reported by the Washington Free Beacon, comes after hundreds of pages of emails about the infamous “tarmac” meeting were released by two conservative watchdog groups who had filed Freedom of Information Act requests for documents about the meeting from the Justice Department.

Paige Herwig was a counselor to the then-Attorney General Lynch in 2016 when the airplane meeting between Clinton and Lynch took place. According to her LinkedIn profile and other sources, she now serves as the deputy general counsel for the minority in the Senate Judiciary. Because both the majority and minority parties each have their own staff, Herwig is one of several lawyers who will have access to and knowledge of how the Senate Judiciary’s investigation of Lynch is proceeding, with many of those other attorneys being Republicans who serve Committee Chairman Chuck Grassley and the other GOP members on the committee.

Requests for comment from the committee were not returned. The Senate Judiciary Committee is investigating Lynch’s role in the Clinton email investigation because of recent testimony from former FBI Director James Comey who said Lynch asked him to use the word “matter” when referring to the investigation.

“That language tracked the way that the campaign was talking about the FBI’s work, and that’s concerning,” Comey said under questioning on June 8. “I don’t know whether it was intentional or not, but it gave the impression that the attorney general was looking to align the way we talked about our work with the way a political campaign was describing the same activity, which was inaccurate. We had a criminal investigation open, and so that gave me a queasy feeling.”

Documents about the meeting have even drawn the attention of President Trump. On Tuesday, Trump tweeted, “E-mails show that the AmazonWashingtonPost and the FailingNewYorkTimes were reluctant to cover the Clinton/Lynch secret meeting in plane.” Trump was referring to a batch of emails released by the American Center for Law and Justice which showed an initial reluctance by reporters from the Washington Post and New York Times to cover the meeting between Bill Clinton and Lynch. Other emails confirmed that Lynch had used an email alias to conduct much of her government business while attorney general, a practice that isn’t illegal, but can sometimes present ethical issues with regards to FOIA and legal discovery.

H/T: USSA News",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200916,"One of the most dangerous aspects of the mainstream media’s fake Trump-Russia conspiracy theory is that it could lead to a very real war between the two nuclear nations. Fortunately, President Trump and President Putin have made strides to prevent war from happening.

While meeting for the first time at the G20 Summit in Hamburg, Germany, Trump and Putin agreed to a cease-fire in southwestern Syria. With this cease-fire in place, the governments of America, Russia, and the Kingdom of Jordan agree to work together in order to limit hostilities involving their proxy fighters, via Associated Press.

Such an agreement could not have come at a better time.

While most worldwide attention is focused on the battles against ISIS in Mosul, Iraq and Raqqa, Syria, a Syrian Arab Army offensive near the border with Iraq and Jordan have brought the forces of Bashar al-Assad into combat with US-backed rebels.

Overall, the SAA has successfully captured hundreds of miles of territory that formerly belonged to either ISIS or the rebels. The fact that America has increased its troop presence in that region has further heightened tensions between the SAA, Russia, and the US, via Reuters.

In total, the US-Russia cease-fire comes at a perfect time.

On the anti-ISIS front, the militant group is on the verge of collapse in both Iraq and Syria. In Mosul, the group’s former capital in Iraq, Iraqi forces are but days away from taking control of the entire city, via BBC.

To the north, in the official ISIS capital of Raqqa, Kurdish forces have surrounded the entire city and have launched an offensive to capture the Old City, via Independent.

Elsewhere, the recent gains of the SAA, which have come thanks to massive Russian aerial support, have denied the rebels easy access between the borders of Iraq and Jordan. Similarly, now that the south has been more or less recaptured by Assad’s forces, the only rebel stronghold left is in the north, where Al-Qaeda is in control.

The goal of the cease-fire is to force the international community to find some sort of solution to the six-year-long civil war.

For Americans, President Trump’s diplomacy indicates that his administration has abandoned Obama’s stated policy of regime change.

President Trump could also be indicating that his administration may no longer be interested in supporting the non-Kurdish rebels, the majority of whom are jihadists.

Whatever happens, President Trump should be applauded for trying to de-escalate a false conflict with Russia.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200517,"During his appearance on Friday’s Breitbart News Daily, Dr. Ben Carson said it was “not terribly surprising to see the focus on racism and divisiveness” in various issues of the day, notably law enforcement and police shootings. “I would encourage people to read a little book, it’s not that long, called Rules for Radicals, by Saul Alinsky, and you can see how the playbook works, and what they need to do. It’s to stir up strife, and to stir up division, and discontentment, as opposed to focusing on the real issues,” he told SiriusXM host Alex Marlow.

“What you must recognize is that they’ve been working on this for decades. And they just need one more term. That’s all they need to culminate their efforts, so they can get control of the Supreme Court, and the federal court system. After they have that control, it doesn’t matter who the President is,” Carson warned. With so much at stake, he anticipated the 2016 election would be “a real knock-down, drag-out” fight, in which “there will be no tactic that will not be used.” Carson pointed to Detroit, where Donald Trump is scheduled to give a major interview this weekend, as a perfect example of progressive devastation. “It was once the most prosperous city in America, and from there has gone on to become the biggest bankruptcy, after decades of progressive leadership,” he mused.

“That should tell anybody – Democrat, Republican, independent – that there’s something wrong with the course that’s been staked out on, and that you really need to stop and do something different. You know, the definition of insanity is doing the same thing, and expecting a different result. We’ve got to stop being insane, and start exercising common sense,” Carson urged. He cannot be any more right. If we don’t seize control of the Supreme Court, we will lose our country — but if we do, we can spare it for our children and grandchildren.

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201789,The Democrats in Washington have absolutely no interest in holding anyone accountable for Benghazi. That’s been made very clear by there complaining and stonewalling. They released a bogus report today saying that Hillary Clinton did a great job handling it and that they still can’t be sure what caused the attack. Seriously. It’s,americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200102,"Donald Trump went off on Bernie Sanders, the one-time Democratic candidate, for selling his soul to the devil, er… Hillary Clinton.

After Sanders officially endorsed Hillary Clinton, despite months of declaring that she was part of a “rigged system,” Trump pointed out his blatant hypocrisy.

“Bernie Sanders endorsing Crooked Hillary Clinton is like Occupy Wall Street endorsing Goldman Sachs,” one tweet read.

Enjoy in his tweets :

Bernie Sanders endorsing Crooked Hillary Clinton is like Occupy Wall Street endorsing Goldman Sachs. — Donald J. Trump (@realDonaldTrump) July 12, 2016

Bernie sanders has abandoned his supporters by endorsing pro-war pro-TPP pro-Wall Street Crooked Hillary Clinton. — Donald J. Trump (@realDonaldTrump) July 12, 2016

KEEP READING ON NEXT PAGE >>>",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198394,"A diplomatic security agent on duty the night of the 2012 attack on the American consulate in Benghazi revealed the last order Ambassador Chris Stevens gave him before they lost contact with each other.

Agent Scott Wickland was the government’s first witness in the trial of Ahmed Abu Khattala in federal court in Washington, D.C., which began on Monday, the U.K. Daily Mail reported.

Abu Khattala has been charged by federal prosecutors with orchestrating the attack on the consulate and the CIA annex building on Sept. 11, 2012, that killed Stevens, as well as State Department information officer Sean Smith and contract security officers Tyrone Woods and Glen Doherty.Wickland, Stevens and Smith made it into the consulate’s safe room after the attack began. The militants were not able to breach the safe room, so they decided to set the building on fire.

The agent testified that Stevens told him, “When I die, you need to pick up my gun and keep fighting,” according to ABC News.Wickland recounted to jurors that he was trying to lead Stevens and Smith to a bathroom, where they could barricade themselves in and open a window for air, when he lost contact with them in the thick black smoke.“I was breathing through the last centimeter of air on the ground,” Wickland said. “I’m yelling, ‘Come on. We can make it. We’re going to the bathroom.’ Within 8 meters, they disappeared.”

“To this day, I don’t even know where they went. I was right next to them, and then that’s it,” he added. Abu Khatalla faces 18 criminal counts ranging from murder of an officer of the United States to conspiracy to provide material support to terrorists, with maximum sentences of life in prison, The Washington Times reported. Abu Khatalla “didn’t light the fires or fire the mortars, but is just as guilty” for planning the attack, setting it in motion and getting others “to do his dirty work,” federal prosecutor John Crabb told jurors in his opening statement, according to CNN.

He further said that Abu Khattala “hates America with a vengeance” and that his “hatred simmered until it boiled over.”“He killed Ambassador Stevens — a man of peace,” Wickland said.Abu Khattala has plead not guilty to all counts.

Defense attorney Jeffrey Robinson claimed in his opening statement that his client was simply a witness to the attack who had gone to the location out of curiosity.“There are people who are not Ahmed Abu Khattala who were the masterminds of the attack,” Robinson said.

“So why is Mr. Abu Khattala sitting in that chair?”Robinson added. “He is sitting there because he was easy.”Abu Khattala is currently the only suspect in custody in relation to the attacks.In the days following the Benghazi raids, Obama administration officials, including then-Secretary of State Hillary Clinton and U.N. Ambassador Susan Rice, described the attacks to the American public as spontaneous uprisings sparked by a YouTube video.

Documents later released during a congressional inquiry showed Clinton and others knew this account was not true.In an email Clinton sent to the Egyptian prime minister on Sept. 12, 2012, she wrote: “We know the attack in Libya had nothing to do with the film. It was a planned attack — not a protest.”

source: www.westernjournalism.com",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200266,"Michell Malkin is an author, blogger, and columnist. She appeared on Fox News a few times, and also visited other conservative media outlets. Malkin is considered as the most intelligent proponent in all conservative media, right behind Ann Coulter.

Gave you ever watched The View? If yes, you have probably noticed all the liberal dummies hosting it. Joy Behar. Really? The worst thing is the way she covers up her ignorance with smart words and stuff.

Malkin went on The View, and talked with Behar about her book and the corruption that flowers in Obama’s campaign.

Behar regretted most of the things she said. That’s what you get when you mess up with the best, Behar. Why is Malkin even wasting her time with shows like The View? Shows like this is something dumb liberals can watch for days, non-stop. You don’t talk with Malkin about lame “facts,” liberals. You don’t.

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199810,"Despite rumors to the contrary, Lady Gaga was never asked by the NFL to refrain from talking about President Donald Trump or politics during the Super Bowl halftime show this Sunday. If anyone thought the fanatical liberal and former Hillary Clinton supporter would actually use her massive stage to do what she is paid to do (you know, shut the hell up and sing), I’m not sure what planet they are living on.

Because that is most certainly NOT what’s going to happen.Instead, it looks like viewers are going to be “treated” to a hefty dose of finger-wagging about “equality,” “inclusion,” and “kindness,” (because Trump and his supporters are such meanies) and maybe the most expensive vocal of “kumbaya” ever witnessed, but we’ll have to wait and see on that last point.

WATCH: ""I believe in passion for inclusion… spirit of equality… this country, it's one of love, compassion, kindness."" – @LadyGaga #SB51 pic.twitter.com/DjbHST0jOE — Good Morning America (@GMA) February 2, 2017

When asked about any potential political statements at a press conference Thursday morning, the singer answered, “Well, I don’t know if I will succeed in unifying America. You’ll have to ask America when it’s over. But the only statements that I’ll be making during the halftime show are the ones that I’ve been consistently making throughout my career. I believe in a passion for inclusion. I believe in the spirit of equality, and the spirit of this country as one of love and compassion and kindness. So my performance will have both those philosophies.”

The Twitterverse, of course, had a few things to say:

Because Super Bowl parties aren’t complete without some entitled rich NYC kid who’s now a frillionare entertainer lecturing America. https://t.co/uLy5Vjfjgm — Dana Loesch (@DLoesch) February 3, 2017

@MattWalshBlog sweet, at least i know to make sure to change the channel, thanks 4 the heads up lady gaga — Steven Bellistri (@SBellistri) February 3, 2017

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199896,"A new Reuters/Ipsos poll released Thursday shows Bernie Sanders beating Hillary Clinton by one point with registered Democratic voters.

The survey of 1,680 registered voters, 635 of whom identified as Democrats, was conducted between April 9 and April 13. Among all Democrats and Democratic-leaning independent voters, Bernie Sanders leads Hillary Clinton by a 47-42 margin, with 11 percent of respondents saying they wouldn’t vote for either candidate. Sanders beats Clinton by a narrow margin of 49-48 among registered Democrats, and he demolishes Clinton by 16 points among self-identified independents. The poll’s margin of error is 2.7 percent.

Among all respondents, 36 percent identify as Democrats, 28 percent affiliate with the Republican Party, and 12 percent listed themselves as independents, with 9 percent leaning toward Democrats, 5 percent toward Republican, and 7 percent favoring a third party. Finally, only 2 percent of those surveyed said they were unsure of their party affiliation.

This latest poll is the third to show Sanders leading Clinton this month. A poll conducted by the Public Religion Research Institute and the Atlantic between March 30 and April 3 showed Sanders beating Clinton by one point, along with a McClatchy/Marist poll conducted between March 29 and March 31 that had Sanders up by two points.

RELATED:Hillary Supporters Are So Scared Of Bernie That They Committed This Crime Against Democracy! [Video]

According to RealClearPolitics polling averages, Hillary Clinton is still narrowly ahead of Bernie Sanders, though her lead has shrunk considerably since the beginning of 2016. As the chart below shows, Sanders has been trending upward since his first win in the New Hampshire primary in February, while Clinton has been steadily trending downward:

The new Reuters poll will undoubtedly give Sanders a boost ahead of tonight’s Democratic debate in Brooklyn and Tuesday’s primary in New York. Sanders remains approximately 200 pledged delegates behind Clinton, though he has a chance to narrow that gap should he win in New York, where 247 pledged delegates are up for grabs.

Connecticut, Delaware, Maryland, Pennsylvania, and Rhode Island will cast their ballots on April 26, with 348 pledged delegates at stake.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199697,"North Korea has fired an “Unidentified projectile” early Monday, says South Korea’s Joint Chiefs of staff via CNN. Here’s what you need to know now in the video below. The South Korean statement did not say where the projectile landed. The U.S. has already briefed the President, according to the National Security Council.

President Moon Jaei-in was briefed and ordered a national security council meeting at 7:30 a.m. North Korea has launched a ton of missile launches recently.

What should Trump do next? Should we respond?

Share this if you stand behind Trump and think that the rest of the nation should since we have enemies with Nukes pointing them at us!!

Thanks for reading, y’all.

(h/t CNN)",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198899,"With all of the controversy going on right now surrounding Special Counsel Robert Mueller, people have seen to lost a lot of respect for him and the FBI. Sheriff Clarke beautifully breaks down why people have lost respect for the FBI, and he makes it very clear that he is not",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200255,"Unless you’ve been living under a rock for the past 6 or so months, you’re well aware that the lying liberal media has turned the phony “Trump-Russia collusion” probe into a three-ring circus with nearly round-the-clock coverage.

The manufactured story has been falsely treated like the scandal of the century.Just looking at MSNBC’s Rachel Maddow, who is an obsessed “Russia conspiracy theorist,” you can see she’s devoted more than HALF of her entire show to the Trump-Russia fake news story.

Think about that…

She’s spent half of her time peddling 100% complete fake news.

Rachel @Maddow’s Russia coverage dwarfed the time devoted to other issues, accounting for 53% of recent broadcasts. https://t.co/fZv9ynAilh — The Intercept (@theintercept) April 12, 2017

After 10 long and intense months of investigation, no one was able to find one shred of evidence that tied President Trump to Russia, in some cockamamie effort to “steal” the election from Hillary Clinton.It’s an absurd notion that never happened.However, thanks to disgraced former FBI Director James Comey, we have discovered actual collusion and obstruction, but not on the part of President Trump.The real obstruction and collusion came from Obama’s former AG Loretta Lynch, who met with Bill Clinton on an airplane tarmac in Arizona, just before Comey came out and cleared Hillary of any potential charges relating to her email investigation.

In addition, Comey testified that Lynch came to him and asked him to change the “name” of Hillary’s email “investigation” to an “inquiry” so it did not sound so serious.So, how much mainstream media coverage do you think THAT bombshell got?",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200293,"Former Senate President of Haiti, Bernard Sansaricq, shocked a large crowd at a Trump campaign event in Little Haiti, FL. Sansaricq exposes all of the dirty dealings of the Clinton’s in Haiti while he was still in office. Donald Trump to his credit, allowed him to speak his mind and",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199797,"There will be no Democratic presidential debate in California, because Hillary Clinton’s campaign reneged Monday on its earlier promise to participate in one. In February, the campaigns of both Clinton and Sen. Bernie Sanders agreed to debate in California before the state’s June 7 primary. But with Clinton comfortably ahead in",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201825,It goes without saying we could be doing much better when it comes to illegal immigration. Just days ago news broke that the Department of Homeland Security had been been accused of sitting on information showing that the success rate of illegal aliens avoiding deportation is 158 percent higher than,americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201390,"Just waiting for someone to say they’re being RAAAAAAACIST for asking.In case you haven’t noticed, Louisiana is dealing with some HORRIFIC flooding right now. According to this, At least 13 people have been killed, many many more have lost their homes and have nowhere to go, and the rain doesn’t",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201165,"…known as the U-6 measure, was 9.3 percent in November, which declined from 9.5 percent in the previous month. Democrats such as Sen. Bernie Sanders (I., Vt.) and Federal Reserve chair Janet Yellen have said this measure accounts for discouraged workers and those working part time instead of full time for economic reasons and is more representative of the labor market.

There were 5,669,000 Americans working part-time in November who would rather have a full-time job but cited economic reasons for not having such employment. According to the bureau, involuntary part-time workers are “persons who indicated that they would like to work full time but were working part time (1 to 34 hours) because of an economic reason, such as their hours were cut back or they were unable to find full-time jobs.”

“Job creation among small businesses was relatively weak in November, but there are clear signs that business owners are feeling better about the future,” said National Federation of Independent Businesses president and CEO Juanita Duggan. “They are trying to hire, but they are still having a difficult time finding qualified employees.

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199152,"From KidRock.com

When my name was thrown out there for US Senate I decided to launch kidrockforsenate.com.

I was beyond overwhelmed with the response I received from community leaders, D.C. pundits, and blue-collar folks that are just simply tired of the extreme left and right bullshit. As part of the excitement surrounding this possible campaign, I decided to take a hard look to see if there was real support for me as a candidate and my message or if it was just because it was a fresh new news story. The one thing I’ve seen over and over is that although people are unhappy with the government, too few are even registered to vote or do anything about it.

We have over a year left until an actual election, so my first order of business is to get people engaged and registered to vote while continuing to put out my ideas on ways to help working class people in Michigan and America all while still calling out these jackass lawyers who call themselves politicians. During this time while exploring my candidacy for US Senate, I am creating a 501(c)(4) – a non-profit organization for the promotion of voter registration. Not only can I raise money for this critical cause, but I can help get people registered to vote at my shows.

Since the announcement, the media has speculated this was a ploy to sell shirts or promote something. I can tell you, I have no problem selling Kid Rock shirts and yes, I absolutely will use this media circus to sell/promote whatever I damn well please (many other politicians are doing the same thing, they just feed you a bunch of bullshit about it). But either way, money raised at this time through the sale of merchandise associated with this very possible campaign will go towards our ‘register to vote’ efforts. One thing is for sure though…The democrats are ‘shattin’ in their pantaloons’ right now…and rightfully so! We will be scheduling a press conference in the next 6 weeks or so to address this issue amongst others, and if I decide to throw my hat in the ring for US Senate, believe me… it’s game on mthrfkers.

— Kid Rock",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201660,"In these final hours Obama is attempting to save the last shred of his failing ObamaCare.

Jesse Watters weighs in on the joke that the ACA has been.

Watch the video:

…

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200688,"Hillary Clinton hasn’t exactly been staying out of sight, or out of mind lately. Examinations into her email wrongdoing are ongoing, regardless of what the liberal media has decided to reveal to the public.

While copious amounts of “to the left” citizens believe the Russians altered Hillary Clinton’s lies to the United States and had influence over the 2016 election, the good old FBI appeared to have uncovered some truth and announced it to the public. However, it was not reported to the world press, perhaps in hopes that the media wouldn’t grab hold of it. The FBI was disappointed when their hopes were thwarted.

WikiLeaks reports on Twitter new documentation “quietly” released by the FBI on the Hillary Clinton investigation, and minutes later 299 pages of FBI’s emails investigation into Clinton in PDF format. Shockingly, the documents revealed that Clinton was aware that she was committing a crime and being dishonest with America.

The fact that she was not let go is likely due to the fact that the head Democrats with power made secretive decisions not to indict the phony, corrupt, criminal we know as Hillary Clinton. Trey Gowdy was shown in a video off C-SPAN siding with Clinton while facing the head of the FBI, James Comey, even when caught in the crossfires of a heated debate. In my opinion, I will try to stay as unbiased as possible. I think it is absolutely sickening that individuals in powerful positions get leniency when it comes to punishment for committing crimes.

They should not be able to get away with breaking the law under any circumstances. Our founding fathers spoke of liberty and justice for all, and I put much emphasis on the “all” part of that speech. Average people are thrown in prison for much less severe crimes than our politicians commit daily, and the same should go for everybody, especially people in charge of upholding, accommodating, and “protecting” the law. Here’s WikiLeaks with the report:",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201271,"2) Unleashing The Genie From The Nuclear Weapons Bottle In The Middle East: Preventing the spread of nuclear weapons has been a high priority since those weapons came into being. It was obviously worrisome when nations that are not friendly to America acquired nuclear weapons capable of reducing our greatest cities to ash in a moment, but there were important considerations that kept those countries from ever acting. You nuke us, we nuke you. Okay, we have a stalemate because no functional state wants mutually assured destruction.

Of course, that kind of stalemate doesn’t work with basket-case nations run by totalitarian dictators or religious fanatics… which brings us to the Iran Deal Obama signed that will end with that monstrous nation acquiring nuclear weapons. Inevitably, if Iran develops nukes, various other countries across the Middle East will also develop nuclear weapons to protect themselves. Israel may already have nukes, but it’s also not going to try to subjugate nations like Saudi Arabia and Egypt. The same can’t be said of Iran.

In other words, Obama’s Iran Deal marks the beginning of a nuclear arms race in an area largely run by religious fanatics and anti-American dictators. The chances of a nuclear war or even more importantly, a nuke going off on American soil, have increased astronomically because of Obama’s foolishness.

3) Facilitating Illegal Immigration: The federal government has never put the amount of money and resources needed into shutting down illegal immigration. Unfortunately, crooked businesses that benefit from the practice have always paid off enough politicians to keep that from happening.

However, the Obama Administration’s practice of actually encouraging illegal immigration was a new low in our nation’s history. Obama illegally tried to give millions of illegal aliens the ability to stay here without fear of deportation; states and localities that enforced immigration law were harassed by the DOJ; he blocked the border patrol from doing its job and increased the number of refugees being imported. By doing so, Obama destroyed the rule of law, created a protected criminal class and imported poverty into the country because he thought it would benefit him politically even if it hurt the country in the process.

READ MORE ON NEXT PAGE >>>",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198755,"The widow of Sgt. La David Johnson was one of the four Green Berets killed by ISIS in Niger this month. For the first time since her phone call with President Trump that Frederica Wilson listened in on.

The President has been in a chilling fight with Congressman Frederica Wilson about the call in which Wilson said that Trump told Myeshia Johnson that her husband “knew what he signed up for.”

Wilson is a family friend of the Johnsons and was in the limo with during the call when the widow was on her way to the airport to pick up her husband’s body. Trump called the master sergeant on his cell phone and pulled over to the tarmac at Dover Air Force Base to pick up Sgt. Johnson.

Johnson put the President on speaker phone so everyone could hear. According to her, “He knew what he signed up for, but it hurts anyway.”

“I heard him stumbling on trying to remember my husband’s name and that’s what hurt me most. Because if my husband is out here fighting for our country and he risks his life for our country, why can’t you remember his name? And that’s what made me upset and cry more,” she added.

President Trump shot back this morning on twitter, via Daily Mail.

This widow is making her husband’s death political and it is really sad. It is sad that her husband died and it is sad that he cannot rest in peace. His memory is now going to get drug through the mud so that the Democratic party can try and take down our sitting President.

Share this if you feel sorry for her loss but are tired of the Democrats and people politicising the deaths of our soldiers.

God bless America. God bless Trump and God bless every single one of our troops.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199371,"Newt Gingrich joined Sean Hannity last night to discuss the breaking news that Tony Podesta, Democratic Lobbyist and Brother to Hillary’s Campaign chairman, is now reportedly under federal investigation due to his ties to the Russians. Newt dropped a bombshell about this new investigation. (Video Below) This comes just a couple days after evidence",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198133,"An article in the Guardian provides more confirmation that John Brennan was the American progenitor of political espionage aimed at defeating Donald Trump. One side did collude with foreign powers to tip the election — Hillary’s.

Seeking to retain his position as CIA director under Hillary, Brennan teamed up with British spies and Estonian spies to cripple Trump’s candidacy. He used their phony intelligence as a pretext for a multi-agency investigation into Trump, which led the FBI to probe a computer server connected to Trump Tower and gave cover to Susan Rice, among other Hillary supporters, to spy on Trump and his people.

John Brennan’s CIA operated like a branch office of the Hillary campaign, leaking out mentions of this bogus investigation to the press in the hopes of inflicting maximum political damage on Trump. An official in the intelligence community tells TAS that Brennan’s retinue of political radicals didn’t even bother to hide their activism, decorating offices with “Hillary for president cups” and other campaign paraphernalia.

A supporter of the American Communist Party at the height of the Cold War, Brennan brought into the CIA a raft of subversives and gave them plum positions from which to gather and leak political espionage on Trump. He bastardized standards so that these left-wing activists could burrow in and take career positions. Under the patina of that phony professionalism, they could then present their politicized judgments as “non-partisan.”

The Guardian story is written in a style designed to flatter its sources (they are cast as high-minded whistleblowers), but the upshot of it is devastating for them, nonetheless, and explains why all the criminal leaks against Trump first originated in the British press. According to the story, Brennan got his anti-Trump tips primarily from British spies but also Estonian spies and others. The story confirms that the seed of the espionage into Trump was planted by Estonia. The BBC’s Paul Wood reported last year that the intelligence agency of an unnamed Baltic State had tipped Brennan off in April 2016 to a conversation purporting to show that the Kremlin was funneling cash into the Trump campaign.

Any other CIA director would have disregarded such a flaky tip, recognizing that Estonia was eager to see Trump lose (its officials had bought into Hillary’s propaganda that Trump was going to pull out of NATO and leave Baltic countries exposed to Putin). But Brennan opportunistically seized on it, as he later that summer seized on the half-baked intelligence of British spy agencies (also full of officials who wanted to see Trump lose).

The Guardian says that British spy head Robert Hannigan “passed material in summer 2016 to the CIA chief, John Brennan.” To ensure that these flaky tips leaked out, Brennan disseminated them on Capitol Hill. In August and September of 2016, he gave briefings to the “Gang of Eight” about them, which then turned up on the front page of the New York Times.

All of this took place at the very moment Brennan was auditioning for Hillary. He desperately wanted to keep his job and despised Trump for his alleged “Muslim ban,” a matter near and dear to Brennan’s heart. Not only was he an apologist for the Muslim Brotherhood, but Brennan’s Islamophilia dated to his days in college, when he spent a year in Cairo learning Arabic and taking courses in Middle Eastern studies. He later got a graduate degree with an emphasis in Middle Eastern studies. In 1996, his ties to the Islamic world tightened after he became the CIA’s station chief in Riyadh, Saudi Arabia. He once recalled that “during a 25-year career in government, I was privileged to serve in positions across the Middle East — as a political officer with the State Department and as a CIA station chief in Saudi Arabia. In Saudi Arabia, I saw how our Saudi partners fulfilled their duty as custodians of the two holy mosques of Mecca and Medina. I marveled at the majesty of the Hajj and the devotion of those who fulfilled their duty as Muslims by making that privilege — that pilgrimage.”",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199903,"When Donald Trump was campaigning, he spoke about the loss of American jobs and how wrong it was for Carrier to be sending business to Mexico. Well, Donald Trump just reached a deal to keep around 1,000 Carrier jobs in the USA! Wow! Trump is creating jobs and he’s not",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201711,"Former Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff Gen. Martin Dempsey penned a short but stern rebuke to two generals dabbling in politics. These generals spoke at the Republican and Democratic conventions during the past two weeks. At the Republican National Convention, retired U.S. Army Lieutenant General Michael Flynn threw his",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198894,"On Monday in Detroit, as the Republican presidential nominee was unveiling an economic plan while he was heckled by a series of protesters in what seemed to be a planned attempt to disrupt the speech. The Michigan People’s Campaign later said that it coordinated the efforts of the female protesters in an effort to “get underneath Donald Trump’s skin.”

“It’s all very well planned out,” Trump said after several had been led away. For most of his address, Trump ignored them, until he finally had to say something.

Watch:

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201964,"Fox News’ Megyn Kelly opened Tuesday’s show with an excoriating look at past claims Hillary Clinton made about her private email server, charging that the former secretary of state “systematically misled the American people for 16 months.”

Pointing to FBI Director James Comey’s statement Tuesday, Kelly went through several claims Clinton made about her use of a private email server, debunking them one at a time, such as Clinton saying she neither sent nor received classified email.

“This is not a matter of retroactive classification; that was another misleading statement from the Clinton camp,” Kelly said.

Fox News senior political analyst Brit Hume agreed that Comey “blew up [Clinton’s] whole network of lies.”

“Basically what he said is, she did everything short of a crime and then lied about it all the way,” Hume said.

Kelly chimed in to say this occurred while Clinton was being investigated.

“She repeatedly told the American people a bunch of nonsense!” she said.

WATCH:",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
202142,"A new bombshell report is out in print. And while Bill Clinton’s interest in women not named “Hillary” is well known, this report adds a shocking new detail that could spell major trouble for Hillary Clinton’s presidential campaign. Bill Clinton once tried to “seduce” Jacqueline Kennedy – the widow of President",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
146262,"Michelle Obama complained several times about being First Lady and not getting paid. Obama complained about that too. On Wednesday he said:

“I want to make sure that when she’s working she’s getting paid the same as men, I gotta say that First Ladies right now don’t get paid, even though that’s a tough job!” How different from Laura Bush.

Watch what she said about this issue:",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199092,"multiple positions in a large, New York-based corporation known for its real estate investments, fake universities, steaks, and wine. The boss has very strict standards for female employees, ranging from the women who take lunch orders (must be hot) to the women who oversee multi-million dollar construction projects (must maintain hotness demonstrated at time of hiring).

Title: Honey Bunch (that’s what the boss will call you)

Job requirements:

* No gaining weight on the job (we’ll take some “before” pictures when you start to use later as evidence)

* Must be open to public humiliation and open-press workouts if you do gain weight on the job

* A willingness to evaluate other women’s hotness for the boss’ satisfaction is a plus

* Should be proficient in lying about age if the boss thinks you’re too old Working mothers not preferred (the boss finds pumping breast milk disgusting, and worries they’re too focused on their children)

About us:

We’re proud to maintain a “fun” and “friendly work environment, where the boss is always available to meet with his employees. Like it or not, he may greet you with a kiss on the lips or grope you under the meeting table.

Interested applicants should send resume, cover letter, and headshot tojobs@trump.com<mailto:jobs@trump.com>",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199163,"We all knew this day was coming! Earlier this week, we learned that The Senate Judiciary Committee will be targeting both Susan Rice and former President Barack Obama over their involvement in the unmasking scandal.

Now, disgraced liar Susan Rice is being called to testify before The House Intelligence Committee in regards to the Russia probe. After years of deceit, lies, and corruption, it’s nice to see the divisive Rice have her turn in the “hot seat.”

From the Washington Examiner: Susan Rice will testify before the House Intelligence Committee next month as part of its probe into Russia’s election interference and possible collusion with the Trump campaign, according to a report Thursday. Republicans have been interested in interviewing Rice, former President Barack Obama’s national security adviser, ever since numerous news outlets reported that she sought the identities of people close to President Trump whose communications were captured after the election in surveillance of foreigners by U.S. spy agencies.

According to CNN, Rice will appear in a nonpublic session with the intelligence panel some time before Congress departs for its August recess. “Ambassador Rice is cooperating with bipartisan Russia investigations conducted by the Intelligence Committees as she said she would,” said Erin Pelton, a spokesperson for Rice, told CNN. Some Republicans have alleged that Rice and the outgoing Obama administration unjustifiably unmasked — as the process of making identities known is called — and then leaked damaging conversations involving Trump’s team.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199620,"Another day, another police officer shot in Obama’s America. From Chicago Tribune: Chicago police officer assigned to bike patrol in the Central District was shot and a suspect was killed in an exchange of gunfire with a man stopped for drinking Thursday evening in the Prairie District neighborhood, authorities said.One officer was taken to Northwestern Memorial Hospital, with his condition stabilized, a fire official said. Chicago police transported the officer on their own from near 18th Street and Calumet Avenue, not in an ambulance. The shooting took place about 8:15 p.m. A suspect was killed in the shooting, sources said.

“A Chicago police officer has been shot at 18th and Calumet. Shot in the lower body, no info on condition,” said police spokesman Anthony Guglielmi, in a Tweet.

The officer was expected to recover after being shot in the leg, sources said.Officers were believed to have spotted a man in or near Battle of Fort Dearborn Park and approached him because they suspected he was drinking, and when he was asked to show identification, he instead took out a gun and shot the officer, a source said, citing preliminary information. Several squad cars, marked and unmarked, sat in the street near the park, which was cordoned off in yellow tape. The area of 18th Street and Calumet Avenue in the historic Prairie Avenue District is dotted with townhomes and some high-rises.

A Chicago police command van sat at 18th and Calumet, where a police-issued light truck also sat, shining a white beam onto the a grassy area of the park.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201758,"President Trump warned North Korea yesterday that any further provocations or attacks would be met with fire and fury. In response, Kim Jong-Un mocked the President and said that he would fire test missiles into the waters around Guam. Given, I doubt that the little troll’s weapons could get through our defenses, but to even issue the threat is an act of war. Japan says they have our backs and will protect Guam as well. But President Trump was crystal clear today and did not back down… he said perhaps fire and fury was not tough enough. I believe him on this… he was serious on Syria and if push comes to shove… as Mattis put it yesterday, North Korea should cease actions that will end their regime. Mattis does not bluff.

Just an hour ago, Mad Dog Mattis announced we have a military plan in place to address North Korea. U.S. military strategists at the Pentagon have a military solution in place to address the growing threat emanating from North Korea, but they are holding their fire in favor of ongoing diplomatic efforts by Washington and its allies, Defense Secretary James Mattis said Thursday. Since I don’t expect for diplomacy to bite on this one, North Korea might want to start kissing their ass goodbye.

From the Daily Mail:

President Donald Trump rebuked critics this afternoon who argued that his ‘fire and fury’ threat to North Korea was over the top. ‘Maybe it wasn’t tough enough. They’ve been doing this to our country for a long time, for many years, and it’s about time that somebody stuck up for the people of this country and for the people of other countries,’ Trump countered. ‘So if anything, maybe that statement wasn’t tough enough.’ Trump said Kim Jong-Un should be ‘very, very nervous’ about U.S. retaliation. ‘Because things will happen to them like they never thought possible, OK?’ he said. He warned Kim in remarks from his golf club’s doorstep not to even contemplate an attack on the U.S. or its allies or he will pay the ultimate price. Unlike previous American leaders, Trump said, he is not ‘weak and ineffective’ and will follow through on his threats. The president spoke to reporters ahead of a national security briefing this afternoon on the intensifying crisis with North Korea. National Security Advisor H.R. McMaster is leading the meeting at Trump’s Bedminster property that retired Gen. John Kelly, the new White House chief of staff, and Vice President Mike Pence are also attending.

Trump is also correct when he says the NoKos should be very nervous about retaliation from the U.S. Because if we are forced into it, there won’t be a whole lot left when we are done. Capiche? Trump is not the weak sap that Obama was or the corrupt bureaucrat that Clinton was. National Security Advisor H.R. McMaster has traveled to Trump’s Bedminster property to brief him in person, the President’s press secretary said. Vice President Mike Pence is also on site as is retired Gen. John Kelly, the new White House chief of staff.

Responding to Trump’s ‘fire and fury’ admonishment, a top general to North Korean dictator Kim Jong-Un taunted the U.S. president this morning. General Kim Rak Gyom dismissed Trump’s remarks as a ‘load of nonsense’ and said that only ‘absolute force’ can work on someone as ‘bereft of reason’ as Trump. The commander of North Korea’s strategic rocket forces told state media outlet KCNA that his unit was steaming ahead with plans to strike the U.S. Pacific territory of Guam by mid-August. That would be next week… and if they do, well… North Korea will no longer exist.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201416,"It’s Dallas all over again. From USA TODAY: The three officers were shot dead near the department headquarters, Baton Route Mayor Kip Holden told MSNBC. At least four others were injured in the shooting, he said. “They are investigating,” he said. “Right now we are trying to get our arms around everything.” Two Baton",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
146218,"THE FBI HAS FINALLY ADMITTED THAT HILLARY KNOWINGLY ENGAGED IN CRIMINAL ACTIVITY; WHICH MEANS SHE DOES BELONG IN PRISON. But we already knew that. Now will she actually be prosecuted for her crimes? With all of the political pressure on the FBI and their seemingly liberal bias, it seems like a long",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201982,"BARACK OBAMA THINKS THERE SHOULD BE LIMITS TO A PERSON’S INCOME, BUT PROBABLY NOT HIS OWN.

It’s not news that former presidents, such as Barack Obama, often go on have a lucrative career as event speakers. That’s where the real money they make in their lives comes from. Bill Clinton was supposedly in a heap of debt when he left office in 2001 (Hillary said they were “dead broke,” but that was mostly false). Thanks to speaking engagements for Bill (and now Hillary, no doubt) they make enough to pay their bills and establish a nice little slush fund for mistress hush money (whether or not it’s Bill’s or Hill’s mistresses is anyone’s guess).

The point is this: It pays to be a former politician, especially if you’re one of the select few in history to be elected president. It’s something we should just accept, except when you’re a socialist hypocrite. Remember when Obama lectured the country about how there’s a point at which people make enough money? While that might just sound like red meat for the Elizabeth Warren crowd, he probably really believe in it, for peons such as me an you.

For himself? Well, he just gave one speech that equaled a year’s pay as president.

From The Hill:

Former President Barack Obama reportedly made $$400,000 for an appearance and interview last week at an A&E Networks advertising event.

Here’s my most favorite part of the entire article, it came early on:

The former president

That’s it, now on to the rest…

was interviewed at The Pierre Hotel in Midtown Manhattan by presidential historian Doris Kearns Goodwin, The New York Post reported. The “History Makers” event, which lasted 90 minutes, was conducted in front of the cable network’s advertisers and hosted by A&E chief Nancy Dubac.

During the event, the former president was asked what he missed most about the White House and how he dealt with frustrating moments when he was president.

“For starters, by not having a Twitter account,” Obama reportedly quipped in response.

Yeah, you mean THIS Twitter account.

Not only does he have a Twitter account, but he started it a full 2 years before Trump started his in March of 2009.

Of course, The Hill reports the “quip” without correction. Too bad there isn’t a current sitting president who shall remain nameless that gets afforded the same courtesy of the leftist lapdog media.

So, in addition to telling blatant bald-faced lies what else did A&E get for the $$400K they paid Obama?

Not much.

A source who attended told the Post that Obama said he missed sitting on the Truman Balcony of the White House in the summer and looking upon the Washington Monument and Lincoln Memorial.

He also told the audience about his transition back into civilian life, saying he still hasn’t driven a car and is learning how to use the coffee machine in his new D.C. home.

Wow. So riveting.

Never has the expression “giving my two cents” been more literal. Looks like A&E deserves a refund in the amount of $$399,999.98.

SHOULD OBAMA REALLY BE PAID $$400,000 FOR THE SOUND IF HIS VOICE? LET US KNOW IN THE COMMENTS BELOW, AND IN ADDITION, SHARE THIS ON SOCIAL MEDIA.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198588,"When Trump brands you with a nickname, it sticks.

Just ask Lyin Ted, Low Energy Jeb, Little Marco, and now Crooked Hillary.

Sunday, on ABC’s This Week, host Martha Raddatz called Hillary Clinton “crooked” as she read a Donald Trump tweet, despite the fact that the word “crooked” was not even in the tweet.

Raddatz read Trump’s tweet but added some extra TRUTH to it:",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199325,"President Obama will be interviewed on “Fox News Sunday” — his first time since being elected to office in 2008.

Chris Wallace will interview Obama April 10 from the University of Chicago and the interview will air on the Fox network, the network announced Wednesday. It will air again on Fox News Channel at 2 p.m. and 6 p.m. Eastern time.

READ ALSO: EXCLUSIVE VIDEO: Border Patrol EXPOSES The Truth Behind Obama’s Immigration Policy!

Though Wallace has interviewed Obama before for Fox News — in 2009 and 2013 — he has not interviewed the president on “Fox News Sunday” since he was a senator in 2008.

This is also Obama’s first interview on Fox since 2014.

According to Fox, the two will discuss the fight over the Supreme Court vacancy, the 2016 election and Obama’s presidential legacy.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200274,"President Trump just signed executive order 4098937Y71 this morning which makes fake news illegal in all 50 states. If a broadcast station, publication or website publishes news deemed fake by the White House Center For Truth In Reporting Office, which was set up by the order, that outlet will face fines, suspension of their license and even prison sentences for reporters and writers looking to make a quick buck or fool people for fun.

The order is effective immediately. Reports from Atlanta say CNN is in a race to review everything they’re set to broadcast for the day while Fox News is smiling and waving and continuing to tell the whole truth. The New York Times has already pulled more than 800 articles from their web server that could possibly be used against them. Four online liberal rags, including the massive “Occupy Democrats,” have announced they will cease operations until they can re-format.

This is great news for conservatives who are repeatedly fed stories of a sensational nature by liberal trolls to see how they’ll react. They don’t seem to have anything better to do with their time since they don’t have jobs and it’s lonely in mom’s basement.

Thank you and God Bless you President Trump!",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198202,"The never-ending Russia saga has captured the imagination of Democrats and the mainstream media. While there continues to be zero concrete evidence that anything nefarious took place – or that a single vote was changed due to alleged interference – the drum is beaten on a daily basis.

During this non-stop Russia mania, we’ve seen all sorts of ‘bombshell’ reports released by the press that are portrayed as some sort of smoking gun. As a general rule of thumb, the ‘reports’ come from unnamed and unverifiable sources. Upon release, these stories are spun as if they’re completely earth shattering. After the initial hysteria winds down, additional attention is finally paid to the actual substance of the report in question.

The overwhelming majority of them turn out to be completely devoid of anything resembling substance or facts. Holes are quickly blown through the report, but corrections and retractions are incredibly hard to come by. This cycle repeats itself on an infinite loop, and little attention is paid to stories that actually move the needle for American voters.

Since the press is so obsessed with the Russia story, you would think that a report that’s chock full of juicy details would see a ton of play. You would be right on that – as long as said story doesn’t shed a negative light on Democrats. Patrick Lawrence of The Nation has put together an exhaustive report on the alleged hacking of the Democratic National Committee last year.

While The Nation is an inherently liberal publication, Lawrence was able to push that aside and do some actual reporting. What he uncovered is nothing less than shocking.

The Independent Journal Review passes along the details on that.

The conclusion of the report: This was not a hack — a hack was impossible based on the evidence. This was instead an inside job by someone who directly downloaded information from the DNC servers onto a hard device and transported it, intending it to be released. That’s an unbelievable assessment, but Lawrence comes armed with facts to bolster his findings. In addition, there is the adulteration of the documents Guccifer 2.0 posted on June 15, when he made his first appearance. This came to light when researchers penetrated what Folden calls Guccifer’s top layer of metadata and analyzed what was in the layers beneath. They found that the first five files Guccifer made public had each been run, via ordinary cut-and-paste, through a single template that effectively immersed them in what could plausibly be cast as Russian fingerprints. They were not: The Russian markings were artificially inserted prior to posting. “It’s clear,” another forensics investigator self-identified as HET, wrote in a report on this question, “that metadata was deliberately altered and documents were deliberately pasted into a Russianified [W]ord document with Russian language settings and style headings.”

Hmmm. If a reporter could so easily come to that conclusion, but then we can be sure this will come out in the wash as part of the scores of investigations into Russian interference, right? It certainly doesn’t appear that way.The FBI has never examined the DNC’s computer servers—an omission that is beyond preposterous. It has instead relied on the reports produced by Crowdstrike, a firm that drips with conflicting interests well beyond the fact that it is in the DNC’s employ. Dmitri Alperovitch, its co-founder and chief technology officer, is on the record as vigorously anti-Russian. He is a senior fellow at the Atlantic Council, which suffers the same prejudice. Problems such as this are many.

If you’re asking yourself how it’s even possible that the computers in question haven’t been examined, you’re not alone.That’s a completely unfathomable revelation, and it places the witch hunt in a whole new perspective.All those interviewed came in between 90 percent and 100 percent certain that the forensics prove out. I have already quoted Skip Folden’s answer: impossible based on the data. “The laws of physics don’t lie,” Ray McGovern volunteered at one point. “It’s QED, theorem demonstrated,” William Binney said in response to my question. “There’s no evidence out there to get me to change my mind.” When I asked Edward Loomis, a 90 percent man, about the 10 percent he held out, he replied, “I’ve looked at the work and it shows there was no Russian hack. But I didn’t do the work. That’s the 10 percent. I’m a scientist.”

Where is the mainstream press on this story? Doesn’t Lawrence deserve a forum to discuss what he has uncovered?Shouldn’t members of the press be inspired to dig even deeper to see what they might uncover too?The unfortunate answer is that they’re not, and that tells you all you need to know about the state of journalism today.If this report was somehow tied to alleged wrongdoing on the part of Trump or someone even loosely affiliated with him, this story would be receiving round the clock coverage that would make your head spin.The Russia scandal simply has to be exposed for what it is at some point, right?We’ll keep our fingers crossed on that, but it’s seeming less and less likely every day.

Source: Independent Journal Review",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200077,"We told you a little while ago that the families of the Benghazi victims filed a wrongful death lawsuit against Hillary Clinton. Which makes sense. From Townhall: In August, the families of Sean Smith and Tyrone Woods, two of the victims in the Benghazi attack, filed a wrongful death lawsuit against Hillary Clinton.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201324,Donald Trump doubled down on his pledge to ban immigration into the U.S. from countries with ties to radical Islam in the wake of this weekend’s terror attack at a gay nightclub in Orlando that killed 50 and wounded many more. The presumptive Republican nominee pointed out that extreme interpretations of,americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198248,"One thing that is undeniable is the fact that Democrats plan to keep doing what they have been since 2008. All of their failed ideas and policies are not going away, and they fully intend to keep fighting for everything that the American people rejected this past election. Despite being an",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200982,"There’s a reason that Barack Hussein Obama has no problem routinely putting on the garb of a devout Muslim.

It’s something that most Muslims and anyone who lives in the Middle East are intimately familiar with.

But Obama has successfully duped Western liberals into believing he’s a “Christian.”

Well, one need only listen to the “Christian” pastor under whom Obama sat for decades, the vile Rev. Jeremiah Wright, to know that no TRUE Christian could possibly come from that church.

But it goes deeper.

Barack Obama was born as a Muslim. And he was raised as a Muslim.

What most folks don’t understand is that in the Muslim world, that means you ARE A MUSLIM, forever, period. Either that, or you’re dead.

That’s why throughout his presidency, despite Obama’s claims to be a Christian, he was still constantly referred to as a Muslim in the Middle East.

Or, let’s take a different approach.

Again, Obama was born and raised as a Muslim, by a Muslim stepfather and in Muslim schools.

If he’s now a Christian, perhaps he could share his conversion experience?

After all, Obama’s written a couple of books. And while he does address the topic of his religion, it’s all philosophical. It’s all calculated. There’s never a moment when he OPENS HIS HEART TO JESUS.

Rather, it all sounds like part of a much larger ploy to attain influence and political power. The very same reason that he decided to stop dating white women and marry a fellow African-American.

In the eyes of the Muslim world, Obama remains a Muslim. Perhaps it’s time for Western liberals to open their eyes.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199589,"As if a lackluster response to the plight of thousands of victims of epic flooding in Louisiana wasn’t bad enough, Hillary Clinton is now reportedly looking to capitalize on their misery in a fundraising email.

According to a social media user, Clinton campaign manager Robby Mook sent an email Friday drawing on the epic flooding in Baton Rouge that has already claimed the lives of 13 people to ask for donations.

Donations for Hillary, not the flood victims!

#Hillary uses disaster in Louisiana to raise money for herself. Disgraceful!

Asks for donations to her campaign! pic.twitter.com/yZ9WutntOp — Halley Croft (@HalleyBorderCol) August 19, 2016

“I just got off the phone with Governor John Bel Edwards of Louisiana,” Mook said in the email displayed. “The flooding there is more extensive than anyone expected — more than 40,000 homes have been damaged and more than 100,000 people have been affected.“My heart breaks for Louisiana, and right now, the relief effort can’t afford any distractions,” he appealed. “The very best way this team can help is to make sure Louisianans have the resources they need.”Mook proceeds to ask for a $$10 donation — for his boss, according to the report.“Hillary needs you now more than ever — chip in $$10 and be one of the more than 2 million grassroots donors standing with her,” he asked supporters.

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198887,"While the eyes of the world are on the recently released JFK assassination files, evidence linking Bill and Hillary Clinton to the death of John F. Kennedy Jr. is being being swept under the carpet by those in power. Let’s quickly rewind to 1999. Approaching the end of two terms in the",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
202082,"The 7th-dan black belt in Aikido, famous for martial arts action flicks such as Above the Law, and Under Siege, recently appeared at the Western Conservative. American actor, screenwriter, martial artist, musician, reserve deputy sheriff, and producer, Steven Seagal, has held a small speech and called out for an impeachment of",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200760,"Hillary Clinton thought she was out of the woods in the FBI’s investigation into her many crimes. This week, however, she learned this is not the case at all, and there’s a chance she still could end up in prison. She thought things couldn’t get any worse for her after her",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201898,"After he cost his party the house, senate, and Presidency, Obama is finally admitting failure…..we’ll kind of.Appearing on 60 minutes, Obama admitted he at time lost the “PR Battle” at times. What Obama is NOT mentioning is that the underlying reason he lost the PR battle was because the majority did not want the radical leftist agenda he was intent on shoving down America’s throat.

From CBSNews: Below is a transcript of the excerpt that appeared on the CBS Evening News with Scott Pelley.Steve Kroft:You didn’t change Washington.President Barack Obama: I changed those things that were in direct– my direct control. I mean, I– look, I’m proud of the fact that, with two weeks to go, we’re part of the first administration in modern history that hasn’t had a major scandal in the White House. In that sense, we changed some things. I would’ve liked to have gotten that one last Supreme Court justice in there. I’d like the Supreme Court to take a look at–

Steve Kroft: You couldn’t even get a hearing.President Barack Obama: But we couldn’t even get a hearing. Trying to get the other side of the aisle to work with us on issues, in some cases, that they professed, originally, an interest in, and saying to them, “Hold on a second. You guys used to think this was a good idea. Now, just because I’m supporting it, you can’t change your mind.” But they did.

And what that did, I think, made me appreciate. And I’ve said this before. But it’s worth repeating. Because this is on me. Part of the job description is also shaping public opinion. And we were very effective, and I was very effective, in shaping public opinion around my campaigns. But there were big stretches, while governing, where even though we were doing the right thing, we weren’t able to mobilize public opinion firmly enough behind us to weaken the resolve of the Republicans to stop opposing us or to cooperate with us. And there were times during my presidency where I lost the PR battle.

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198842,"This is 100% legit. I check it out at https://www.iardc.org/Stands for Illinois Attorney Registration And Disciplinary Committee. It’s the official arm of lawyer discipline in Illinois ; and they are very strict. (Talk about irony.) Even I, at the advanced age of almost 65, maintain (at the cost of approximately $$600/year) my law license that I worked so hard and long to earn.

Consider this: 1. President Barack Obama, former editor of the Harvard Law Review, is no longer a “lawyer”. He surrendered his license back in 2008 in order to escape charges he lied on his bar application. A “Voluntary Surrender” is not something where you decide “Gee, a license is not really something I need anymore, is it?” and forget to renew your license. No, a “Voluntary Surrender” is something you do when you’ve been accused of something, and you ‘voluntarily surrender” your license five seconds before the state suspends you.

Michelle Obama “voluntarily surrendered” her law license in 1993. after a Federal Judge gave her the choice between surrendering her license or standing trial for Insurance fraud! The University of Chicago released a statement in March 2008 saying Sen. Barack Obama (D-Ill.) “served as a professor” in the law school-but that is a title Obama, who taught courses there part-time, never held, a spokesman for the school confirmed in 2008. “He did not hold the title of Professor of Law,” said Marsha Ferziger Nagorsky, an Assistant Dean for Communications and Lecturer in Law at the University of Chicago School of Law.

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198739,"CNN commentator Carl Bernstein, the former Washington Post journalist who gained national renown for being one half of the team that broke the infamous Watergate scandal, is clearly more on the liberal wing of the political spectrum and prefers Hillary Clinton over Donald Trump. Yet, he proved he is not going to bend over backwards to defend her in the weeks leading up to Election Day. In a discussion with Chris Cuomo over Clinton’s email server during her tenure as secretary of state, Bernstein made it clear what she did was unforgivable.“What she did is indefensible,” he said.

When Cuomo pushed back at that narrative and insisted what Clinton did was not illegal, Bernstein doubled down.“Whether it’s illegal or not, he did not quite say,” Bernstein said. “What she did was indefensible, it was reckless, she has lied about it, and that is why, especially after Comey, she is now baked in this perception among too many people in this country for her comfort as a liar, as distrusted, and so what we now have – and we now have an election between these two people who are disdained by most Americans.”Clinton is having a difficult time finding friends these days – even on CNN.

Bernstein’s damning conclusions suggest Clinton will have a hard time leaving her email scandal behind as she tries to prove to Americans she’s a trustworthy candidate. They clearly aren’t buying it. She didn’t just misuse an email account – she jeopardized our national security. Expect Donald Trump to remind voters again and again.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199953,"What is there left to say about Maxine Waters?She gave up trying to be a real politician a long time ago and this whole Trump thing has thrown her for a loop to the point where there’s no coming back from the fantasy land she now lives in.

She has been one of the most vocal supporters of a Trump impeachment regardless of the fact there is not a shred of evidence connecting him to the Russian conspiracy theory the Democrats have adopted.It seems like Maxine might be starting to understand that people aren’t listening to her anymore because she just upped the ante in a very strange way.She moved on from impeachment and is now talking about exile. Yes, exile. Like Napoleon exile.

Women are outraged and fed up with this President. Impeachment isn't enough. Should we explore exile? — Maxine Waters (@MaxineWaters) June 29, 2017

All her uninformed minions ate it up.

thinking more along the lines of tar & feather — Indiga Arcturus (@ElizabethWoodv2) June 29, 2017",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
146258,"Former president George H.W. Bush has been admitted into Houston Methodist Hospital to be treated for pneumonia. (via KHOU).Fortunately, his pneumonia has been described as “mild.”However, at 92-years-old, even the mildest case of pneumonia could be potentially deadly. Our former president is under constant watch.Jim McGrath, Bush’s spokesman stated: “President Bush is in very good spirits and is being held for further observation while he regains his strength.”

This is Bush’s second visit to Houston Methodist Hospital for a case of pneumonia. The former president spent two weeks there in January of this year, around the time of his 72nd wedding anniversary.Thus far, Bush has been able to pull through everything that’s been thrown at him, in regard to illnesses. Even McGrath is hopeful saying, “He is already well on the path to recovery.”Bush is already regulated to a wheelchair, as his Parkinson’s disease continues to worsen with each year that goes by. However, that hasn’t stopped him from living live to its fullest.The younger generation may not remember our former president — who held office in the White House from ’89 to ’93 — but we do. We also remember his wonderful son, the brave cowboy-esque George W. Bush. The Bush family has done a lot for our great nation, and, as patriots, it’s our duty to keep their legend alive, and educate the younger generations. The mainstream media and liberal history classes haven’t always painted a good — or even fair — picture of the Bush family, so it’s our job to tell the REAL story.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198759,"We have all seen the videos in which Hillary Clinton collapses in New York, right on the commemoration of the 9/11 victims. This, of course, brought more bad news for Hillary Clinton. The recent polls from CNN show that Trump further increased his lead and that she is slowly, but",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200337,"Allllllllll ABOARD. The crazy train has left the station and Maxine Waters on board. Maxine Waters is mad that President Trump has fired FBI Director James Comey after she announced in January that he has lost his credibility. Trump’s secret weapon is revealed below.

MAXINE WATERS: I Don’t Support Trump Firing Comey, I Would Support Hillary Clinton Firing Comey

In March, Waters put out a press release that said Comey “advanced Russia’s misinformation campaign.” Here is the link to that.

The real thing is that Maxine Waters does agree with Trump. You see how much these politicians dance.

In March, Maxine put out a press release that literally said she thought that Comey “advanced Russia’s misinformation campaign.”

Here is her saying specifically in a video published on January 20th, 2017: “Let’s let the FBI Director have it”

Uh oh. You hear what is coming, y’all. Trump is setting this fools up get drained because it is time to drain that swamp.

Trump’s weapon is the truth. It is becoming increasingly obvious who the enemies of this nation are now. Who do you think it is?

That’s why right now!!!!! Every single Trump voter needs to share this post!! Let’s get Maxine Waters out of the 43rd district of California and get someone in there that isn’t as partisan. If you live in California, get this out there.

Thanks for reading. (h/t Real Clear Politics)",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200881,"There have always been rumors that Obama weaponized the IRS against conservatives. A lot of rumors – but not a lot of proof. Many have levied claims that the IRS, in targeting Tea Party groups, actually helped to end the powerful movement, which brought the Obama agenda to its knees, forcing him to use his “pen and his phone.” Now a new report has come out, claiming PROOF that Obama did indeed use the IRS to take down his conservative enemies.

From Breitbart: We continue to undercover the details of the Obama IRS’s arbitrary and capricious behavior toward those presumed to be “enemies” of President Obama. Last week we released 695 pages of new documents containing admissions by IRS officials that the agency used “inappropriate political labels” to screen the tax-exempt applications of conservative organizations. Other records reveal that the IRS was going to require 501(c)(4) nonprofit organizations to restrict their alleged political activities if they opted for “expedited consideration” of their tax-exempt applications. The documents were produced after a revelation by the IRS that it had located “an additional 6,924 documents of potentially responsive records” relating to a 2015 Judicial Watch Freedom of Information Act (FOIA) lawsuit about the Obama IRS targeting scandal. These new records are the first batch of nearly 7,000 documents that had been hidden from JW, Congress, and the American people. (Our FOIA lawsuit seeks records about the IRS’ selection of individuals and organizations for audits based upon applications requesting nonprofit tax status filed by Tea Party and other 501(c)(4) tax-exempt organizations (Judicial Watch v. Internal Revenue Service (No. 1:15-cv-00220)).

Of the 695 pages of documents released by the IRS, 422 (61 percent) were completely blacked out. Again, this new material was not in the “Congressional Database,” which the IRS created in 2013 to house records responsive to congressional inquiries into the IRS scandal. Nevertheless, we extracted some key info – such as a June 20, 2013, memo from Karen Schiller, then-acting director, EO (Exempt Organizations) Rulings and Agreements, suspending use of the controversial Be on the Lookout (BOLO) and Touch and Go (TAG) lists:

EO Rulings and Agreements is undertaking a comprehensive review of screening and identification of critical issues. We intend to develop proper procedures and uses for these types of documents. Until a more formal process for identification, approval and distribution of this type of data is established, Rulings and Agreements will not use this technique to elevate issues.

In an August 9, 2013, memo, Schiller admitted the IRS used political labels in targeting the groups for special scrutiny and possible audit and that, going forward, the agency would screen organizations based only on their activities, “not words” or “labels of any kind:”

As Acting Commissioner Danny Werfel has said, the IRS has taken decisive action to eliminate the use of inappropriate political labels in the screening of 501(c)(4) applications. IRS policy is now clear that screening is based on activity, not words in a name. The new steps and current policies were outlined in the June 24 report, which noted: “In the absence of BOLO lists, the Determinations Unit will continue to screen for information affecting the determination of applications for tax exempt status, including activity tied to political campaign intervention, but it [will] be done without regard to specific labels of any kind.” The 30-day report also reflects the June 20, 2013 memorandum, which was issued to officially suspend the use of the BOLO list in the screening process.

The documents also include a “Dear [Applicant]” letter that offers an “expedited process” for 501(c)(4) groups in exchange for restriction on their activities:

This optional expedited process is currently available only to applicants for 501(c)(4) status with applications pending for more than 120 days as of May 28, 2013, that indicate the organization may be involved in political campaign intervention.

In this optional process, an organization will represent that it satisfies, and will continue to satisfy, set percentages with respect to the level of its social welfare activities and political campaign intervention activities (as defined in the specific instructions on pages 5-7). These percentage representations are not an interpretation of law but are a safe harbor for those organizations that choose to participate in the optional process.

In short, the Obama IRS, after lawlessly delaying the approval of Tea Party group applications, tried to extort restrictions – which had no basis in law – on these very same groups.

On September 30, 2013, Acting Director, Exempt Organizations, Kenneth C. Corbin, sent a memo to IRS staff providing detailed guidance on classifying applications when “‘merit approval’ is not an option,” emphasizing that the determination is to be based on “facts and circumstances,” not “words and labels:” Classifier reviews the application and determines if it should be routed to a specialty group. This determination is based upon facts and circumstances of the stated activities within Part II of the application rather than names or labels. This is consistent with Karen Schiller’s August 9, 2013 memorandum …

The Schiller and Corbin memos came on the heels of the May 14, 2013, Inspector General report revealing that the IRS had singled out groups using conservative-sounding terms such as “patriot” and “Tea Party” when applying for tax-exempt status. The IG probe determined that “Early in Calendar Year 2010, the IRS began using inappropriate criteria to identify organizations applying for tax-exempt status (e.g., lists of past and future donors)” and “delayed processing of targeted groups’ applications” in advance of the 2012 presidential election. No wonder the Obama IRS hid these records. These new smoking-gun documents contain admissions by the Obama IRS that it inappropriately targeted conservative groups. But the records also show that the abuse continued – as the Obama IRS tried to force conservative applicants to give up their First Amendment rights in order to finally get their applications granted.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199101,"Robert DeNiro has become a well-known loser ever since his cute little “Trump is a punk” video made no difference on election day. In that video, he told some very bad lies and disrespected the president in a big way. Watch the piece of trash fake tough guy’s pitiful performance below:

Now that President Trump has taken office, DeNiro went on a list of people who had directly threatened hi. “I’d like to punch him in the face” might be something fun to say about a guy at the end of the bar or your wife’s flirty boss, but it’s not something you can just say about the President of the United States. Donald Trump made sure of that when he signed the POTUS protection order the day he took office.

Jeff Derpinger, Director of the WHOIP, told reporters from The Gateway Pundit and Breitbart:

“President Trump said from the beginning that he wouldn’t stand for the insults and threats and that they’d be dealt with accordingly. DeNiro is an influential person in this country and his statements create a direct and credible threat against the leader of our country. As such, he will be investigated, his passport and any travel visas he has revoked and he will go on the no-fly list. He will also be subject to a tax audit and further investigation by the Justice Department. Basically, his entire life is about to be opened and examined. Let this be a lesson to those who won’t back President Trump: You will not like what happens if you don’t fall in line.”

DeNiro wasn’t available for comment but a source for Paramount Pictures says the travel ban has already cost him more than $$10 million for contracted filming obligations in New Zealand that he can no longer attend.

Take notice, liberals. You can’t just say whatever you want about President Trump and get away with it.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201792,"After Trump’s temporary travel ban was blocked yesterday by a liberal judge in Hawaii, it became clear who was really behind it. News 2 in Hawaii reported that Obama played golf on Tuesday, then took a 40 minute drive to eat at Noi Thai Restaurant on the other side of the",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201613,"Donald Trump has amassed a wide-array of enemies. From celebrities, to fellow Republicans and “conservatives”, a lot of people can’t stand The Donald’s glowing persona and unrivaled popularity. Of all of his vocal enemies, perhaps none has grabbed his attention more than Fox News Host Megyn Kelly. Kelly has been loudly critical of",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201751,"…cherry-picking statements by Comey in order to preserve her basic narrative about the unusual email set-up. This allows her to skate past the more disturbing findings of the FBI investigation.For instance, when Clinton asserts “my answers were truthful,” a campaign aide said she is referring to this statement by Comey to Congress: “We have no basis to conclude she lied to the FBI.”

But as Kessler pointed out, that was a dodge.Comey was saying that Clinton hadn’t lied to the FBI. While the FBI would not release any transcript or recording of its interview with Clinton, all the director was saying is they had no evidence of her lying … to them.Clinton, meanwhile, was saying that Comey vouched for her statements made to the American public. He clearly did not, as he laid out — both in his press conference and while testifying to Congress — the areas where she lied to the American public.In the end, Kessler slapped Hillary’s statement with WaPo’s harshest judgement for a lie:

As we have seen repeatedly in Clinton’s explanations of the email controversy, she relies on excessively technical and legalistic answers to explain her actions. While Comey did say there was no evidence she lied to the FBI, that is not the same as saying she told the truth to the American public–which was the point of Wallace’s question. Comey has repeatedly not taken a stand on her public statements.

And although Comey did say many emails were retroactively classified, he also said that there were some emails that were already classified that should not have been sent on an unclassified, private server. That’s the uncomfortable truth that Clinton has trouble admitting.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198651,"Vice President Joe Biden says don’t give Trump the nuclear code one day and then outs the guy carrying them the next! Ay Yi Yi!

Biden revealed during a campaign rally that he had a military aide who was carrying the nuclear codes football present at the event.

“There’s a guy that follows me right back here, has the nuclear codes,” Biden said, as he pointed the guy out on camera. “So God forbid anything happened to the president and I had to make a decision, the codes are with me.”

HAS HE LOST HIS EVER LOVIN’ MIND? Biden placed our national security as well as the man’s life in danger! Biden has made some dumb gaffs in the past, but this one takes the cake!

Then he has the audacity to discuss Trumps judgement!

This is not the first time Biden has divulged sensitive information of this nature. In 2009, Biden outed the location of a secret Vice Presidential bunker that sits beneath a U.S. Naval Observatory.

Hillary leaves our secrets open to our enemies on an unprotected server. Obama is out paying ransom and siding with our enemies. Joe is telling the world exactly where the nuclear codes are. We are rather unsafe right now with idiots at the helm.

Wonder what John Kerry is doing these days, maybe I don’t want to know.

Barack Obama does not love America, that is his excuse. I do not believe that of Biden. I think he loves this country. He is just a moron. Too bad too. Personally, I like the ol guy. Had it not been for his plethora of gaffs, Biden would have made a better candidate for the Democrats than Hillary for sure!

But C’mon Biden… Really? There are just some things that are not easy to not forget. The most important briefcase in the country is not one of them!",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201826,"At a joint press conference today in France, President Trump made it clear he is aware of the bombshell report that shows none other than former DOJ head Loretta Lynch helped the Russian Lawyer who met Don Jr. get into the United States under “extraordinary circumstances.”

Just like the rest of us, he wants to know exactly WHY she did this.

We now know Veselnitskaya was vehemently anti-Trump.

he circumstances make the move look extremely suspicious and many believe it was part of a larger sting operation.

From FoxNews

President Trump lashed out at the media and the Obama administration Thursday over the criticism his team is facing for his eldest son’s 2016 meeting with a Russian lawyer thought to have damaging information on Hillary Clinton.

At a joint press conference with the French president in Paris, Trump said the media are making “a very big deal over something that really a lot of people would do.”

He then turned his focus to Obama Attorney General Loretta Lynch, saying he had “heard” Lynch was the one to approve Russian lawyer Natalia Veselnitskaya’s visa.

This is an apparent reference to reports that Lynch signed off on granting the attorney special “parole” to be in the country — though it remains unclear whether she had permission to be in the U.S. at the time of the June 2016 meeting.

“Somebody said that her visa or her passport to come into the country was approved by Attorney General Lynch, now maybe that’s wrong, I just heard that a little while ago … [that] she was here because of Lynch.”

Trump also, as he has in recent days, defended Donald Trump Jr. against criticism.

“My son is a wonderful young man. He took a meeting with a Russian lawyer, not a government lawyer but a Russian lawyer,” Trump said in the press conference with President Emmanuel Macron. “From a practical standpoint most people would have taken that meeting, it’s called opposition research or research into your opponent.”",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201272,"4) Encouraging Racial Polarization: No president ever had a better opportunity to encourage racial reconciliation than Obama. Instead, America’s first black president went in exactly the opposite direction and tried to create as much racial polarization as possible because he thought it benefited him politically. Unlike Jesse Jackson or Al Sharpton, Obama is subtler. His administration encouraged hatred of police, turned a blind eye to race riots and did nothing to slow down the incessant cries of “racism” from his supporters that greeted every disagreement with Obama’s policies. During Obama’s presidency, the Left openly used race as a political weapon and it created a level of racial strife in America that we haven’t seen since the sixties.

5) Losing A War We Had Already Won In Iraq: Today in 2016, people tend to forget that Bush had largely pacified Iraq with the surge before he left office. By 2010, things had gotten so stable that the Obama Administration was trying to take credit for Iraq. Here’s Joe Biden,

I am very optimistic about…Iraq. I mean, this could be one of the great achievements of this administration. You’re going to see 90,000 American troops come marching home by the end of the summer. You’re going to see a stable government in Iraq that is actually moving toward a representative government.

Despite the fact that our generals wanted him to work out a status of forces agreement with the Iraqi government so we could leave troops there, Obama wanted political credit for getting all our troops out of the country and he didn’t much care what happened afterwards.

So we pulled out of Iraq rather than leaving a residual force there as we have in nations like Germany, Japan and South Korea. Predictably, the whole country then fell apart. Worse yet, because of Obama’s incompetence, ISIS was able to take large swathes of territory in Iraq and it became a major player on the world stage. All the blood and treasure we spent in that nation was squandered because an incompetent politician cared more about getting a minor political advantage than winning a war.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
146383,"Americans have been begging Trump to take action against Hillary for her laundry list of corruption and crime—and they won’t be disappointed this time.

For months we’ve had to sit by and watch the left slander and attack our President. Despite a shocking lack of evidence, the FBI—led by a “special” prosecutor—has conducted an investigation into whether Russia had any part in Trump’s campaign.

This witch hunt has been used by liberals to discredit the election, our leadership, and our very democracy. These spoiled babies have tried to conjure up rumors, simply because they refuse to except the results of the election—still!

But in recent weeks we’ve seen more and more evidence showing Hillary Clinton, the DNC, and Barack Obama were really behind the infamous Russia dossier. This suggests Russian collusion—by the left.

That should result in something kind of repercussions, right? At least that’s what President Trump is demanding.

From Daily Wire:

President Trump on Sunday called for somebody — anybody — to “DO SOMETHING!” about the reports that Hillary Clinton’s campaign was involved in the production of a dossier that contained charges about Trump’s supposed ties to Russia.

In a series of early morning tweets, Trump said:

Never seen such Republican ANGER & UNITY as I have concerning the lack of investigation on Clinton made Fake Dossier (now $$12,000,000?),…. — Donald J. Trump (@realDonaldTrump) October 29, 2017

…the Uranium to Russia deal, the 33,000 plus deleted Emails, the Comey fix and so much more. Instead they look at phony Trump/Russia,…. — Donald J. Trump (@realDonaldTrump) October 29, 2017

…""collusion,"" which doesn't exist. The Dems are using this terrible (and bad for our country) Witch Hunt for evil politics, but the R's… — Donald J. Trump (@realDonaldTrump) October 29, 2017

…are now fighting back like never before. There is so much GUILT by Democrats/Clinton, and now the facts are pouring out. DO SOMETHING! — Donald J. Trump (@realDonaldTrump) October 29, 2017

The Washington Post last week revealed that Clinton’s presidential campaign and the Democratic National Convention (DNC) funded Fusion GPS as they produced the unverified Trump dossier. On Sunday, a new report indicates that former President Barack Obama’s campaign organization might have played a part in financing the project as well, The Daily Wire reported.

So, let’s put this into perspective. Buzzfeed and CNN released a bogus and widely-discredit dossier that suggests Trump was working with Russia. Despite everyone claiming it was fake, the FBI used that as an excuse to open an investigation—excuse me—a witch hunt.

But today, there is overwhelming evidence connecting Clinton and her buddies on the left with colluding with Russia to steal the election. And there has been no word of a single investigation by the FBI?

So I guess it has nothing to do with facts, evidence, or justice, huh? Just whoever has enough power on the left to shield themselves from indictments?

It’s about time things changed in D.C. The American people won’t stand for this kind of treatment much longer.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201077,"Donald Trump just struck the ultimate win today about Russia and now the Democrats are scurrying back to their caves in fear of being caught. Despite all the BS saying his meeting was terrible and he is a puppet, HE DID PREVAIL. Take it from Bush-era Russia expert Stephen Cohen, who declared:

It was the BEST meeting between an American and Russian President since Roosevelt met with Stalin!

According to Cohen, the meeting between Roosevelt and Stalin is the main reason Nazis do not run Europe to this day. That’s a HELL of a compliment if I have ever heard one.

This was a much-needed meeting because the picture Cohen paints of US-Russia relations could not be much grimmer:

“Our relationship with Russia is so very, very dangerous – arguably the most dangerous since the Cuban missile crisis of 1962.”

Well, that is an issue we certainly want to avoid happening again. Thanks to President Trump, that may now be possible.

Also, Cohen expertise on Russia has apparently led him to the conclusion that Donald Trump is NOT a Russian puppet and has actually been handling the “crippling allegations” quite well. In fact, Cohen went as far as to say that those making the allegations with no proof are “a threat to our national security.”

Amen, brother. These baseless claims are hurting our negotiating power and stance in the world. Show your proof or stop the lies. Help share this everywhere if you think Stephen Cohen vindicated Trump 100%.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201285,"BRITAIN first, a British conservative party has released a video that shows what’s happening in the streets of Sydney, Australia.

Muslims are protesting daily, attacking police officers, imposing sharing law etc.

Some experts believe that everything has changed since the Australian government banned guns and allowed massive immigration from Islamic nations.

Does it sound familiar? Obama? Hillary?

Australia enacted its gun ban in 1996. Murders have basically run flat, seeing only a small spike after the ban and then returning almost immediately to pre-ban numbers. NOTHING HAS CHANGED! JUST MORE INNOCENT PEOPLE KILLED CAUSE THEY DIDN’T HAVE GUNS TO PROTECT THEMSELVES.

WATCH HERE:

It sounded like they were chanting ‘Obama Obama”?",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200901,"Watch former New York City Mayor Rudy Guiliani correctly say the Black Lives Matter movement puts a target on the back of police officers. Guiliani adds, “When you say black lives matter, that’s inherently racist.” WATCH: ...",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199987,"Obama’s presidency can be traced way back to his speech in 2004 at the Democratic National Convention. Back then he was announced as a contender to the national audience.

He had the really unlikely presidency. Then, Hillary Clinton again was such a big loser and summarised every word of her opponent’s qualification and as we can all remember she said: “Senator Obama has a speech he delivered.” The statement was more than obvious.

via Allenbwest

So green was Obama that even the liberal steadfast Huffington Post blogged at the time about “Obama, The Rookie.” Obama’s resume for the presidency was slight to say the least. He was an Illinois state senator, won a U.S. Senate seat and served in Washington D.C. for about 140 days, declared his candidacy for the presidency and started campaigning.

Kamala Harris is a California state senator who is a young, well-spoken, clean (to use the words of Joe Biden), light-skinned black-American with no detectable inner-city dialect (to use the words of Harry Reid) who may be eyeing the prize:

“Now’s the time prospective presidential candidates start taking the subtle but crucial behind-the-scenes steps that get them noticed by the political intelligentsia, and Sen. Kamala Harris is quietly following the script.

Female, liberal and undeniably bi-racial. Sorry Elizabeth, but she’s got you there.

She’s making speeches to key national constituencies. She’s due for an appearance at a Washington think-tank panel full of chattering-class presidential favorites that the national media will be reporting and analyzing, probably for days. She’s been fundraising for colleagues and making sure that she is forming relationships with key national reporters.

They’re all boxes that prospective presidential candidates routinely check. It’s a chance to ultimately convince insiders they’ve got the gravitas and the fundraising chops to be taken seriously.”

But if ‘rookie’ is a term appropriately applied to Obama, Harris must be a minor league rookie. Rookie benchwarmer. She’s been an elected legislator since…gulp…2017! Yes that’s right, she has held political office since January (just four months) and already has Democrats salivating at the potential.

“…speculation is not going away, not with the absence of a clear Democratic presidential frontrunner and the party desperately in search and in need of a new generation of leadership.

“A lot of activists in the party would love to see a new leader step forward,” said Roger Hickey,” co-director of the progressive strategy group Campaign for America’s Future.”

Harris is being closely watched.

“Looking forward to see how she performs as a senator, I think that the sky is the limit for her,” said Jaime Harrison, associate chairman and counselor of the Democratic National Committee.”

The similarities to Obama’s run-up to the presidency are striking. Let’s face it, Obama had one shining moment, a speech at the 2004 DNC, prior to that he was a complete unknown.

“What every new presidential hopeful needs is an early defining moment.

President Barack Obama’s was his 2004 keynote speech at the Democratic National Convention. Harris’ was her energetic performance in a prominent speaking role at the Women’s March on Washington, a rally that attracted worldwide attention and had an estimated crowd of a half a million people. She instantly became a favorite of liberals, and followed that with remarks at an immigration rally at the White House and a podcast with former top Obama adviser David Axlerod, the architect of Obama’s out-of-nowhere 2008 campaign.

Harris’ rollout accelerates this month. She was the keynote speaker at last week’s National Democratic Institute’s Madeleine Albright luncheon, a prominent Washington event hosted by the nonprofit, nonpartisan group. She’ll give the May 13 commencement speech at Howard University in Washington, her alma mater.

Days later she’ll join a host of others floated as presidential wannabes, including Warren, Sen. Cory Booker of New Jersey, Sen. Amy Klobuchar of Minnesota and Sen. Kirsten Gillibrand of New York in a speaking role at the Ideas Conference, a Washington gathering seen as the liberal equivalent of the Conservative Public Action Conference, a traditional testing ground of GOP presidential hopefuls.”

An unknown hyper-partisan, hyper-liberal bi-racial American from a solid blue state and finally someone not a member of the Democrat octogenarian club. Yes we’ve read this script before and tragically had to sit through the ensuing horror movie. Twice.

Could the story repeat once again? Of course that it could. But, Foolish is the person who does not learn from the past.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198169,"We’ve been hearing a lot lately about “reparations” for slavery. The idea behind it is that if you’re white in America, your family benefits from the work of slaves. It’s the guilt trip associated with the sins of our ancestors that we will never be able to pay back. According to those who back this group, the black population in America today has infinitely harder lives because of not having access to funding for college, racism, discrimination and they wish they’d been left in Africa. For the record, at this point, I think we wish we’d left them too.

We’re not going to get into discussing all the other countries that have slaves, still or the fact that many of the slave traders were black themselves. We’re not going to address the enormous and ever-growing number of tax dollars coming from white people going to black people and whether that amount would be just paying for all their pain and suffering because it really is hard to put a price on pain and suffering. What we’re going to talk about are the people that are here now, who want your money.

The reparations movement is growing by the day, and they’re getting more brazen with their demands, and even threats to take what they believe to be theirs.

“While this young man’s opinion and rage is clearly an outlier and not representative of the opinions of the majority of black Americans it is none the less troubling.

I can not help but feel sorry for someone who has been told their whole lives that they will never amount to anything and that they are owed something from an entire race of people who have never done anything to hurt them.

What makes America great is that people born into any situation can work hard and become anything they desire to be. Either you believe you can or you believe you can not, either way you are right.

According to DailyMail:

‘A recently launched ‘reparations’ website is calling for white people to provide money and services to black people to relieve them of guilt and atonement from slavery. Seattle-based artist Natasha Marin started the website that offers and suggests numerous ways where whites can give back to blacks to relieve their white guilt.’

Here’s an example of what these damaged parties want you to know about the reparations movement. In case you’re wondering what they keep saying, it’s “Uhuru“. This is a communist movement in Africa that these kids are obviously a part of.

I don’t know how it sounds to you, but to me that “Uharu” they keep saying sounds a little like “hail Hitler”. It also looks a lot like those being videoed have been bullied into reciting a catechism of the black reparations movement. And that’s not even addressing the religious comments at the beginning the video that reek of all out blaspheme, according to Biblical standards. Obviously, I wouldn’t normally hold the star of a random youtube video to Biblical standards, but he’s the one that brought Jesus into it.

Unfortunately, this seemingly confused young man isn’t alone. This is a movement that’s growing in strength and numbers as white guilt takes hold and those in the black community who consider themselves injured grow in audacity.

Via U.S. Herald:

In a post, the delusional black activist begins telling white people ‘if you don’t have any descendants, will your property to a black or brown family, preferably one that lives in generational poverty.’

She continues; White people who can ‘afford to downsize’ are urged to ‘give up the home you own to a black or brown family.’

Helm also references ‘lil’ dick-white men’ associated with the alt-right and tells other whitesto, ‘Get they ass fired. Call the police even: they look suspicious.’

The hilarious list composed by Helm is no doubt a serious attempt by her to somehow bring the issue of slavery back into focus; however what she’s actually achieved by her silly antics, is the obvious race hustle

Moreover Helm’s is a sad individual using a tragic moment within our nation’s history to enrich herself and continue the ‘victimization cycle’ rather than actually accomplishing something on her own, it’s a common thread among left-wing activists, many of whom insist that the only way to properly address historical racism is through reparations.

Here’s a few of Helm’s ‘top 10 list.’

1.’White people, if you don’t have any descendants, will your property to a black or brown family, preferably one that lives in generational poverty.’

2. ‘White people, if you’re inheriting property you intend to sell upon acceptance, give it to a black or brown family. You’re bound to make that money in some other white privileged way’.

3. ‘If you are a developer or reality owner of multi-family housing, build a sustainable complex in a black or brown blighted neighborhood and let black and brown people live in it for free.’

4. ‘White people, if you can afford to downsize, give up the home you own to a black or brown family, preferably a family from generational poverty.’”

I don’t think there’s a person in America today that would contend that slavery was a good thing. We were wrong and righted it. It’s probably just a little insulting to the families of the hundreds of thousands of white American men who died to free the slaves that their sacrifice wasn’t good enough. To date, the United States has done arguably the most to make up for our indiscretion against slaves that any country has ever done.

What people conveniently forget is that reparations were paid by slave owners on the day that Union soldiers stepped foot on their property. That ever taunted 2% of the south that owned massive plantations had their homes and livelihoods burned to the ground. Their families were left in desolation with nothing to show for generations of hard work that was done before slaves were bought and sold en mass to grow cotton and the like. But that’s the price you pay for doing something wrong, so their children, for the most part, keep their mouths shut and carry on.

We pay our reparations in taxes every day. We pay it in food stamps and subsidized housing and affirmative action. So to those who have any ideas about coming and personally taking any more than that, we would tell them what we told the Mexicans; come and take it.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201995,"The murder of 62-year-old Andrei Karlov, the Russian ambassador to Turkey, in Ankara was called a “provocation” by Russian President Vladimir Putin.Putin condemned the shooting Monday, saying it was meant to sabotage the relationship between the two countries.

Although the gunman was shot dead by police, Putin dispatched a team of investigators to Turkey to look further into the incident.“We have to know who directed the hand of the killer,” he said.In a special, televised meeting at the Kremlin, Putin spoke of how he would answer the murder of Karlov. “There can only be one response — stepping up the fight against terrorism,” he said. “The bandits will feel this happening.”

He also called for extra security in Russian embassies around the world. Karlov was speaking at the Cagdas Sanat Merkezi modern arts center in Ankara when he was gunned down by Mevlut Mert Altintas. Altintas, a police officer, approached Karlov from the rear and shot him three times in the back.In video of the incident, Altintas can be heard shouting, “Allahu akbar [God is greatest]. Do not forget Aleppo! Do not forget Syria! Do not forget Aleppo! Do not forget Syria!”

He then said, “Only death will remove me from here.” Altintas was removed shortly afterward.Ties between Russia and Turkey have been improving, and each country said it was determined not to allow this incident to damage the relationship.Turkish President Recep Tayyip Erdogan agreed with Putin’s assertion that the murder of Karlov was meant as a provocation.“But both the Russian and Turkish administrations have the determination not to fall for this provocation,” he said. Following a mourning ceremony at the airport Tuesday, the body of the slain ambassador was to be sent back to Russia.

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198572,"President Donald Trump and Sen. John McCain (R-AZ) have been caught bickering and taking shots at one another on multiple occasions. In this instance, McCain crossed the line, and as a result, the President responded with an epic warning.

Trump issued his warning during a radio interview on WMAL in Washington. According to The Washington Times, the President responded to McCain’s comments by saying that, “People have to be very careful because at some point I fight back.” He added, “I’m being very, very nice but at some point, I fight back, and it won’t be pretty.” The only thing that McCain had to say in response was, “I have faced rougher adversaries.”

The big question is what did McCain say that led President Trump to these comments? It all began on Monday when McCain received an award for a lifetime of service and sacrifice to the country.

McCain did the usual and spoke about his two decades in military service and the time he was imprisoned during the Vietnam War. He then took it a step further and started talking about the political climate in the country, and of course, took a stab at the President in the process.

“To abandon the ideals we have advanced around the globe, to refuse the obligations of international leadership for the sake of some half-baked, spurious nationalism cooked up by people who would rather find scapegoats than solve problems,” McCain said.

He then added that it “is as unpatriotic as an attachment to any other tired dogma of the past that Americans consigned to the ash heap of history.”

It sounds like McCain is implying that we need not worry about ourselves, but, rather, need to worry about all of the other countries around the world. This appears to be McCain’s intent, given the words, “half-baked, spurious nationalism,” which he is condemning.

Many are wondering why McCain would say such harsh words–words targeting the party he represents. Trump noted in the interview that McCain, as most are aware of, also voted against the repeal and replace of the Affordable Care Act.

Some would speculate that this has to do with a personal vendetta that McCain has against the President. It may have something to do with the comments that Trump made about McCain at the Family Leadership Summit in Ames, Iowa–before Trump won the presidency.

The comments about McCain included, “He’s not a war hero.” Then, candidate Trump also said, “He was a war hero because he was captured. I like people who weren’t captured.

These comments were made back in 2015, but they still must sting the Arizona Senator because he is resisting and obstructing Trump every step of the way. His failure to vote in favor of the repeal and replace of the ACA is hypocritical considering how he continuously advocated for repealing Obamacare during his re-election bid.

When given a chance, he let the country down. Sadly, it appears the feud between McCain and the President is just heating up. That is not good for the Republican Party–or the country.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199345,"Role of Special Counsel Robert Mueller has become more politicized every single day. Mueller was allegedly appointed to probe whether or not President Trump or his team colluded with Russia during the election. Thus far, intelligence agencies and Robert Mueller had to find any proof, but if there was it would be leaked by",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199588,"Joe Scarborough interrogated Hillary Clinton campaign manager Robby Mook on MSNBC’s “Morning Joe” Monday on claims the former secretary of state made during her first interview since the Democratic National Convention. “No, we’re not gonna throw you a softball,” Scarborough told Mook. “How could Hillary Clinton say that she did not send or receive classified emails?”

Over the weekend, Clinton appeared on “Fox News Sunday,” where host Chris Wallace pressed her to account for the contradictions between FBI Director James Comey’s testimony before Congress and statements she’d made in defense of her private server. Scarborough began by examining the Wallace interview, where Clinton again insisted that she neither sent nor received information marked as classified.

“Director Comey said my answers were truthful, and what I’ve said is consistent with what I have told the American people, that there were decisions discussed and made to classify retroactively certain of the e-mails,” Clinton told the Fox host. Fact-checkers tore Clinton’s statements apart, and Scarborough laughed at…

KEEP READING ON NEXT PAGE>>>",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200667,"Judicial Watch on Thursday announced that it had unearthed emails from Hillary Clinton’s personal email account dated February 2009. Until now, the former secretary of state had maintained she was not using the account at that time.

The findings include a Feb. 13, 2009, exchange between Clinton and her chief of staff, Cheryl Mills, in which Mills conveys to Clinton that the National Security Agency is not pleased with her request for a more secure, personalized BlackBerry. Clinton sought the device to circumvent normal security protocols for accessing classified information.

The emails went through Clinton’s now-infamous personal account, hdr22@clintonemail.com. Judicial Watch reports that the information was obtained through an open records request submitted to the State Department on April 28, 2015.

Clinton has maintained that she did not use the personal email account before March 2009, months after she was sworn in to lead the State Department. At that time, Clinton has said, she used a Blackberry.net account associated with her tenure in the Senate and has refused to hand over the contents of that account.

However, the State Department does possess some of Clinton’s emails from the older account after they were caught up in a probe of Gen. David Petraeus by the Defense Department. The Pentagon reportedly obtained them from his accounts before handing them over to State, though the department has refused to release them to the public.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199927,"About a week ago Donald Trump asked a crowd of supporters who they’d like to see as his vice presidential running mate.

The three names that were mentioned were former Speaker of the House Newt Gingrich, former Secretary of State Condoleezza Rice, and Sen. Jeff Sessions.

Now, Rice has taken herself out of contention.

Condoleezza Rice won't be Trump's VP, and will skip the GOP convention. But she will campaign for GOP Senators. https://t.co/mKRrJLWrfv — Olivier Knox (@OKnox) June 17, 2016

More from Yahoo:

…

“Dr. Rice has repeatedly said in past cycles as well as this one, she’s not interested in being vice president,” Georgia Godfrey told Yahoo News in a statement. “She’s happy at Stanford and plans to stay.”

Rice will also stay away from Cleveland, where Republicans are expected to anoint the volatile entrepreneur as their candidate. “She does not plan to go to the convention,” Godfrey said.

Since President Bush left office in January 2009, “Draft Condi for (TBD elected office)” speculation has never fully gone away. She’s the highest-profile African-American woman in the party and a former secretary of state who consistently rates well with voters. Various news outlets have recently fed that fire. In the past week, right-leaning Newsmax and Breitbart News each ran a story touting the possibility that Rice, now a professor of political science at Stanford University and fellow at its Hoover Institution, might run with Trump.

“She plans on doing a few events to help her friends in the Senate,” the source said, speaking on condition of anonymity. “She’s concerned about down-the-ballot races and wants to be helpful where she can.”

Interesting.

Condi is just one of many prominent Republicans who won’t be attending the RNC convention next month.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200148,"Society Security has been one of the most embattled programs in American history. Set up by President Roosevelt over 80 years ago, the program designed to help Americans when they reach retirement has been abused and misused for generations.

Americans who paid into the system all their lives often have trouble receiving benefits when they retire. Meanwhile immigrants and others who have not contributed are able to withdraw from SS on day one of entering the country.

Presidents have worked to reform the system, to alleviate the burden it will place on future generations, but have often been denied by liberal lawmakers..

Today the Social Security program is in great need of help and reform. President Trump has vowed to preserve the benefits of both Social Security and Medicaid, but change is still needed.

Recent news is flooring Americans and revealing a scandal you wish could only be made up. Instead it has only confirmed the great problems SS faces and the challenge Trump faces.

From Right Wing News:

An audit found that the Social Security Administration paid out over $$1 billion in benefits to people that don’t have social security numbers — or, people that should not be able to get benefits at all. The government’s documentation of “representative payees,” or people who receive benefits on behalf of someone else incapable of managing their affairs, was evidently massively flawed.

Over the last 10 years, the SSA has paid out $$1 billion to 22,426 representative payees who did not have […]

READ MORE ON NEXT PAGE >>>",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
202155,"The murder of 62-year-old Andrei Karlov, the Russian ambassador to Turkey, in Ankara was called a “provocation” by Russian President Vladimir Putin.Putin condemned the shooting Monday, saying it was meant to sabotage the relationship between the two countries. Although the gunman was shot dead by police, Putin dispatched a team of",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201808,"In a report published to lawmakers Wednesday, the State Department inspector general determined that Hillary Clinton did not comply with the agency’s policies on records. According to Politico, the report specially pointed to Clinton for her “exclusive use of private email.” Specifically, the report set forth the following: “Secretary Clinton should have preserved",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199975,"You know how Obama and his friends used the Dallas Massacre to promote their gun control agenda. Obama didn’t care much about the lives of those police officers killed to protect BLM protesters. Thank God, Trump is completely different. In his last campaign in Texas, He went down the line of Dallas police",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199375,"Hillary Clinton has more problems than anyone can possibly count, but it just got worse for her campaign as a video has surfaced that will cause a stir among her supporters. It’s no secret that Bill Clinton has been upfront and center of her campaign every step of the way, so what Bill Clinton says and believes has a direct impact on Hillary Clinton, particularly on policy issues.

A new video has surfaced from NumbersUSA that shows President Bill Clinton addressing Congress on illegal immigrants approximately 20 years ago. The video shows a side-by-side comparison between the words of Bill Clinton and Donald Trump…they are virtually the same, yet Hillary slams Trump for his stance on illegal immigration.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201710,"President Trump spoke the truth about illegal immigration from the moment he threw his hat in the ring to be president. He boldly stated in his campaign announcement speech that Obama’s open borders were, “bringing drugs…crime…and rapists” into the United States.

Liberals quickly moved to denounce Trump’s statements as racist, and sought to hide all of the facts proving Trump right.

But the depths of corruption were worse than anyone could have imagined.

Not only did Obama’s administration know that gang members were entering the country.

They invited them in and provided them with housing, all while knowing their history.

From The Washington Times:

The Obama administration knowingly let in at least 16 admitted MS-13 gang members who arrived at the U.S. as illegal immigrant teenagers in 2014, a top senator said Wednesday, citing internal documents that showed the teens were shipped to juvenile homes throughout the country.

Sen. Ron Johnson, chairman of the Senate Homeland Security Committee, said a whistleblower turned over Customs and Border Protection documents from 2014 detailing the 16 people who were caught crossing the border.

“CBP apprehended them, knew they were MS-13 gang members, and they processed and disbursed them into our communities,” Mr. Johnson, Wisconsin Republican, said.

These 16 gang members have been connected with all manner of serious crimes, including murder by beheading, amputations by machete, rape, extortion, racketeering, drug smuggling, and human trafficking.

Obama and Democratic Party were guilty of knowingly supporting this violence against the U.S. citizens. This makes the Obama administration complicit in any crimes committed by these gang members.

Obama and his cronies did everything they could to promote chaos, violence, crime and division in America. They armed the drug cartels during Operation Fast and Furious while trying to disarm American citizens.

They have armed affiliates of al-Qaeda and let in terrorists with no vetting. They did everything possible to create racial animosity and have fueled hatred toward the police.

Knowing that, it’s no surprise that these MS-13 gang members were welcomed in by Obama with open arms. But now the president is undoing the years of damage caused by Obama by restoring law and order, and holding these criminals accountable.

Mr. Trump, build that wall!

Source: The Washington Times",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198046,"◘ Hillary Clinton suffered a dural sinus thrombosis (blood clots in the brain). Very serious. Significant risk of stroke, intracranial hemorrhage and death.

◘ They blamed the clots on a concussion. Not a chance. Concussions don’t cause blood clots. It would take a skull fracture with tearing of the dural sinus.

◘ She suffered/suffers residual/recurrent neurological deficits (visual disturbance, balance, memory, mental status). Bad prognostic indicator.

◘ She is on lifelong Coumadin. This is highly significant. Dangerous drug. Blood thinner. It’s clear she has a hypercoagulable disorder despite their denials. Coumadin carries a substantial risk for patients, particularly those with fall risk. Spontaneous hemorrhage common, intracranial and elsewhere. I see it commonly, including life-threatening brain bleeds. Normal, healthy patients are NEVER, NEVER prescribed Coumadin.

My conclusions (and I’m right about these):

◘ HC clearly has an underlying hypercoagulable blood disorder. That’s the only reason to give Coumadin (other than chronic atrial fibrillation and prosthetic heart valves, which are actually themselves causes of hypercoagulable disorders).

◘ Her hypercoagulable is likely severe. There are safer blood thinners than Coumadin. They’ve tried them on her (Lovenox) and it failed. Coumadin is typically given to those who can’t afford the newer drugs or reserved for cases that are refractory to the safer drugs. Coumadin is a powerful and dangerous drug; originally developed as a rat poison (Warfarin).

And the big one:

◘ It’s more likely than not that Hillary suffered a stroke in 2012 that they called a concussion. Stroke is extremely common following sinus thrombosis (of patients with clot in SSS: 75% stroke and 60% have intracranial hemorrhage). Overall about half the cases of sinus thrombosis resolve completely but that’s obviously not her since she exhibits and confesses to lasting neurological deficits. This is med school 101 stuff.

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199157,"We had to sit back and suffer through eight years of Obama as our president. He blatantly put our country in danger and would flirt with terrorists every chance he got, and this is the result.

Iranian officials have come forward and said that they have no qualms about “acting decisively” against our country. The reason for their threat is because the Senate just voted to impose new sanctions on the Islamic regime. Iran is saying that President Trump “violated” the Obama-era Iran deal, and that America “will be harmed.” (via The Washington Free Beacon)

Essentially, Obama drafted up a plan of action with members of the United Nation Security Council. The agreement was called a Joint Comprehensive Plan of Action. It lifted heavy sanctions off of Iran, in hopes that they would come to their senses and quit messing with nuclear weapons. This deal that Obama helped craft lifted BILLIONS of dollars of sanctions against Iran. The country could trade in valuable resources such as their oil and natural gas, and the country was able to be invested in again. You would think they would be appreciative that at least one president favored them over the citizens he is supposed to represent.

Here is the insane part. The inspections on Iran to ensure that they had their hands off of nuclear weapons and that they were not enriching Uranium never happened. They were allowed to run unchecked, and they even resisted multiple investigations. In other words, Iran got what they wanted, and they were allowed to back out of their end of the deal. This plan has “Obama” written all over it. Obama was spending his time sponsoring terrorists, arming the Mexican Cartel, and allowing a flood of illegals like we have never seen before enter the country, but we are not supposed to be angry?

Now we all have to do sit and wait to see what Iran is going to do next. It is pretty unbelievable that they would have the gall to threaten us after Obama pretty much saved them from falling into pieces. President Trump let it be known from the start that he was not a fan of the Iranian Nuclear Deal. He believed, much like we all do, that Iran is violating their terms of the agreement. There is nothing there to even reason with at this point. They can’t say “but we are doing what we are supposed to be doing,” because they would be lying.

The main reason Trump is leery is that they will not allow an inspection of their nuclear program, even just to ease the minds of the people who pulled them out of a bottomless pit of despair and debt. If you want the icing on the cake, consider that the Iranian government is openly testing ballistic missiles right in front of us. This move should be considered a slap in the face, and we need to be on watch. We are confident in the abilities of President Trump and James “Mad Dog” Mattis to secure our country from these savages. I guess this is one of those times where the old punchline still works, “Thanks, Obama.”",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201415,"In the mind of “Open Borders” Barack Obama, “immigrants” and “ILLEGAL immigrants” are basically the same thing.

Watch Eric Trump expose Obama for trying to pass of Trump’s plan to stop ILLEGAL immigration with “anti-immigrant” sentiment.

Let us know what you think about this..",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
146212,"Chuck Schumer has some serious questions to answer with the revelation of his personal role in the recent NYC terror attack.

The American public has already been informed the the NYC terror attack was executed by Sayfullo Saipov, a legal immigrant from Uzbekistan with radical Islamic beliefs. What wasn’t known until more recently is the role Chuck Schumer played in this criminal immigrants presence in America as it was his ‘lottery’ visa program that allowed this deadly person into our country with little to no knowledge of his true and diabolical motives.

Mark Levin has come forward to report on these disturbing allegations and voice his concerns that these events continue to occur thanks to the left refusing to accept the reality behind the necessity of President Trumps immigration reform.

Via Subject Politics:

Levin revealed that Saipov was a LEGAL immigrant from Uzbekistan who came here under Chuck Schumer’s “Diversity Immigrant Visa Program.”

Chuck Schumer co-sponsored the “Diversity Immigrant Visa Program,” which grants 50,000 permanent foreign visas per year based on a lottery system! All the people have to do is apply online and enter the “lottery” to come into the US.

Levin warned that Federal Judges blocking Pres. Trump’s extreme vetting are literally endangering American citizens.

“THIS IS PROGRESSIVISM GONE NUTS. AND IT’S GOING TO KILL A LOT MORE PEOPLE. AND YOU WOULD HAVE THOUGHT AFTER 9/11 THAT PEOPLE WOULD TAKE THIS ISSUE OF IMMIGRATION SERIOUSLY.”

Watch Here:",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199103,"First Lady Melania Trump is going to host her first White House event and it will be competing with Hollywood’s famed Oscars event.White House Press Secretary Sean Spicer reported that the White House will sponsor the Governor’s Ball on Sunday night, February 26. The gala event is part of the National Governors Association’s winter meeting, according to The Daily Mail.

“Mrs. Trump looks forward to putting on a phenomenal event” Spicer said on Wednesday. “And the first lady’s put a lot of time into this event that’s going to occur, welcoming our nation’s governors to the capital and I have a feeling that that’s where the president and the first lady are going to be focused on, on Sunday night.”During the White House presser, Spicer was asked about the animosity Hollywood seems to have for President Trump, specifically citing the attacks leveled by actress Meryl Streep.“I have no idea, it’s a free country,” Spicer said. “I think Hollywood is known for being rather far to the left in its opinion.”Kellyanne Conway was reportedly sitting nearby when Spicer was asked the question and had a noteworthy reaction.

But before that, the president had a few words for lefty Hollywood.On Twitter , Trump said, “Meryl Streep, one of the most over-rated actresses in Hollywood, doesn’t know me but attacked last night at the Golden Globe.”He went on…

Meryl Streep, one of the most over-rated actresses in Hollywood, doesn't know me but attacked last night at the Golden Globes. She is a….. — Donald J. Trump (@realDonaldTrump) January 9, 2017

Hillary flunky who lost big. For the 100th time, I never ""mocked"" a disabled reporter (would never do that) but simply showed him……. — Donald J. Trump (@realDonaldTrump) January 9, 2017

""groveling"" when he totally changed a 16 year old story that he had written in order to make me look bad. Just more very dishonest media! — Donald J. Trump (@realDonaldTrump) January 9, 2017

Donald Trump isn’t really alone with his feelings about the Oscars. The American people — the ostensible customers for Hollywood’s products — are also getting sick and tired of Hollywood’s left-wing antics.A few recent polls have shown that many Americans are getting over their interest in the Oscars.A THR and National Research Group poll found, perhaps unsurprisingly, that Trump voters and Clinton voters want very different things from the Oscars.The poll found that 44 percent of Trump voters think the Oscars are “too political.” But Clinton supporters think they aren’t political enough with 43 percent saying they want the speeches to be more political (while only 8 percent of Trump voters want the speeches to get political).

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198316,"Bernie Sanders on Tuesday jabbed back at Gov. Jerry Brown’s endorsement of Hillary Clinton in the presidential campaign, saying he is accustomed to opposition from “the Democratic establishment.”

“I will tell you that in every state that we have gone into, we have taken on the entire Democratic establishment,” Sanders said in response to a question about the Democratic governor’s endorsement. “It’s not surprising to me that, you know, we will have the Democratic establishment supporting Hillary Clinton.”

He added, “I like Jerry Brown, but people can make their own choices.”

One week before California’s June 7 primary, Sanders stopped for reporters in a hotel hallway after leaving a news conference without taking any questions.

When pressed, he said of the event with members of the California Nurses Association, “It was more of a rally, but what’s on your mind?”

Sanders continues to campaign furiously in California, despite Clinton’s near-lock on the nomination. After spending time in the Central Valley in recent days, the Vermont senator said he has not studied controversial proposals to increase pumping from the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta. He gave a similar response earlier this month.

“Actually, it’s not an issue that I have studied,” Sanders said. “I mean, I think clearly there’s going to have to be more federal, state and local cooperation in a crisis situation.”

Sanders planned to rally supporters in Santa Cruz and Monterey later Tuesday, then in Palo Alto and Davis on Wednesday. Following a rally in Oakland on Monday, Sanders appeared in the stands at Oracle Arena to watch the Golden State Warriors complete their come-from-behind, Game 7 victory over the Oklahoma City Thunder in the Western Conference finals.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200499,"The 9th Circuit Court of Appeals, well known for their liberal bias and hatred for all things American, has ruled that Christianity is illegal. The religion that America was founded on; the apex of western civilization, is apparently too good for our schools, our government and our public parks.

A lawsuit brought by an atheist group in California that was shot down by a federal judge has been overturned on appeal, meaning any Christian symbols, mentions of God or images of Jesus are to be removed from all public places in America. The suit was immediately appealed to the Supreme Court, which will hear it later this month.

Until then, an injunction will keep the heathens of the left from tearing down thousands of statues, pictures and symbols that have adorned the public places of America for generations. If the ruling stands, the word “God’ will be removed from everything associated with the public interest, including the pledge of allegiance and all US currency.

Experts give the decision little hope of surviving a day in the Supreme Court, but you never can tell. If the court decides that separation of church and state should be that far-reaching, we may be kissing our beloved Christianity goodbye.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200672,"Russian president Vladmir Putin is asserting himself as the next broker for Middle East peace talks between Israel and the Palestinians, a sign of his continued ambition to supplant the U.S. – and Obama – as the major power broker in the region.

Egyptian president Abdel Fattah al-Sisi said that Putin would be willing to host Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu and Palestinian President Mahmoud Abbas for talks at the Kremlin, reported Egyptian media.

“The Russian president has informed me that he has invited Palestinian President [Abbas] and Prime Minister Netanyahu for a meeting in Moscow,” al-Sisi said. “Egypt supports these efforts and both sides are urged to participate and respond positively to the initiative for the sake of finding light at the end of the tunnel for Palestinians and establishing their state alongside Israel.”

Egypt’s role in the process would be “that which convinces the sides that if peace will be attained light will shine on the entire region,” according to al-Sisi.

He added that Fatah and Hamas, the opposing Palestinian political parties, needed to make amends and end their civil war in order for the peace talks to be successful.

In July, Palestinian leaders presented several preconditions for participating in a trilateral Israeli-Egyptian-Palestinian peace summit in Cairo, including a freeze on Israeli settlement construction.

Abbas also demanded that Israel accept negotiations based on the pre-1967 boundary lines and pledge ahead of time to implement any agreements reached in the talks.

Putin originally suggested a Moscow peace conference in 2005, but the U.S., in hopes to contain Russia’s diplomatic influence, opposed it.

But after a decade under Obama’s tired lead-from-behind strategy coupled with ISIS’s regional destabilization, conditions in the Middle East have continued to give Putin the leverage he needs step in and show Russia’s influence as a regional power player.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201896,"We all feel frustrated and helpless by the violence, but that is not acceptable. It’s time to look in the mirror and ask ourselves, what are we doing to create change?” “Tonight we’re honoring Muhammad Ali, the GOAT. But to do his legacy any justice, let’s use this moment as a",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200004,"The liberal media has tried to position anti-Trump rioters as “peaceful protesters.” That story was obliterated this week, however, when they acted violently and belligerently during the presumptive nominee’s visit to San Jose, California for a campaign rally. This behavior is almost to be expected at Trump events these days, though",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198456,"Democratic presidential front-runner Hillary Clinton slammed rival Sen. Bernie Sanders on Wednesday morning for being ignorant of how banking law works, despite promising voters that he’d work to break up the big banks.

In an appearance on MSNBC’s “Morning Joe,” Clinton pointed to a Friday interview Sanders conducted with the New York Post as proof that may not be able to deliver the promises he makes on the campaign trail.

READ ALSO: Clinton Campaign Chief Linked to Russian Bank Listed in Panama Papers

“I think the interview raised a lot of really serious questions,” Clinton said. “The core of his campaign has been, break up the banks, and it didn’t seem in reading his answers that he understood exactly how that would work under Dodd-Frank, exactly who would be responsible, what the criteria were.”

“That means you can’t really help people if you don’t know how to do what you are campaigning on saying you want to do,” Clinton added.

In the Friday interview, Sanders was asked for specifics about how he was going to “break up” big banks, whether the executive branch had that for authority, or how he obtain that power as president if he lacked it. Sanders’ responses pivoted back to broad talking points that he uses on the campaign trail.

Clinton suggested that Sanders “hadn’t done his homework” in spite of “talking for more than a year about doing things that he obviously hadn’t really studied or understood.”

“That does raise a lot of questions, what it really goes to is for voters to ask themselves can he deliver on what he’s talking about, can he really help people, can he help our economy, can he keep our country strong,” Clinton added. “I think I’m by far the better choice.”

Despite her misgivings, Sanders easily won the Wisconsin primary Tuesday night, and defeated Clinton by about 13 points.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
202006,"The newly devoid of hope Michelle Obama told a group of young Muslims and other immigrants Friday that “this country belongs to you.”

From The Star-Telegram:

In her final speech as first lady on Friday, Michelle Obama singled out young immigrants and Muslims, many of whom express apprehension about President-elect Donald Trump.

“Do not ever let anyone make you feel like you don’t matter, or like you don’t have a place in our American story — because you do,” she said. “Know that this country belongs to you, to all of you. From every background and walk of life. If you or your parents are immigrants, know that you are part of a proud American tradition . . . that has made us the greatest country on Earth.”

Religious diversity is “not a threat to who we are,” she said, “it makes us who we are.”

…“Whether you are Muslim, Christian, Jewish, Hindu, Sikh . . . I want our young people to continue to learn and practice those values with pride,” the first lady said.

Obama signaled she’s going to continue agitating despite being forced out of the White House:

“Don’t be afraid. Be focused. Be determined. Be hopeful. Be empowered,” she said, her voice breaking. “Lead by example with hope, never fear. And know that I will be with you, rooting for you and working to support you for the rest of my life.”

In the mind of leftists, immigrants who showed up last week are more American than the descendents of those who came over on the Mayflower.

To think those who built the country and paid into the system for generations have a claim to it is “racist” and “xenophobic.”

An American who gets citizenship in Japan is just as Japanese as the descendents of Emperor Sujin, entitled to all the same benefits as other Japanese and “the country belongs to him.”

Hey Michael, here’s a news flash: the only memory anyone will have of your husband’s awful presidency is this.

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199787,"CNN Reports: Two federal judges have temporarily blocked President Donald Trump’s travel ban, both citing Trump’s statements about Muslims during the presidential campaign as part of their rulings.

A ruling by a federal judge in Hawaii Wednesday resulted in a temporary restraining order nationwide, hours before it was set to go into effect. In a decision published Thursday morning, another federal judge in Maryland specifically blocked the 90-day ban on immigration for citizens of six Muslim-majority countries.In a 43-page ruling, US District Court Judge Derrick Watson, who presides in Honolulu, concluded in no uncertain terms that the new executive order failed to pass legal muster at this stage and the state had established “a strong likelihood of success” on their claims of religious discrimination.

The reason? religious discrimination!

“The illogic of the Government’s contentions is palpable. The notion that one can demonstrate animus toward any group of people only by targeting all of them at once is fundamentally flawed,” Watson wrote. “Equally flawed is the notion that the Executive Order cannot be found to have targeted Islam because it applies to all individuals in the six referenced countries,” Watson added. “It is undisputed, using the primary source upon which the Government itself relies, that these six countries have overwhelmingly Muslim populations that range from 90.7% to 99.8%.” “It would therefore be no paradigmatic leap to conclude that targeting these countries likewise targets Islam,” Watson added. “Certainly, it would be inappropriate to conclude, as the Government does, that it does not.” They forgot that radical Islamists attacked us on 9/11, that radical Islamists are destroying the middle east and want to destroy America and Israel. They forget that ISIS is made of radical Islamists… this is not religious discrimination – this is terrorism discrimination!

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198483,"Newly released FBI documents show that Obama used a secret pseudonym when communicating with his Secretary of State!

The devastating information was disclosed in new FBI records that were made public Friday.

Just how far does the corruption really go? The world may never know! But this is not the transparency we were promised!

Politico reports:

President Barack Obama used a pseudonym in email communications with Hillary Clinton and others, according to FBI records made public Friday. The disclosure came as the FBI released its second batch of documents from its investigation into Clinton’s private email server during her tenure as secretary of state. The 189 pages the bureau released includes interviews with some of Clinton’s closest aides, such as Huma Abedin and Cheryl Mills; senior State Department officials; and even Marcel Lazar, better known as the Romanian hacker “Guccifer.” In an April 5, 2016 interview with the FBI, Abedin was shown an email exchange between Clinton and Obama, but the longtime Clinton aide did not recognize the name of the sender. “Once informed that the sender’s name is believed to be a pseudonym used by the president, Abedin exclaimed: ‘How is this not classified?’” the report says. “Abedin then expressed her amazement at the president’s use of a pseudonym and asked if she could have a copy of the email.”

The FBI’s latest revelation throws huge holes in the president’s past claims concerning his knowledge of Hillary Clinton’s private email server.

It’s been known since last year that Obama and Clinton corresponded via her private account, but the White House has insisted Obama did not know that she relied on it routinely and exclusively for official business.

So why all the secrecy?

This, along with Comey relating he was very queasy with the request from Loretta Lynch that he call his investigation into Hillary a “matter” sheds new light on the scandal.

It has become blatantly obvious that the tarmac meeting between Bill Clinton and Loretta Lynch was much more than discussion about grandkids. Did Obama himself ask for that meeting to occur? He obviously knows more than he has let on.

Just using a pseudonym itself by the leader of the free world begs some very Nixonian questions. How often did he use that pseudonym and why? With whom did he use it and under what circumstances?

Why is the White House evoking executive privilege to keep these emails secret? If it were a matter of security, they would claim that instead.

The Obama administration claimed early on that he would be the most transparent president in history. He has proven to be the least. What more is he hiding? When will we dind out?

It took decades for some of the items surrounding Nixon to come to light. I have a feeling that we will see a slow stream of revelations for years to come.

But the truth always surfaces. Emailgate, Benghazi, Fast-n-Furious… in a decade, the American people will see the Obama administration for its true form. The most corrupt administration in the history of the United States of America!",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200740,"During a Dallas Police Press Conference Friday, Police Chief Brown advised that one suspect in the Dallas “Black Lives Matter” Sniper Attack was killed with a police-detonation device after a standoff and a subsequent shoot-out. Chief Brown also stated that the shooter, who spoke with the hostage negotiator, indicated “allegiance” to",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
146254,"Hand-wringing over party unity misses the point. No one cares about your precious parties.

As Hillary Clinton joylessly stumbles her way to the Democratic nomination, calls have increased for Bernie Sanders to either drop out of the race altogether or, at least, to stop fighting so darn hard. We’re told that Bernie should drop out for the good of the party. Bernie should drop out so that Hillary can make her general election “pivot” (which presumably means she can be free of the burden of pretending to be a liberal). Bernie should drop out so that Hillary can focus on Trump. According to this logic, Bernie and his band of loyalists need to get pragmatic, face the music, have a reality check. Hogwash. Doesn’t anyone see what I see? Bernie Sanders is our best chance to beat Donald Trump and to prove to the young voters backing him that the Democratic party actually stands for something.

Error in thinking #1: Sanders supporters care about the existing system.

Not all Sanders voters are young but many are, so let’s consider the world as it appears to a 24-year-old. Perhaps you are deeply in debt from a college degree that still left you with few job prospects. Perhaps you were told in many ways large and small that you are not clever or connected enough to make it into the vaunted ranks of the “creative class” so you are doomed to a life of poorly paid service sector hell in which you will never be able to properly afford a family, a house or a vacation. Perhaps you were one of the lucky few who are ascending that creative class, new economy ladder, but find it deeply disturbing that the kids you went to high school with have been so casually cast aside and relegated to a life of gut-clenching instability. And again, you’re 24-years-old so you’ve got a long time to live and struggle with this corrupt, fickle, Gilded Age, bubble prone system — unless, that is, you are one of the many who will suffer a shortened lifespan like so many others who don’t make it in this system. Now from this vantage point, how much might you care about Harry Reid or Debbie Wasserman Schultz or some other Democratic partisan pearl clutcher’s pleas for party unity? These young voters are expected to back down for the sake of a party they tell pollsters they don’t identify with, in the service of nominating a presidential candidate who promises to maintain a system that has conspired to screw them at every turn.

#2 NEXT PAGE >>>",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199872,"Wikileaks just dropped a bombshell that may finally put Obama and Hillary in jail.

It seems that they were using the CIA in order to manipulate the outcome of 2012 election in France.

Wikileaks released several documents that prove this.

However, late on Thursday, they released maybe the biggest document yet. This document proves that American spies wanted an insider’s take on the race, including every single detail that comes too (party funding, internal rivalries and future attitudes toward America)

According to Wikileaks, the CIA operation ran for about 10 months, from from November 21, 2011, to September 29, 2012 and then continued after the April-May 2012 French presidential election.

Here is the press release from Wikileaks:

All major French political parties were targeted for infiltration by the CIA’s human (“HUMINT”) and electronic (“SIGINT”) spies in the seven months leading up to France’s 2012 presidential election. The revelations are contained within three CIA tasking orders published today by WikiLeaks as context for its forth coming CIA Vault 7 series. Named specifically as targets are the French Socialist Party (PS), the National Front (FN) and Union for a Popular Movement (UMP) together with current President Francois Hollande, then President Nicolas Sarkozy, current round one presidential front runner Marine Le Pen, and former presidential candidates Martine Aubry and Dominique Strauss-Khan.

In addition, here are the guidelines that the CIA spies followed:

1. REPORT ON DELIBERATIONS BY SARKOZY, OR OTHER HIGH LEVEL GOVERNMENT OFFICIALS REGARDING THE PRESIDENTIAL CANDIDATES IN THE 2012 ELECTION.

2. REPORT EFFORTS BY SARKOZY, THE SOCIALIST PARTY, OR OTHERS TO MANAGE THE 2012 ELECTIONS, INCLUDING:

A. DISCUSSIONS THAT INDICATE SARKOZY’S LEVEL OF CONFIDENCE IN HIS ABILITY TO CONTEST THE ELECTION.

B. ATTEMPTS TO PASS GUIDANCE OR DIRECTIVES TO PARTIES OR INDIVIDUALS ON SUPPORTING ACTIVITIES OR INITIATIVES.

C. HOW SARKOZY AND HIS ADVISORS INTERACT.

3. REPORT ANY DISCUSSIONS REGARDING GUIDANCE FROM SARKOZY OR MARTINE AUBRY, FRANCOIS HOLLANDE, OR DOMINIQUE STRAUSS-KAHN ON THE UPCOMING ELECTIONS.

This actually proves that Obama was the biggest threat that the world has faced, not Trump. This guy meddled everywhere, he had his fingers in everything.

Hopefully, this will get him impeached once and for all.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199336,"[8/23/16] With Secretary Clinton essentially disappearing from the campaign trail (focusing almost exclusively on fundraising), many people have noted an unusual scheduled event for presidential candidate Hillary Clinton appearing on her calendar, a fundraiser in Amsterdam – North Holland, by former U.S. Ambassador Timothy Broas . If, as the media continue",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200381,"Last night, Scaramucci pointed out that this was a FELONY and identified Chief of Staff Reince Priebus as the potential leaker. But Scaramucci didn’t stop there!

New York Post reporter Ryan Lizza reported that Scaramucci has asked the FBI and Justice Department to investigate Reince Priebus for leaking. Scaramucci Tweeted that he has notified the FBI and Justice Department, adding Reince’s Twitter name (@Reince45) to the end of the Tweet.

Scaramucci went on Sean Hannity last night to explain what they are doing end these leaks.

Ryan Lizza confirmed that Scaramucci has in-fact asked for the FBI to investigate Priebus. He also reported that Scaramucci and President Trump hosted Sean Hannity for dinner, one of the biggest advocates for finding and punishing the leaker.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198052,"Speculation online is rampant that Hillary Clinton is using a body double after she nearly fainted while leaving a 9/11 commemoration ceremony Sunday.

Here are 10 women who could easily pass as her.

Click an image below for larger version.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201537,"According to President Barack Obama’s nominee to be the next top general in the Air Force, David Goldfein, budget limits are devastating morale within the Air Force.

That budget has drastically cut the flying hours of those pilots not currently in war zones, making our reserves dangerously under-trained.

“When we were sequestered in 2015, we grounded 13 fighter squadrons that stopped flying. We’re still recovering from that effort and if we’re sequestered again it will be even worse,” he said.

Now, those on the fronts getting all the flying time they need — but it is at a serious cost. Our squadrons not currently deployed get less flying time than their Russian and Chinese counterparts, according to the Washington Examiner.

All of this seriously concerns Goldfein.

“Pilots who don’t fly, controllers who don’t control, cyberwarriors who don’t operate, because they are not given the resources to do so, morale goes down and they vote with their feet,” he explained.

If he is confirmed, he said, he’d be in charge of the oldest and smallest Air Force in its history — that’s 68 years.

Sen. John McCain has been furious with the state of affairs, and felt personally responsible. He called the initial sequestration of five years ago “an act of incredible cowardice” on the part of the Congress.

“I hope that the voters understand that a good faith effort was made and it was turned down, four votes short, by members, some of the members of this committee,” he said. “I’m embarrassed.”

Take it from the war hero: We should all be embarrassed at the state of the U.S. military under Barack Obama.

Please share this and let us know what you think about the condition of the U.S. Air Force under Barack Obama.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199639,"The book’s details have been kept quiet but Byrne has said what he saw of the Clinton White House and “culture” “sickened” him.

A prior book written by investigative journalist Ron Kessler had statements from Secret Service members that may shed light on some of what can be expected in Byrne’s book.

Some excerpts from Kessler’s book include statements about how then First Lady Hillary Clinton treated others:

'She was just really rude to almost everybody. She'd act like she didn't want u around, like you were beneath her.' https://t.co/JluS5MqYha — DanRiehl (@DanRiehl) June 5, 2016

The Daily Mail writes:

On another occasion, a member of the uniformed Secret Service once cheerfully greeted Mrs Clinton by saying ‘Good morning, ma’am.’

‘F*** off,’ is how she replied, according to Kessler’s book.

Kessler explained in the book that when Mrs Clinton is in public, she smiles and acts graciously.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199167,"The Supreme Court this morning ruled that illegal aliens have no right to sue anybody if they feel they’ve been mistreated. In a 5-4 decision, the conservative-leaning court reminded America that illegal aliens are called illegal for a reason and therefore don’t have the same rights as American citizens.

That means if they’re arrested for being here illegally they have the right to an attorney…in their own country. They have the right to a speedy trial…in Mexico. They have the right to remain silent and not incriminate themselves…just not here.

Here they have the right to be loaded onto buses and sent back to where they belong to apply for legal citizenship like everyone else. That also means that sanctuary cities have no right to tell federal agencies that they can’t come in and collect illegals for deportation.

It’s time the liberal snowflakes figured this out once and for all: In Trump’s America, we will take care of our own. People from other countries who aren’t in immediate danger or are from a religion that wants to blow us up just aren’t welcome here.

This ruling should pave the way for the travel ban to be enacted. America just got a little bit safer.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200505,"Chuck Schumer just let out desperate he really is to retain some level of political relevance.

In an interview with The Washington Post, the slumping New York senator threw Hillary Clinton under the bus.

“When you lose to somebody who has 40 percent popularity, you don’t blame other things — Comey, Russia — you blame yourself,” said Schumer of Clinton’s defeat at the hands of Donald Trump. “So what did we do wrong? People didn’t know what we stood for, just that we were against Trump. And still believe that.”

Now, that’s quite the admission given that Schumer’s been right there along with the rest of the Democratic leadership alleging Russian intervention in Trump’s election.

It’s also quite the act of betrayal by Schumer, considering he was among Hillary’s staunchest supporters during the campaign.

The Democratic ship is sinking. Most rats are scurrying to get off. Expect those that remain to increasingly cannibalize one another as they desperately cling to any scrap of relevance.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199577,"During an intensely heated debate on Fox News’ “Hannity” Friday night, Pastor Darrell Scott, a strong supporter of Donald Trump, came to the Republican nominee’s defense, saying he was absolutely right to call Hillary Clinton a “bigot.”

The comments came after host Sean Hannity got caught in a back-and-forth with fellow network anchor Juan Williams. Hannity said he doesn’t “want to see the race-baiting that Hillary Clinton played this week,” presumably referring to her speech against the alt-right.

WATCH IT :

“But considering it’s her, and she’s so dishonest, and she lies so often, and she sold out her office, and she got caught, I’m not surprised she did it,” Hannity charged.

Williams then moved in to criticize Trump for his apparent shift on immigration reform, but Scott interjected.

“One thing you have to understand when Donald Trump calls Hillary a bigot. Bigotry does not always manifest as hatred. Bigotry can be manifest with kindness and niceness.”

As an example, he said Clinton — in his view — feels she has to “reach down to help” black people, which proves she believes they are “inferior to her.”

Hannity then played a couple instances of Clinton seeming to take on a deep southern accent when speaking to predominantly black audiences before asking Scott if her doing so is “pandering.”

“That’s insulting,” the pastor replied. “She might as well put on blackface — that’s what she might as well do. She pantomimes us, she insults us, she imitates us.”

“It is insulting. There is something pandering and insulting,” Hannity agreed.

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198909,"First Lady Melania Trump has been settling into her new role since moving into the White House two weeks ago, owning every part of the opportunity and impressing the world as she does it. She’s graceful classy and the picture of the American dream, having come over the right way as an immigrant and reaching making it all the way to the Washington, D.C. where she is today.

While the left was quick to discredit her ability to take on this notable role, she hasn’t ceased to impress, which they refuse to admit. A rumor of the first lady’s future began to circulate this week and now the Trumps are prepared to confirm what everyone is inquiring about.

Melania hadn’t been seen too much while planning this transition from New York City to Washington, D.C., until she stepped off Marine Force one with the president and their young son, Barron. This gave the left the opportunity to attack, which they did, but not nearly as bad as when she was seen a second time since the move, while she and President Trump were meeting with Panamanian President Juan Carlos Varela at the White House on June 19.

As the couple has done with every dignitary they’ve met with, they stepped out for a photo op. Melania looked stunning in a light blue dress, a color reminiscent of the incredible ensemble she wore to her husband’s inauguration. This one was form-fitting and appropriate for the season, designed by Michael Kors, who is one of the few in his industry willing to let her wear his clothing line.

However, it wasn’t the dress or the $$1,695 price tag on it that people were talking about, it was something else that sparked a rumor and nearly broke the Internet with a couple specific search terms.

Opposing Views reports:

“The dress seems to be the catalyst which caused Google searches for the phrase ‘Melania Trump belly’ to increase more than 4,000 percent, according Google Trends statistics cited by The Inquisitr.”

“The search phrase ‘Is Melania Trump pregnant?’ increased 1,000 percent, and ‘Melania Trump blue dress’ went up 750 percent, as did ‘Melania pregnant now’.”

While Melania looks svelte and statuesque, it seems that the world was focused on the normal curvature of a woman’s body in her abdomen, which is often airbrushed out in glossy magazines, online, and in ads. The expectations that a 47-year-old woman, who also had a child in her 30s, is supposed to have a flat stomach is as alarming as the rumor that she’s expecting a child based on a slight bump in her dress. It’s confirmed now that a baby is not in her future, but more criticism of her body, which most women would love to look like (including her detractors) probably is.

“The 47-year-old first lady would not be the first celebrity to give birth at such an age, Opposing Views pointed out, citing a written observation by Parenting Magazine. “Singer Gwen Stefani gave birth at age 44, actress Susan Sarandon at 45, and actress Gina Davis had twins at 48,” the report continued. However, Melania doesn’t seem to be following in the footsteps of these celebrities, not that there would be a single thing wrong with it if she decided to do so.

Stephanie Grisham, who is the spokesperson for the first lady quickly shut down the rumor mill by confirming that the pregnancy allegation is not true. “Obviously that is absolutely false,” Grisham said, according to The Inquisitr. However, pregnancy rumor isn’t the only disgusting falsehood being spread about Melania and her personal life with Donald Trump.

“Another viral set of tweets, posted by a popular blogger who has said she wants the president’s ‘whole wretched family out of power,’ alleged that Melania is having an affair, Opposing Views reported. “But here it is: word is, for many years, Melania’s been having an affair with the head of security at Tiffany’s in the Trump Tower lobby…with DT’s knowledge. They had an agreement (written, I think) that if DT lost the election, they’d get divorced. But then he won. So they had to renegotiate the agreement. She is imprisoned in that marriage for as long as he’s president. Again: this is kind of obvious already to anyone with eyes. Melania looks miserable. But this would be a broader illustration of why. Also, it’s why she doesn’t leave New York,” the Tweet claims, according to The Inquisitr.

People will criticize our incredible first lady if she were pregnant or just looking like it (in their eyes). It’s ironic considering that they are supposed to be the party of people who don’t talk about the way a woman’s body looks or what she does with it because of “feminism.”",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
202087,"The Chicago Cubs won the World Series this year in “America’s sport” and with that achievement, they were invited to the White House for a meet-and-greet with the president. While other champion teams from different sports disrespectfully declined the offer, the Cubs accepted and went to the Oval Office for the honor. As they posed for a photo around the Resolute Desk with President Donald Trump, everyone immediately noticed what one outfielder did in the picture. When President Trump found out, he was sure to get the last laugh.

Wednesday’s visit to the White House wasn’t the first for the Cubs who met with President Barack Obama at the time he was in office. However, there were very stark differences between the two meet-and-greets, especially what was different between the pictures.

Cubs center fielder Albert Almora, Jr and his other team members dressed up in professional business attire when meeting with Barack Obama in January while he was occupying the Oval Office, but opted for a much more casual look for this week’s meet-and-greet with Trump. While the president and those who support him can overlook that detail in the dress code, despite the clear message it sends of who they do and don’t respect, what Almora did was not ignored.

In an interview ahead of his visit, Almora told the Chicago Sun Times that was looking forward to meeting President Trump. “I just look at it as it’s not every day you get to meet the President of the United States,” he told the newspaper. “And in a year I get to meet two.” Some seem to think that it was the second president who he was far less enthusiastic about than the first. The Chicago Times was on the scene with their city’s team to snap photos of the special visit that turned into what was allegedly a deplorable show of complete disrespect for our president.

The Daily Mail reports: Albert Almora, Jr, the Cubs center fielder, extended his middle finger while standing just a few feet from Trump as the president sat down at the Resolute Desk. Almora has his hands in his pocket, but the left middle finger is clearly extended.

The photograph was snapped by the Chicago Sun Times and later posted on Twitter.

Trump welcomed the manager and several players from the Cubs to the White House.

The president met with manager Joe Maddon and some Cubs on Wednesday, and he calls the Cubs a “great team.”

However, Almora has since come out swinging to defend himself against the allegations, claiming that he was definitely not flipping the president the bird, Deadspin reports. Whether he was or wasn’t, our president is taking it in stride and pretty much laughing the whole ordeal off because he’s such a good-natured person, which is pretty impressive. If the player did, in fact, flip him off, it definitely didn’t seem to get to Trump as some would hope. On close look of the picture, it appears that he actually has two fingers extended.

While the trip was completely voluntary, the motive to go may have differed among those in attendance yesterday. To have the opportunity to flip the president off in a picture may have been worth going for some, however, for Maddon, he was there out of respect for his team’s owners, the Ricketts family, who donated to Trump’s campaign.“In November, then-President elect Trump nominated Ricketts to serve as deputy secretary of commerce in his administration, but Ricketts eventually withdrew from consideration because he was unable to meet ethics requirements related to his business holdings,” Mail Online reported. The team gifted Trump his own Cubs jersey with the number 45 on it, representative of him being the 45th president of the United States. They are currently in Washington, D.C. to play against the Nationals this week, making double-purpose of the trip, although not everyone from the team came to meet the president. The Chicago Times reported that of the players asked if they were planning on attending, ten said that they were going to skip the visit, proving their dislike for the president.

While some immature players opted out, others who went saw it for the honor that it is. Cubs’ first baseman Anthony Rizzo said, “I’m going because it’s the United States of America, and I’d rather not live anywhere else except this country.” “It’s an honor. No political ties. It’s the White House,” he added, and that’s they kind of good sportsmanship more players can learn from — including those on his own team.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200686,"President Donald Trump is under attack from all sides. After he fired James Comey, there have been MASSIVE leaks from inside the FBI, Justice Department, and even the White House.

After learning about these leaks, Newt Gingrich went on Fox News and dropped a bombshell that explains who is behind it.

We all knew that the Government is full of Obama hold-overs who supported Hillary, but not to this extent. Newt just revealed who is really behind these leaks and it will make you sick.

“LET’S PUT CONTEXT IN REALITY. 95% OF ALL FEDERAL EMPLOYEE DONATIONS WENT TO HILLARY CLINTON. 97% OF ALL THE DONATIONS AT THE JUSTICE DEPARTMENT WENT TO HILLARY CLINTON. 99% AT THE STATE DEPARTMENT WENT TO HILLARY. SO WHEN YOU START TALKING ABOUT LEAKS FROM THE JUSTICE DEPARTMENT, JUST REMEMBER, THERE WAS AN AMAZING NUMBER OF CAREER BUREAUCRATS WHO ARE PRO-HILLARY AND ANTI-TRUMP.”

Newt went on to BASH the mainstream media lies. He summed up the lying media perfectly when he said:

“THERE’S AN ENTIRE WING OF THE NEWS MEDIA WHO WAKES UP EVERY MORNING AND SAYS ‘I KNOW TRUMP DID SOMETHING HORRIBLE, WHAT WAS IT?’”

We can all agree with that!",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
146352,"Actress and Fox News contributor Stacey Dash shared in a radio interview a story that helps explain her personal appreciation for the Second Amendment, one of the many conservative values she has been chided for in left-wing Hollywood.

“My gun and my Second Amendment right saved my life and the life of my son. I’ve had first-hand experience that I know carrying a gun can save your life,” Dash, who describes herself as a “lifetime NRA member,” told WPHT-AM’s Rich Zeoli.

She went on to explain the time she used a gun to protect herself against an abuser:

I got into an abusive relationship, a man that would beat me up every day for five years. I got away from that man and then got into another relationship with another man that was also not a good man. He was a bad man — cut too. My son is three-years-old. We’re being stalked by this man; we’re having to move — I can’t tell you how many times because this man would find us every place we went. Finally, I bought a gun, and thank God, because he found us. He kicked the door in off the hinges. He beat me up. My son was asleep upstairs. I ran upstairs, I got my gun, I loaded it and I came down the stairs shooting and he was coming up the stairs. I missed him, but he went away and he never came back.

Dash’s first book, “There Goes My Social Life: From Clueless To Conservative,” came out earlier this month.

The actress, who starred in the 1995 classic “Clueless,” said…

KEEP READING ON NEXT PAGE >>>",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200279,"Facts can’t be hateful. They simply are what they are. If you have a problem with them, then you have some soul-searching to do.

It’s difficult to formulate an argument that dispels specificities, such as the events that took place on September 11th, but leave it to liberals to do exactly that. A billboard that proclaims its support for Donald Trump’s immigration ban is under fire. It reads, “Why support President Trump’s immigration ban? 19 Muslim immigrants killed 2977 Americans. September 11, 2001.” The Left is livid at this attempt to expose people to the truth. (via Dennis Michael Lynch)

These numbers are a terrifying part of America’s history. They are emblematic of the tragedy and horror that took place on American soil, all as a result of Islamic terror. 2,977 innocent people were murdered at the hands of our terrible enemies. It’s almost as if the Left has completely forgotten about that horrific day, as they continue to protest the billboard on I-40 in Catawba County. They’re even demanding that the billboard is taken down because of its “hateful” nature.

What’s hateful is the memory of dirty terrorist thugs flying our planes into two prominent towers as adults and children burned alive. People were forced to jump out of 110-story skyscrapers in order to “save themselves,” all while the Muslims who caused it shouted their support for their “God.”If you detest this billboard, than you need to reconsider. It’s as simple as that. What happened that day should’ve permanently unified us as a nation against the Islamic terror regime. It’s disheartening that the Left is so quick to forget about it.

The village fool, Oliver Reitzell, shared his bizarre opinion regarding the billboard. He smugly stated, “I believe in the Christian way, and that’s to embrace everybody,” while noting the message of “hate” the billboard perpetuates.

Christianity tells us to love our enemies, but it also encourages us to name our enemies. The act of identifying who is out to brutally murder us is an important behavior. As a matter of fact, Christians are ISIS’s primary victim overseas. Christianity acknowledges that good will always triumph over evil. In this case, our enemies are evil and want us dead. These radicalists believe in everything we despise as Christians. Securing your nation’s borders in order to ensure that your family is protected is not an “unchristian” thing to do.

We don’t leave the doors to our homes wide open at night. We lock them in order to keep the people inside safe. If you believe the U.S’s borders should be wide open, then you should sleep that way as well. It’s not wrong or immoral to keep your country, and your home, safe from outside attacks. The billboard is directly acknowledging the significance a temporary immigration ban will have on this country. Don’t you want to save American lives? This billboard does not consist any hateful content or unkind words. It displays the sad reality of the current state of the world that we live in.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201743,"Over a month after the election, and in response to now new evidence uncovered, the CIA claimed to find evidence of Russian influence in the U.S. election. Even the Washington Post, which broke the story, notes as much.

The Post article admits there is no hard intelligence that ties alleged Russian hacking to orders from Moscow. The conclusions of the CIA analysts appear to be based on a kind of gestalt that combines allegations about Russian hackers, WikiLeaks, and past Russian intelligence use of “middlemen” to hide involvement in intelligence operations.

The FBI is in dispute with the CIA’s claims too, claiming themselves that there’s no evidence for what the CIA claims. So whose right?

As Liberty Writers News reported:

Today the head of the Office of the Director of National Intelligence (ODNI), who oversees the CIA, FBI, NSA, and all the other intelligence agencies, said he does NOT support the claims the CIA made about Russia.

A spokesperson from his office said,

“ODNI is not arguing that the agency (CIA) is wrong, only that they can’t prove intent.”

Wait, but isn’t the American legal system principled on “innocent until proven guilty”? Well, no proof of intent sounds like no proof to me.

This report comes almost immediately after the FBI released their own findings which also disputed the CIA’s, saying that the case and evidence used by the CIA would NOT hold up in court.

Meanwhile, here’s Obama’s comments on alleged Russian hacking, claiming it’s the consensus of all intelligence agencies that the Russians were responsible for the hacking of the DNC.

Well, not ALL of them, apparently.

Obama and other liberals are demanding a review of the evidence, and we should all welcome it. Jill Stein’s “Recount 2016” campaign allowed Hillary Clinton to make history twice in becoming the first U.S. presidential candidate to lose twice, and a review of the evidence of supposed Russian involvement in our election will reveal that it’s liberals pushing fake news everywhere.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200446,"Last night, pitching great and Boston Red Sox hero Kurt Schilling was on Fox with Neil Cavuto. As he is running to displace current socialist hack Elizabeth “Fauxahontas” Warren in the Senate in Massachusetts, there was very little baseball discussed, beside the fact that Cavuto is a Yankees fan. Anyone",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199458,"Earlier today, travel came to a complete halt after there was a harrowing attack that took place inside Bishop International Airport, in Flint, Michigan. As we all know, Michigan is a hot bed for Muslims as they have taken over the nearby city, of, Dearborn. It did not take long for the country to discover that a radical Muslim was at the center of this horrific attack. Now, just hours after the terror attack, Muslims around the country just received some bad news.

Authorities in Michigan are still piecing together the tragic events that led up to today’s terror attack. But, what we do know is that a radical Muslim armed with a knife stabbed Lieutenant Jeff Neville in the neck. During the time of the attack, witnesses said that they heard the deranged Muslim shout “Allahu Akbar”. Neville was rushed to a nearby hospital fighting for his life and has been listed in critical condition.

“The officer, identified as Lt. Jeff Neville, is in critical condition after being stabbed in the neck at Bishop International airport,” Breaking 911 reported. “The Canadian-born suspect was shouting ‘Allahu Akbar’ during the attack, witnesses said. The unnamed male suspect was taken into custody alive.”

Michigan has been infiltrated by Muslims thanks to Barack Obama’s refugee program. These programs brought in thousands of unvetted, radical Muslims that are hell bent on destroying the western world. That is why it has been incredibly important for our country to tighten our borders so that these vermin cannot continue to pour in. Which is exactly why Donald Trump was elected as president. The bleeding heart liberals in America continue to push back against Trump with their protests and silly “resist” campaigns. They have tried to demonize conservatives calling them racists and bigots for wanting to protect our borders, but none of it is working.

It has not been an easy road for President Trump over the past few months, but that has not stopped him from pushing forward. Now a recent poll shows that President Trump has gained popularity in one specific area that has Muslims and liberals screeching.

According to CNBC’s quarterly “All American Survey”, President Trump is gaining ground in halting immigration from specific Middle Eastern and African countries. Public support for President Trump’s controversial travel ban actually rose one point. 44 percent of Americans polled now say they strongly or somewhat support the ban. Now, some may say that is not a big deal but in all reality it actually is. You see, those who have been opposing the ban also fell slightly from 50 percent to 49 percent. Plus, the respondents who said they “strongly oppose” the plan saw a steeper decline, to 32 percent from 36 percent.

It seems that the recent terror attacks around the globe and now on American soil are starting to hit home. But, in all honesty, I believe that those numbers are much higher than this poll says.

Here is more from Breitbart on other issues on the Trump agenda:

The share of Americans who say they somewhat or strongly support the administration’s plans to rebuild American infrastructure, for example, has declined to 62 percent from 75 percent three months earlier. Support for individual tax cuts has fallen to 59 percent from 64 percent, while support for cuts to business taxes fell to 50 percent from 54 percent.

Renegotiating trade deals has lost support, falling to 50 percent from 58 percent. Support for regulatory relief has declined to 44 percent from 47 percent.

Public support for repealing Obamacare very nearly held steady, losing just one percentage point of support from 45 percent to 44 percent. But the public remains strongly divided on healthcare, with opposition to the administration’s repeal and replace plans edging up to 38 percent from 37 percent in April.

Considering that there was a terror attack today I can only imagine that President Trump will push harder for the travel ban.

It is way past the time for this extra sense of security for our country. For way too long we have been sitting wide open for attacks by these deranged Muslims. Obama knew exactly what he was doing when he ushered in all these refugees into the country. By labeling Islam a religion of peace Obama emboldened Muslims and made them a special class of citizens.

Now, we are seeing what happens when these sort of rhetoric continues unchecked. Muslims will NEVER assimilate to western culture and their only goal is to conquer every nation. We have seen this happen around the globe and it will not stop until someone takes a tough stand against them.

Thankfully, we elected Donald Trump and we are finally seeing results from his tough stance. I truly believe that Trump’s travel ban will be enacted soon and we can get back to the business of making America safe again. I am all for people wanting to come into our country and assimilate to our way of life. However, I am 100% against Muslims and liberals that are set on destroying it.

H/T [ Breitbart ]",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201209,"In the months leading up to this election, we saw multiple businesses either pack their bags and outright move out of the United States or tell us the move was about to happen. While most politicians were stuffing their faces full of turkey, the president-elect was working the phones trying to",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201539,"In one of the most awesome pro-gun laws to come down the pike, Tennessee is blaming business owners if they disarm citizens with “gun-free zones.” If those citizens get injured because they were stripped of their Second Amendment rights, the new law – which goes into effect Friday – allows gun",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201388,"We can definitely expect the news media to pull some tricks to try to shift the narrative. Apparently, this will include some creative editing.A man who works as an Iraqi interpreter was temporarily detained at JFK Airport after Trump’s executive order on refugees was signed. The man said he liked Trump. ABC knows they can’t have that, so they edited that portion of his remarks out.

Hameed Darweesh speaks after being released from detention at JFK airport in wake of immigration order: ""America is the land of freedom."" pic.twitter.com/2NfkWSEhxN — ABC News (@ABC) January 28, 2017

The networks that were honest enough to show the full comments were also treated to a hilarious reaction by liberal activist Rep. Nydia Velazquez. After Velazquez heard this foreigner say that he liked President Trump, we see her with a look of shock in her eyes followed by her shaking her head in disbelief, but, of course, if you watched ABC, you wouldn’t have even seen that exchange at all.

The fact that ABC edited these comments out did not sit too well with Twitter users, who called ABC out as nothing more than “fake news.” I agree — only a fake news outlet would deliberately omit such an important comment from their coverage. This Iraqi interpreter is probably used to being held up at airports, but it has nothing to do with his personal heritage. It has more to do with the nature of how the world works in this day and age. You see, other countries are often very strict about who they might allow within their borders. Here is the video with his full comments about Trump… and that look from Rep. Velazquez… priceless!

Hameed Darweesh The Man Just Released From JFK Says He Likes Trump. Look At @NydiaVelazquez 's Face pic.twitter.com/C3AWQqKxQt — Mr. Brexit 🇺🇸 (@KlayVolk) January 28, 2017

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200511,"Russian President Vladimir Putin offered some interesting insight into his meeting with President Trump at the G20 summit in Hamburg on Friday, saying:

“As I see it, television Trump is very different from the real person.”

The Russian President continued:

“He is absolutely concrete, absolutely adequately perceives the interlocutor, quite quickly analyzes, answers questions or draws from the discussions some new elements.”

He then concludes by saying:

“As regards personal relations, I think they are established.”

America’s relationship with Russia soured during the Obama administration, and going into 2017, the mainstream media tried as hard as it could to make it seem like President Trump colluded with Russia to win the election.

Election fear-mongering aside, Russia is a key global player and it would benefit the world for the US to have a more cooperative relationship with the country. Putin’s comments come as a sign that our relationship with Russia could drastically improve under the Trump administration.

Putin himself seemed hopeful of this prospect, saying:

“It seems to me that if we can build a relationship, in the way our conversation went yesterday, there is every reason to believe that we will be able to recover, at least partially restore, the level of cooperation that we need.”

President Trump represented the US well in his Putin meeting, and he seems more than ready to build bridges while standing firm for American interests. Trump issued a series of tweets about the meeting:

I strongly pressed President Putin twice about Russian meddling in our election. He vehemently denied it. I've already given my opinion….. — Donald J. Trump (@realDonaldTrump) July 9, 2017

…We negotiated a ceasefire in parts of Syria which will save lives. Now it is time to move forward in working constructively with Russia! — Donald J. Trump (@realDonaldTrump) July 9, 2017

Of course, you’ll never hear that on the mainstream media though, so that’s why we’re asking you get the word out and share this 10,000 times!

(h/t Politico)",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198584,"For Months, Obama, the Democrats, and their lapdogs in the mainstream media have been spreading LIES about how Trump won because Russia “meddled” in the election. There is no evidence, other than Putin said Trump was a “bright man,” and praised his business successes. Putin never endorsed either Hillary or Trump. BUT",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201709,"Former President Bill Clinton is on the defensive this morning after the news broke that a deal was brokered in 1998 to make Monica Lewinski and her son, David, who she raised as a nephew, very wealthy people. To date, they have received a reported $$30 million and they’re looking",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199320,"Two years before Ahmad Khan Rahami went on a bombing rampage in New York and New Jersey, his father told the police that the son was a terrorist, prompting a review by federal agents, according to two senior law enforcement officials.

Separately on Tuesday, another official said that when Mr. Rahami was captured during a shootout with the police, he was carrying a notebook that contained writings sympathetic to jihadist causes.

In one section of the book, which was pierced by a bullethole and covered in blood, Mr. Rahami wrote of “killing the kuffar,” or unbeliever, according to the official, who agreed to speak about the investigation only on the condition of anonymity.

After Mr. Rahami was captured on Monday morning, ending one of the largest manhunts in the city’s history, investigators have turned their focus to what might have motivated, inspired or led him to plant bombs in the Chelsea section of Manhattan and on the Jersey Shore.

Officials are also looking at […]

READ MORE ON NEXT PAGE >>>",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200565,"Senator Ted Cruz (R-TX) is busy fundraising off his victory in Wisconsin. But after this bombshell announcement, Donald Trump has two reasons to smile.

With 92 delegates and a possible winner-take-all victory, Trump isn’t just leading in New York, but he’s up by 31%, according to an average of recent polling!

Monmouth University just confirmed this today after the most recent survey of likely Republican voters in New York. This is epic:

Donald Trump is positioned for a sweeping primary win in his home state of New York according to the Monmouth University Poll. He currently has the support of an outright majority of likely voters, a margin that suggests he could win nearly every delegate awarded by the state.

READ ALSO: Hillary Just Got The WORST News Of Her Campaign!

Currently, 52% of likely Republican primary voters in New York support Trump compared to 25% who support John Kasich and 17% who will vote for Ted Cruz. Trump has more than half the vote in New York City and Long Island (58%) and Upstate New York (52%), and nearly half in Western New York (47%). Kasich does slightly better upstate (28%) and west (26%) than he does in NYC/LI (22%). Cruz does slightly better in the west (21%) than he does upstate (15%) and in NYC/LI (14%).

As Patrick Murray, director of the independent Monmouth University, opined, “If this result holds in every single congressional district, Trump will walk away with nearly all of New York State’s delegates.”

And if that wasn’t enough good news for Trump fans leading up to the RNC convention, he’s also the clear favorite in the upcoming Pennsylvania primary too. Wow:

Trump leads among likely Republican primary voters with 39 percent, followed by Sen. Ted Cruz of Texas with 30 percent and Kasich with 24 percent, the independent Quinnipiac (KWIN-uh-pe-ack) University Poll finds.

With such strong numbers, it’s clear that only Trump has the possibility to collect enough delegates to avoid a contested convention. These numbers are so overwhelming, that with Trump’s nearly 100% name-ID, he’s almost guaranteed two massive victories in NY and PA. Check out this report:

What do you think about Trump’s latest, record-breaking poll numbers? Please leave us a comment (below) and tell us!",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198298,"Minnesota let a Somalian Muslim join the police force and he senselessly murdered a woman for no reason. This is how the Muslim police officer protects and serves his force, his country, his people? We have a woman who was pointlessly murdered and the liberals are more concerned with the potential for “Islamaphobia” than they are for understanding why this degenerate Muslim randomly and unnecessarily shot a woman.

Here’s a brief background of what happened. Justine Damond (aka Justine Ruszczyk), 40, called the police to report a possible assault in an alley near her home. The police arrived in a cruiser containing the alleged murderer- Officer Noor, and his partner- Officer Harrity. Harrity was in the driver seat and Noor in the passenger seat. Damond approached the driver side window while dressed in her pajamas and began talking to the police officers. She was likely explaining what happened or what she heard/saw. That’s when Officer Noor discharged his weapon, shooting across his partner in the driver seat, and striking Damond in the abdomen. The Somalian cop literally shot across his partner’s body and out the opposite window of the car to kill the woman who called for help. She had no weapon and no one really knows why he shot her.

Both officers provided medical attention, but Damond passed away on the scene of the shooting.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198473,As most of you are already aware of we are now living in a third world banana republic now thanks to the fact that the Democrats decided to run a crooked presidential candidate which no one wanted or liked. Not even her own husband! Corrupt FBI agents who are working on,americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198037,"Everyone saw Hillary Clinton collapse as she left the 9/11 memorial this past weekend. Hours later, her team admitted that she is indeed suffering from pneumonia.

In the video above, Infowars host Alex Jones analyzes the impact this will have on Clinton’s presidential campaign. He cites the fact that DNC officials are holding special meetings to find a special replacement for Clinton in saying that there is a chance she may drop out as early as next week.

Clarification from dem operatives @HillaryClinton pneumonia: Expect emergency DNC meeting to CONSIDER replacement. #HillarysHealth — David Shuster (@DavidShuster) September 11, 2016",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
146201,"Oklahoma’s state legislature isn’t messing around. They are so furious about President Barack Obama’s dangerous actions about transgenders in public school bathrooms, that they are officially calling for OK’s members of Congress to start impeachment proceedings.

Obama’s actions have been unconstitutional, and boys and girls should be using the restroom according to the gender they were born with. It’s about time for impeachment!

Oklahoma’s Republican-dominated legislature has filed a measure calling for President Barack Obama’s impeachment over his administration’s recommendations on accommodating transgender students, saying he overstepped his constitutional authority.

Lawmakers in the socially conservative state are also expected to take up a measure as early as Friday that would allow students to claim a religious right to have separate but equal bathrooms and changing facilities to segregate them from transgender students.

The bill introduced on Thursday night could force schools into costly construction, which would be difficult for them to complete after lawmakers significantly cut education funding to plug a $$1.3 billion state budget shortfall.

NEXT PAGE >>>",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200022,"Isn’t there a law against threatening physical harm towards the President of the United States? Because that is EXACTLY what Arnold Schwarzenegger just did in his new interview with Men’s Journal. Schwarzenegger said that he wanted to Smash Trump’s face through a table if he ever saw him! He told the journal, ‘I",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200697,"Like his running mate, Vice President-elect Mike Pence has met staunch resistance from certain segments of the American public. For Pence, it’s his views on the LGBT community that seem to have sparked the most ire — despite the fact that one of the harshest criticism seems to have no real factual basis. Wednesday night, Reuters reports that Pence once again became the subject of an LGBT protest when groups WERK for Peace and DisruptJ20 staged a “Queer Dance Party” just outside the vice president-elect’s new D.C. home:

#LGBT dance party almost at Mike Pence's house on his last night living there pic.twitter.com/l1jtMO0jRz — Alexander Rubinstein (@AlexR_DC) January 19, 2017

To be sure, the LGBT community and their supporters have expressed their apprehension about Pence in the past — despite President-elect Trump’s expressed support of gay and transgender rights on a number of occasions.Still, organizer Firas Nasr explained that the dancers were there “to send a clear message,” according to CNN:“We are here tonight to send a clear message to Daddy Pence that we will not tolerate bigotry and hate in our country. We are here today to take the streets as our dance floor.”

After gathering outside D.C.’s Friendship Heights Metro station at about 6 p.m., the protesters dance-marched a couple of miles to Pence’s temporary home in the nearby Chevy Chase neighborhood.Once there, the activists partied in front of the D.C. police and Secret Service stationed outside Pence’s home for about an hour, at one point chanting “Daddy Pence, come dance!”:

Dance protest has arrived – now dancing a half a block from Mike Pence's rental house. Were chanting ""Daddy Pence, come dance"" pic.twitter.com/kaUEbUXxAC — Betsy Klein (@betsy_klein) January 19, 2017

Though the gathered activists may not have been surprised when Pence didn’t answer their call to “come dance,” it turns out there was a pretty good reason for it. While the dance protest has received plenty of media exposure, neither Pence nor his wife were actually at home that evening — they were both attending the Vice President-elect’s Inaugural Dinner in the heart of Washington, D.C:

Great crowd at the Vice President-elect's Inaugural Dinner. Honored to introduce & welcome special guest, President-elect @realDonaldTrump. pic.twitter.com/EpwsrMVv5u — Mike Pence (@mike_pence) January 19, 2017

While many might speculate that the dance protesters would have received the same reaction from Pence even if he had been there, the vice president-elect has surprised his critics in the past. When Pence and his family received a lecture from the cast of Broadway’s Hamilton back in November, he didn’t lash out — but simply turned to his children and said, “That’s what freedom sounds like.”

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200358,"Obama’s CIA Director John Brennan’s hearing on the Russian election interference was today. Withing MINUTES of starting, Trey Gowdy and his crew were down Brennan’s throat.

The Republicans started hounding him. Asking him straight up if he saw ANY evidence of Trump working with Russia during the election.

Brennan admitted that he saw ZERO evidence of collusion with the Donald Trump campaign.

Wow. There is not really any wiggle room there.

Not only that, but John Brennan also said he has not seen any evidence to back up the WaPo’s unfounded claims that Trump has been asking MULTIPLE intelligence directors and members to deny Russia for him. OUCH!

Look, I am not saying that I trust what Brennan said. This man has done NOTHING to prove that he is trustworthy. However, it’s hard to deny that him saying there is no proof about Trump, who he very much dislikes, is anything BUT the truth.

He also said one more very interesting thing. John Brennan suggested that Russia’s main strategy is to cut the US off from their ties around the world and divide the nation.

So I will leave you with a final thought: Is it Russia fake-leaking to the Liberal media because they know the MSM will go after ANY story about Trump they can?

Share this with all your family and friends to help set the record straight once and for all.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198126,"The conduct of the Democratic party in regards to Benghazi has been nothing short of disgraceful, but newly-leaked documents demonstrate how truly low they have sunk in their efforts to protect Hillary Clinton.

In the latest in a series of leaks of sensitive Democratic documents, a hacker by the name of Guccifer 2.0 published items obtained from Senate Minority Leader Nancy Pelosi’s computer. The document, which deals with the question of the Benghazi attacks, apparently served as a guide for Democrats to follow when discussing the subject.

Although it paid lip service to the memory of the four Americans who lost their lives in the attack, the memo was mainly concerned with how party members would go about casting doubt on the credibility of people asking questions about the government’s handling of the matter, characterizing Republican calls for investigations as “pandering to conspiracy theorists.”

The fact that such a document even exists shows how uncertain the Democrats have become about the position they’ve staked on Benghazi. After all, it explicitly notes that former Ambassador to the UN Samantha Rice “gave incorrect information on television” when she blamed the attacks on a movie instead of Al Qaeda, further weakening their stance:

READ MORE ON NEXT PAGE >>>",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199889,"Black Men for Bernie founder Bruce Carter is on a mission to restore hope to black communities across America. Bernie changed his mind about a couple of things when the Vermont senator ended up losing to his main rival, Hillary Clinton. In an interview with Breitbart News, Carter explained how the Democratic party hasn’t done anything for the black community in decades, and how his new plan was to gather support for Republican nominee Donald Trump.

“Bernie inspired us to disrupt the status quo because it only works for the elites and not regular people who are struggling,” Carter said. “If black communities vote for Hillary Clinton and Democrats in November, nothing will change because Democrats will continue to believe they don’t have to do anything to earn our votes.”

Carter likens the Democrat abuse of African-Americans to “political slavery.” After reading a Washington Post article about how little the Democratic Party spends on minority-owned companies, he knew it was time to make a change.

“Donald Trump is a business man and a real estate mogul who could provide knowledge and resources to transform urban communities through the development of minority-owned businesses,” Carter said. “With this tour, we’re going to show Mr. Trump and Republicans that…

KEEP READING ON NEXT PAGE>>>",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
202130,"…drawn up after government lawyers told the AP last week that the department expected to release the last of the detailed daily schedules around Dec. 30, weeks after the election. The AP had objected to the delays. The daily schedules drew attention last week after the AP reviewed the two years of schedules released so far, plus Clinton’s official calendars. From those, the AP determined that more than half the people who Clinton met or spoke with — outside of members of the U.S. or foreign governments — had donated to the Clinton Foundation either personally or through companies or groups.

The AP’s review focused on Clinton’s discretionary contacts with outside interests and excluded her meetings or calls with federal officials or foreign government representatives, because those contacts were part of her regular diplomatic obligations. Clinton has said the AP’s analysis was flawed because it did not account fully for all meetings and phone calls during her entire term as secretary. She also said the analysis should have included meetings with federal employees and foreign diplomats.

The State Department’s decision Thursday to turn over all of the more-detailed daily schedules by Oct. 17 means it will have to triple its pace of producing 600 pages a month. That production schedule was ordered last January by U.S. District Court Judge Richard Leon. The AP first asked for all Clinton’s calendars in 2010 and again in 2013 under the U.S. Freedom of Information Act, but the State Department did not release them. After further delays, the AP sued the State Department in federal court in March 2015 to obtain the planning materials and other records, leading to Leon’s order.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198404,"Who is better qualified to talk about how race has held him back than an eighty-year old black man from the Deep South, Memphis, Tennessee? On his way up there were no affirmative action programs to help him overcome the obstacle of “being born Black in America.” Morgan Freeman was 80",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199866,"Republicans are gearing up for the 2018 midterm elections — and Massachusetts Sen. Elizabeth Warren’s progressive policies are expected to take center-stage in the GOP’s fight to win seats in the upper chamber. With Republicans holding the majority in both chambers of Congress and controlling the White House, Warren has become one of the top political targets for the GOP, owing to her far-left leanings and relatively high name recognition.

Political strategists speculate Warren could spark conservative interest in donating to prevent officials with similar views from being elected into office. “Elizabeth Warren is the face of the Democratic Party,” National Republican Senatorial Committee Chairman Cory Gardner told Politico. “She’s extremely popular with their base, and that’s why she’s leading them right now. That’s why [Democrats] are voting 100 percent of the time with Elizabeth Warren.” The NRSC has already released digital advertisements linking vulnerable Democrats and their voting records with Warren, alleging that Warren has an “extreme agenda” and suggesting red-state Democrats distance themselves from her.

“These Red State Democrats’ voting records align more with Elizabeth Warren than the beliefs of the hard-working people of their states,” said NRSC Communications Director Katie Martin. “Having Elizabeth Warren as the face of the increasingly more extreme Democratic Party gives Republicans just another example to give to voters as to why these Senators deserve a pink slip in 2018.” Democrats, who have been attempting to link Republican lawmakers with President Donald Trump for their fundraising efforts, seem to be bracing themselves for the attacks.

“To suggest that we’re Elizabeth Warren is ridiculous, especially when you look at voting records and where we’ve been,” North Dakota Sen. Heidi Heitkamp said in an interview with Politico. “They need a boogeyman, and they’re trying to turn Elizabeth into a boogeyman. And I think maybe what they should worry about more is actually doing America’s work.” Twenty-five of the 34 seats up for reelection in 2018 are held by Democrats.

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
202230,"Bill Clinton was accused of raping three women, however, he was never charged. The media didn’t report about the rape allegations, but they fully reported about Bill O’Reilly sexual harassment allegations. So, the media proved they have double standards. They chose to report about O’Reilly activities, but they were silent when 3 rape victims stood up to Clinton.

Via Cons Nation:

Bill Clinton is famous for being a WOMANIZER. This seems good to me because he has his own life and I don’t want to interrupt. BUT, when he and his wife, supported by millions of liberal snowflakes, attack our president for saying some rude words in private conversation with friends, THAT MAKES ME FURIOUS. Actually, that’s hypocrisy and evilness. Yesterday I mentioned that Bill Clinton and Hillary Clinton remind me of Francis and Claire Underwood. Those people have no morality at all, they are promiscuous classy liberal hippies. But when it comes to their ambition, they stick together and they are ready to strike against ANYBODY who may be a possible threat.

If you remember well, Donald Trump BASHED Hillary Clinton and her nasty husband for their hypocrisy and evilness. There’s your little flashback:

The victims raped by Bill Clinton have gathered again, and that’s the awesome news that I want to share with you people. Actually, these BRAVE women stand together with Bill O’Reilly and ask one very simple question: WHERE WERE YOU ALL “HUMAN RIGHTS ACTIVISTS” WHEN YOUR BOSSES DID EVERYTHING TO GET AWAY WITH RAPE?

Juanita Broadrick, Kathleen Willey and Paula Jones in their statement draw the line that they are not defending O’Reilly, nor are interested in the case, but they criticize the MAINSTREAM MEDIA DOUBLE STANDARDS. When their case ( A LOT MORE SERIOUS) was completely ignored. “I have no idea whether the accusations against Bill O’Reilly are true or not, but I would like to ask ‘Where in the world were all these people when Bill Clinton’s victims came forward with more serious accusations? Why is Bill Clinton GIVEN A PASS over the other Bills?’ I would truly like to know because I will never understand it”– This is part of the official statement by Broaddrick for Breitbart. You could also check the full interview and read more details from the announcement.

Poor women… The mainstream media is just a tool in the hands of the elitists. We are here to spread the truth, unlike them. These women should gain support from the nation. SHARE THIS POST AND SPREAD THE TRUTH!",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
202204,"The FBI has released a second batch of documents pertaining to former Secretary of State Hillary Clinton’s private email server, 189 pages, and in these pages President Obama was caught in a major lie about it. In 2015, CBS’ Bill Plante asked Obama when he learned about Clinton’s private server and",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
146208,"Privacy Policy

Your privacy is critically important to us. At USA News Studio we have a few fundamental principles:

We don’t ask you for personal information unless we truly need it. (We can’t stand services that ask you for things like your gender or income level for no apparent reason.)

We don’t share your personal information with anyone except to comply with the law, develop our products, or protect our rights.

We don’t store personal information on our servers unless required for the on-going operation of one of our services.

In our blogging products, we aim to make it as simple as possible for you to control what’s visible to the public, seen by search engines, kept private, and permanently deleted.

Below is our privacy policy which incorporates these goals: (Note, we’ve decided to make this privacy policy available under a Creative Commons Sharealike license, which means you’re more than welcome to steal it and repurpose it for your own use, just make sure to replace references to us with ones to you, and if you want we’d appreciate a link to USA News Studio somewhere on your site. We spent a lot of money and time on the below, and other people shouldn’t need to do the same.)

If you have questions about deleting or correcting your personal data please contact our support team.

Website Visitors

Like most website operators, USA News Studio collects non-personally-identifying information of the sort that web browsers and servers typically make available, such as the browser type, language preference, referring site, and the date and time of each visitor request. USA News Studio purpose in collecting non-personally identifying information is to better understand how USA News Studio visitors use its website. From time to time, USA News Studio may release non-personally-identifying information in the aggregate, e.g., by publishing a report on trends in the usage of its website.

USA News Studio also collects potentially personally-identifying information like Internet Protocol (IP) addresses for logged in users and for users leaving comments on WordPress.com blogs. USA News Studio only discloses logged in user and commenter IP addresses under the same circumstances that it uses and discloses personally-identifying information as described below, except that blog commenter IP addresses and email addresses are visible and disclosed to the administrators of the blog where the comment was left.

Aggregated Statistics

USA News Studio may collect statistics about the behavior of visitors to its websites. For instance, USA News Studio may monitor the most popular blogs on the WordPress.com site or use spam screened by the Akismet service to help identify spam. USA News Studio may display this information publicly or provide it to others. However, USA News Studio does not disclose personally-identifying information other than as described below.

Protection of Certain Personally-Identifying Information

USA News Studio discloses potentially personally-identifying and personally-identifying information only to those of its employees, contractors and affiliated organizations that (i) need to know that information in order to process it on USA News Studio’s behalf or to provide services available at USA News Studio’s websites, and (ii) that have agreed not to disclose it to others. Some of those employees, contractors and affiliated organizations may be located outside of your home country; by using USA News Studio’s websites, you consent to the transfer of such information to them. USA News Studio will not rent or sell potentially personally-identifying and personally-identifying information to anyone. Other than to its employees, contractors and affiliated organizations, as described above, USA News Studio discloses potentially personally-identifying and personally-identifying information only in response to a subpoena, court order or other governmental request, or when USA News Studio believes in good faith that disclosure is reasonably necessary to protect the property or rights of USA News Studio, third parties or the public at large. If you are a registered user of an USA News Studio website and have supplied your email address, USA News Studio may occasionally send you an email to tell you about new features, solicit your feedback, or just keep you up to date with what’s going on with USA News Studio and our products. We primarily use our various product blogs to communicate this type of information, so we expect to keep this type of email to a minimum. If you send us a request (for example via a support email or via one of our feedback mechanisms), we reserve the right to publish it in order to help us clarify or respond to your request or to help us support other users. USA News Studio takes all measures reasonably necessary to protect against the unauthorized access, use, alteration or destruction of potentially personally-identifying and personally-identifying information.

Cookies

A cookie is a string of information that a website stores on a visitor’s computer, and that the visitor’s browser provides to the website each time the visitor returns. USA News Studio uses cookies to help USA News Studio identify and track visitors, their usage of USA News Studio website, and their website access preferences. USA News Studio visitors who do not wish to have cookies placed on their computers should set their browsers to refuse cookies before using USA News Studio’s websites, with the drawback that certain features of USA News Studio’s websites may not function properly without the aid of cookies.

Business Transfers

If USA News Studio, or substantially all of its assets, were acquired, or in the unlikely event that USA News Studio goes out of business or enters bankruptcy, user information would be one of the assets that is transferred or acquired by a third party. You acknowledge that such transfers may occur, and that any acquirer of USA News Studio may continue to use your personal information as set forth in this policy.

Ads

Ads appearing on any of our websites may be delivered to users by advertising partners, who may set cookies. These cookies allow the ad server to recognize your computer each time they send you an online advertisement to compile information about you or others who use your computer. This information allows ad networks to, among other things, deliver targeted advertisements that they believe will be of most interest to you. This Privacy Policy covers the use of cookies by USA News Studio and does not cover the use of cookies by any advertisers.

Comments

Comments and other content submitted to our Akismet anti-spam service are not saved on our servers unless they were marked as false positives, in which case we store them long enough to use them to improve the service to avoid future false positives.

Privacy Policy Changes

Although most changes are likely to be minor, USA News Studio may change its Privacy Policy from time to time, and in USA News Studio’s sole discretion. USA News Studio encourages visitors to frequently check this page for any changes to its Privacy Policy. If you have a WordPress.com account, you should also check your blog’s dashboard for alerts to these changes. Your continued use of this site after any change in this Privacy Policy will constitute your acceptance of such change.

DoubleClick DART Cookie

– Google, as a third party vendor, uses cookies to serve ads on healthyss.com

– Google’s use of the DART cookie enables it to serve ads to users based on their visit to healthyss.com and other sites on internet.

– Users may opt out of the use of the DART cookie by visiting the Google ad and content network policy at the following URL – http://www.google.com/privacy_ads.html",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198652,"Socialist Bernie Sanders and his wife Jane are now being investigated by the FBI for fraud in yet another devastating disaster for liberals.

The Daily Wire reported:

Bernie Sanders has dismissed accusations that his wife Jane had committed fraud in obtaining bank loans for the now defunct Burlington College and Sanders’ Senate office had stepped in to help, calling the accusations “nonsense,” and blaming it on Donald Trump’s campaign manager in Vermont.

Cue the FBI, according to VTDigger, an online publication, according to Politico, which has an in-depth article about Jane Sanders’ alleged malfeasance. Although Brady Toensing, an attorney who chaired Trump’s Vermont campaign, had indeed asked for an investigation in January 2016 with a letter to the U.S. attorney for Vermont, he told Politico Magazine, “The investigation was started more than a year ago under President Obama, his Attorney General Loretta Lynch, and his United States Attorney, all of whom are Democrats.”

Now Sanders is worried, with the FBI and President Donald Trump’s Justice Department on his trail. As Politico Magazine reports, Jeff Weaver, Sanders’ longtime top political adviser, confirmed Sanders and his wife have retained high-powered lawyers to represent Jane Sanders, including Larry Robbins, who represented I. Lewis “Scooter” Libby and former Rep. Bill Jefferson.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200844,"Donald Trump has made a lot of BIIIIG hires to his White House since getting elected, but not a one of them can begin to compare to the LEGEND he just brought on to take down Obama’s terrible legacy.

Today, Trump’s transition team announced that he has brought on none other than Carl Icahn, the Legendary investor himself, to be his “Special Advisor on Regulation.”

Icahn himself, known for his business savvy, released a glowing statement outlining his ambitions for America’s future:

“I am proud to serve President-elect Trump as a special advisor on regulatory reform. Under President Obama, America’s business owners have been crippled by over $$1 trillion in new regulations and over 750 billion hours

dealing with paperwork. It’s time to break free of excessive regulation and let our entrepreneurs do what they do best: create jobs and support communities. President-elect Trump is serious about helping American families, and regulatory reform will be a critical component of making America work again.”

As an America business owner myself, all I can say is THANK GOD! Things are finally starting to look up again for Entrepreneurs and workers as the playing field will finally begin to level out.

Under Obama’s iron-fisted rule, small businesses have been stifled while the top-dogs of big corporations with connections to the White House have flourished. This would have continued under Clinton except way worse, but now we have President Trump.

So welcome to the new America, a place we can be proud to work in and call how, as we rebuild our nation on the framework created by our founders and restore our country to greatness!!

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199172,"Special Council Mueller is on a roll. He’s doing what he can to discredit the Trump administration, and claim the Russians were directly involved with the Trump campaign. There is zero proof this ever happened. News broke this week that Mueller might have illegally been pointed to his position. If this",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200438,"Conservative businessman Donald J. Trump literally wrote the book on deal-making. And if he’s our President, we will immediately have a great deal: Amazing! It’s clear Trump’s number one priority is keeping America safe and securing the border by any means necessary. His message has totally re-shaped America’s political discussions and turned",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198458,"From Mad World News:

Former First Lady Michelle Obama was caught sneaking away to New York, and it was to make a very big purchase. So big, in fact, she called Barack to come meet her, but what is really freaking conservatives out is what this all means. You’ll never believe what the Obamas are up to now, and it has everything to do with President Donald Trump. This will piss you off.

Well, we all were wondering what the Obamas would do next in their war against Donald Trump. We need not look any further than what they just purchased in New York. Page Six is reporting the Obamas are “eyeing” a 10 million dollar “apartment” at 10 Gracie Square on the Upper East Side of Manhattan.

If this is leaving you a little perplexed, you’re not alone. The Obamas just bought an eight million dollar mansion in the exclusive Washington, D. C. neighborhood of Kalorama. So, why would they need a residence in New York? For the same reasons that Bobby Kennedy and Hillary Clinton bought real estate in New York — to run for office…

Michelle has been making the rounds lately, appearing at different “Tech” conferences and attending a variety of events that she usually had no time for. She came out recently and really let female Trump voters have it. “Any woman who voted against Hillary Clinton voted against their [sic] own voice,” the former first lady declared, speaking at a conference in Boston. Believe it or not, the pomposity only got worse from there.

If Michelle Obama really has aspirations for public office, it might be the funniest thing I’ve heard in a long time. People are starting to compare her to Hillary Clinton, who after Bill left office, purchased a home in New York. Soon after she ran for Senate in New York state, starting her desperate claw towards the White House. But, um, correct me if I’m wrong, but didn’t that end in failure? Hillary Clinton worked for almost twenty years to secure the presidency, only to be beaten, TWICE. In 2008, she was derailed by Barry O’. And we know what happened last year.

Does Michelle really want to follow in Crooked Hillary’s footsteps? Outside of her brain-dead supporters, Hillary Clinton is one of the most hated politicians in America. With $$2 billion at her disposal, she couldn’t win the election! That should tell you something about her carefully laid out plans! It’s all speculation at this point. But Michelle has been making many appearances at events recently. It could be to promote her forthcoming memoirs, or it could be signs that she’s preparing a political bid.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199184,"Everyone, at this point, should know Hillary Clinton’s campaign promises. They consist of towing the party line, and that includes amnesty for Mexican illegal immigrants as well as a host of other entitlements. It’s a sticking point that draws a line in the sand between progressives and someone like Donald Trump, who wants to deport illegals and have them come in legally if they go through the proper channels.

However, video never lies, and an old Hillary video was just unearthed with the current Democratic nominee talking about how she would deport illegal Mexican immigrants and how Mexico’s problems, namely that of immigration, is due to Mexico’s public policies and poverty and crime rates. Before she advocated for illegals to receive free healthcare, she railed on about how they’re a problem for America.

Just watch the video and see how two-faced she can be:",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
146395,"In a flurry of executive orders signed by President Obama this week,one order will edit the Pledge of Allegiance to remove the phrase ‘Under God’.

For several years,Atheist and Muslim activists have put pressure on The White House for the move citing religious freedom regulations.

This order will help “ensure religious diversity” the President said in a press release Saturday.

“The separation of church and state outlined in the First Amendment to the United States Constitution is an important founding principle of our nation. Our nation’s Bill of Rights guarantees not only that the government cannot establish an official religion, but also guarantees citizens’ rights to practice the religion of their choosing or no religion at all.” White House spokesman Josh Earnest told Fox News.

According to Earnst,neither Children attending Public School nor Military personnel will obligated to recite the Pledge is they choose not to.While the Pledge is Voluntary it Amounts to Coercion When Young Children are Required to Recite it in Schools according to White House spokesmen.

The measure will undoubtedly meet stiff criticism from Republicans and the Christian Right who believe Christianity should be the State Religion of The United States.

Presidential Candidate Dr. Ben Carson chimed in as he was campaigning in Iowa for Monday’s GOP Primary.

Carson told Fox News,”I have been to contries where they throw people in jail for talking about God and they always have more tornadoes and hurricanes than we do.God gets really angry if we don’t talk about him.I don’t want to make God mad.He scares me.”

The order is scheduled to go into effect in June and is one of many measures outlined by the White House to “ensure religious freedom after The President leaves office next year.”",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201946,"the Democrats, but he is trying. If he can win some of these angry Sanders supporters, it is very bad for Crooked Hillary. So far though, it is questionable if this will work.

Wombat: Jawa Report: Sells Out

NYT: Sanders Supporters Sad: You broke my heart Bernie, you broke my heart.

Wombat: 90 Miles From Tyranny: A look forward at Hillary Fail 2017-2020 (send me back Clarence, send me back!) and JWF: Hillary explains why no one trusts her

Rush Limbaugh: Bernie and Hillary: Hillarious, but Scary and Beating Hillary

Instapundit: Fundamentally Transformed, Roger Simon: Bernie the Faker, Sells Out To Goldman Sachs, Never give up Bernie Bros, Never Surrender and Bernie Bros Freak over Sanders Sellout

AoSHQ: Bernie Sanders endorses security risk and known felon Hillary Clinton

Hot Air: Bernie Fans Say Fart In at Democrat Convention Still On

American Power Blog: Blazing Saddles for Sanders

EBL: Why I want #CrookedHillary to lose

Lem’s Place: Who’s voting for Trump?",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199713,"It doesn’t take much observation to realize that the halls of political power are also home to some very corrupt people and practices. We should not allow that to blind us to those who truly are public servants. Yet the profound level of malfeasance and duplicity that lives within those government halls can be shocking.

Ilhan Omar is a Congresswoman from Minnesota who has been moving up in prominence within the Democratic party. Given her accomplishments, the last thing she and her party needed was a scandal. And they’ve got one.

Circumstances point to the possibility that she is married to more than one man, one of whom might be her brother whom she might have married for citizenship purposes. Not surprisingly, suspicion runs wild over the truth of these allegations. She claims to be “Trump’s nightmare.” It might turn out she will become her own and the Democrats’ “nightmare.”

“Pamela Gellar, the well-known expert on Islam and Muslim terrorists, reported, ‘Omar is a 35-year-old mother of three and is America’s first elected Somali representative. She was married in an Islamic ceremony in 2002 at the age of 19, but never officially filed a certification in any government office. In 2009 she married a man whom people have accused of being her brother for citizenship purposes (and is still legally married to), and finally reunited with her first ‘husband’ in 2011, who she is still with today.’”

If true, not only is Omar in violation of the law, but also is engaged in some very sick practices. It would seem that the concept of “marriage” has no meaning to her at all if these allegations prove accurate.

Here’s what we can learn from the leftist Minnesota Star-Tribune:

“Hennepin County records show Omar applied for a marriage license in 2002 but never used it. It was not immediately known whom she planned to marry. Seven years later, Omar married Ahmed Nur Said Elmi in Eden Prairie, according to their marriage record. Elmi could not be reached for comment. Minnesota courts have no records of Omar and Elmi filing for divorce.

“Her campaign flatly denied that Elmi is her brother. It would only say that she and Ahmed Hirsi, who is pictured in campaign literature and is the father of their three children, are together and raising a family. The Star Tribune could not find records in Minnesota showing that the two ever married.”

The allegations take on more credibility with this information:

“Former Minnesota Congresswoman Michele Bachmann weighed in, saying, ‘Fraud, deceit, lies, corruption, cover-up, bigamy, immigration law violations, law breaking – all appear to be associated with the first Somali American winner of a Democratic primary in Minnesota. The newly discovered documents and witness testimony cry out for an investigation,’ according to WND.”

It looks like Omar has a distorted view of what marriage is all about and a lax attitude toward the laws of our country. And it is essential that an investigation be conducted to either clear her of these allegations or to have her charged with any number of crimes including bigamy and immigration fraud.

And the Democrats associated with her should start running for cover.

Source: Mad World News

Author, Craig Bennett, American Conservative Herald",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201797,"Wildfires engulfed the Great Smoky Mountain National Park on Monday and strong winds further complicated efforts to put out the fires, forcing a mandatory evacuation order to be issued for residents of Gatlinburg and Pigeon Forge, Tennessee. Terrifying videos and breathtaking pictures below show the scene near downtown Gatlinburg (*Warning:",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198820,"He might be known as The King on the court, but when it comes to politics LeBron James is just another clueless lefty.

James, like many others, decided to place the blame for the madness in Charlottesville squarely on President Donald Trump’s shoulders.

From Sports Illustrated:

LeBron James took to Twitter Saturday to voice his displeasure with the violence and white nationalist rallying taking place in Charlottesville, Va. this weekend, and appeared to take a pointed swipe at President Donald Trump as well.

James, who has been famously outspoken on social issues in the past, expressed his sadness at the weekend’s events and made a reference to Trump’s ‘Make America Great Again’ slogan, appearing to punctuate it with a sense of frustration. The white nationalists openly and verbally aligned themselves with Trump’s campaign rhetoric, with some Charlottesville marchers yelling “Heil Trump” while also parroting antiquated, racist sentiment.

It's sad what's going on in Charlottesville. Is this the direction our country is heading? Make America Great Again huh?! He said that🤦🏾‍♂️ — LeBron James (@KingJames) August 12, 2017

Our youth deserves better!! Flat out — LeBron James (@KingJames) August 12, 2017

This is just dumb, LeBron. Not everything is Trump’s fault. Don’t be so ignorant to the facts.

Right now James is making the case that he’s another uneducated multi-millionaire athlete voicing his opinion on matters of which he knows nothing.

This guy has such a large platform. He influences millions of Americans every single day, which is why it’s unfortunate he’s choosing to lead his young fans straight into the fire.

James is correct when he says “our youth deserves better.” Kids today need more manly, conservative role models, and less whiny quasi-socialists like Bron Bron.

After all, James did vote for Hillary Clinton.

H/T: Weasel Zippers",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200882,"GOP presumptive nominee Donald Trump is starting to get some endorsements from very odd places as he gears up to take on Hillary Clinton in the general election.

One such endorsement comes from controversial rapper Azealia Banks — the one who said Sarah Palin should be gang raped — who tweeted she hopes The Donald wins the presidency.

But that’s not all. She also had some harsh words for Democratic candidate Hillary Clinton.

From TheBlaze:

https://twitter.com/AZEALIABANKS/status/729050828196216832

“Trump just wants the U.S to be lavish … for all of us,” the rapper tweeted shortly after the big announcement.

PAGE 2 >>>",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201813,"Nothing is off limits to the degenerate Dems and their sick perversions, not even innocent children.

Executives from the disturbing website Backpage.com are facing indictments for facilitating sex trafficking including child trafficking. All of the executives are top donors to the Democrat party of Colorado. (via WND)

Backpage.com is the purveyor of the sleazy ads that appear in the back of news papers to advertise adult services. The executives of the website are currently being tried in front of a grand jury in Arizona.

The executives have been accused of knowingly accepting advertisements offering sex with minors.

The lawyer for two of the founders of the website acknowledges the guilt of his clients and in a recent court filing that stated that “indictments may issue anytime.”

The court heard how the website developed software that would systematically edit ads appearing in publications. They deleted keywords used in prostitution and child trafficking to “clean up” the ads before publication.

Backpage.com would accept ads from child sex traffickers and would edit the ads for them removing terms such as, “barely legal,” “cheerleader,” and “Lolita.” These are all terms that denote child prostitute in the john community.

Four of the executives of the sex trafficking websites and their wives all donated the maximum amount to the Colorado Senate Victory Fund giving almost $$90,000 between them.

This means that the Colorado Democrats accepted money from their largest donors who raised the funds by providing a platform for child and sex trafficking. The knowledge of this deal has caused conservatives in Colorado to demand the party donate the funds to a non-partisan charity to fight child trafficking.

It is unlikely that the Colorado Dems will return the $$90,000. Local liberal newspapers are already defending the Backpage.com executives claiming they are not responsible for what third parties place on their website. The liberals take no issue with the website editing the ads to help child pimps slip under the radar of law enforcement.

The Colorado Democrats deserve to be investigated. Who knows how the $$90,000 in donations would have affected their policy.

The fact that Democrats are comfortable accepting money raised on child prostitution is sickening, and very telling of the character of those in the party.

What do you think should happen to the Colorado Democrats? Please share the story on Facebook and tell us what you think because we want to hear YOUR voice!",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198840,"Maxine Waters has officially flown off the deep end. She has been caught on tape saying some pretty ridiculous things, but this one easily takes the cake. This time, she was caught on tape at an Islamic conference PRAISING SHARIA LAW, and CONDEMNING anyone who dare go against it. (see video below)

So, now Democrats are now praising an Islamic law that throws gays off buildings, oppresses women to the point they can’t even leave the house or show their face in public, participates in honor killings, and forces young girls to marry older men. Let that sink in.

Our constitution does not even come close to honoring anything remotely having to do with Sharia law, so why are the democrats not only defending it, but going after Americans who criticize it?

MAXINE WATERS: AMERICANS ARE BIGOTS FOR OPPOSING SHARIA LAW

WATCH :",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
202135,"In the latest news, it looks as if California Democrat, Rep. Maxine Waters, has been exposed as part of a major money funneling scheme that channels money directly into her campaign. Perhaps most importantly, the scandal could have major implications in the next presidential election.

According to the Washington Free Beacon, nearly $$750,000 has been funneled through an endorsement and mailing list operation run by Waters and her daughter, Karen: “The mailers list the candidates endorsed by Waters and is sent to the more than 200,000 constituents in South Central Los Angeles area, where the congresswoman holds considerable clout. The mailers contain an “official sample ballot” with brief quotes from the congresswoman.”

“The operation is run by Karen Waters, the daughter of Rep. Waters, who has collected more than $$650,000 to date for running the endorsement mailers. Karen is owed another $$108,000 from her mother’s campaign committee, according to its most recent records. Once Karen is paid, her total payments will reach more than $$750,000 since 2006.”

One would think that paying such ludicrous amounts of money for endorsements would be a bit unusual, but that isn’t the case according to California’s Sen. Kamala Harris, who has reportedly paid Waters tens of thousands of dollars to be included on the printed list of endorsements. “Harris — who has garnered media attention and earned speculation that she is positioning herself to run for president in 2020 following her performance during recent Senate hearings, including that of former FBI Director James Comey — has kicked $$63,000 to the campaign of Maxine Waters, the congressional face of the anti-Trump movement, in exchange for placement on the endorsement mailers,” the Free Beacon reported, citing Federal Election Commission records.

Pretty alarming, isn’t it, folks? Politics can be so sick and twisted at times. Apparently, the Waters campaign operation, the only one of its kind, has been able to bypass contribution limits that restrict other people, thanks in part to a decade-old legal loophole. Pretty ironic when you consider most Democrats are against money in politics, huh?",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
146203,"Today Democrats felt like they had finally beaten Donald Trump after YEARS of trying and failing. They finally got the Justice Department to appoint a Special Prosecutor to the Russia investigation.

They were so happy, bragging any way they could that they finally got their precious “justice.” Then the President burst their bubble Big League.

Donald Trump said it doesn’t even matter!

He released a statement just today that reassures us that both he and his campaign will STILL be proven innocent.

Trump said in a statement,

“As I have stated many times, a thorough investigation will confirm what we already know – there was no collusion between my campaign and any foreign entity.”

He continued,

“I look forward to this matter concluding quickly. In the meantime, I will never stop fighting for the people and the issues that matter most to the future of our country.”

So there you have it. Like we have heard time and again from all the top intelligence gurus, “There is no evidence of any collusion between Trump and Russia.”

They are grasping for straws and they know it. The best they have is that speech where he sarcastically and rhetorically asked Putin to release the emails Hillary Clinton deleted. It’s just pathetic.

So if you think it’s worth letting people hear Donald Trump’s side of the argument, and I promise it is, then give him a hand and share this statement to all your family and friends and coworkers and the whole lot of them.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199274,"He might be known as The King on the court, but when it comes to politics LeBron James is just another clueless lefty. James, like many others, decided to place the blame for the madness in Charlottesville squarely on President Donald Trump’s shoulders. From Sports Illustrated: LeBron James took to Twitter Saturday to voice",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
202109,"Two Mexican-American men have come under fire (no pun intended) after lighting the flag on fire to express their frustration with what was happening in this country—but it is not what it seems.

These two men were actually Donald Trump supporters, and they were taking a stand against protesters burning the American flag in California.

One of the men is shown wearing a “Make America Great Again” t-shirt, and the other is wearing an American flag designed shirt.

“This is about America, the America people, and our flag,” the men declared in the short clip. They go on to explain that they are firmly behind Trump. That’s when they set the Mexican flag on fire.

The two men explain that while they take great pride in their heritage, they believe that one should assimilate when they move to a new country. This means you must support yourself and take steps to learn the local language.

“If you don’t like it, go back,” one of the men comments before the video ends.

Watch it:

What do you think of this video?",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201460,"Recently, Michelle Obama delivered the commencement speech at Jackson State University in Mississippi. As usual, instead of focusing on the accomplishments of the graduating students, Michelle decided to push her husband’s agenda. During her speech, Michelle whined about the “religious freedom” bill. HB 1523 was introduced and signed into law by",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
146329,"Earlier this week, Nordstrom announced that they were dropping Ivanka’s fashion line from their stores, and denied any culpability. They “denied partisanship in the decision to drop Trump’s brand, insisting the move was made as a result of poor sales months after it was hit by a grassroots boycott started by a marketing specialist and a grandmother.”

ICYMI, this is what their stupid campaign is about:The Grab Your Wallet campaign was launched on October 11 by Shannon Coulter and Sue Atencio after they ‘simultaneously realized they could no longer in good conscience shop at retailers that do business with the Trump family’. The campaign compiled a list of businesses that sell Trump family goods. The extensive list also includes companies that advertise on Celebrity Apprentice or executives that have raised money for President Donald Trump.

The campaign name was direct reference to the president’s infamous ‘grab them by the p***y’ remark from 2005 a leaked audio tape that led to numerous allegations of sexual assault. In November, Nordstrom responded to a shopper’s letter calling for the company to stop selling the brand, tweeting: ‘We hope that offering a vendor’s products isn’t misunderstood as us taking a political position; we’re not.’By Thursday evening, Nordstrom had completely taken off the first daughter’s merchandise from their website.So anyway, first it was Nordstrom, now it’s NEIMAN MARCUS!

Neiman Marcus has also now removed Ivanka Trump’s jewelry collection from its website and some retail locations. Like Nordstrom, the company cited flagging sales, and made no mention of the boycott.“Neiman Marcus has a very small Ivanka Trump precious jewelry business, which is comprised 100 percent of consigned merchandise (merchandise owned by the vendor),” reads the statement. “Based on productivity we continuously assess whether our brands are carried in stores, on our website, or both.”So of course they’re going to act like there’s nothing to see here, totally not a political thing, move along people, but it IS political. It’s political because the only reason this boycott even happened is because some hypocritical seahags decided it totally offends them if a Republican candidate says something inappropriate. No word yet on how they feel about the legitimate sexual assault committed by their golden boy Bill Clinton.

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199206,"Hillary Clinton can’t be happy now that the debate rules for Monday night have been released. Unfortunately for the presidential hopeful, it looks likes she just got some bad news as she’s being forced to do without one major thing – and it could guarantee her a loss. As we all",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199117,"Bill Clinton was caught on camera doing something this weekend that could destroy his wife’s presidential dreams forever. We knew the Clintons had no respect for our military, but we had no idea they would sink this low… According to Daily Mail, Bill Clinton was campaigning for Hillary in South Carolina this",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
202092,"Liberal pundits and their good buddies in the mainstream media are still going on, and on, and on about how exciting and inspiring the DNC Convention and Hillary Clinton’s acceptance speech were. Apparently, at least one very notable Democrat was not left invigorated by the experience.

Bill Clinton appears to be so bored with his wife’s “historic” nomination and lengthy acceptance speech he fell asleep while she was speaking into the microphone.

WATCH HERE:

The guy sitting behind to the former president appears to elbow him at one point to wake him up.

Of course, Dems will first claim Bill was not taking a snooze – but the video tape is pretty damning evidence to the contrary.

After a lot of online mocking of Bill Clinton’s little cat nap, the Liberals will likely come out and finally admit he MIGHT have closed his eyes for just a second, but it was not out of boredom.

Excuses will range from his age, health issues, long hours he has been putting in to help get the old girl elected, and so on.

Perhaps he and Hillary are just big nappers – she did of course need to get a little shut eye during the 13 hours Americans were dying and being shot in Benghazi.

Bill, Hillary, and Donald Trump are all about the same age, and the Republican appears to have the energy of a man half his age.

Maybe Trump can stay awake until the late evening hours is because he is not weighed down by tons of political baggage and a backpack full of skeletons from his past he is trying to shield from the public.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201990,"Donald Trump demonstrated that the campaign was all about his supporters Thursday night when news media were stuck and couldn’t get to the Laconia, New Hampshire event in time for its opening. Knowing that many of the people had already waited hours for the rally, the Republican presidential nominee declined the reporters’ request to delay the start. and appeared pleased with himself doing it.

“I have really good news for you,” Trump said. “I just heard that the press is stuck on their airplane, they can’t get here. I love it.” He told them that the reporters are “going to be about 30 minutes late. They called us and said, ‘could you wait!’ I said ‘absolutely not,’ let’s get going!” The reporters voiced their anger at the snub on social media, beginning with CNN Politics reporter Jeremy Diamond.

Traveling press corps just landed in New Hampshire for Trump's event because we left from a different airport. /1 — Jeremy Diamond (@JDiamond1) September 16, 2016

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200715,"*Warning! This post contains content too disturbing for some. CNN’s most far left political commentator, Sally Kohn, has stooped to a new low even for her. She tweeted a photo of a 5-year-old Syrian boy injured in air strikes that has touched the hearts of people across the globe, regardless of political",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199138,"Federal prosecutor Beranton J. Whisenant, Jr., was found dead from a gunshot wound to the head on May 24. At the time of his death, Whisenant was investigating Debbie Wasserman Schultz and DNC voter fraud.

Now, the circumstances surrounding Whisenant’s death have gotten even stranger.

The Gateway Pundit reported that though police ruled Whisenant’s death a suicide and said he shot himself in the head, no gun was ever found at the scene. Police searched for two blocks north and south of the crime scene, but they could not find any firearm.

Whisenant’s friends and colleagues have previously said that he was not the type of person to commit suicide.

“People were drawn to him,” said Whisenant’s friend, attorney Michael Feiler. “He was very humble, a very good spirit … the universal opinion is that this was a guy who was going places.” Acting U.S. Attorney Benjamin Greenberg for the Southern District of Florida, said in a statement that his agency was “deeply shocked and saddened.”“He was a great lawyer and a wonderful colleague and we will miss him deeply. Our thoughts are with his family and friends.” Greenberg said.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199618,"…Director James Comey may be seeking to “redeem himself” with a public corruption charge against Hillary after he failed to recommend indictment for her mishandling of classified information. – According to Klein, Comey and Bharara have been in contact for months on the subject of Hillary Clinton’s public corruption with the Clinton Foundation while she was Secretary of State. – Sources have confirmed to Klein that Bharara has lined up several witnesses who are willing to testify. According to Klein, at least one of those sources used to work for the Clinton Foundation, and would have first-hand knowledge of any pay-to-play which occurred.

“Your sources are telling you that witnesses were said to be willing to testify that this was a quid pro quo–in other words that she sold access to her office?” Sean asked.“That’s my understanding from my sourcing,” Klein responded.– Klein also claims to have spoken to three State Department employees who worked closely with Hillary Clinton while she was Secretary of State, who personally witnessed her dealing with State Department business.

“The actually overheard her talking not he phone to a donor,” Klein explained. If true, Clinton’s actions would be a violation of a “letter of understanding” she signed prior to taking office, in which she promised to the Obama administration that she would not to engage in business connected to the foundation. “I’m not predicting this is going to happen,” Klein concluded. “All I’m saying is that the heat is on right now. Whether or not it’s going to flame into a real serious law case, who knows. Will Preet Bharara do the right thing? I hope so.” Check out Sean’s interview with Author Ed Klein:

WATCH:

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201309,"Liberal journalists took eight years off during Obama’s presidency. They didn’t ask him tough questions and they acted like guard dogs when anyone else tried to do so.Now, under President Trump, they think they’re so important that the future of the country depends on them being able to ask Trump tough questions. He keeps going around them and it’s driving them bonkers. At a press conference with Benjamin Netanyahu this week, Trump took questions from conservative news outlets and the liberal media freaked out.

From News Busters:Angry ABC in ‘Open Hostility’ at Trump for ‘Shutting Down’ Free Speech The journalists at ABC on Wednesday erupted in “open hostility” to Donald Trump, accusing the President of “shutting down part of the First Amendment” by not calling on network reporters at a press conference with Israeli Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu. Jon Karl, Cecilia Vega and Matt Dowd repeatedly whined about the “conservative” questioners who were chosen, lamenting that the preferred narrative of the liberal media wasn’t highlighted.

In the post-press conference coverage, Vega ranted, “I want to tell you about the open hostility right here in this room. You know, I’m sitting right here kind of in the middle of the pack of a number of journalists, mainstream reporters, if you will, and there is open anger in here about the fact the President did not take any real questions about the issue of the day.” …ABC analyst Dowd increased the hyperbole, stating that Trump was dismantling the First Amendment: This is two democracies, two important democracies in the world and basically the President of the United States is shutting down part of the First Amendment by not taking certain questions that are going to be any way antagonistic. Check out this video:

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201963,"Nelson Mandela’s funeral in South Africa together (along with former President George W. Bush and his wife Laura).

Before that, Clinton flew with Obama occasionally as Secretary of State, including to Myanmar in 2012.

While former Presidents Bill Clinton and George W. Bush largely stayed off the campaign trail in their final years in office, Obama is expected to stump heavily in support of the presumptive Democratic nominee, meaning Democrats will be on the hook for at least some of his travel in the coming months.

Like past administrations, Obama could offset some of the price-tag by combining political travel with official events, which are paid for by the government. The formula breaking down campaign and official costs, however, has been kept secret by White Houses going back to the 1970s.

Obama also hasn’t shied away from ripping Trump at “official” events over the past year, including most recently during a foreign leaders’ summit in Canada.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198638,"Americans were left stunned yesterday when a left-wing gunman attempted to assassinate Republican members of Congress in Alexandria, VA.

The gunman, James “Tom” Hodgkinson, opened fire and wounded 5 people, including Congressman Steve Scalise. The crazed gunman would have claimed more victims had it not been for the Capital Police who bravely returned fire and helped take the shooter down.

Shortly after receiving the news of the shooting, President Trump cancelled plans to celebrate his birthday and left to visit Rep Scalise in the hospital.

But what the President did after the hospital visit surprised everyone, especially the Secret Service!

“Despite being rushed to exit for security reasons, President Trump REFUSED to leave without stopping to shake the hands of EVERY SINGLE Capital Policeman and woman at the hospital.”",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199107,"Never one to mince words, former House Speaker Newt Gingrich needed one short sentence to summarize his opinion of CNN reporter Jim Acosta’s confrontational exchange with President-elect Donald Trump at Wednesday’s press conference.

“The reporter was an idiot,” Gingrich told TMZ Thursday. “Trump pointed out he was an idiot.”

“Most people in the country thought he was an idiot,” Gingrich added. “What went wrong? I thought from Trump’s standpoint it was fine.”

On Wednesday, Acosta attempted to confront Trump during the media event at Trump Tower. Trump was sharing his opinion about media coverage of unverified, salacious claims about him in an intelligence report that Trump has denied when Acosta spoke up.

“Since you are attacking us, can you give us a question?” Acosta said.

“Not you,” Trump said. “Your organization is terrible.”

“You are attacking our news organization, can you give us a chance to ask a question, sir?” Acosta then said.

“Don’t be rude,” Trump replied. “I’m not going to give you a question. I’m not going to give you a question. You are fake news!”

Gingrich suggested incoming White House Press Secretary Sean Spicer should make Acosta cool his heels with a temporary ban.

“I’m hoping Spicer will simply ban Acosta for 60 days, like hockey, where you bench somebody. Acosta needs to be benched for a couple of weeks,” he said.

“In baseball, hockey, basketball, if certain players behave inappropriately, you kick them out of the game,” Gingrich had said about the same incident Wednesday on Fox News Channel’s Hannity.

“I think the way Acosta behaved for CNN, have him suspended for 60 days. Send someone else,” Gingrich said.

The goal should be to ensure reporters know there are limits, he said.

“When you get beyond those limits, you ain’t going to be there,” the former speaker said. “They shouldn’t put up with this. It’s bad for the country.”

Also on Hannity, Gingrich said Trump “is deliberately trying to shrink and isolate CNN, and CNN is working hard to be worthy of that.”",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199224,"Chuck Schumer and his lapdogs in the mainstream media have been spreading lies about Trump’s ties to Russia. Now Trump is FIGHTING BACK! This afternoon, President Trump tweeted out a picture of Chuck Schumer enjoying a donut with Vladimir Putin. He mockingly said we should start an investigation into him!

Turns out that’s not the only time Schumer and Putin were hanging out. Schumer welcomed Putin to New York City in 2003 as his personal guest to open a Russian Oil Company Gas Station in New York City. Here they are hanging out on a New York sidewalk:

DEMOCRATS ARE SUCH HYPOCRITES! This comes just a day after Sen. Claire McCaskill called for the resignation of Jeff Sessions because he met with a Russian Ambassador. AND THEN SHE GOT CAUGHT IN A SICK LIE:",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198479,"Hillary Clinton’s inability to manage her emails was mind boggling. Politicians and high-level officials have been doing it for years and years and they never get in the kind of trouble Hillary did.

Democrats would like the Hillary email debate to go away but it really looks like it’s never going to happen. It’s going to be a running joke for years and years.

From Fox News:

The FBI has turned over 7,000 new documents from Anthony Weiner’s private laptop to the State Department as part of a watchdog group’s lawsuit related to last year’s Hillary Clinton email case. Judicial Watch and State Department representatives appeared in federal court in Washington, D.C., on Thursday over the group’s Freedom of Information Act suit seeking Clinton emails from her tenure at the State Department. It emerged during the hearing that the 7,000 new documents were turned over. The trove is expected to contain some emails sent by Weiner’s estranged wife, Clinton aide Huma Abedin.

Thank the Lord for Judicial Watch.

It seems like they are the only people concerned about getting to the bottom of this Hillary thing once and for all.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198379,"Believe it or not, there’s been a development in the Russia story that we need to investigate.

Of course, it has nothing to do with President Trump. Instead, it’s about John Podesta. In a recent interview on FOX Business Network, Hillary Clinton’s former campaign manager may have admitted that he colluded with Russia (via Breitbart).

FOX Business asked Podesta about his involvement with Joule Unlimited. Take note media; this is what journalism sounds like. We’ve talked about the Joule Unlimited scandal before. Podesta was brought onto the Russian energy company’s board while Hillary Clinton was Secretary of State.

Months after his appointment, the company received 35 million dollars from the Russian government through an investment fund supported by the Kremlin. FOX Business simply asked Podesta why he failed to disclose this.Ever the snake, Podesta outright denied that he had failed to disclose this. Much to Clinton’s alarm, I’m sure, the New Your Post has found that Podesta only disclosed two of three of his points of involvement with the firm (via NY Post).

Quick, someone page the liberal media! It sounds like someone found the Russian tie for which they’ve been searching! That’s not where Podesta’s troubles ended, either.FOX business asked Podesta where his Joule Unlimited stock is. Podesta replied that he doesn’t have any Russian stock. Well, seeing as Joule is headquartered in Massachusetts, Podesta’s stock in the company is technically American.

That doesn’t mean the Kremlin’s involvement with this firm wasn’t a way to pay off Podesta, and therefore, Clinton. It’s clear that something was going on here that Podesta wished to hide. In his defense, Podesta made the pathetic excuse that he divested Joule stock before Obama brought him into the White House.

However, Wikileaks has revealed that Podesta merely handed over his stock to his adult children. Podesta also kept in contact with Joule. At one point, they asked him for permission to add a new board member.It’s high time that we get to the bottom of this issue and find out if Podesta and Clinton are guilty of selling out Americans, again.The author of Clinton Cash, Paul Schweizer, has tried to bring attention to Podesta’s revealing appearance on FOX Business, in the New York Post piece. We can only hope that a real Russia investigation begins soon.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199928,"Political theatre, led by Ted Cruz supporters on the convention floor.

The NeverTrump scumbags called for “voice vote” on the convention floor, regarding the rules committee decision made earlier last week. The convention is attempting to move forward, while Ted Cruz’s selfish, scumbag supporters do all they can to upset the process.

Ted Cruz is trying to get his name on the ballot. He should not be allowed to speak at the convention.

WATCH:",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198072,"Hillary Clinton and her camp dismiss any talk of her fragile health as “conspiracies” spread by internet trolls. So what happens when a highly regarded professional with first hand experience working for Clinton emerges and echoes those “trolls”?

Americans are about to find out, because a Secret Service agent who once worked the “First Lady” detail during the Bill Clinton administration has a lot to say about the video showing a frail Hillary being carried off from the 9/11 memorial.

Gary Byrne writes:

Through the lens of my 29-year-career in The Service, I can see what a naked-eyed media pundit cannot: There is something seriously wrong with Mrs. Clinton. (…)

Here’s what was very disturbing to me: after the medical episode, she went to her daughter’s apartment and not to an Emergency Room. Secret Service procedure for […]

READ MORE ON NEXT PAGE >>>",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
146280,"Russia was distraught and outraged over the recent shooting in Turkey that took the life of the Russian ambassador there. The shooter was a Muslim terrorist, which makes it all the more concerning when you look at the other simultaneous terrorist attack that took place that day in Germany at a Christmas market.

Now, this would have been a good time for Obama to make a statement offering his condolences to Vladimir Putin and to those in Germany who lost friends and family in the brutal attack, but that would have meant taking time out of his busy schedule and getting a bit too close to condemning Muslim terrorists, who Obama is almost convinced do not exist.

A leader is truly tested when they are faced with tragedy, and it is most telling of their true character through their response to this tragedy. Most of us remember when American journalist James Fowley was beheaded by ISIS militants and his brutal execution broadcast around the world.

Most were very disturbed by this tragedy. If Obama felt this way he made sure not to show it. He put on a brave face and marched right on to the back nine to get a few more swings in while the rest of the country and the world mourned Fowley’s death.

This seems to be Obama’s go to response when the world faces tragedy at the hands of radical Muslim terrorists. So, it’s no surprise that when the dual terrorist attacks, the one in Turkey that killed the Russian ambassador, and the one in Germany at the Christmas market that left 12 dead and another 48 injured, Obama did what he does best in these scenarios, practiced his backswing.

He went right back to the golf course in Hawaii where he was vacationing to continue his tay in paradise while the world around him rages in chaos, partly as a result of his lackadaisical attitude for the past 8 years on the growing Islamic terrorism threat.

Obama has already been straining our relations with Russia, constantly egging them on accusing them of hacking into American systems and interfering with the presidential election.

The least he could do would be to pay his respects to those who have lost people during these two terrorist attacks, but instead, he’s sticking his nose up Putin and seeing how much he can get away with before Putin has had enough of his blatant disrespect.

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200140,"Michael Moore is really not smart.

Honestly, it’s hard to take anything the guy says seriously.

Like most liberals, Moore was appalled that the people of Britain think they should rule themselves instead of having unelected officials in Brussels tell them what to do.

So, he took to Twitter and made a strange proposal.

Europe, u are better off w/o Brits! Now that there's a vacancy, take us! We want what Europe has: free health care, free college, real beer! — Michael Moore (@MMFlint) June 24, 2016

I can’t tell you how many people have pushed back when I say that Democrats want to be like Europe.

Michael Moore is literally admitting that very fact in this tweet.

He not only wants to be like Europe, he suggests we should join them. Obviously he knows we can’t and he is kidding but clearly he would be open to that idea.

The European Union is antithetical to the founding of this country in a variety of ways and they really couldn’t be more different.

I know it gets old beating up on Mike but seriously what is this guy talking about?

Britain wants to rule Britain.

That’s not a crazy idea.

They did a pretty decent job doing it before the 1960’s wouldn’t you say?

They were only the most powerful nation on the planet for hundreds of years.

Liberals need to just take a deep breath.

Britain will figure it out.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200944,"Donald Trump voted for himself in Tuesday’s New York primary.

“It’s a great honor. It was a great moment. It was really something, very special. We want to make America great again,” Trump said after voting at Central Synagogue in New York City Monday morning, according to the New York Daily News.

The synagogue is less than half a mile away from Trump Tower on 5th Avenue.

Trump initially told reporters “it’s a secret” when asked who he voted for, but he quickly acknowledged he won his own vote.

After voting, he called for Texas Sen. Ted Cruz to drop out of the 2016 race should Trump win New York’s primary. He also ignored two questions about his flub on Monday night in Buffalo, when he referred to the September 11, 2001 terror attacks as “7-Eleven” instead of “9/11.”

Trump, who leads rivals Cruz and John Kasich in the delegate count with 756 is looking to sweep all 95 delegates up for grabs in New York’s primary.

RELATED:Just In Time For The NY Primary Trump Gets Weirdest Endorsement Yet [Video]",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201328,"Senator John McCain is back in his favorite place, the headlines. The man has always been!

The man has always been a go-to for reporters whenever they’re itching to get a Republican to trash his other party members. The more conservative, the more hatred McCain spits their way.

He’s been leading the Republican charge against Trump, likely very jealous that someone like Trump was able to succeed where he failed, and against an amateur politician in Obama at that.

As reported at the Powdered Whig Society, the mythos surrounding McCain is very powerful, and certainly the reason he has made it so far in the political world. But not everything you’ve heard about his heroic past is true.

During the presidential campaign, Trump had some choice words for the senator, questioning his patriotism at times, and daring to challenge the hero mythos that has been built around McCain. A lot of folks will immediately refuse to listen to you is you don’t call McCain a hero, or even begin to question his service.

A lot of folks will immediately refuse to listen to you is you don’t call McCain a hero, or even begin to question his service.

But the truth about his infamous time as a POW in a Vietnam is not as cut and dry as it’s made out to be. Even if every claim about his past was true, it doesn’t excuse his awful political record, but unfortunately, many feel it difficult to criticize him precisely because of his past service. Which is wrong, and quite frankly, dangerous.

Even if every claim about his past was true, it doesn’t excuse his awful political record, but unfortunately, many feel it difficult to criticize him precisely because of his past service. Which is wrong, and quite frankly, dangerous.

At least 1,205 American POWs were kept by North Vietnam according to records recovered at the end of the Cold War. President’s Clinton and Russia’s Boris Yeltsin instituted a search of Russia’s gulags looking for their remains with no success.

In 1993, armed with testimony from a former high-ranking Czech security official, a systematic search of archives in Prague that recorded the fate of 200 missing US POWs from Vietnam was mysteriously blocked by Senator John McCain.

Apparently, 33 POWs faced execution for treason after Vietnam until Nixon pardoned all POWs. On that list was none other than McCain himself.

Why? Well, according to Colonel Ted Guy, who was McCain’s commander was a POW, the senator collaborated with the communist Vietcong.McCain has also been accused of spilling information that resulted in the downing of 60 US aircraft, and training some of the North Vietnamese air defense personnel.

To top things off, McCain is also accused of making 30 propaganda videos against the US, which he moved to have classified once he became a senator. There are other accusations, but these are the most widely substantiated of the lot.

McCain owes his career to the fact he was a POW. His backstory propelled him to the Senate, where he’s been pushing bad policy ever since. We must remember that just because someone did something good or heroic in the past, it doesn’t make them above reproach in the present.

We must remember that just because someone did something good or heroic in the past, it doesn’t make them above reproach in the present.

Source: Powdered Whig Society",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199120,"The Missouri state senator who said she “hoped” President Trump would be assassinated has finally apologized. This comes after she faced outrage from both sides and lost her job. She should be charged with a felony, as what she said was a violation of federal law.A precedent needs to be set, it’s",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
146243,"DOMESTIC TERRORIST BILL AYERS IS BACK TO UNDERMINING AMERICA AGAIN. THE FORMER COLLEGE PROFESSOR AND LEFT-WING ACTIVIST IS A LEADER OF REFUSE FASCISM, ONE OF THE GROUPS ORGANIZING AND SUPPORTING THE RIOTS AT BERKELEY AND OTHER COLLEGES ACROSS THE COUNTRY.

Ayers, a friend of former President Barack Obama, was a member of the Weather Underground, a domestic terror group active in the 1970s. They were responsible for the bombings of New York City Police Department headquarters in 1970, the United States Capitol building in 1971, and the Pentagon in 1972. Ayers admitted to participating in all of those bombings. As authorities pursued him, Ayers went on the run, changing his identity. Eventually, charges against him were dropped after it was revealed the FBI broke the law in their investigation against him.

Now, The Gateway Pundit has outlined Ayers’ involvement with Refuse Fascism. They pointed out a tweet by Jack Posobiec, which first mentioned the connection.

Domestic Terrorist Bill Ayers who bombed the Pentagon is now working with Antifa — Jack Posobiec 🇺🇸 (@JackPosobiec) April 27, 2017

ANTIFA COVERS UP AYERS’ INVOLVEMENT

The Gateway Pundit then ran this screenshot from the Refuse Fascism website, listing their founders and organizers. Ayers is at the top of the list. The page listing these individuals has since been taken down.

On the Refuse Fascism website, it calls on members to resist the “Trump/Pence regime,” and states this as the “danger” a Trump presidency represents.

It is remaking the form of governance in this country so as to close off the ability of anyone – inside or outside of the official halls of power – to challenge or stop them. As long as they are in power, even if they are temporarily pushed back on one front or another, they will continue to slam ahead unless and until they are removed from office. This is all the more underscored by the regime’s extremely aggressive posture and actions, and its openly warlike wielding of nuclear weapons. It is not an exaggeration to say that the fate of humanity may hang in the balance of how we act and when.

It has previously been reported that President Obama is using his D.C. home as a headquarters to organize a Trump resistance. We should be surprised if a link is discovered between Ayers, Refuse Fascism, and Obama himself.

WHAT DO YOU THINK ABOUT OBAMA PAL BILL AYERS ORGANIZING THE ANTIFA RIOTS AT BERKELEY AND OTHER PLACES? LET US KNOW IN THE COMMENTS, AND IN ADDITION, SHARE THIS ON SOCIAL MEDIA.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199596,"As voters in five different states head to the primary polls on Tuesday, there is another unlikely alliance, of sorts, forming.

Donald Trump, the Republican front-runner who has expressed empathy for Democratic presidential candidate Bernie Sanders, is offering him some unsolicited advice.

“Bernie Sanders has been treated terribly by the Democrats — both with delegates & otherwise,” Trump tweeted Tuesday afternoon. “He should show them, and run as an Independent!”

Sanders has run as an independent for most of his political career and is the longest-serving independent in congressional history. But he joined the Democratic Party to run for president and his campaign manager told Bloomberg News that Sanders would be a Democrat for life.

Though Sanders and Trump’s views are vastly different, these two populist stars do have a few similarities. For one, they have enjoyed some of the largest crowd sizes of any presidential candidate. And Trump has likened their candidacies, comparing the struggle he says both men face.

“This is a crooked system,” Trump said earlier this month in Rochester, New York. “I’m not a fan of Bernie. I couldn’t care less. As far as I’m concerned, I couldn’t care less about Bernie. But he wins. And he wins. Like me.”

Trump has decried the primary system in both parties, calling them rigged, accusing the votes of being in the hands of the delegates not the people.

RELATED: BREAKING: As Voting Begins, The GOP Establishment Received HORRIBLE NEWS! [Video]",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199351,"…further details emerged. “There had been a struggle. His hands were bruised, his knees are bruised, his face is bruised, and yet he had two shots to his back, and they never took anything,” his mother, Mary Rich, told NBC News.

According to the Daily Mail, “The mystery surrounding his death has sparked a flurry of theories posted online, including claims that he was on his way to speak to the FBIwhen he was shot. There have also been suggestions he fed Wikileaks the 3,000 DNC emails that were released at the start of the party’s convention last week.”

Seth Rich’s position at the time of his death was Director of Voter Expansion, and he described himself as an analyst. He would have key information about all DNC voter fraud schemes. Rich’s death is very convenient for Hillary and the DNC, a little too convenient when you consider that he was the main operator at the DNC with access to all top secret documents.

Joe Montano, who was a former DNC Chairman, would have knowledge of the criminal activities used to get Hillary Clinton elected. Montano died from what was said to be a heart attack on July 25, the day the DNC started.

At 47-years-old and in good health, a heart attack is suspicious. Montano was on low-dosage of high blood pressure medication, which means his hypertension was under control, which put him more at risk of low blood pressure. His family says he was packed and ready to go to the DNC convention when they found him dead. They report he was in […]

CONTINUE READING ON NEXT PAGE >>>",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199021,"…response to a request by the conservative watchdog group Judicial Watch, which is suing the State Department for Clinton-era records under freedom of information laws.

Spokesmen for Clinton did not respond to requests for comment.

At least one other judge has said the department will eventually have to release all the newly recovered work emails, and at least some are expected to appear before the Nov. 8 presidential election.

After the system’s existence became more widely known, Clinton returned what she said were all her work emails to the State Department in 2014, and the department released them in batches to the public, some 30,000 in all.

The FBI took her server in 2015 after it was discovered she had sent and received classified government secrets through the system, which the government bans.

Clinton has said she did not know the information was classified at the time.

After a year-long investigation, FBI Director James Comey said last month that Clinton should have recognized the sensitivity of the information and that she had been “extremely careless” with government secrets. But he said there were not enough grounds for a prosecution, a decision criticized by Republican presidential nominee Donald Trump and other Republicans.

It remained unclear if there were any newly discovered emails that related to the September 2012 attack on a U.S. facility in Benghazi, Libya, in which four Americans, including U.S. Ambassador Chris Stevens, were killed.

“Using broad search terms, we have identified a number of documents potentially responsive to a Benghazi-related request,” Elizabeth Trudeau, a State Department spokeswoman, said in a statement. “At this time, we have not confirmed that the documents are, in fact, responsive. We also have not determined if they involve Secretary Clinton.”",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200525,"President Trump told the country that Americans must come first and he is backing that statement by strictly enforcing our immigration laws.

Trump’s “America First” stance has attracted a lot of criticism from other countries, especially our neighbors to the north, Canada.

Canadian Prime Minister Justin Trudeau has previously said that he disagrees with Trump’s views on immigration and border security.

Trudeau claims, “One of the reasons why Canada remains an open country is Canadians trust our immigration system and the integrity of our borders and the help we provide people who are looking for safety.”

But as it turns out, Canada isn’t as “pro-immigrant” as they claim to be.

“In 2016, Canada turned back more Mexican immigrants than it had in the last several years combined.”

The Mexicans who are allowed to enter the country, as Reuters notes, often end up deeply “disappointed” when they find that “tough border checks, hard-to-find jobs and fine-tuned enforcement policies mean it can be hard to enter and harder to stay.”

Phenomina is being called the “Trump effect”, and it’s exposing the liberal Prime Minister as a hypocrite!

Below is a graph provided by Reuters showing the dramatic uptick in Mexicans turned away:

The amount of Mexicans swarming Canada has even forced them to clarify their immigration stance.

The Royal Canadian Mounted Police in Quebec wrote in a statement,

“Consequences for crossing illegally can include incarceration, civil monetary penalties and deportation with a ban on re-entry.”

That’s strange, their policy sounds a lot like what President Trump has proposed. Why is the Canadian Prime Minister not being called “bigoted” for wanting to secure the border of HIS country?

It seems like Trudeau has a lot in common with President Trump when it comes to illegals entering his country, he just doesn’t want to admit it!

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199355,"The Cold War provided a solid generation of unfettered government growth in the US on the pretext of the Russian threat, and over the past few years American officials have relished at the new round of tensions with Russia, and the budget-busting spending it has permitted.

They’re hoping to make that permanent, with a new bill called the STAND for Ukraine Act aiming to make temporary measures imposed during Ukraine’s regime change permanent, and hamstring all future governments from a diplomatic rapprochement with Russia.

The new push centers in part on the fear that some future president might be less on-board with open-ended hostilities. Current Republican nominee Donald Trump has expressed doubt about the current acrimony, and said if elected he would be open to lifting sanctions on Russia.

It’s not just about Trump, however, and aims to preclude any president at any time in the future from such considerations, making the sanctions a permanent aspect of American policy. While there’s a lot of taxpayer money to be frittered away on preparing for war with Russia, however, those aren’t the only moneyed interests at play here.

The US-Russia Business Council is fighting vigorously against the bill, and the sanctions, with ExxonMobil’s agreed to $$500 billion drilling deal with Rosneft at risk if the sanctions become permanent. Even this enormous deal could potentially just be the beginning, as the Russian Arctic contains untold oil wealth, and American oil giants are the best positioned to get it out of the ground.

This puts two wildly influential lobbying powers, America’s military contractors, and its oil industry, directly at odds with one another, and with massive sums of money ultimately at stake.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201241,"domestic terrorism, what do the Democrats do? They blame the gun,” he said.

“When Micah X. Johnson commits a massacre of police officers in Dallas, who gets blamed? Conservatives. Republicans. Donald Trump, for crying out loud! Jesse Jackson and any other number of civil rights activists pop straight up and blame Donald Trump — who just happens to be the presumptive Republican nominee. Other than that, what in the name of Sam Hill does Donald Trump have to do with any of this? Absolutely nothing!” argued Limbaugh.

As reported by Western Journalism, according to Dallas Police Chief David Brown, Johnson stated his motivation: He wanted to “kill white people, especially white police officers” in response to the deaths of black people by police.

“Did they try to find out if he’s a member of the new Black Panthers?” the conservative pundit asked of the media. “I guarantee you they didn’t.”

According to the Independent Journal, Johnson’s Facebook cover photo was an image of a fist with “Black Power” written above it. He also recently liked the African American Defense League’s Facebook page, which calls for the killing of police officers.

…

Rush is good.

What he’s saying isn’t exactly anything we couldn’t have figured out for ourselves, but when it comes from a man as smart Limbaugh you at least feel your opinion is validated.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198118,"Professor of economics at the Massachusetts Institute of Technology and one of the main architects of Obamacare – Jonathan Gruber has been sacked after settling a fraud lawsuit with the State of Vermont. Gruber settled charges that he billed the state for work that he never did.

The Daily Caller reported:

“Vermont’s Attorney General has settled the state’s claims of fraud against Jonathan Gruber, the Massachusetts Institute of Technology professor who served as a technical consultant for President Barack Obama and as one of the chief architects of Obamacare.

Under the terms of the settlement, Gruber will no longer work as a taxpayer-funded economic consultant for the state’s health care system and he won’t seek to be paid any money he might be owed, reports the Rutland Herald, a Vermont newspaper.

For its part under the agreement, the Vermont’s attorney general will not pursue legal action under the Vermont Civil False Claims Act.

Vermont Attorney General T.J. Donovan announced the settlement on Friday after state investigators wrapped up an inquiry into Gruber’s billing practices.

Officials in Vermont had hired Gruber as an economic consultant to assess, examine and provide economic models for a now-abandoned plan to roll out a single-payer health care system across the tiny state.”

Here’s the report from Fox & Friends:

Gruber is the same man who said that the stupidity of the American voter is what allowed Obamacare to pass through congress.

Remember this?

Gruber’s issues is latest example of problems among the powerful in the Democratic Party.

H/T: American Lookout",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198606,"There are certain times where we can read between the lines, and this is one of those cases. President Donald Trump was not mentioned by name, however, it was painfully obvious that former Presidents George W. Bush and Barack Obama were referring to him and the direct impact they believed",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200605,"Last Friday Democrats said they were going to allow the US Senate to hold a vote on Donald Trump CIA nominee Mike Pompeo.Then Chuck Schumer changed his mind. On Monday Senator Tom Cotton (R-AR) confronted Minority Leader Schumer on the Senate floor.

Senator Cotton approached Schumer to confront him on the US Senate floor. Cotton said to Schumer, “Hey you promised you were going to hold this vote. You didn’t hold it.” Schumer reportedly said, “Well where were you eight years ago when we were trying to get through all of President Obama’s nominees?”

That’s when Cotton snapped back, “Eight years ago I was getting my a** shot at in Afghanistan… so don’t talk to me about where I was eight years ago.” Cotton then walked away. Boom!

Via America’s Newsroom:

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198463,"When are liberals going to learn that when President Trump says something, he MEANS IT! Ultra-liberal Chicago Mayor Rahm Emmanuel just learned that the hard way.Last month, Trump was outraged by the out-of-control crime in Chicago. Taking to Twitter, as he likes to do, the president threatened to “send in the Feds” if Emmanuel didn’t get the situation under control.

Chicago murder rate is record setting – 4,331 shooting victims with 762 murders in 2016. If Mayor can't do it he must ask for Federal help! — Donald J. Trump (@realDonaldTrump) January 2, 2017

Well, the rulers of Chicago did not heed Trump’s warning. And now he’s dispatched a “special task force” from the ATF. Until now, the ATF only had 40 agents in Chicago. Trump just increased that to 60, and tasked those additional agents to form a new “crime guns strike force” on the ground there.President Trump is done letting liberal Democratic politicians ruin America’s greatest cities. He’s taking back the streets!

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201992,"Democratic candidate Hillary Clinton has an uphill battle ahead of her in earning the trust of Americans. She has a history of lying and manipulating the public, and she is currently under investigation by the FBI. That’s not exactly at the top of the list of what Americans want in a presidential candidate.

Now, a recent photography of Clinton has gone viral, capturing what appears to be a joke and message from the universe.

Clinton was speaking at a rally, and members of the audience where holding signs shaped like the letters spelling out “Hillary.” When this photo was snapped, however, several letters were left out, and her face covered part of the letter “L.” The result? The word “LIAR” spelled out right behind her.

That message was the most honest one we saw all night, and the image has quickly gone viral.

What do you think? Do we need to keep Clinton far away from the White House?",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201847,"President Barack Obama appeared to spend $$360,236 of taxpayer money on a campaign trip to North Carolina on Air Force One with Hillary Clinton, a Freedom of Information Act request by a watchdog group found.

Air Force One costs $$180,118 per hour in flight, and the aircraft flew two hours round-trip to make the July 2016 trip to North Carolina, the Air Force’s Air Mobility Command Headquarters said in its response to a FOIA request by the conservative group Judicial Watch.

The use of Air Force One for campaign travel is not a new practice, but it was an issue of contention on the campaign trail this summer after presumptive Republican nominee Donald Trump complained about Obama’s use of the aircraft in support of presumptive Democratic nominee Clinton.

At the time, the White House said in a statement that the Democratic National Committee and other relevant political committees foot the bill for Obama to travel to political events on Air Force One, Bloomberg News reported.

However, the formula for how travel costs are divided is unclear, Bloomberg added.

As CNBC reported at the time, it’s common for presidents to use Air Force One to travel to campaign events themselves, but a president actually traveling with a non-incumbent candidate is new.

Presidents Lyndon Johnson, Ronald Reagan, Bill Clinton and George W. Bush all used the jet to travel to non-incumbent campaign events, but none of them traveled with their chosen successor.

The two hours of Air Force One use are in addition to dozens of other fundraising and campaign trips over Obama’s eight years in office, Judicial Watch argued, “bringing the known total over the past eight years to $$96,938,882.51.”

“The Obamas’ notorious abuse of presidential travel perks wasted military resources and stressed the Secret Service,” Judicial Watch President Tom Fitton said. “Judicial Watch estimates that the final costs of Obama’s unnecessary vacation and political travel will well exceed $$100 million.”",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200010,"Nancy Pelosi is having a really hard time since Donald Trump became president. On a weekly basis, she has provided us with a head scratching sound bite or patently false claim against Trump. Here’s Nancy telling Donald Trump to grow up.

Let’s just grow up. President Trump cannot be allowed to feel as if he can simply say whatever he wants, despite a lack of evidence. — Nancy Pelosi (@NancyPelosi) March 19, 2017

Lack of evidence you say? I seem to remember Nancy not being the most credible person in the world on more than one occasion. Twitter remembered as well…

@NancyPelosi ha ha you do it all the time. What a hypocrite you are — Kevin (@kevindandy1) March 19, 2017

@NancyPelosi

Yes, Ms. Pelosi. Let's grow up and legislate for the good of the country. Not obstruct for the good of your party or sp int's. — Cole Ector III (@ColeEctorIII) March 19, 2017

…

@NancyPelosi you said Obamacare was the the way to go, without a shred of evidence supporting your position. Hell, you never read the bill. — Stephen Durden (@Steve_Durden) March 20, 2017

@NancyPelosi Exactly. Politicians should only use fully vetted information before making political attacks. https://t.co/aFfhxF3BZE — Matthew Kolken (@mkolken) March 20, 2017

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201104,"Donald Trump may not be the media’s favorite President, but even they will tear up when they see the amazing thing he did for the first responder officers that saved the life of Congressman Scalise and the others in the area during that horrible shooting weeks ago.

So what did the President do? Well, he called a meeting with all of the first responders and Scalise’s wife Jeniffer. That’s when he dropped this bombshell on them:

He gave ALL the Heroic first responders the Medal of Valor!

That’s right. The highest honor a civilian officer can receive was given to two Capitol Police Special Agents, David Bailey and Crystal Griner, and three Alexandria Police Department Officers, Nicole Battaglia, Kevin Jobe, and Alexander Jensen.

Trump told a tale of the officers racing through a hail of bullets only to narrowly escape with their lives before heroically taking down the mad man. It may sound grand, but it’s the truth.

In fact, Special Agent Crystal Griner took a bullet during the shooting in her successful attempt to save Scalise. God bless you, Special Agent Griner

Look, I think the video and the story speak for themselves. So please, do your part in thanking them for their service my commenting ‘Amen’ and sharing their incredible story with everyone you know.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199952,"Jane Sanders had a hot mic moment during Bernie Sanders’ DNC speech, which prompted massive speculation among pundits and supporters after hearing what she said. During a rally on Monday afternoon in which the Vermont senator was encouraging his supporters to vote for Hillary Clinton to stop Donald Trump (and getting booed by supporters), Jane, was heard whispering to Bernie on a live microphone, “They don’t know your name is being put in nomination. That’s the concern.”

Senator Sanders is speaking to the Democratic National Convention tonight, and according to a press release about his prepared remarks, the Vermont senator is expected to double down on his endorsement of Hillary Clinton.

However, the fallout from the DNC emails revealed by WikiLeaks on the eve of the convention, along with Hillary Clinton giving disgraced former DNC chair Debbie Wasserman Schultz a top position in her campaign, has some Sanders supporters hoping their candidate will rebel against the Democratic establishment.

Even if the roll call vote isn’t successful, it’s clear that Hillary Clinton will have a difficult time uniting the Democratic Party around her candidacy. A new election forecast from Nate Silver’s FiveThirtyEight.com projects Trump to win a plurality of electoral college votes in November, including victories in critical swing states like Florida, Ohio, and Pennsylvania. Clinton’s sole swing state victories are Colorado and Virginia, according to FiveThirtyEight’s map.Other speakers tonight include First Lady Michelle Obama, Senator Cory Booker, and Senator Elizabeth Warren.

MSNBC producer Kyle Griffin confirmed the news of a roll call vote on Sanders’ nomination with Sanders campaign spokesman Michael Briggs:",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200835,"The inauguration of Donald Trump promises to be quite the spectacle.January 20th is a Friday, so tell your boss you need the day off way ahead of time.It was rumored at one point that potentially 30,000 protesters may try to crash the event as a way to show how un-American they truly are. Leading the pack will be socialist filmmaker and Bernie Sanders supporter, Michael Moore. Just swell.

From Independent: Michael Moore was one of the few people to accurately predict Donald Trump’s victory. Among pollsters, media commentators and even some member of the Republican party, it was widely considered beyond the bounds of possibility.

Nevertheless, now that he has won, the Oscar-winning documentary-maker and left-wing political commentator, has made it crystal clear he will not be accepting the rise of Mr Trump or resigning it to the annals of history. On the contrary, Moore is planning to lead national protests and planned resistance to disrupt the President-elect’s inauguration in January.

“If by some awful happenstance Trump shows up to be sworn in on January 20th, I will be there helping lead the national protest and non-violently disrupting the inauguration of a man no one other than the electoral college elected – and I’ll also be doing my own thing as a private citizen (activities I won’t disclose now),” Moore told The Hollywood Reporter.

Disrupt the Inauguration. The Majority have spoken – by nearly 2.7 million votes &counting! Silence is not an option https://t.co/HSmP3pREvy — Michael Moore (@MMFlint) December 7, 2016

The electoral college means nothing to Moore and radicals like him. Moore dreams of a socialist utopia in a country that has made him a multi-millionaire because he’s truly blind to reality.

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
146317,"Congresswoman Frederica Wilson has made a complete idiot out of herself by trying to turn the death of a United States soldier into a political tool in order to bash President Trump. We all would hope that a member of Congress would never politicize the death of a United States soldier, but Wilson did just that. She did it for her own political gain. This woman is disgusting. She eavesdropped on a call between a Gold Star family and President Trump and used the situation to launch her career, but unfortunately for her, we aren’t buying it.

It seems as though the Left is willing to do just about anything to try to ruin Trump’s reputation. Wilson isn’t the only guilty party. Leftists all over American are willing to do just about anything to tarnish our President’s reputation among the military.

It didn’t surprise anyone when CNN decided to cash in on the action and invite a Gold Star family onto their network. Their intentions were obvious. They were trying to get this family to bash Trump, but it backfired in their faces.

The following was reported by BizPacReview:

Murphy also explained that her true wish is for people to remember her son for who he was. This heartbreaking comment touched the hearts of Americans. However, CNN’s Camerota didn’t just leave it at that. She really really wanted this Gold Star mom to hate on President Trump. I guess that’s just what you do if you work for CNN.

Camerota stated, “I know that you, you wrote a letter to the White House, I think. What did you want the president to know about your son?”

The grieving mother answered, “I just wanted him to not forget my son. And I actually thank President Trump for ordering the air strike in Syria but it wasn’t enough to save my child. I have no hard feelings towards anyone.”

The full interview can be seen below:

The amazing thing about Gold Star families is that they are not looking to point fingers or place blame. It is not about politics to them. All that matters to them is that their loved one, who sacrificed their life for our country, be remembered. It’s not about a phone call or a letter. It’s about recognition and respect.

Camerota had ought to be ashamed of herself for trying to get a grieving family to point fingers. This isn’t anywhere near the first time that Camerota has invited a guest on her show with the sheer goal of getting them to lash out at Trump. She should just stop now before she makes herself look any worse.

If you recall back when the Charlottesville incidents took place, Camerota brought people on the show in order to get them to bash Trump. She failed miserably.

The Daily Caller reported:

The Left will continue to use the sorrow of Americans to try to lash out at Trump and destroy his good reputation. CNN has got to change their tune before they lose ALL of their viewers.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198066,"President Trump is very frustrated on Jeff Sessions! You probably asking why but i think our President thinks right. It is about Imran Awan, Debbie Wasserman Schultz’s IT staffer case. Arrest of this criminal could have been the key to unlocking a slew of criminal activity including extortion, blackmail, violation of the Espionage Act, and even the murder of Seth Rich, at the very highest levels of our government.

On July 25th, immediately after Imran Awan was arrested trying to flee the country we had posited that this signaled the Justice Department’s first step in draining the swamp. Predictably the MSM ignored the story and instead focused America’s attention on disparaging President Trump.

We never thought Sessions would turn his back on this potentially explosive break in draining the highest levels of the swamp.

When Robert Mueller was appointed Special Counsel and he began assembling his team, it began taking on the look of a Clinton legal defense team. This came as no surprise since Mueller had been the F.B.I. director the entire time she served as Secretary of State.

During that time Mueller saw no reason to investigate an NBC report that she was protecting a pedophile ring inside the department that she was running. The NBC report virtually alleged that she was responsible for quashing the internal investigation into it.

Of course, it was also during that time that Mueller found nothing suspicious about the incredible growth of the Clinton Foundation all the while Hillary was leveraging her position at Foggy Bottom to enrich her foundation. This included Cash Flowing to the Clinton Foundation Amid Russian Uranium Deal.

Now, the indictment handed down against Imran Awan shows us just what President Trump is up against as he attempts to drain the swamp. The Deep State is still in charge of both the F.B.I. and the DOJ.

According to a former U.S. attorney with knowledge of these kinds of cases the indictment against the Awans has been deliberately narrowly written.

Andrew C. McCarthy has written in National Review:

“To summarize, the indictment is an exercise in omission. No mention of the Awan group’s theft of information from Congress. Not a hint about the astronomical sums the family was paid, much of it for no-show “work.” Not a word about Wasserman Schultz’s keeping Awan on the payroll for six months during which (a) he was known to be under investigation, (b) his wife was known to have fled to Pakistan, and (c) he was not credentialed to do the IT work for which he had been hired. Nothing about Wasserman Schultz’s energetic efforts to prevent investigators from examining Awan’s laptop. A likely currency-transportation offense against Alvi goes uncharged. And, as for the offenses that are charged, prosecutors plead them in a manner that avoids any reference to what should be their best evidence.”



How could a qualified U.S. attorney ignore evidence of suspected blackmail, “given (a) the staggering sums of money paid to the Awans over the years, (b) the sensitive congressional communications to which they had access, (c) the alleged involvement of Imran Awan and one of his brothers in a blackmail-extortion scheme against their stepmother, and (d) Wasserman Schultz’s months of protecting Awan and potentially impeding the investigation.”



You may find it enlightening to learn who is in charge of the U.S. attorney’s office that is handling this case. It’s the U.S. Attorney’s Office for the District of Columbia and it is currently under the direction of Channing D. Phillips who is an Obama holdover who was never confirmed.

Making matters even more problematic is that Steven Wasserman, Representative Wasserman Schultz’s brother is an assistant attorney in that office.



Meanwhile, Trump’s nominee, Jessie Liu still awaits Senate confirmation. What more evidence do you need that Mitch McConnell and the Senate Republicans are part of the problem than their reliance on an Obama operative – who they never confirmed – to save them from being implicated in all of this D.C. corruption?

H/T: Banned Information",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200730,"The Donald has a long, storied history of being in the spotlight and grabbing headlines – that’s why this blast from the past in MAD Magazine is very telling about who the Republican frontrunner really is!! Here’s the unearthed page of their scathing rebuke of Trump from 1991: LOL!! Click here for a",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200351,"Dan Rather ended his journalism career by pushing false reports about George W. Bush so it comes as no surprise that he detests Trump supporters. Still, urging the media to shame people for their political beliefs is despicable.

Breitbart reports:

Dan Rather: Media Must Publicly Shame Donald Trump Supporters

Disgraced former CBS news anchor Dan Rather is out with a haughty statement on Facebook, urging all of his fellow news anchors and mainstream media editors to destroy Donald Trump and his supporters.

“This cannot be treated as just another outrageous moment in the campaign,” Rather said, referring to the Republican presidential nominee’s comments about defending the Second Amendment.

Rather appeared horrified by Trump’s comment, struggling to explain his shock.

“By any objective analysis, this is a new low and unprecedented in the history of American presidential politics,” he said.

Rather challenged the media to hold Trump accountable for his words, urging them to do more to try to shame his supporters.

“We will see whether major newscasts explain how grave and unprecedented this is and whether the headlines in tomorrow’s newspapers do it justice,” he said. “We will soon know whether anyone who has publicly supported Trump explains how they can continue to do.”

Hillary Clinton was investigated by the FBI and got away with things that would send any average citizen to jail but Trump supporters should be shamed? Right.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198127,"One of the biggest reasons that Britain decided to leave the European Union was to push back against globalism. They basically rejected the idea that the entire world is one big economy and that sovereignty and national identity should take a back seat to the desires of the global community. It’s nonsense. But President Obama loves the idea. He told us about it today during his last speech at the United Nations.

From Weasel Zippers via Free Beacon: President Obama advocated that nations will have to give up some of their autonomous freedoms for international cooperation to achieve security on Tuesday during his speech to the United Nations General Assembly. Obama told the audience how he believes global security can be achieved with the help of international institutions like the U.N. In his remarks, Obama said “powerful nations” like the United States will have to accept constraints and give up some of their freedoms. The president acknowledged that he has been criticized by his own citizens for this belief but he remains convinced he is right. Obama also stated that while countries will have to accept some limits on their freedom, they should not give up autonomous rights like the freedom to defend themselves.

“We can only realize the promise of this institution’s founding to replace the ravages of war with cooperation if powerful nations like my own accept constraints,” Obama said. “I’m convinced in the long run giving up some freedom of action, not giving up our ability to protect ourselves or pursue our core interests but binding ourselves to international rules, over the long-term, enhances our security.”

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200591,"President Trump suggested Tuesday the string of bomb threats called into Jewish centers -- which the media has used to try and paint him as antisemitic -- may be staged to ""make people look bad."" From The New York Times: President Trump suggested on Tuesday that the recent spate of anti-Semitic bomb",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201274,"Close Pelosi Friend and ally, Congresswoman Corrine Brown, has been convicted of 18 felonies for stealing $$1 Million from children’s scholarship charity. Brown faces life in prison!!

As she was stealing scholarship money from school children, Corrine Brown partied with Pelosi, flew with Obama, and campaigned for Clinton… and she was a Super-Delegate!

The FBI proved that Brown ‘exploited the needs of children and deceived her constituents to advance her own personal and political agendas’. The FBI said the Congresswoman raised over $$800,000 in donations for a charity she was linked to while scholarships from that charity only amounted to $$1,200.

The verdict came just three days after closing arguments. Brown was shown to have lived the high life on cash that aides secretly deposited in her bank account after passing it through other accounts.

She is expected to be sentenced within 100 days.

The trial brought explosive headlines when it was revealed that the disgraced Congresswoman used $$750 from a bogus charity to buy her daughter a $$10 birthday cake.

The FloridaTimesUnion reports:

The jury convicted Brown of 18 of the 22 separate criminal counts a grand jury indicted her for in July. The convictions involve conspiracy, mail fraud, wire fraud, tax crimes and hiding income she should have publicly reported. She was found not guilty of two counts of mail fraud and two counts of wire fraud. Brown could in theory be sentenced to decades in prison, but that decision is likely more than three months away. No sentencing date was immediately set. Each fraud or conspiracy conviction carries a potential 20-year sentence, and each tax conviction three years. Hiding income could lead to another five-year sentence. The convictions affirm parts of a narrative prosecutors told of Brown breaking laws while she lived an unsustainable expensive lifestyle that left her desperate for cash. Jurors were told the brash 70-year-old Democratic icon, who spent 24 years in Congress before losing reelection last year, received $$141,000 in untraceable cash over several years through sources including the sham charity One Door for Education and her Friends of Corrine Brown campaign committee. An FBI accountant testified Brown, who earned around $$175,000 a year as a member of Congress with a pension from the Florida Legislature, spent an average of $$1,438 per month more than her reported income. “Former Congresswoman Brown took an oath year after year to serve others, but instead she exploited the needs of children and deceived her constituents to advance her own personal and political agendas,” said FBI Jacksonville Division Special Agent in Charge Charles Spencer in a prepared statement.

With her former chief of staff testifying against her, the question is begged!

Why did Pelosi continually cozy up to a Congresswoman who was so clearly corrupt?

From the beginning, Corrine Brown has been shrouded in controversy. Shortly after she won election in 1992, the Federal Election Commission accused Brown of violating numerous campaign finance laws. The biggie was that she accepted donations from foreign citizens and failed to report the use of a corporate plane. And that’s just the tip of the ethical iceberg.

A convenient rap sheet, put together by the Florida Times-Union, documents every allegation of wrongdoing brought against Brown during her 27-year career.

It is the never-ending story!

In the midst of all this scandal, Corinne Brown not only fundraised with the Pelosi, but also enjoyed prominent perches on the Transportation and Veteran Affairs Committees.

The Democrats only care about corruption if it is on the other side of the aisle.

What did Pelosi know about Corinne Brown and when did she know it?",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201306,"‘Morning Joe’ co-hosts Joe Scarborough and Mika Brzenzinski have made it pretty clear they hate Trump, falling in line with most mainstream media anchors these days. But they took a break from their usual Trump-bashing to drag Kellyanne Conway into the mix. Mika and Joe LIED about Kellyanne, accusing her",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
202029,"If Michelle Obama is so offended by the White House, and says that it’s built by slaves… Well, the door is right there…

But apparently she and Barack don’t exactly want to leave. They plan on sticking around once their tenure in the “House that slaves built” is over.

Robert Gehl reports that for the first time in almost a century, an outgoing President will remain in Washington D.C. after his term is up.

Why did it have to be Obama?

SEE IT ON PAGE 2 >>>",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200116,"Evidence shows that John Roberts, chief justice of the United States Supreme Court, was “hacked” by a Deep State surveillance operation overseen by Obama administration CIA director John Brennan and Obama director of national intelligence James Clapper.

Roberts, the Bush appointee who made the decisive vote to uphold the constitutionality of Obamacare before the 2012 election, was allegedly the victim of the same Deep State surveillance program that spied on President Donald Trump.

Tapes released by Federal Judge G. Murray Snow — preserved on a Whistleblower Soundcloud page — show real estate billionaire Timothy Blixseth explaining Brennan and Clapper’s surveillance program to Maricopa County Sheriff Joe Arpaio and detective Mike Zullo. The existence of this surveillance program has been corroborated by Wikileaks’ “Vault 7” release and by the public comments of former CIA and NSA contractor Dennis Montgomery, who says he worked on the program for Brennan and Clapper.

Montgomery has gone public with his claims exposing how the program was used to spy on President Donald Trump when he was a private citizen. Montgomery has gained immunity and desperately wants House Intelligence Chairman Rep. Devin Nunes or other lawmakers to call him to testify about what he knows.

On the explosive tapes, Blixseth walks Arpaio and Zullo through the details of the program on a computer screen. At one point, the three begin pulling up specific names of targeted individuals.

“You know who that guy is? That’s the head of the FISA court they hacked into, Reggie Walton,” Blixseth tells the investigators.

“John Roberts, the chief justice of the Supreme Court, was hacked,” Blixseth tells Arpaio and Zullo.

LISTEN TO THE TAPE HERE (18:00 Minute Mark)

Insiders have always been skeptical of Roberts’ motives for siding with President Obama on the 2012 Obamacare case. While there’s still no available evidence that Roberts was blackmailed, the allegation that he was “hacked” by Obama officials provides some more context into the justice’s controversial career.

As we reported, former FBI director James Comey seized and buried volumes of information that demonstrated this wide-ranging government surveillance operation targeting Donald Trump before he became president.

Larry Klayman, attorney for former NSA and CIA contractor and whistleblower Dennis Montgomery, delivered to the FBI 47 hard drives and data amounting to more than 600 million pages of documentation on the surveillance scheme. Then-FBI director James Comey’s general counsel James Baker took the data into his possession, according to multiple sources. But despite possessing Montgomery’s bombshell whistleblower revelations, Comey never acted on or publicized the information.

Additionally, Comey’s former firm Lockheed Martin granted entry to Montgomery to one of its facilities to help him work on the alleged mass surveillance program, which was allegedly overseen by Obama administration officials John Brennan and James Clapper and specifically targeted Trump.

“This guy showed me 900 million phone calls. And I see myself in there. I see people I know. I see Donald Trump in there a zillion times, and Bloomberg is in there,” Blixseth said on the tape, referring to information that Montgomery allegedly showed him.

“We don’t have any comment,” the FBI told Big League Politics when questioned about the existence of the program.

“I provided to the FBI seventeen businesses of Donald Trump, including the Trump Tower, the Trump leasing programs, all of these different programs, and including Trump himself and the various family members that had been wiretapped under these programs,” Montgomery said in a recent interview. “There has been a wiretap on Trump for years.”

“I started by going to Maricopa County and showing that Sheriff Arpaio himself was wiretapped under the Obama administration,” the whistleblower said.

“I was a CIA contractor both under John Brennan and under James Clapper and these individuals were running domestic surveillance programs in the United States collecting information on Americans. This isn’t political. They were collecting information on Republicans and Democrats. But they collected everything they could find. Bank accounts, phone numbers, chats, emails, and they collected a massive amount of it under the Obama administration,” Montgomery said.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201523,"Russian officials who have a history of lying and reneging on international agreements. The White House and Department of State decided to pursue the agreement anyway, believing it will limit any expansionist U.S. role inside Syria.

The Syrian battlefield is described by many as a proxy war between the U.S. and Russia, however deliberate Russian targeting of an American facility surpasses even the proxy war norms of the Cold War. Russia has also operated within these proxy war norms by repeatedly targeting U.S. backed rebels, in one case continuing to do so despite an official request from the Pentagon to stop.

Obama’s deal with Putin legitimizes Russia’s intervention inside Syria and will have to negotiate the definition of “terrorist” with Russia when striking targets. Legitimization of Russia’s intervention in Syria is part of a concerted Russian campaign to get international recognition of its annexation of Crimea and invasion of Ukraine. The deal will also likely remove the most effective battlefield forces against Assad without offering any meaningful U.S. assistance to another rebel group to replace Assad.

Despite an official U.S government line that Assad must go, the U.S. is essentially conceding that Assad remain in power and will not play a leadership role in determining Syria’s future.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199221,"Rep. Peter Roskam (R-IL) went on with Stewart Varney on Thursday morning to discuss recent developments on Capitol Hill. Roskam told Stewart House Republicans are planning of filing criminal charges against Lois Lerner. Rep. Roskam: The Obama Administration was very lenient with the crimes that Lois Lerner committed. And those are strong words that I’m using but the House Ways and Means Committee voted out a criminal referral to the Department of Justice which was completely dismissed by the Department of Justice… We think that Lois Lerner did two things wrong. Number one, she denied people due process and equal protection of the law based on their political philosophy. We’re convinced that there is overwhelming evidence to suggest that that’s true. And that’s a felony. Secondly, we suspect that she lied to the Inspecter General of the Treasury Department.

Via Varney and Co.:

More than 30 lawmakers sent a letter to President Trump last week calling for Obama’s IRS Commissioner, John Koskinen to step down from his post before the end of his term, Fox News reported.

The IRS Conservative Targeting Scandal involved:

Hundreds of conservative groups were targeted

At least 5 pro-Israel groups

Constitutional groups

Groups that criticized Obama administration

At least two pro-life groups

An 83 year-old Nazi concentration camp survivor

A 180 year-old Baptist paper

A Texas voting-rights group

A Hollywood conservative group was targeted and harassed

Conservative activists and businesses

At least one conservative Hispanic group

IRS continued to target groups even after the scandal was exposed

10% of Tea Party donors were audited by the IRS

And… 100% of the 501(c)(4) Groups Audited by IRS Were Conservative",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201978,"As always happens, Dems use mass shootings to promote and market their gun control agenda.

Every democrat is demanding gun control, they even protested during the minute of silence for Orland’s victims in congress.

On the wake of the attack, many of us predicted what would unfold. It was sadly the same political tale we have seen over and over again. Many of us predicted that Democrats would, as a matter of rigid partisan ideology, refuse even to say the words “radical Islamic terrorism.”

That they would suggest this attack was yet another isolated incident, one lone criminal not connected to any global ideology, not connected to any global jihad. And that even worse, they would try to use it as an excuse to go after the Second Amendment rights of law abiding citizens.

Yesterday we saw a political show on the senate floor. Democrat after Democrat standing for hours incensed not at ISIS, not at radical Islamic terrorism, [but] incensed that Americans have a right to keep and bear arms. This is political distraction. This is political gamesmanship.

Watch:",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198580,"Red Alert Politics reports that in 1948, Pelosi’s father, Baltimore Mayor Thomas D’Alesandro, Jr., actually dedicated a monument to none other than Robert E. Lee and Stonewall Jackson.

At the dedication, he said, “Today, with our nation beset by subversive groups and propaganda which seeks to destroy our national unity, we can look for inspiration to the lives of Lee and Jackson to remind us to be resolute and determined in preserving our sacred institutions.”

According to the Baltimore Sun, “The Lee-Jackson statue was erected in 1948 after a $$100,000 donation from Baltimorean J. Henry Ferguson. Ferguson’s father was a friend of Confederate President Jefferson Davis.” Many believe that the statues erected during this time were to push back on the growing Civil Rights movement.

Baltimore’s current Mayor Catherine Pugh decided to remove this monument and others on Tuesday.

Pelosi has called for the removal of all confederate-linked statues in the Capitol Building, but has yet to denounce her father’s support for Lee and Jackson — nor has she condemned the racist roots of the Democratic Party. She also did not remove the statues when she was Speaker of the House.

One of President Donald Trump’s top advisors spoke for all of us with her reaction:

Yes, this would be the same Nancy Pelosi who now calls these statues “celebrat[ions of] violent bigotry” and symbols of “white supremacy.” “I call upon Speaker Ryan to join Democrats to remove the Confederate statues from the Capitol immediately,” she said…without bothering to explain why she left them standing during the four years she held Ryan’s job.

H/T: Townhall",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
202133,Angela Merkel has been a disaster as leader of Germany. Her ridiculous decision to give up and let hundreds of thousands of unvetted refugees into Germany has been a nightmare in every possible way.Trump has made it clear he’s not a fan of that policy. Trump usually shakes hands with,americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200343,"This presidential election season has been pretty celebrity-heavy and thank God for that, because we need desperately need them to use their political insight to show us the way. George and Amal Clooney are throwing VERY expensive dinners for Hillary Clinton and Rosario Dawson is rallying the crowds for BernFest2k16. And then there’s the really elite, top of the top, cream of the crop celebrity crew coming together to support orange turd, Donald Trump! And one of those elite supporters is Kirstie Alley.

“Donald Trump, whether you like him or you don’t like him, is waking this country up,” Alley told FoxBusiness.com before Thursday’s Republican debate in Charleston, South Carolina.

“If you hate him, you’re going to talk about how much you hate him,” Alley added. “If you love him, you’re going to talk about how much you love him.”

“I want someone who will rev us up and make us pay attention. I think that’s a really great step for this country because this country’s gotten very complacent,” she said.

RELATED: Playboy Playmate Kendra Wilkinson Makes HUGE Trump Announcement!",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
146284,"Trump has been dealing with a lot of nonsense from his critics and the mainstream media since he took his Presidential Oath. It looks like he has finally had ENOUGH!

President Donald Trump is warning Barack Obama to “get a good attorney” after what his team of investigators just found within the White House records. This definitely was something Obama was trying to hide, and he must be burning up the phone lines, calling his legal team and warning his cohorts. Trump’s senior adviser and attorney Jay Sekulow just dropped this bombshell, and this shocking evidence against Trump’s worst enemies will blow your mind.

President Trump has been under a bogus investigation thanks to the Democrats who appointed Robert Mueller as Special Counsel and that snake James Comey. Well, now it’s Mueller who is banging his head against a wall after what Trump’s team of investigators just found.

Trump attorney Jay Sekulow just revealed a huge problem for Barack Obama, Loretta Lynch, James Comey, and the Clintons. We all remember the Lynch-Clinton tarmac meeting that Lynch said was a personal visit with Bill Clinton, where they discussed “grandkids.” With Hillary Clinton being under fire for her email server scandal at the time, we all knew that was a load of bullcrap, and Sekulow just discovered damning evidence that incriminates Lynch and Obama in a massive cover-up.

On the ACLJ website, Jay’s son Jordan Sekulow, who’s also an attorney, writes, “Our federal lawsuit against the DOJ bureaucracy over the secret meeting between former Attorney General Lynch and former President Clinton has already unearthed documents proving the FBI lied that it had ‘no’ documents, that the media was colluding with the Obama DOJ to bury the story, and that AG Lynch (AKA Elizabeth Carlisle) was using a secret email address to conduct official business. Now we’ve uncovered that the White House was involved.”

Jordan Sekulow goes on to point out, “So within 2 minutes of learning that the press had found out about the secret Clinton-Lynch meeting, senior DOJ officials knew they had a crisis on their hands.” Indeed they did, which means Comey was lying his butt off when he stepped in and exonerated Hillary in the email scandal, and obviously, this is what the tarmac meeting was about. Then, Sekulow has just found these incriminating emails which prove these rats were all colluding to cover it up, and it went straight to Obama’s desk as the emails prove. But, it gets worse.

Top Senior Democrat Dianne Feinstein is the head of the Senate Intel investigation going on right now, investigating Loretta Lynch’s tarmac meeting with Bill Clinton. So, who pops up on Sekulow’s radar in these emails? Yep, Dianne Feinstein, specifically Feinstein’s Deputy Counsel, Paige Herwig.

It’s a tangled web, but all you have to know is that this Paige Herwig, who now is Dianne Feinstein’s right-hand woman, was working for Loretta Lynch during this tarmac meeting, and she is the one who redacted all of Lynch’s emails to cover-up the real reason for the visit with Bill Clinton. Don’t you think this is something Feinstein knows too? Of course, Feinstein knows, yet she is pretending to investigate this matter when she knows all about the cover-up going straight to the former President Barack Obama.

Jay Sekulow was livid last night on Sean Hannity’s show, where he said, “The conflict of interest is astounding. Committee staff [Dianne Feinstein, Paige Herwig] who are supposedly investigating this [tarmac] situation were the same people creating the talking points [Loretta Lynch, Paige Herwig] – Obama loyalists investigating themselves.”

BUSTED!! Feinstein opted to look into Loretta Lynch / Slick Willy Tarmac meeting b/c Lynch’s Senior Counsel is now Feinstein Deputy Counsel!

Sekulow hinted at what Trump’s reaction was, saying, “Yeah, Barack Obama better get a good attorney.” It’s not just Obama who needs a good attorney as it was also discovered that Lynch was forwarding the emails which plotted the cover-up to the FBI. The name is redacted, but everyone knows it’s former FBI Director James Comey.

Patriots are sick and tired of the crimes which we know Obama, Lynch, Comey, and the Clintons committed. It’s time the DOJ open a special counsel to investigate these matters. Heck, they are investigating Trump over nothing. Here, we have real crimes and real evidence, and all we need is for Jeff Sessions to open an investigation.

AG Sessions has zero conflict of interest here, so he can just go ahead and open an investigation, which he may have already done. Typically, DOJ investigations are secret matters. The only way to make these matters see the light of day is to keep exposing them. Obama and his crew think this will just wash away, but the tenacity of the American people for justice is great, and we’ve been waiting long enough.

Do you support President Donald Trump against Obama?",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200159,"Massive voter fraud in the 2016 Presidential election has been uncovered in Nevada. Megan Barth from Newsmax said:

Well it appears Nevada, which has voted for the winner of the Presidency for the past 108 years may have been stolen and must be investigated by the Feds. Not Obama feds but incoming Attorney General Jeff Session must investigate this issue.

Barth interviewed Republican Assembly Candidate for District 15, Stan Vaughan, who had actual proof of the massive voter fraud in his Clark County district. A total number of 17,086 votes were cast in the District for both Republican and Democrat candidates. However, when confirmation letters were sent to the voters in the District, the US postal service returned mail from 9,200 of these voters.

Vaughn found that many of the people who are listed as deceased are still on the active voter rolls. Many of the returned mail came back with 5 people living in a vacant lot with no mail receptacle. Edward Snowden, Willie Nelson, Waylon Jennings and dozens of movie stars were registered to vote in District 15 according to Mr. Vaughan.

Vaughan tested a sample of 200 people of the 9,200 return mail and found that 185 of those had indeed voted. According to Mr. Vaughan, there were other serious voting system irregularities he documented.

President-elect Donald Trump lost by only 27,000 votes statewide in Nevada. So 9,200 fraudulent voters in one small Assembly district is more than 1/3 of the total margin that Trump lost by.

It was previously reported that Nevada poll workers wore defeat-Trump t-shirts at the polls during the election which was against the law and Hillary supporters were caught breaking the law before the election when registering people to vote as well.

Green Party candidate Jill Stein has asked for recounts in three states won by President-elect Donald Trump in this year’s election (Wisconsin, Michigan and Pennsylvania). Her rationale for requesting these recounts was voter fraud. However, there is no indication Stein will request any recounts in Nevada.

by Joe Hoft

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201764,"Democrats in Congress have made it their goal to resist the President at every turn. They have fought his attempts at preventing illegal immigration, ending Obamacare, and even combating terrorism. It’s clear they do not care about helping Americans or winning back voters—just preventing Trump from having success. But thankfully the rest",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200183,"Not only do illegal aliens come before American citizens in Obama’s America, but now prisoners have it better than the law-abiding.

Just another day at the office for Barack.

From Christian Science Monitor:

Starting next month, thousands of US prison inmates will be able to access federal financial aid to continue their higher education studies.

These new students, which could number up to 12,000, will remain in their prison facilities learning through online classes, classroom-based instruction, or a combination of the two, reports the Washington Post. But the Obama administration hopes that the pilot financial aid program will open doors for the inmates when they leave the system.

“We all agree that crime must have consequences, but the men and women who have done their time and paid their debt deserve the opportunity to break with the past and forge new lives in their homes, workplaces and communities,” Education Secretary John B. King Jr. said on a call with reporters Thursday. “This belief in second chances is fundamental to who we are as Americans.”

The pilot program is part of a larger, bipartisan effort to reform the US justice system. It includes measures ranging from “ban the box” so felons don’t have to report criminal history on job applications to rolling back lifetime sentences on drug-related crimes and commuting the sentences of low-level and nonviolent drug dealers.

The Second Chance Pell Pilot Program will enable inmates to access Pell grants, which are federal education scholarships of $$5,815 or less per year. By slating this as a trial, the US Education Department can circumvent a 1994 Congressional ban on awarding Pell money to inmates. The trial has been over a year in the making: last summer the Obama administration publicly announced the executive action to launch the program in 2016.

At the time, Republican Rep. Chris Collins, filed his own bill, the “Kids Before Cons Act,” which would study whether students enrolled at charter or private schools under a voucher program are less likely to end up in prison than children in traditional public schools. The idea behind the Collins bill: Reduce imprisonment on the front end, rather than spending money on the back end.

“The Obama administration’s plan to put the cost of a free college education for criminals on the backs of the taxpayers is consistent with their policy of rewarding lawbreakers while penalizing hardworking Americans,” Collins (R) of New York told Politico.

The Obama initiative brings together more than 100 federal and state adult penitentiaries and 67 colleges and universities, the majority of which have offered some version of prison-based education in the past, according to the Washington Post. Inmates must be within 5 years of leaving prison in order to access the funding.

Prison is meant to rehabilitate bad guys so can they can function normally once they get out.

We shouldn’t be supporting these people financially.

How is it that law breakers have it easier than those who work hard to achieve their goals?",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200248,"Outspoken radio icon Howard Stern destroyed liberals’ call for gun control on his radio show by using a chilling analogy.

Stern’s response about gun control came after the Orlando Islamic terrorist attack, where a radical jihadist walked into a Florida gay night club and shot about 100 people, leaving at least 49 dead.

“I’m so upset about Orlando and what went down,” Stern said, “but I can’t believe these people would come out afterward and their answer to Orlando is to take away guns from the public. It’s f***ing mindblowing to me.”

Stern used a detailed story of sheep and wolves to explain his analogical reasoning.

“Now, let’s say I walked up literally to a sheep herd, and they know that every night the wolves pick off a couple of them,” Stern said. “What if I went up to the sheep and I said, ‘You wanna have a shot at the wolves? I’m gonna give you a pistol. You can actually even the playing field with these wolves whose fangs are out — you could shoot them and save your family.’”

Then, taking on the role of the passive sheep, Stern said “Well, baaaa. We’re not gonna do that. We don’t want to fight baaaack. He didn’t hurt uuuus. He only hurt the family down the streeet. And the shepherd will protect us, the sheepdogs are out there, they’ll protect us.”

“Well, the sheepdogs are protecting you, but some of them can’t be with you all day,” Stern said in a hypothetical reply. “There’s not a sheepdog for every citizen, and a wolf is still eating one of you every night.”

VIDEO:",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198244,"2 journalists are causing a stir online by suggesting Hillary Clinton’s latest fainting episode may result in her getting replaced. First, David Shuster, who claims to have information from a democrat party operative.

Clarification from dem operatives @HillaryClinton pneumonia: Expect emergency DNC meeting to CONSIDER replacement. #HillarysHealth — David Shuster (@DavidShuster) September 11, 2016

And also Clinton insider, Dick Morris who reports: Hillary would not have left the 9/11 ceremony unless she absolutely had to. She has always made 9/11 her signature issue and, amid concerns about her health, she would not have left unless she had no alternative. As she got into her car, she appeared to faint, losing a shoe as she was virtually carried into the car. She won’t withdraw unless he has to. But anxious Democrats will be so worried if she fails to be able to campaign and her health escalates as an issue that they might bring unbearable pressure on her to step aside.

If that happened, the Party rules state that the Democratic National Committee — two from each state — would be empowered to nominate a new presidential candidate. Tim Kaine would have no special claim on the nomination and, if there were a switch in the presidential nominee, would remain as the VP candidate. Democrats are getting more and more nervous about Hillary’s campaign now that she has blown her August lead and settled into a tie with Trump. If she is sidelined for much of the campaign, their worry is likely to reach a crescendo.In any event Hillary will now be forced to release her medical records, a step she has heretofore resisted and perhaps submit to a new examination. Be careful what you wish for. Biden would be a lot harder to beat than Hillary.

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198452,"The FBI have announced that they will no longer release evidence related to the Las Vegas massacre, claiming that it is not in the public interest to do so. In yet another obvious attempt at covering-up the truth about what happened in Vegas, the FBI are now refusing to provide any",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200268,"Bernie Sanders was just got dozing off at a Memorial Day ceremony. Or, maybe he was praying? Okay, maybe he was just looking down at the exact moment this picture was snapped, but being the socialist commie character he is, should he receive the benefit of the doubt? We report, you decide! Check it",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198488,"Trump’s got enough trouble with subversive Democrats. But the real threat to his presidency comes from traitors within the Republican Party.

According to: christiannewsalerts

The president relies on the expertise of long-time government officials, some of whose loyalties lie elsewhere.Since adding H.R. McMaster to the administration, Trump and the national security advisor have had their ideological differences. Now, Breitbart has revealed that McMaster was recently employed at a think tank with ties to Hungarian billionaire George Soros, one of the biggest opponents of President Trump’s agenda.

From September 2006 to February 2017, H.R. McMaster was a member and senior consulting fellow at the International Institute for Strategic Studies (IISS), a think tank with offices in Washington, D.C., Singapore, and Bahrain.According to its website, IISS has a mission “to promote the adoption of sound policies to further global peace and security and maintain civilized international relations.” However, IISS’s stances on major foreign policy issues are at odds with the platform on which Donald Trump ran his campaign.Most notably, IISS supported the Obama administration-brokered Iran nuclear deal and has denied charges that the Iranian government has violated its end of the agreement. This is a deal which President Trump has continually denounced.

Breitbart reports that the Iran deal bans US nuclear inspectors from examining Iran’s nuclear sites and lifts sanctions that will ultimately give them as much as $$150 billion–money that Obama admitted would likely be used to finance terrorism.Not surprisingly, Trump called the Iran deal “the worst deal ever,” as observed by The Hill. Nevertheless, the president re-certified the deal last month, contrary to his repeated promise on the campaign trail to nullify it. McMaster’s presence in the White House gives further understanding as to perhaps why President Trump has made such a great reversal on the Iran issue. McMaster was one of the leading voices in Trump’s circle of advisors urging the president to re-certify the nuclear deal.

McMaster has also been accused of purging the Trump administration of officials who follow the president’s lead of taking a tough stance against Iran. Just recently, McMaster removed Trump aide Ezra Cohen-Watnick from the National Security Council, The Jerusalem Post reports. Cohen-Watnick is one of the most notable anti-Iran hawks in the White House.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198449,"The District of Columbia’s hostility to the Second Amendment is well known. But while the nation’s capital may have limitless hostility to the nation’s Constitution, apparently its will to fight — in one area, at least — is spent.

WTOP in Washington reports that city officials have decided they will not try to convince the United States Supreme Court to reinstate DC’s restrictions on carrying concealed weapons, effectively restoring a big part of the right to keep and bear arms:

D.C. Attorney General Karl Racine was joined by D.C. Mayor Muriel Bowser, Police Chief Peter Newsham and D.C. Council member Charles Allen at the announcement of the decision Thursday at One Judiciary Square.The U.S. Court of Appeals for the District of Columbia Circuit is expected to issue an order that strikes down the D.C. law that requires applicants who want a conceal-carry permit to prove they have “good reason” to carry a firearm in public. Under the law, reasons to get a concealed carry license might include a personal threat, or a job that requires a person to carry or protect cash or valuables.

The law suffered a setback in July when a divided three-judge panel of the U.S. Court of Appeals for the District of Columbia Circuit ruled that it infringes on residents’ Second Amendment rights. Gun rights advocates have long argued that D.C.’s law is unconstitutional and that it makes it difficult for people to defend themselves.D.C. officials later asked the Court of Appeals to rehear the case as a full court. However, in a brief order last week, the court said it would not reconsider the ruling, leaving the city’s attorney general with no choice but to take the case to the U.S. Supreme Court or back down.

As a result, DC residents interested in exercising their concealed-carry rights could begin applying for permits as soon as next Thursday.But the best part of this story? Apparently being good little lefty foot soldiers, they feared that if they fought it out at the Supreme Court and lost, the result would be a net disaster for gun grabbers by creating a precedent to strike down concealed carry restrictions throughout the rest of the country (according to the National Rifle Association, eight other states plus Puerto Rico place substantial restrictions on carry permits). Better to let our residents have their Second Amendment rights back than risk way more Americans getting their Second Amendment rights back, the thinking apparently went.

The gun grabbers were right to be pessimistic about their chances. Justice Anthony Kennedy is no conservative and far from reliable, but he voted the right way on the last major gun rights case to reach the Supreme Court, DC v. Heller. Now with Neil Gorsuch replacing the late, great Antonin Scalia on SCOTUS, the challenge almost certainly would have resulted in a fresh flood of liberal tears. And with rumors swirling that Kennedy could retire and an actual, consistent conservative jurist could be sitting in his chair by the time oral arguments began, it’s no wonder they didn’t risk it.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199153,"Last week, the country received the shocking news of Senator John McCain’s cancer diagnosis just a couple of days before he underwent brain surgery to remove the tumor. This intensive procedure poses an obvious risk to the one’s ability to think and perform critical tasks for at least a period of time after the surgery. For this reason, Republicans thought that McCain would resign from his Senate position.

However, just a few short days after major surgery, he returned to D.C. to get immediate revenge on everyone who counted him out with the cancer diagnosis, with his what he did as soon as he showed up to stick it to America.

Had there been term limits in place, McCain would have been out of office long before now. That couldn’t stop him and neither can brain cancer from getting his twisted way in Washington. He doesn’t exactly have the best track record when it comes to fulfilling his oath to our country which has led to many innocent people’s deaths in the Middle East and even in our military. People weren’t celebrating his cancer diagnosis because of this but were saying that it’s probably a good time for him to step down and focus on his health, rather than his backhanded plans for America.

Cancer was apparently a mere inconvenience for 80-year-old McCain who can’t and won’t admit that his time in Congress is long expired. He’s the poster boy for the need for term limits but his lust for power and control as one of the biggest RINO’s in Washington can’t be stopped. He underwent surgery to remove a blood clot on Friday at Mayo Clinic Hospital in Phoenix, as part of his treatment immediately following his glioblastoma diagnosis. According to the American Brain Tumor Association, this particularly aggressive tumor forms in the tissue of the brain and spinal cord.

Just three short days later, he announced his return and the reason for leaving his hospital bed so quickly was so that he could be part of key votes on repealing Obamacare and passing sanctions on Russia, Daily Mail reported.

“Senator McCain looks forward to returning to the United States Senate tomorrow to continue working on important legislation, including health care reform, the National Defense Authorization Act and new sanctions on Russia, Iran and North Korea,” a statement issued by his office late Monday said. McCain is no fan of President Trump’s as has been proven frequently, most recently from his actual hospital bed when he sent the Commander-in-Chief a salty message:",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198947,"Democratic presidential candidate Hillary Clinton says Donald Trump’s rhetoric is ‘ugly and divisive’, following scenes of chaos and clashes in Chicago. Speaking at a town hall event in Cleveland on Saturday, Clinton says Trump is starting a fire he cannot control by encouraging violence and aggression. Trump’s rally in Chicago was cancelled on Friday, leading to clashes between protesters and supporters.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199877,"Rep. Maxine Waters (D-CA) went too far yesterday when she stood on the House floor and spewed the most ANTI-American rant ever said by a U.S Representative. Not only did she imply that white people are not as patriotic as black people, she also admitted that she is using her role",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199024,"Project Veritas has been a font of great video investigations. Here’s another one.

James O’Keefe uncovers the planning of actions against Trump inauguration events, around the hashtag #DisruptJ20. This sounds a lot like terrorism. From Right Scoop:

The DC Anti-Fascist Coaltion is trying to shut down events at the inauguration. They set up a meeting at the infamous Comet Pizza, the subject of the Pizzagate controversy. They talked specifically about targeting the Deploraball being held at the National Press Club on January 19th.

They discussed plans to set off butyric acid bombs (a stink bomb) into the HVAC system to stop the Ball to drive people out into the street and the cold. Inhalation of butyric acid can also cause burning in the throat, coughing and labored breathing. Project Veritas turned over their information to the police. The FBI is now investigating…

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199579,"Fox News reports:

Steve Bannon is on his way out at the White House – but the fiery, anti-establishment conservative who helped Donald Trump win the presidency says he getting ready to wage his populist campaign from the outside.“If there’s any confusion out there, let me clear it up: I’m leaving the White House and going to war for Trump against his opponents — on Capitol Hill, in the media, and in corporate America,” Bannon told Bloomberg on Friday.

The outgoing White House chief strategist spent just over a year formally working for the president. On Friday, his job with Trump came to an end.“White House Chief of Staff John Kelly and Steve Bannon have mutually agreed today would be Steve’s last day,” White House Press Secretary Sarah Sanders said. “We are grateful for his service and wish him the best.”

Breitbart announced Friday that Bannon returned as executive chairman of the populist news site he once ran that rails against the political establishment in both parties. He chaired its evening editorial meeting Friday, the site said.

“The populist-nationalist movement got a lot stronger today,” said Breitbart News Editor-in-Chief Alex Marlow. “Breitbart gained an executive chairman with his finger on the pulse of the Trump agenda.”As soon as Bannon started back at his job at Breitbart Friday, President Trump tweeted him a hearty congratulations saying Steve Bannon will be a tough and smart new voice at @BreitbartNews…maybe even better than ever before. Fake News needs the competition!”",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
201762,"Famous Hollywood Actor James Woods, a conservative, just shared a video about Arkansas and Highway 265. It details what happened more than 40 years ago, and the details spell “doom” For Hillary Clinton’s 2016 presidential campaign. Watch (below) the shocking details of Kathy Shelton, the 12-year old girl from Arkansas, who",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200076,"one extensive investigation, countries Like Saudi Arabia that donated to the Clinton Foundation saw a marked increase in State Department-approved arms sales. The timing as well as the magnitude of these sales – some were unprecedented — is highly suspicious, and if part of an explicit “pay-to-play” arrangement, would be evidence of public “corruption.

-In many cases, it appears that the enormous sums raised by the Clinton Foundation did not even come close to achieving their “humanitarian” objectives, or worse – in cases like Haiti — caused even greater problems for the recipient countries. The Clintons, according to a confidential report prepared by their own daughter, Chelsea, apparently did little to actively monitor Clinton Foundation projects, facilitating chronic abuse and mismanagement. There is also compelling evidence that the Clintons failed to report contributions – and even improperly established the Clinton Foundation as a “charity” – in violation of federal and local laws. And yet the Clintons continue to extol their foundation work as if it were beyond reproach

The US government often establishes amicable partnerships with foreign governments that involve an explicit or tacit exchange of “benefits.” That’s what good diplomacy is all about. In addition, public officials sometimes conduct charitable work in their own name even while holding office. But in this case, through a private intermediary beholden only to Clinton and her fellow “charitable” board members, the former First Lady appears to have hijacked public authority to negotiate illicit foreign policy “side-deals” outside established channels. These arrangements may have skewed US national interests while allowing her – and the Foundation — to profit from the transactions. If so, she and those who knowingly facilitated such deals broke the law.

What can the public do? The House GOP is already circulating a letter demanding that the FBI, the State Department and other federal agencies fully investigate the Clinton Foundation and its operations prior to the November election. There also needs to be a stronger push from major media organizations – many of them far too friendly to Clinton’s candidacy — to turn up the heat on these same agencies. It may turn out that Clinton, in the end, will be cleared of criminal wrongdoing, just as she was in Email-Gate. But voters have the right to know now – not later — the full extent, gravity and consequences of Clinton’s efforts to build a policy world unto herself without the participation of the taxpayers and their legitimate representatives.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198586,"Bernie Sanders is still way behind Hillary Clinton in the Democratic delegate count, but now that deficit is smaller by one.

The Colorado Democratic party admitted that Sanders won one more delegate than originally calculated, due to misreporting from 10 precinct locations at the March 1 caucus.

Although Sanders originally won the caucus 54 percent to 45 percent, capturing 38 delegates compared to Clinton’s 28, new projections show than Sanders would now win 39 delegates and Clinton would only be awarded 27, upping his margin of victory. Every little bit helps Sanders overcome Clinton’s lead.

With the shift in pledged delegate count, even if Clinton wins all of Colorado’s superdelegates, the Vermont senator will, at worst, finish with a split decision among the 78 delegates at stake. If Sanders wins one more superdelegate he will win the state’s delegation.

The Denver Post reported that the state party found out about the error a week after the caucus but did not initially correct the public record.

According to Democratic Party Chairman Rick Palacio, the error occurred on caucus night at Byers Middle School in Denver when a volunteer punched the wrong tallies for ten precincts into the party’s interactive voice response system.

This update to the Democrats’ delegate count comes as the Colorado GOP faces criticism from Donald Trump for their system of awarding national delegates.

RELATED: BREAKING: Michelle Obama Just SLAMMED Hillary In A BIG WAY!",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199218,"March 2017 Judge Andrew Napolitano was temporarily suspended from Fox News. He claimed that sources had told Fox News that the GCHQ had spied on Trump. The Judge returned to Fox News a few weeks later.

The Guardian published an article on April 13, 2017, that confirms what Napolitano said. The carefully worded article attempts to convince readers the spying was “incidental.” However, they admit that the GCHQ and other agencies shared information about Trump and his associates. The Guardian wrote:

OVER THE NEXT SIX MONTHS, UNTIL SUMMER 2016, A NUMBER OF WESTERN AGENCIES SHARED FURTHER INFORMATION ON CONTACTS BETWEEN TRUMP’S INNER CIRCLE AND RUSSIANS, SOURCES SAID. THE EUROPEAN COUNTRIES THAT PASSED ON ELECTRONIC INTELLIGENCE – KNOWN AS SIGINT – INCLUDED GERMANY, ESTONIA AND POLAND. AUSTRALIA, A MEMBER OF THE “FIVE EYES” SPYING ALLIANCE THAT ALSO INCLUDES THE US, UK, CANADA AND NEW ZEALAND, ALSO RELAYED MATERIAL, ONE SOURCE SAID. ANOTHER SOURCE SUGGESTED THE DUTCH AND THE FRENCH SPY AGENCY, THE GENERAL DIRECTORATE FOR EXTERNAL SECURITY OR DGSE, WERE CONTRIBUTORS.

The Guardian Article then craftily continues in their report by saying:

IT IS UNDERSTOOD THAT GCHQ WAS AT NO POINT CARRYING OUT A TARGETED OPERATION AGAINST TRUMP OR HIS TEAM OR PROACTIVELY SEEKING INFORMATION. THE ALLEGED CONVERSATIONS WERE PICKED UP BY CHANCE AS PART OF ROUTINE SURVEILLANCE OF RUSSIAN INTELLIGENCE ASSETS. OVER SEVERAL MONTHS, DIFFERENT AGENCIES TARGETING THE SAME PEOPLE BEGAN TO SEE A PATTERN OF CONNECTIONS THAT WERE FLAGGED TO INTELLIGENCE OFFICIALS IN THE US.

Did you see that? They said, “It is understood…” The entire paragraph is qualified as a report on how people “understand” the situation. They want you to “understand” it, their way. You just read the FACTS above their SPIN. How could anyone misunderstand unless they want you to?

Ladies and Gentlemen this is a carefully crafted piece of Propaganda. It is meant to tell you that the GCHQ spied on Trump, and then make you believe that the GCHQ didn’t really spy on Trump!

The truth is right under our noses and these Globalists are intentionally misleading millions of people. We now know the truth. Not only did the GCHQ Spy on Trump, so did several other countries and The Guardian just admitted it citing their “sources.”

Please, PLEASE Share this on Facebook, Tweet it on Twitter, and drop it on Gab.ai. We all deserve to know the TRUTH!",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198601,"…an estimated 33,000 more unborn babies would lose their lives to abortion every year in America, according to the Guttmacher Institute, a pro-abortion research group. Currently, about 1.1 million unborn babies are aborted legally in the U.S. each year. Graham warned Christians about this new radical pro-abortion goal on Friday.

“Some political officials—liberals who call themselves progressives—are seeking to overturn the Hyde Amendment,” he wrote. “We need political leaders who will, along with citizens who value life, stand up for the most vulnerable and voiceless among us.” Graham did not mention or endorse any presidential candidate in his message. Instead, he urged Christians to research candidates’ positions and compare them to biblical teachings before they vote. “I’m not telling anyone who to vote for, but I am speaking out on issues that impact all of us as Americans,” he wrote.

“I’m encouraging Christians to look at the facts, line them up to what the Bible says and their faith, and vote on November 8. Research the candidates and the party platforms and see what they stand for. … Christians can bring change for the good in this country if we will stand up and let our voice be heard.”

his fall, Graham is stopping in all 50 states to host prayer rallies and encourage Christians to vote and pray for the United States. So far, his Decision America Tour has attracted tens of thousands of Christians to their state capitals to pray for issues like abortion, religious freedom and other concerns facing America.

source",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199196,"Throughout his eight years in the White House, Barack Hussein Obama has made it clear that he has no respect for the U.S. military. Donald Trump combatted this during his presidential campaign by making the military a priority, which is partly why millions of people got behind him. Now, Navy Admiral",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200607,"…the lying media attacking one another and crying they’re not being biased enough against him!

Sadly, Mr. Lauer’s widely panned handling of the candidate forum was not an aberration. Judging by polls showing that voters trust Mr. Trump more than Ms. Clinton, as well as other evidence, it reflects a common shorthand for this election articulated by NFL quarterback Colin Kaepernick last week: “You have Donald Trump, who’s openly racist,” he said. Then, of Ms. Clinton: “I mean, we have a presidential candidate who’s deleted emails and done things illegally and is a presidential candidate. That doesn’t make sense to me, because if that was any other person, you’d be in prison.” In fact, Ms. Clinton’s emails have endured much more scrutiny than an ordinary person’s would have, and the criminal case against her was so thin that charging her would have been to treat her very differently.

They go on to provide a bunch of excuses as to why she’s completely innocent and pure as the driven snow.

“Anyone who claims that Ms. Clinton should be in prison accuses, without evidence, the FBI of corruption or flagrant incompetence,” they say.

Here’s their closer:

Imagine how history would judge today’s Americans if, looking back at this election, the record showed that voters empowered a dangerous man because of . . . a minor email scandal. There is no equivalence between Ms. Clinton’s wrongs and Mr. Trump’s manifest unfitness for office.

There’s no equivalence between Donald Trump’s hurting peoples’ feelings with “mean words” and Hillary Clinton’s manifest unfitness for office due to her endless corruption.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
200189,"Law-abiding common sense Americans are mad.

And when law-abiding common sense Americans get mad they don’t burn down liquor stores.

No.

They create petitions demanding that the Federal Government officially recognize the Black Lives Matter (BLM) group as a terrorist organization.

And that petition has over 100,000 signatures.

Which means the White House must respond.

The petition is described as follows:

Terrorism is defined as “the use of violence and intimidation in pursuit of political aims.” This definition is the same definition used to declare ISIS and other groups, as terrorist organizations.

Black Lives Matter has earned this title due to its actions in Ferguson, Baltimore, and even at a Bernie Sanders rally, as well as all over the United States and Canada.

It is time for the pentagon to be consistent in its actions – and just as they rightfully declared ISIS a terror group, they must declare Black Lives Matter a terror group – on the grounds of principle, integrity, morality, and safety.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199473,"On Monday, presidential hopeful Donald Trump somehow managed to confuse 9/11 with the Slurpee-selling convenience store 7-Eleven.

You may be thinking to yourself: How could someone who wants to run our country confuse one of the most horrendous events in U.S. history for a convenience store? But then again, this is Trump we’re talking about.

One of the many people to call him out for his mistake was none other than actress Salma Hayek, who shut him down with a single tweet.

I am a dyslexic Mexican and English is my second language, however even I do not confuse 7/11 with 9/11. #DonaldTrump — Salma Hayek (@salmahayek) April 19, 2016

Take a bow for that one, Salma.

RELATED:Tupac Touches On Donald Trump’s ‘Greed’ In Rare 1992 Interview [Video]",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
202137,"A man from Texas whose life imprisonment sentence was commuted by former president Obama is now behind bars again after police officers caught him with over 2 pounds of cocaine following a car chase, states one report. The person, Robert M. Gill, 68, had been incarcerated in 1990 for cocaine and heroin distribution before Barack set him loose with some other non-violent prisoners n 2015, reported the San Antonio Express News.

While Obama was in charge of this country, he commuted 1,715 prison sentences which is more than any of his predecessors. Past Thursday, Gill reportedly met with his parole officers and went to the parking lot of a food market to purchase more than 2 pounds of cocaine.

He met with a person who gave him a black backpack that he put in his car That’s when a sheriff’s deputy in an undercover car tried to stop him. Gill, however, drove off and after a high-speed car chase he crashed into another car so the deputies were able to capture him.

Gill “related that he was going to sell the cocaine to make money and would be paying a female $$26,000 for the cocaine,” the affidavit said.

The police found his cocaine in the backpack and apprehended him, read the affidavit. Gill “related that he was going to sell the cocaine to make money and would be paying a female $$26,000 for the cocaine,” the affidavit said.

“I’m so disappointed to hear that he got arrested again,” said Ronald Schmidt, an attorney who helped Gill appeal his life sentence in the courts for the San Antonio newspaper. When signing his release, Obama said he did this “because you have demonstrated the potential to turn your life around. … Now it is up to you to make the most of this opportunity.”

Gill’s warden in jail also supported him, saying, “Robert has reformed and rehabilitated himself and poses no threat to the outside world.” Gill was charged with possession with intent to distribute over 500 grams of cocaine and was not allowed bail. If proven guilty, he faces a sentence of up to 40 years.

Be sure to let us know what you think of Obama’s decision to commute this man, and the aftermath of it. Comment in the section below and share this story on the social media to spread the truth.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199273,"Small foreign speaking firms often listed as source of payments, actual paychecks came from undisclosed third parties By all accounts, it was the most popular gala the Lady Taverners had ever held. Over 1,000 people packed the Park Lane Hilton in London on Oct. 30, 2009, with the crowd overflowing into",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
202159,"Anyone who has not been living under a rock the last 2-3 years, and has watched the number of Americans out of work rise to 94 million people without a job, a number that is just below 30% of our total population, knows this country is going over a cliff",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
198903,"Democratic presidential candidate Hillary Clinton said Friday on Morning Joe that she is sure that there are no more unpublished emails that could be damaging to her and her campaign.

Morning Joe host Mika Brzezinski asked Clinton about emails showing more cross-involvement between the Clinton Foundation and the State Department. Clinton Foundation donors made up a majority of the non-government individuals who met with Clinton while she was secretary of state.

“I think it’s really fair to take a look at the work that the Clinton Foundation has done and take the time to hear about it, which is what we’ve been doing,” Brzezinski said. “There is so much more you can do as president, obviously, and so I guess the question would be, are you certain that there are no emails or Foundation ties to […]

WATCH THE VIDEO ON NEXT PAGE >>>",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
199993,"It seems like every liberal in the country has chimed in on the Orlando terrorist attack but not to condemn the actual cause of the attack but rather to push their own personal gun control narrative.

Every objective observer knows that radical Islam is to blame for this crime and that should be our focus.

But Democrats aren’t exactly the most rational people in the world and they would rather talk about more minor issues that shift the conversation away from being honest about Islam.

That is exactly what Hillary Clinton did and it makes you wonder why she thinks she has any business running for president.

Hillary suddenly cares about what the FBI thinks. Weird.

If the FBI is watching you for suspected terrorist links, you shouldn’t be able to just go buy a gun with no questions asked. — Hillary Clinton (@HillaryClinton) June 13, 2016

Of course, that brings up one pretty major issue.

@HillaryClinton if the FBI is investigating you you shouldn't be able to run for president. Period. — Jamie Lono (@JamieLono) June 13, 2016

Nailed it!

Hillary Clinton is one of the biggest hypocrites on the planet so obviously this shouldn’t come as a surprise but sometimes she says things that are just too ridiculous to ignore.

So apparently the FBI investigating a potential terrorist is a big deal but the FBI investigating people who possibly broke the law isn’t.

Got it.

No double standard there.

Just another example of Hillary living one way and then demanding the rest of the world live another.

Again, our thoughts and prayers are with all the people affected by this horrible tragedy in Orlando.",americantoday.news,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
195070,"on •

An elderly man with no criminal record ended up harassed and arrested by a power tripping cop for no apparent reason, other than because she wanted to arrest someone, and drove around until she found a suitable victim. Her excuse?… Read More ›",newswire-24.com,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
195072,"on •

The Chinese government and banks will finance Chinese companies to build $$45.6 billion worth of energy and infrastructure projects in Pakistan over the next six years, according to new details of the deal seen by Reuters news agency on Friday.

China and Pakistan, are both nuclear-armed powers,and consider each other as close allies Their military and economic ties are cemented by their common enemy India, and both nations have a desire to fight against U.S. influence in South Asia.

Documents seen by Reuters news agency show that China is going to invest around $$33.8 billion in numerous energy related projects and around $$11.8 billion in Pakistan’s infrastructure development.

The deal says the Chinese government and banks, including China Development Bank, and the Industrial and Commercial Bank of China Ltd one of China’s ‘Big Four’ state-owned commercial banks, will loan funds to Chinese companies, who will invest in the projects as commercial ventures.

Major Chinese companies investing in Pakistan’s energy sector will include China’s Three Gorges Corp, which built the world’s biggest hydro power scheme, and China Power International Development Ltd.

Under the CPEC agreement, $$15.5 billion worth of coal, wind, solar and hydro energy projects will come online by 2017 and add 10,400 megawatts of energy to the national grid.

Conclusion

So the total route from gwadar to Kashgar is 3217km vis a vis 18000km through sea

It takes close to 2 months per trip between china and Gulf

While at max if the rail link is made it will take few days.if road route than almost 1 week

if pipeline than 1-2days

Hence Gwadar in return will offer China

*Cheaper Route

*6-7 times shorter route

*will reach china within 1 week be it rail or road vis a vis 2 months through sea

It will offer Pakistan

*Development of Balochistan and specially Gwadar

*Possible naval base of PLAN beyond 2020.hence more secure coastline of Pakistan

*Economic Boom to Pakistan

Tajikistan and central Asia

*Tajikistan already has completed construction on there side of road

*Has also expressed willingness to join the Gwadar-kashgar railway line.

*More central Asian countries can get access to Gwadar against through Tajikistan

Share this: Twitter

Facebook

Reddit

Pinterest

Google

Like this: Like Loading...

Categories: Business, Politics",newswire-24.com,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
195057,"on •

As a never-ending stream of spy scandals put Washington-Berlin relations under unprecedented strain, Germans are increasingly asking themselves whether the country should be blindly following the US. After all Germany is still waiting for its gold bullion currently being stored… Read More ›",newswire-24.com,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
195053,"on •

http://nos.nl/artikel/2016195

COPS POINT OF VIEW:

http://www.rtlnieuws.nl/nieuws/binnenland/video-politie-overmeestert-gewapende-man-nos-studio

Armed Man Demands Airtime On Dutch Broadcaster

A building belonging to broadcaster NOS is evacuated in Hilversum after a man with a gun demands airtime.



Dutch national broadcaster NOS temporarily went off air after an man armed with a gun entered the building and demanded airtime.

The RTL press agency said a building belonging to NOS in Hilversum was cleared on Thursday evening after the man walked into the building.

He was later arrested at the scene, the agency added.

NOS broadcast an onscreen message which read: “In connection with circumstances, no broadcast is available at this time.”

There were no immediate reports of injuries.

http://news.sky.com/story/1417563/armed-man-demands-airtime-on-dutch-broadcaster

For everyone who can’t speak Dutch, here’s what was said (a quick summary by me):

Man: “I think it’s really nice you… Ehm, you’re staying calm and that’s very nice of you.”

Doorman: “I’m just as nervous as you are. Between us men, at home I’ve also got, I’d really, I’d really like to go home. So I’m not going to be standing in your way.”

Man: “Yes I understand.”

Doorman: “With the risk…”

Man: “Right.”

Doorman: “And I’m glad you want me to go home tonight as well. We have to make sure that you.. ehm. This [the hostage situation] has been created for a reason.”

Man: “Yes, of course. – pause, moves a bit across the room – I hope that… Would you please take a seat over there – points – for later when I can start [the live broadcast]. I can promise you nothing will happen to you, but ehm, it’s different when I’m alone here. They’re [the police] probably already standing outside. As far as I know, ehm, the things I will be saying… they are worldnews. We are, well, hired by Intelligence Agencies and ehm, there we’ve come across things which question modern society and those we’ll be taking public now.”

Doorman: “Mhm.”

Man: “So that’s why I said, we’re not that bad people. We’re doing it for the ordinary citizen as well. But that’s why it’s possible people from above [higher-ups] are saying to whomever: “Just kill him, nobody can know about this.” And if I’m sitting here alone, then ehm, it’s very likely they’ll go in and shoot me down.”

Doorman: “I uhm, I don’t know, I assume the director ehm… I just really hope that, even if I’m sitting there…”

Man: “I promise that… You can shake my hand on it srsly dude?”

Doorman: “-something I didn’t understand- …you don’t take me with you.”

Man: “No, no, of course. I’d just like you… I would appreciate it if you would to sit there, the chance is smaller they’ll undertake such an operation if you stay here.”

Doorman: “Right, like that you mean.”

Man: “Yes. When my speech is over then… I will just let you go then.”

Doorman: “Alright but when you’re done, you’ll be going outside with me I believe?”

Man: “No I think I’ll let you go first. I will let myself get arrested, you can go outside then. -Getting anxious/nervous, moving around- This is taking too long.”

Doorman: “Ehm, I believe.. Can you hear me? [talking into his earpiece I think]. Anyway, I think you’ve got a link online.”

Man: “But is there a connect. This is taking too long.”

Doorman: “You’ve heard just like I that the mic works.”

Man: “Yes the mic works but I need to know we’re live on TV. And I’m not getting anything through from ehm…”

Doorman: “Yes, but ehm, you said you can only hear them. They can’t here you, you see? You’re standing here with the camera and the red light on it is on.”

Man: “Yes but I heard them say the mic works… -looking to the side- There’s the police already.”

Doorman: “I… Can I walk outside?”

Man: “Later, OK. When the speech is over.” – Holds hand up toward police – Stay… What are you doing, sir.”

And then the police walks in and he drops the gun.

Edit : Authorities have released some (as of yet) unconfirmed information. The armed man is supposedly a student at the TU Delft (a Dutch university). Supposedly the suspect has lost his parents recently .

: Authorities have released some (as of yet) unconfirmed information. The armed man is supposedly a student at the TU Delft (a Dutch university). . Edit2 : Rumors about the mans identity are being spread, nothing confirmed as of yet.

: Rumors about the mans identity are being spread, nothing confirmed as of yet. Edit3 : Police has confirmed the suspect is a 19 year old male, currently living in The Netherlands.

: Police has confirmed the suspect is a 19 year old male, currently living in The Netherlands. Edit4 : I just love the fact that even with all this happening, the Dutch news broadcast ends with the weather forecast as they always do. Oddly comforting.

: I just love the fact that even with all this happening, the Dutch news broadcast ends with the weather forecast as they always do. Oddly comforting. Edit5: Thanks /u/marijnfs for the generous Bitcoin tip! It’s my first ever, pretty excited about that!

http://www.np.reddit.com/r/worldnews/comments/2u42dj/armed_man_demands_airtime_on_dutch_broadcaster/

Share this: Twitter

Facebook

Reddit

Pinterest

Google

Like this: Like Loading...

Categories: Gun control, News mix",newswire-24.com,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
375954,"on •

Sounds like a Yank with good manners to me….

Ukraine will regret the day they allowed Victoria pass out bread Nuland from the USA State Dept in their country…Putin is playing this like a master chess player that has countered every move knowing Kiev does not have the staying power to go the distance even with more IMF loans…After Kiev defaults on all the IMF loans they will have to sell-off what’s not been stolen for pennies on the dollar….There is no way the people in East will ever trust the butchers in Kiev that started killing them from day one…Only question is will or when will the separatist ever go from defence to going on the offence and take back Kiev….Kiev is already blocking military age men from leaving the country and drafting men because no one wants to go commit suicide in the East for the lying Porko…

Share this: Twitter

Facebook

Reddit

Pinterest

Google

Like this: Like Loading...

Categories: News mix, Ukraine Crisis",newswire-24.com,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
195066,"on •

“Go Hard Like Vladimir Putin“, a rap by two Africans living in Russia, this track has been viewed over a million times, and a large number of Russians are uploading their own versions to social media websites.

He’s the Russian villain in the eyes of the West, targeted by economic sanctions and by Prince Charles comparing him to Hitler. However Vladimir Putin’s popularity among Russians continues to rise – even as the value of the ruble is plunging and the country’s economy is on the verge of recession.

In short Russian nationalism, is thus so far trumping over any economic concerns.

Share this: Twitter

Facebook

Reddit

Pinterest

Google

Like this: Like Loading...

Categories: News mix, Ukraine Crisis",newswire-24.com,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
195055,"Yanis Varoufakis

In the next hours and days, I shall be sitting in Parliament to assess the legislation that is part of the recent Euro Summit agreement on Greece. I am also looking forward to hearing in person from my comrades, Alexis Tsipras and Euclid Tsakalotos, who have been through so much over the past few days. Till then, I shall reserve judgment regarding the legislation before us. Meanwhile, here are some first, impressionistic thoughts stirred up by the Euro Summit’s Statement.",newswire-24.com,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
195069,"on •

According to my Ukrainian mate, special charter flights began arriving a few days ago with men dressed in civilian clothes each carrying bulky NATO issue kit bags, at Boryspil International Airport , 29 km east of Kyiv/Kiev.

Speculation is growing among the local ethnic Russians population that American mercenaries have been deployed to Donetsk after videos emerged of unidentified armed men in the streets of the eastern Ukrainian city.

At least two videos published on YouTube earlier this week show burly, heavily armed soldiers with no insignia in the city, which has been gripped by pro-Moscow protests.

Both the videos which purport to show ‘Blackwater’ mercenaries in Donetsk were uploaded last Monday, with their descriptions written in Russian.

Blackwater!’Since the videos emerged, Twitter has been alive with speculation that mercenaries linked to Blackwater, now known as Academi, are active in Ukraine, helping to prop up the embattled new pro-western government.

Other media/news reports have speculated that these chaps have beeen sent into regions of Eastern and Southern Ukraine where Russian-speaking and ethnic Russian groups are posing to be a regional successionist threat to the new de-facto government of Ukraine.

Major figures including John Ashcroft, the former Attorney General, and former NSA chief Bobby Ray Inman, stated that if Blackwater are present in Ukraine, it would make most sense for them to be deployed in the country’s east and south, where pro-Russian protesters raised the Russian flag over the regional parliament last Saturday.

Share this: Twitter

Facebook

Reddit

Pinterest

Google

Like this: Like Loading...

Categories: Ukraine Crisis",newswire-24.com,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
195056,"on •

Thanks to the power of the internet, the foreign mercenary filmed on Azov Battalion video has been identified as Instagram user swampychris30. The rent-a-murderer quickly responded to being identified by deleting the account, but one can still look him up… Read More ›",newswire-24.com,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
195059,"on •

A year later, it is deja vu all over again, when the same energy and geopolitical tensions (Europe, natural gas, etc) are once again at the frontline, and while the theater of combat may be different, the same key players… Read More ›",newswire-24.com,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
375961,"on •

Paul Craig Roberts – Next Economic Collapse & World War III & Paris Attack False Flag?

Economic Disaster Coming & Collapse In Oil Prices In 2015 Says Financial Expert

Share this: Twitter

Facebook

Reddit

Pinterest

Google

Like this: Like Loading...

Categories: Business, News mix",newswire-24.com,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
375957,"on •

As a never-ending stream of spy scandals put Washington-Berlin relations under unprecedented strain, Germans are increasingly asking themselves whether the country should be blindly following the US. After all Germany is still waiting for its gold bullion currently being stored in New York, I guess some friends are just to expensive to keep around.

Lets not forget that a few months ago US official Victoria Nuland was recorded saying “Fuck the EU” while discussing the crisis in Ukraine with the US ambassador to the country.

A recording of the tapped telephone conversation has posted online, see below.

It happened as the EU and US were in talks to end months of unrest in Ukraine between the opposition, who wanted the country to become closer to the West, and the government who turned down a deal with the EU late last year under Russian pressure.

Secondly the continuation of the spy scandals has put German elite in an “either/or” position, when they should either turn a blind eye on the current state of things and remain American protege or dash away from American chokehold.

Though US Secretary of State John Kerry has told German counterpart Frank-Walter Steinmeier that Washington and Berlin remain “great friends” despite the new spying scandal that rocked bilateral relations in recent two weeks, Germans themselves feel the friendship went wrong.Ever since the creation of the post-WWII West Germany in 1949, the country remained in the orbit of American foreign policy, not least because of a large number of American bases deployed in the country.

But as German intelligence agency the BND has found out, the Americans never calmed down and continued spying, this time sneaking documents of the investigation of NSA intelligence activities in Germany, as reprted by the German news magazine Der Spiegel.

Share this: Twitter

Facebook

Reddit

Pinterest

Google

Like this: Like Loading...

Categories: Business, Politics, Ukraine Crisis",newswire-24.com,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
195071,"on •

With a potential FEMA death camp being discovered in nearby Arizona and FEMA camp delivery trucks being spotted on the roadways in nearby New Mexico, it seems that America is reaching ‘the point of no return’. According to eyewitness reports,… Read More ›",newswire-24.com,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
195054,"on •

Horrible photographs and a video claim to show Islamic State turning captive Jordanian pilot into a fire ball as he is held inside a metallic cage, surrounded by fighters, Jordanian Government says pilot was killed on January 3.

This is one of the most horrific things I have ever seen, yet the West will continue to say ‘we are still engaging in airstrikes’ every day, pretending to fight back. This lunatic ideology needs an absolute shit storm thrown at them, not just little pussy airstrikes.

So in conclusion If you can’t hear the drums of war, you’re not listening. Jordan is about to escalate this battle to a level we have not seen. We have the US supporting the Saud Family so that we can Have precious Oil, And then the Saud Family Supports Wahabbis So they can remain in Power.

And then you have the Wahabbis supporting the Salafist ISIS because they are Sunni’s Fighting both Ottomans and Shia… I’ll be anxiously waiting to see how this all unfolds.

The Whole thing is a Cluster Fuck!

Click here to watch the execution video

Share this: Twitter

Facebook

Reddit

Pinterest

Google

Like this: Like Loading...

Categories: Syria",newswire-24.com,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
195068,"on •

A massive protest has gathered in front of PM David Cameron’s official London residence at 10 Downing Street , calling for his resignation. The rally follows the so-called Panama Papers leak, which among others exposed the offshore dealings of… Read More ›",newswire-24.com,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
375960,"on •

According to Russian separatist leader Igor Strielkov in recent interview with Russian Spring news http://rusvesna.su/news/1405676334, he claims all passengers were dead already prior to the missile strike on the plane, according to him only the pilots were alive before the aircraft was blown out of the sky, secondly he assumes it was some kind medical plane with dead bodies that were at least several days old. Thirdly, the plane was discovered with a large quantity of drugs, blood serum and other things, which is not typical for conventional airliner.

If this is true, then there is a lot more to this tragic event.

Anyway below is the Google translation from http://rusvesna.su/news/1405676334

Gunmen Igor answered questions on the fall of the Malaysian Boeing.

There is a version that the civilian plane was shot down by the Su-27.

“Information such is. But I still did not understand the situation until the end. Therefore, this version (like all others) is not the voice. “

“According to the people who collected the bodies, most of corpses -” stale “- people have died and several days ago. For complete accuracy of this information can not vouch – of course, you need forensic conclusion. “

– Someone else should fly a plane, leave that including it would be impossible. Version with a plane full of corpses, exciting, of course, but somehow can not see sense.

“First of all, not all people on the plane were dead before the fall.

Secondly, the plane was discovered a large quantity of drugs, blood serum and other things, which is not typical for conventional liner. It seems that there was a medical special-load.

Third, no not insist on anything (yet). Literally just now talked to two people personally collected the bodies immediately after the fall (both – of Shakhtersk and arrived at the scene in less than half an hour after the accident). With their words and write. They stressed that many corpses were “entirely bloodless” – as if the blood curled long before the disaster. Also noted the strongest and putrid smell, marked by many locals – this odor in any weather for half an hour could not be formed, and the weather was overcast yesterday, not too hot.

Fourth, himself with extreme suspicion concern to all kinds of “conspiracy theory”, but 18 of our soldiers poisoned chemistry in position in Semenovka, shooting family members of militias and other “small pleasures Svidomo patriots” have convinced me that the Ukrainian authorities are capable of any meanness.

Pilots, of course, were quite alive – the whole cabin (and the front end is well preserved) was literally flooded with their blood. “

A penny for your thoughts?

MH-17 that was flying over a war zone in Ukraine and crashed near the border with Russia. Even after dropping 33,000 feet and exploding on impact, film footage shows debris everywhere, huge chunks of plane thrown randomly around and human victims clearly recognizable. Yet to this day we are told the US government’s narrative that the plane that crashed in Shanksville, Pennsylvania on 9/11 evaporated into the thin air.

Share this: Twitter

Facebook

Reddit

Pinterest

Google

Like this: Like Loading...

Categories: News mix, Ukraine Crisis",newswire-24.com,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
195058,"on •

As you head off for your Presidents’ Day weekend, The Cable would just like to note that it’s now been over 72 hours since Secretary of State John Kerry reached out to Russian Foreign Minister Sergei Lavrov — without getting a call back. As The Cable reported earlier… Read More ›",newswire-24.com,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
195067,"on •

Horrible photographs and a video claim to show Islamic State turning captive Jordanian pilot into a fire ball as he is held inside a metallic cage, surrounded by fighters, Jordanian Government says pilot was killed on January 3. This is… Read More ›",newswire-24.com,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
195052,"on •

A massive protest has gathered in front of PM David Cameron’s official London residence at 10 Downing Street , calling for his resignation. The rally follows the so-called Panama Papers leak, which among others exposed the offshore dealings of Cameron’s late father. “Cameron must go!” and “Tories out!” read the placards held by the demonstrators.

Class War, Socialist Workers Party and Anonymous were among the crowds present. So anyway I decided to do what any good blogger would do and filmed as much as I could and give my readers an raw insight into the protest.

Some of the donors, MPs and high net worth business people who have supported David Cameron’s rise to power have links to the United Kingdom’s network of tax havens, the Panama leaks reveal.

Former Conservative MPs and six members of the House of Lords are among those with connections to companies on the books of the offshore law firm Mossack Fonseca.

The irony is that The British prime minister has been calling for reforms, recognising – along with other world leaders – that the system is too secret.

In 2012, Cameron criticised complex offshore structures saying it is “not fair and not right”. At a G8 summit in Enniskillen three years ago, he demanded more transparency, saying this would be better for business in the UK.

51.511390 -0.298512

London, UK Share this: Twitter

Facebook

Reddit

Pinterest

Google

Like this: Like Loading...

Categories: News mix, Politics",newswire-24.com,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
195062,"( 5.9.17 ) In today’s video, Chad Boukzam of AMTV reports on Trump’s Military Surge in Afghanistan. WATCH NOW!",amtvmedia.com,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
195061,THANK YOU SO MUCH!! WELCOME NEW SUBSCRIBERS👊🏻,amtvmedia.com,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
195060,"Trump Launches Preemptive Attack On Deep State

In today’s video, Chad Boukzam of AMTV reports on Trump Launches Preemptive Attack On Deep State. WATCH NOW!",amtvmedia.com,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
195065,"Massive Cyber Attack Test Run For Something Bigger?

The biggest global cyber attack in history traces directly back to the United States National Security Agency. With multiple warnings prior to this attack and America’s arch enemy Russia being hardest hit, was this an inside job conducted by U.S. Intelligence Services? The mainstream media will never reveal the truth and with the threat of World War 3 on the horizon, could this massive cyber attack just be a test run for something bigger?",amtvmedia.com,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
195064,"How to Survive with AMTV Bug Out Bag

In today’s video, Christopher Greene breaks down the AMTV Bug Out Bag in all its Glory!! Enter promo code ‘SURVIVE15’ for a Limited Time for 15% Off at checkout.",amtvmedia.com,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
195063,"The Russia PSYOP On America

In today’s video, Chad Boukzam of AMTV reports on The Russia PSYOP On America. WATCH NOW!",amtvmedia.com,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
